
<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42727 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> INTERSTATE AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     RF Envoy Views Mediation, Peace Initiatives for Nagorno-Karabakh </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944Q0159A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 27 Jan 94 pp 
1, 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944Q0159A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Vladimir Kazimirov, ambassador-at-large of </F>
the Russian Federation and special representative of the 
president of the Russian Federation for Nagornyy Karabakh, by 
Aydyn Mekhtiyev; place and date not given: "`The Main Thing Is 
To Prevent Internationalization of the Conflict'"] 
  [Text] 
  [Mekhtiyev] Vladimir Nikolayevich, the situation has once 
again deteriorated in the zone of the Armenia-Azerbaijan 
conflict in recent days. How might you evaluate the present 
situation in the region? 
  [Kazimirov] "Karabakh" has, unfortunately, on the vast 
territory of the former Soviet Union, and beyond, perhaps, 
become a byword for ethnic and territorial conflicts primarily 
in the sense of duration, unlimited brutality, and irrationality 
even. This was not only the first armed conflict on the 
territory of the USSR but has also been the most protracted and 
bloody. I would put among its salient features the following: 
ancient historical roots and the gradual growth of a focal--more 
precisely, multi-focal--power conflict into a large-scale war; 
its expansion far beyond Nagornyy Karabakh, up to the borders of 
other states, to the dangerous brink of internationalization, 
and the massive use of modern heavy arms, including aviation, 
tanks, and other armored equipment, artillery, and salvo-fire 
missile launchers, very often against populated localities and 
civilian targets, what is more. Large casualties among the 
peaceful population, mass flows of deported and displaced 
persons, refugees, broad economic, power, and transport 
blockades infringing the interests of other states also, and 
flagrant and mass violations of international humanitarian law. 
  All this makes simply imperative the need for a settlement 
of 
the Karabakh conflict, both speedy and lasting, what is more, 
which is possible now only with the active assistance and 
guarantees of the international community. These and other 
salient features of the conflict, including the parties' immense 
mutual distrust, irreconcilability, and inflexibility, and the 
general destabilization of the region are creating particular 
difficulties for an end to the bloodshed and a political 
settlement. Whence the need for impartial mediation and the 
limited nature of the peacemaking resources which may be engaged. 
  Russia's mediation efforts are continuing with all due 
persistence and in the most diverse forms. The president and 
foreign minister of the Russian Federation are constantly 
keeping this issue in their field of vision. Messages between 
heads of state are being exchanged, and there are telephone 
conversations with them and trips by the president of Russia's 
special representative to the conflict region. 
  A.V. Kozyrev's negotiations 18-20 January in Moscow with G. 
Gasanov and V. Papazyan, ministers of foreign affairs of 
Azerbaijan and Armenia respectively, and also with A. Gukasyan, 
representative of the leadership of Nagornyy Karabakh, were 
significant. A certain convergence of the positions of the 
antagonists on questions of the conclusion of an agreement on a 
complete cessation of military operations was noted. Mutual 
understanding concerning the intensive continuation of this work 
was reached. 
  The military situation in the conflict zone demands this 
also. We regret that the new spiral of military operations has 
entailed heavy losses on both sides. This is unforgivable, 
especially since the negotiating process confirms the 
possibility of a peaceful resolution of all problems of the 
conflict. 
  [Mekhtiyev] Nonetheless, could you describe in more detail 
the essence of the proposals that the leadership of the Russian 
Federation has addressed to the parties to the conflict? 
  [Kazimirov] Since June 1992 practically our efforts have 
been 
concentrated on the accomplishment of a fundamental task--an end 
to military operations, total and universal, by way of the 
conclusion of an agreement among all the antagonists. We believe 
that this is the key to a resolution of other problems born of 
the conflict. This is dictated not only by natural 
considerations of humanity but also by a whole number of 
pragmatic considerations. We are insisting on an immediate 
termination of military operations, liberation of the captured 
territories, and the lifting of the economic and transport 
blockade and also on conditions for the return of refugees to 
the places they have abandoned. All this would create favorable 
conditions for the transition to the parties' political 
settlement of the contentious issues, including the definition 
and specification of the mutually acceptable legal status of 
Nagornyy Karabakh. 
  I would recall that in April 1992 the parties to the 
conflict 
were offered an approximate outline of a two-stage settlement, 
which they received positively, on the whole. The expansion and 
intensification of the conflict in May-June 1992 held up the 
practical implementation of this plan of action and required 
additional measures on the part of the Russian mediator. New 
proposals of Russia aimed at de-escalating the conflict and 
normalizing the life of the peaceful population were handed over 
in June the same year. 
  Russia's mediation efforts were stepped up particularly as 
of 
the fall of 1992. In developing the Sochi agreement between the 
defense ministers of Azerbaijan and Armenia, which was of a 
military-technical nature, the parties were offered in October a 
draft political agreement on the principles and paths of a 
settlement in Nagornyy Karabakh. 
  [Mekhtiyev] Is the Russian Federation coordinating its 
peacemaking efforts with the United Nations and the CSCE's Minsk 
Group? Some observers are conjecturing that there are certain 
differences in approach to a settlement of this problem between 
Russia and the CSCE Minsk Group. 
  [Kazimirov] The activity of Russian diplomacy is closely 
linked with the peacemaking efforts of the international 
community. We are assigning the United Nations and the Security 
Council a particular role in a settlement and believe that it 
could grow. It is important that the Security Council and the UN 
secretary general have continued to keep events in this region 
in their field of vision. A mediation mission, which 
periodically visits Baku and Yerevan and also Stepanakert and 
Nakhichevan and conducts numerous meetings in Moscow, has been 
created especially for current business under the auspices of 
the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of Russia. Painstaking and quite 
diverse work is having to be performed along a broad front: 
first, directly with all the parties to the conflict, second, 
within the framework of the CSCE, which has created under its 
aegis the Minsk Nagornyy Karabakh Conference, and, third, 
individually with the participants in the Minsk Group and with 
United States, Italy, Sweden, and other states, including Turkey 
and Iran. 
  There are no fundamental differences, I believe, between 
Russia and the Minsk Group in the approaches to a resolution of 
the problem. At the same time the Russian Federation is paying 
far more attention than the Minsk Group to the question of the 
formulation of an effective mechanism of the termination of 
military operations and is the most active in the framing, 
study, and detailed elaboration of this question. We are for the 
removal of all obstacles to the opening of the Minsk Nagornyy 
Karabakh Conference. We are concentrating particular attention 
on measures that could exclude the possibility of a resumption 
of military operations in the future. The Russian Federation is 
proposing the most practicable mechanism of assurance of a 
stable armistice in the region--the use of a disengagement force 
as a guarantor of observance of the armistice. 
  [Mekhtiyev] Yes, indeed, Andrey Kozyrev, minister of foreign 
affairs of the Russian Federation, has put forward an 
initiative--giving Russian troops in the region of the 
Armenia-Azerbaijan conflict and other "flash points" of the 
former USSR the status of peacekeeping force under the aegis of 
the United Nations or the CSCE. But the whole problem, as far as 
I understand it, is that Russia has as yet been denied a mandate 
for such operations.... 
  [Kazimirov] It is a question wholly of the kind of 
peacekeeping resources that would be sufficient for dependably 
guaranteeing the armistice. If owing to the seriousness of the 
situation there could prove to be insufficient observers, the 
question of the use of a more effective means--a disengagement 
force--would arise. This could be a peacekeeping force of a 
third country, better, of several states, which would be capable 
of a multifaceted operation. Specifically, formations of 
European neutral countries with great experience of 
participation in peacekeeping operations along UN lines, 
Finland, Sweden, Austria, Switzerland, for example, could be 
used as the disengagement force. But the main, obligatory 
condition for the commitment to the region of a disengagement 
peacekeeping force is the consent of all the parties involved in 
this conflict. And after a dependable cease-fire has been 
established, of course. 
  [Mekhtiyev] The wording "neutral countries" unequivocally 
rules out, evidently, the possibility of participation in such 
an operation of such countries as Iran and Turkey, which have 
their own interests in the region? 
  [Kazimirov] I repeat that the main condition will be the 
consent of all the parties to the conflict. If at least one of 
these parties objects to the participation of any third country 
in the operation or is altogether completely opposed to the 
commitment of a peacekeeping force to the region, this cannot, 
naturally, be imposed by force. 
  [Mekhtiyev] But recent experience shows that the mere fact 
of 
the commitment of a peacekeeping force to some region of 
conflict without the elimination of the causes of the conflict 
itself does not always produce positive results. The commitment 
of peacekeeping forces in the Dniester region and South Ossetia, 
say, performed a stabilizing role, but there is another example 
also--the failure of the peacekeeping operation under the aegis 
of the United Nations in Somalia.... 
  [Kazimirov] Each conflict has its own specific features, and 
the means that are applicable for the resolution of one conflict 
are ineffective in another. An analogy should hardly be drawn 
between Somalia and the Karabakh conflict. The KSDL [Senior CSCE 
Officials Committee] will shortly be studying the question of 
the use of a peacekeeping force of the CSCE members. This is a 
complex issue: the problems of the mandate and the funding of a 
peacekeeping force within the framework of the CSCE and 
international supervision of its activity need to be resolved in 
balanced fashion. 
  [Mekhtiyev] What is the response of the parties to the 
conflict to the Russian plan for a peace settlement? 
  [Kazimirov] We have the impression that each party to the 
conflict is becoming increasingly aware of the need for the use 
of the most effective means which guarantee a nonresumption of 
hostilities. The parties to the conflict are now acknowledging 
in words that it does not have a military, power solution and 
are calling this war senseless. We believe that such 
affirmations are insufficient and are insisting that they 
advocate precisely a settlement exclusively by peaceful, 
negotiated means and bolster this by practical action. It is 
time for the state and political leaders to adopt on this score 
firm commitments to their peoples and the world community. 
  [Mekhtiyev] What topics were discussed in the course of your 
recent trip to Tehran? 
  [Kazimirov] The consultations in Tehran were held on the 
initiative of the Iranian side. We responded to this proposal 
for the simple reason that military operations are being 
conducted in direct proximity to the borders of this state. We 
share the concern being expressed in this connection in Iran and 
other countries of the region. We agreed in the course of 
negotiations with the Iranian leadership, therefore, that the 
internationalization of the Karabakh conflict, so-called 
creeping internationalization, that is, the enlistment of a 
variety of mercenaries, fighters for the faith, and so forth 
included, was impermissible. This is fraught with the danger of 
a gradual expansion of the scale of the combat operations. Our 
states should aspire to constructive cooperation. 
  [Mekhtiyev] As we all know, in the past year Russia has 
harmonized its mediation efforts with Turkey, but one has the 
impression today that there is a trend toward a lessening of 
contacts on this subject between Moscow and Ankara.... 
  [Kazimirov] On the question of a peaceful settlement of the 
Armenia-Azerbaijan conflict we are prepared to continue 
cooperation with the Turkish side, and if the need arises, 
consultations will be conducted with the leadership of Turkey 
also. 
  [Mekhtiyev] Vladimir Nikolayevich, many attempts were made 
in 
the course of the past year to achieve a peaceful settlement of 
the Armenia-Azerbaijan conflict, but none of these attempts was 
crowned with success. How realistic, in your opinion, is the 
achievement of progress in the course of Russia's present 
mediation mission? 
  [Kazimirov] Attempts to resolve the Karabakh conflict at a 
stroke, at a rush, are doomed to fail--we have seen this 
repeatedly. This is why the mediation mission of the Russian 
Federation has put the emphasis on systematic work with the 
parties to the conflict requiring efforts and patience. A number 
of meetings of the president of Russia and of other Russian 
leaders with the presidents of Azerbaijan and Armenia and the 
leaders of Nagornyy Karabakh have been held. There have been 
visits by Foreign Minister Andrey Kozyrev to the conflict zone. 
There is every reason to believe that these peacemaking efforts 
will permit an easing of tension in the region. Russia's role in 
the process of a Karabakh settlement enjoys the positive 
appraisal of the parties to the conflict and recognition on the 
part of many states, including for objectivity and impartiality. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42728 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> INTERSTATE AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Role of Islam in Central Asia, Implications for Russia Assessed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944Q0160A Moscow MIROVAYA EKONOMIKA I MEZHDUNARODNYYE 
OTNOSHENIYA in Russian No 12, Dec 93 (signed to press 29 Oct 93) </F>



<TEXT>
pp 10-14 
<F P=103> 944Q0160A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MIROVAYA EKONOMIKA I MEZHDUNARODNYYE 
OTNOSHENIYA </F>

 Language: <F P=105>Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by D. Malysheva: "Central Asia--Muslim Challenge to </F>
Russia?"] 
  [Text] The planning of foreign policy in Central Asia 
reflects many of the contradictions of the present stage of 
Russia's development. The necessary unity and civic consensus 
with regard to development priorities in Russia itself have not 
been achieved yet, and the debates over Russia's national 
interests and foreign policy in Central Asia reveal two mutually 
exclusive approaches. The supporters of the first advocate the 
gradual curtailment of the Russian presence in Central Asia to a 
minimum and eventual "withdrawal" from the region. The others 
believe that Russia should act as the direct successor to the 
USSR as a guarantor of peace and stability in Central Asia, 
which is being threatened by "creeping Islamization," conflicts, 
and other problems. It is obvious that the aims of Russia's 
Central Asian policy will depend ultimately on the development 
option it chooses: Either it will be able to escape the confines 
of the old great-power and isolationist thinking, or 
neoconservative efforts could result in the use of the country's 
resources for the restoration of the imperial structure. 
  While Russia's development priorities and the aims of its 
Central Asian policy are being debated, serious geopolitical 
changes are taking place in the Asian region. The collapse of 
the USSR was followed here by the transformation of old centers 
of influence and the emergence of new ones with connections to 
different parts of the former Soviet Union and by the elevation 
of national and religious consciousness, combined with the 
surviving potential for territorial and ethnic conflicts--these 
tragic corollaries of the emergence of national states. 
  Events in Central Asia can have the most direct effect on 
Russian interests. Russia has maintained its presence on the 
border between the European Christian world and the gigantic 
zone of Islamic civilization. The primary concerns are the 
maintenance of peace and stability in Central Asia, the security 
of CIS borders in this region, the protection of the Russian 
population's interests, and the creation of conditions excluding 
a spontaneous mass exodus of the Russians from the region. The 
realization of Russia's vital interests in Central Asia will 
depend largely on its ability to overcome the imperial syndrome 
and establish equitable and mutually beneficial relations with 
the former fraternal republics. This should not, however, 
exclude firm and consistent responses to any challenges 
constituting a threat to Russian security. The question of the 
real or imaginary aspects of the "Islamic threat" to our country 
and its interests in Central Asia is of fundamental significance 
in this connection. 
  Assessments of religious and political affairs in the 
Central 
Asian region have always been extremely contradictory. Many 
Western analysts, especially French researchers, created the 
image of Central Asia as part of the "Islamic world," as a group 
of Muslim territories subjected in recent years to the concerted 
influence of fundamentalist ideas from neighboring Iran and 
Afghanistan. Other experts assert that Central Asia is not in 
any sense an "Islamic land" (dar al Islam), but simply one of 
the regions of the "Russified Soviet subculture" that gave rise 
to the specific phenomenon of "homo Sovieticus." The view of the 
new independent states in Central Asia as "Muslim" territories 
has been denied vigorously on the official level, mainly with 
references (particularly in Kazakhstan) to the polyethnic and 
polyreligious nature of these young republics and to the 
separation of church and state in these republics. In addition, 
there are some researchers (I. Rotar, for example) who believe 
that the events in Central Asia after the collapse of the USSR 
were not a religious revolution, but the "legalization of 
religious institutions" that had existed here throughout the 
Soviet period, and that their influence should not be 
overestimated. 
  There is some truth in all of these points of view, but the 
facts are always more complex than any theories and ideas, even 
the most intriguing ones. The development of the Central Asian 
states in the last few years has provided conclusive proof that 
"homo Sovieticus" is a myth, and that the majority of people in 
Central Asia, just as in other parts of the former Soviet Union, 
are not indifferent to their ethnic and religious roots. The 
specific forms of ethnic nationalism and religious rebirth are a 
different matter, however, and so are the specific 
roles--stabilizing and destabilizing--they might play in the 
establishment of the national state. 
  The intensity of processes of religious and cultural rebirth 
in Central Asia would be difficult to deny. There are external 
signs of this in the new mosques, the rising number of religious 
pilgrims, and the many religious celebrations. Islamic 
influences are apparent in the most diverse spheres: in everyday 
life, where religion is serving as a source of comfort and a 
point of reference in a rapidly changing and anxiety-ridden 
world; on the cultural level, in the search for ethnic and 
religious cultural roots and "origins" and the acknowledgement 
of the historic role of the Islamic people of Central Asia in 
world civilization; on the political level, in the emergence of 
political religious movements, parties, and associations 
promoting the Islamic alternative and competing with communist, 
nationalist, and other ideologies. 
  In the new independent states of Central Asia, Islam is 
turning into a force that cannot be ignored by the government. 
This is why the references to Islamic values by the heads of all 
Central Asian states, regardless of their political aims, are 
primarily intended to mobilize public opinion, impart a certain 
degree of legitimacy to the authority of the new "national 
fathers," and win as much diplomatic and financial support as 
possible from the leading states in the Islamic world. 
  In itself, Islam does not constitute a threat to security 
and 
stability. Its more important role in the life of the new 
independent states in Central Asia reflects the natural and 
legitimate desire of people belonging to the same religion and 
having the same cultural heritage, sanctified by this religion, 
to return to their traditions and roots and establish regular 
dialogue and communication with others of this religion 
throughout the former USSR and beyond its boundaries. The 
politicized form of Islam is a different matter, however, 
because it is capable of creating tension in the society and 
provoking religious and ethnic conflicts, turmoil, and 
confrontations. 
  The origins and foundation of political Islam, or Islamism, 
in Central Asia are virtually the same as in the Muslim states 
of the Third World. They are economic stagnation, the 
marginalization of society, growing unemployment (particularly 
among youth), the absence of democratic traditions, the 
prevalence of ethnic, clan, and national factors in politics, 
and the growing influence of extremist ideas, accompanied by the 
harassment of weak and isolated democratic parties and movements. 
  In addition to this, all of the talk about the threat of 
Islamic fundamentalism probably conceals completely perceptible 
interests and specific political goals. It has been convenient 
for government officials in the majority of Central Asian states 
to portray the whole opposition, including its secular segments, 
as Islamic fanatics and to promote authoritarianism as an 
alternative to fundamentalist expansion. The neocommunists in 
Tajikistan resorted to force without hesitation, starting a 
civil war as soon as the opposition, promptly labeled 
"Islamists" (or "Wahhabists"), made a bid for power. The most 
diverse political forces have played the "Islamic card" with 
some success--from members of the local elite, clans, and 
special services to nationalist and political groups and 
movements. It is no secret that the "Russian speakers," who were 
in a particularly difficult position after the collapse of the 
USSR, were caught in the trap of anti-Islamic propaganda. It is 
difficult for them to give up the stereotypes of imperial 
thinking and to make the necessary psychological adjustments to 
their new self-image as an ethnic minority. In addition, the 
local nationalist movements speculating on tradition and the 
strong commitment to Islam have alienated even the democratic 
segment of the "foreign" population. 
  Nevertheless, "political Islam" is still incapable of 
playing 
a major mobilizing role in this region. There are no influential 
and well-organized Muslim parties and movements in the region 
with traditions of political struggle, and there are no 
charismatic leaders capable of compensating for the lack of 
political organizations and rallying the other Muslims. Islamism 
is opposed by the still monolithic and rigid regime in the 
region. 
  Russia and its Central Asian neighbors in the CIS have an 
interest in stable and predictable development and the exclusion 
of the possibility of confrontations. All of the efforts to 
arouse fear of the Islamic threat and the dangers represented by 
Islamic fundamentalism, as well as the emotional statements 
about Russia's role in the protection of Western civilization 
from the "creeping Islamic threat," however, are compounding 
Russia's own domestic problems because of the country's 
polyreligious nature. Besides this, the fueling of Islamophobia 
has made Russian policy suspect in states with a primarily 
Muslim population in the CIS and the Third World. 
  The participation of the Russian military in internal 
conflicts on the side of forces announcing their intention to 
"put an end to the Islamic (and democratic) epidemic," as in the 
case of the civil war in Tajikistan, is probably setting an 
extremely dangerous precedent, regardless of the arguments that 
are being used to justify these actions (the protection of 
ethnic Russians, the defense of borders, etc.). This puts 
citizens of the Russian nationality in the position of potential 
refugees, because the mistrust in them as "infidels" or as a 
"fifth column" could be fueled by Islamist propaganda. 
Furthermore, Russian military support of one side in this kind 
of conflict could draw the country into another war like the 
Afghan one. 
  Russia's interests are unlikely to be served by the creation 
of some form of "union of the cross and crescent," not to 
mention membership in official military-political blocs with 
Central Asian members of the CIS. The idea of endowing Russia 
with the power to serve as a "bridge" or "relay" between East 
and West also sounds impractical, because today's states prefer 
to forge their bilateral relations directly, without any 
intermediaries. 
  Religious and political affairs in Central Asia, in spite of 
the differences between the states of the region, suggest that 
militant Islam and confrontation with neighboring states are not 
the prevailing tendency in politics. Are the "distant Islamic 
foreign countries" capable of influencing Central Asian policy 
in ways detrimental to Russian interests? 
  Turkey, Iran, Pakistan, and Afghanistan would seem to have 
the greatest chances of doing this. They all support, to some 
extent, the idea of a broad association of Muslim states, which 
would include the Central Asian republics of the former Soviet 
Union. The leaders of some political parties and movements in 
Third World states are also known to be willing to assist in the 
more vigorous introduction of the Islamic alternative into 
politics in the new independent states of Central Asia and are 
urging the governments of their countries to offer more 
effective support to the Islamic opposition in Tajikistan, 
Uzbekistan, and other republics. The leaders of the states 
bordering on Central Asia have avoided involvement in the 
internal political struggle in the former CIS republics thus 
far, and they do not support the territorial repartition of the 
region, because they are aware of the adverse security 
implications of this process. 
  Russia's waning influence in Central Asia and the 
possibility 
of its total withdrawal from the region could kindle the 
political ambitions of neighboring states and intensify the 
struggle for spheres of influence in this region. Russia does 
not want the balance of power in the region to be disrupted in 
favor of the states with a primarily Muslim population, and 
neither does China or India. Nevertheless, Russia is in no 
position to impede the inevitable shift of the Central Asian 
republics toward the "Islamic world." Because the hypothetical 
community of Central Asian states will not necessarily become an 
automatic enemy of Russia, Moscow has to display maximum concern 
for their national and religious feelings, as well as the 
traditions based on the political and cultural unity of the 
region in the past, before it was divided by the tsarist 
conquests, especially at this time, while militant Islam still 
occupies only an insignificant place in the spectrum of the 
whole Islamic movement in Central Asia, and while moderate 
Muslim currents still want to preserve the historic ties with 
Russia. 
  COPYRIGHT: Rossiyskaya Akademiya Nauk Institut mirovoy 
ekonomiki i mezhdunarodnykh otnosheniy RAN, 1993 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42729 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kravchuk on Constitutional Issues </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0624A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 21 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0624A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Skachko under the rubric "Ukraine": </F>
"Kravchuk Agreed to a Compromise: Adoption of a New Constitution 
Is Postponed"] 
  [Text] After parliamentary speaker Ivan Plushch and other 
participants of the conference of representatives of different 
level councils had their turn at the rostrum (NEZAVISIMAYA 
GAZETA No. 10), President Leonid Kravchuk took the floor; he 
said that he supports the main constitutional provisions on the 
organization of state power and local self-rule in Ukraine 
developed by parliament's services. According to the president, 
the integral problem for him is organizational development of a 
state in which the internal factor of stability is "balancing 
the powers of the branches and their democratic renewal." At the 
same time, Kravchuk assured those present that the presidential 
structures will do everything possible to make the elections to 
parliament happen and to ensure that "qualified and 
conscientious people" work in the new parliament on a 
professional basis. 
  However, in Leonid Kravchuk's opinion, elections to the 
parliament do not represent the final step in the renewal of 
authority, and Ukraine needs a wholesome system under which the 
president would be taken out of the system of executive power 
and would remain only the head of state speaking on its behalf. 
"The president should not be placed above all--only outside the 
executive branch. He controls it but does not interfere with its 
work," Kravchuk summed up. He also supported the proposal to 
combine in one person the jobs of the heads of local executive 
and legislative authority and have the entire population of the 
region elect such an official. As the only mandatory condition 
Leonid Kravchuk named the right of the Cabinet of Ministers to 
remove such officials without the concurrence of local soviets 
in the event they violate the Ukrainian Constitution. "Unless we 
have this, people will circle around such an official like a cat 
around hot cereal but will not be able to do anything. Even the 
president may be impeached, but we not have any mechanism to 
remove officials in the regions," Kravchuk insisted, and the 
speaker, Ivan Plushch, completely agreed with him. 
  Leonid Kravchuk also supported the idea of expanding the 
regions' rights and said that he has already began to experiment 
in this direction, giving eastern regions of Ukraine greater 
powers in the matter of disposal of state property on their 
territory. However, coming upon the problem of the Crimea, 
Kravchuk said that it should be written into the new Ukrainian 
Constitution that the executive branch of the autonomous 
republic is formed on the basis of the Ukrainian Constitution 
and laws, as well as on the basis of the Constitution of the 
Republic of Crimea, which should be brought in line with the 
fundamental law of Ukraine. In addition, Kravchuk proposed to 
change the current Ukrainian Constitution in such a way that the 
president of the country would have the right to cancel 
decisions of the Crimean parliament if they violate Ukrainian 
legislation. "Otherwise, why do we need to put there that Crimea 
is a part of Ukraine?" asked Leonid Kravchuk and added that this 
provision should not be used as a political screen. Speaker Ivan 
Plushch said that the Ukrainian Supreme Council will definitely 
change Article 114 of the Ukrainian Constitution, and the 
conference participants wrote a respective point into their 
summary document. 
  The president expressed doubts that the new constitution may 
be adopted by the current Supreme Council. He urged that for the 
transition period the fundamental constitutional provision for 
organizing the state power proposed by the parliament be adopted 
at the all-Ukraine referendum (simultaneously with elections to 
the parliament). In his words, this document should become the 
basis for the future constitution. "The main task of the 
fundamental provisions is to balance responsibilities and rights 
between the branches, to set the mechanism for their mutual 
checks and balances." Kravchuk summed up and repeated his old 
thesis on the need to remove from the future fundamental law all 
provisions on the state language, symbols, the socioeconomic 
system, and others that may exacerbate political confrontation 
in the society. Closer to the end of the conference's work, 
Leonid Kravchuk cheerfully informed all present that the 
Ukrainian Cabinet of Ministers has decided to cut the executive 
branch apparatus at all levels by 25 percent. 
  The conference of council representatives approved the text 
of the fundamental constitutional provisions on authority and 
recommended discussing them at the parliament meetings, and then 
later put them up to an all-Ukraine referendum on 27 March. It 
looks like the current deputy corps will arrive at a similar 
decision; therefore, it is safe to assume that the council's 
conference, as journalists covering its work collectively 
determined, was another attempt on the part of various circles 
of the ruling central and regional nomenklatura to reach a 
compromise in an unconstitutional but peaceful manner as they 
approach presidential and parliamentary elections. They have 
succeeded in doing this; however, the fate of the compromise in 
the final count will depend on the results of both the 
parliament election and the referendum--if it takes place. It is 
quite possible that supporters of one or the other branch will 
win the elections, who will then assume additional powers. 
Another possibility is a victory of reformers, who will attempt 
to remove the nomenklatura both from power and from conducting 
privatization to its own benefit. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42730 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Plyushch Views Local Government Issues </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0622A Kiev HOLOS UKRAYINY in Ukrainian 20 Jan 94 pp 2-3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0622A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev HOLOS UKRAYINY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Ukrainian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Report by Chairman of the Supreme Council of Ukraine Ivan </F>
Plyushch at a Conference of Representatives of the Local 
Councils of People's Deputies on 18 January 1994"] 
  [Text] Esteemed participants in the conference! 
  When the Presidium of the Supreme Council of Ukraine 
resolved 
to hold the present representative forum, it proceeded from 
working out together with you uniform approaches to the main 
problems of further reforms in the political systems and to 
preparations for and the holding of the next elections, because 
reforming the system without holding elections is virtually 
impossible. 
  The current stage of development in Ukraine necessitates the 
increased role of the organs of power in managing all processes 
in society. 
  As is known, the Declaration of State Sovereignty of Ukraine 
set forth the main principle for building state power in our 
country by establishing that it should be exercised on the basis 
of its separation into legislative, executive, and judicial 
authority. The attempt to follow this principle under the old 
Constitution, which was adopted when Ukraine still belonged to 
the Soviet Union, turned out to be unrealizable, although 
substantive amendments and additions have been made to it. You 
know of the contradictions that have developed not only between 
individual branches of power but also between the center and the 
local organs of power, and local self-government. 
  All of this has influenced the status of state discipline, 
brought about a power imbalance, and provided grounds for abuse 
by certain employees and other state organizations, as well as 
those who were employed directly in the sphere of material 
production. 
  For this reason, questions of political reform, 
determination 
of the jurisdiction of central and local state organs, as well 
as the organs of local self-government, and the codification of 
mechanisms for their interaction at the constitutional level 
represent the path that will help in cementing the state 
structure and overcoming the dual power that has actually 
emerged within the system of executive power. 
  A certain step forward in this area has been taken in the 
draft of the new Constitution of Ukraine which was published in 
October of last year. It was based on a 
parliamentary-presidential model of government; it set forth the 
forms of a state and territorial system, as well as the main 
powers of the power structures at all levels. 
  The issue is for the organs of power to actually influence 
economic and social processes and determine the nature of 
further development of the regions. This is first of all 
associated with the fact that solving the problems of economic 
reforms, denationalization of property, social support for the 
population, and economic development, as well as ensuring legal 
order and stability in society, is being to a considerable 
degree shifted to the regional level. We want to build a 
democratic rule-of-law state. The path toward it is long, 
thorny, and difficult, as the past two-year period has convinced 
us. 
  The deterioration of the economic and social situation 
generates criticism of the power structure which, I will tell 
you openly, is extremely hard to bear. 
  Some accuse the leadership of conservatism. Can radical 
political and economic reforms get underway in Ukraine, they 
say, if former "Communist Party people" who brought about the 
crisis in the country remain in power? Can they lead us out of 
the crisis? Others, especially those who were in power 
previously, exploit in every way possible the version that 
someone betrayed someone else. There also are politicians who, 
in pursuit of their own goals, see the breakup of the Union and 
the abandonment of "socialist orientation" as the cause of all 
adversity. 
  I would like to repeat today what I have said repeatedly. 
The 
process now taking place in our society is a process of 
transformation of the administrative-command system into a 
democratic system, of transition to the market mode of economic 
development. This process develops in keeping with objective 
laws of development of the economy and society, and it cannot 
develop otherwise. This is happening not only in Ukraine but 
also in other countries of the former USSR and Eastern Europe, 
and Ukraine cannot remain some kind of island. Naturally, it may 
have certain national peculiarities as far as the form and 
content of reforms are concerned; however, in many respects it 
should adapt to the generally recognized rules for this process. 
  No matter what our opponents say (they are many, and this is 
good), the Supreme Council of the current term has prepared many 
laws, but has also made a great deal of mistakes in the process. 
More than 350 laws and 1,030 decrees have already been adopted. 
However, two characteristic peculiarities should be taken into 
account in all of this. First, we have entered the first stage 
of the creation of a state in which all these acts are needed. 
Second, their content objectively reflects the condition of our 
society and the economy, as well as various approaches and the 
diversity of the thoughts of legislators. Under our conditions 
it is impossible to work out the only correct and perfect laws 
for a long period of time. Therefore, they should of course 
undergo changes in line with social processes. 
  The following question is frequently asked: What 
socioeconomic and political system does the new draft 
Constitution of Ukraine codify? 
  It appears to me that an answer to this question may be as 
follows: a civic society and a rule-of-law state. 
  As far as the main signs of such a society and state are 
concerned, they are indicated quite specifically in the draft 
Main Law, in particular: 
  recognition of the individual, his life, rights, and 
freedoms 
as the supreme value; 
  proclamation that the people of Ukraine are the sole source 
of power, 
  economic, political, and ideological diversity embodied in a 
multiparty system, guarantees for various forms of ownership and 
economic operations, and social orientation of the economy; 
  recognition of the primacy of the law with regard to state 
power, and of the civic society with regard to the state. 
  It is frequently asserted that this also has the marks of 
capitalism. What can we say to this? Perhaps so, but it is not 
the kind of capitalism with which they scared us for decades but 
rather that which has already been built in Sweden, Austria, 
Switzerland, and a number of other European countries with 
developed democracies and market economies. May God grant us the 
building of the social order which the aforementioned states 
have, because they have considerably more social protection and 
guarantees for the people than we had under the "developed phase 
of socialism." I think that few will object at present to such a 
model of the organization of society and the state. 
  The draft of the new Constitution sets forth, on a 
conceptual 
basis different from the one in the Constitution in effect, the 
system, structure, and procedure for the formation, functions, 
and powers of the organs of legislative, executive, and judicial 
power, as well as the organs of local self-government. 
  Many proposals to accelerate the adoption of the new 
Constitution of Ukraine are received by the Supreme Council. 
  These proposals come down to several variants. 
  First, this could be done by the current Supreme Council, 
having traveled with dignity the path from the Declaration of 
State Sovereignty of Ukraine to its new Constitution, although 
this variant may already be unrealistic. 
  Second, the Constitution could be adopted by the new Supreme 
Council. However, for the latter, the developed draft would be a 
new document, and time would be needed to master and adopt it. 
During this period there would not be a proper legal basis for 
forming the organs of state power. 
  There also were the following proposals: either convene a 
special Constitutional Conference (assembly) which on assignment 
from the Supreme Council could itself adopt this draft, or 
submit it to an All-Ukrainian Referendum on 27 March 1994, 
simultaneously with the election of people's deputies. 
  As you know, a meeting of the Commission for the Development 
of the New Constitution was held in this auditorium on 12 
January with the participation of the chairmen of oblast 
councils, city councils of the city-seats of oblasts, 
representatives of the president in the oblasts and in the 
cities of Kiev and Sevastopol, heads of political parties and 
trade unions, and scientists. 
  The main principles of the construction of state organs in 
the center and locally were discussed, as well as prospects for 
the adoption of the new Constitution of Ukraine. In view of the 
fact that a majority of those present at that meeting expressed 
doubts about the possibility of the Supreme Council adopting the 
Constitution shortly, it was agreed to prepare the draft of a 
separate constitutional law or statute in which the main 
principles for the organization of state power and 
self-government in Ukraine would be codified. 
  The adoption of such a Constitutional act is necessitated by 
the urgent need to precisely regulate the powers of all branches 
of state power and eliminate duplication and lack of 
coordination in their operations as early as this stage of 
building the state. 
  Proposals worked out on the basis of the discussion have 
been 
incorporated in the draft that has been handed out to you. It is 
envisioned that this draft, with today's discussion taken into 
account, could be submitted to the Supreme Council so as to be 
placed, by its decision, on the All-Ukrainian Referendum which 
would be held together with the election of people's deputies on 
27 March. For now, we do not see a different way. 
  If a draft of such significance to the creation of the state 
is approved, it will, to our mind, make it possible to: 
  specify stable foundations for the buildup of legislative, 
executive, and judicial organs and organs of local 
self-government of our state; 
  lay a secure foundation which is approved by the people for 
the new Constitution of Ukraine; 
  codify the jurisdictions and powers of all branches of 
central power, to clearly delineate the performance of their 
functions, as well as to delineate the powers of state organs 
and organs of local self-government. 
  The adoption of this constitutional act will make it 
possible 
to reinforce the government and will open new opportunities for 
carrying out economic transformations and overcoming the lack of 
coordination which now exist. Besides, nobody will have the 
right to change tomorrow what is accepted today. 
  What principles does the draft of the Main Constitutional 
Provisions for the organization of state power and 
self-government in Ukraine propose to codify? 
  First of all, the main functions of the Supreme Council as 
the organ of legislative power are refined, and its influence on 
the government is strengthened. This document also envisions 
divorcing the powers of the head of state and head of the 
executive power. 
  Under the Constitution in effect, the president of Ukraine 
is 
the head of state and head of the executive power, whereas the 
draft envisions distribution of these powers. The president of 
Ukraine remains the head of state. The Cabinet of Ministers of 
Ukraine becomes the supreme organ of executive power. 
  As the head of state, the president of Ukraine will have the 
right to veto laws adopted by the Supreme Council and return 
them for repeat consideration, and to call all-Ukrainian 
referendums on lack of confidence in the Supreme Council. His 
powers will include the right to act on behalf of the state, 
represent it in international relations, be commander in chief 
of the Armed Forces of Ukraine, resolve issues of citizenship, 
as well as other constitutional powers. 
  The president will also retain certain powers as to the 
formation of the structures of executive power. In particular, 
he will nominate, for the appointment by the Supreme Council, a 
candidate for prime minister who, in turn, will form the 
membership of the Cabinet of Ministers and present it to the 
Supreme Council. 
  Therefore, the executive authority as represented by the 
Cabinet of Ministers will become completely independent in 
exercising its powers. At the same time, the government 
continues to report and be accountable to the Supreme Council 
and be under the control of the president of Ukraine. 
  The draft sets forth the main principles for the 
construction 
of a judicial system in Ukraine. It is envisioned that the 
administration of justice will be effected in the form of the 
constitutional, civil, criminal, and administrative-law court 
proceedings. 
  Assertions about the need to eliminate councils at the local 
level may be heard frequently, even from the lips of some 
statesmen. I would like those who harbor such intentions to 
understand that, under the draft Constitution and the draft Main 
Constitutional Provisions on the organization of state power and 
self-government, it is envisioned to transform councils into 
organs that perform the state functions delegated to them while 
at the same time, most importantly, remaining organs of local 
self-government. 
  Those who advocate the elimination of such councils actually 
come out against the democratic principles on which our state is 
to be built and fight for a return to the administrative-command 
system in one form or another. 
  Understandably, it is impossible to agree with this. The 
implementation of such intentions will result in nothing but 
harm. 
  You would recall that the introduction of the institution of 
representatives of the president was considered a temporary 
measure to reinforce state discipline locally. At the same time, 
it was a mistake to also endow them with the functions of heads 
of local state administrations and to deprive rayon and oblast 
councils of their own executive organs in conjunction with this. 
The "executive vertical chain" did not begin to operate 
effectively because of this. 
  In general, a paradox has occurred in practice whereby the 
local state administration tries to negate the operation of 
representative organs, reducing the principle of separation of 
powers to the absurd. This is happening while no vertical 
presidential structure exists in any country of the world. 
  On the contrary, local self-government has been generally 
recognized and codified in acts of international law such as the 
World Declaration on Local Self-Government and the European 
Charter of Local Self-Government. We took the requirements of 
these documents into account in developing the draft law. 
  Certainly, it is necessary to reform the councils on the 
principles of local self-government and, first of all, make them 
more flexible and smaller, endow them with real rights and 
powers, provide an opportunity to really influence the state of 
affairs in their territories. Councils and similar 
representative organs of local self-government exist in many 
developed countries. They operate autonomously and independently 
within the confines of the law and have their own executive 
structures. 
  As you know, in keeping with the provisions in the draft of 
the new Constitution, oblast councils and oblast executive 
committees which would operate on the principle of separation of 
powers were to become the organs of state power in oblasts. 
  This meant that relations between them would be structured 
similarly to those between the Supreme Council and the Cabinet 
of Ministers, to be sure, with certain peculiarities. Thus, the 
oblast council would act as the parliament of an oblast, and the 
executive committee--as the oblast government. Such forms of 
government exist in a number of states; perhaps in the future we 
will come to them, too. 
  It was proposed that oblast councils be elected for four 
years and consist of deputies whose number would not exceed 75. 
The chairman of the oblast council was to be elected by the 
council in question from among the deputies. 
  The composition of the executive committee would be 
confirmed 
by the oblast council on the petition of its chairman, and the 
executive committee itself would be headed by the chairman who 
would be elected by the population of the oblast and confirmed 
by an edict of the president. The oblast executive committee 
would report to the oblast council, as well as be subordinated 
to the Cabinet of Ministers and the president. 
  The above provisions met with criticism from the local 
councils. 
  The triple subordination of the executive committees of 
oblasts, as well as the confirmation by the president of their 
chairmen who are elected by the people, do not meet with 
support. We know that many chairmen of oblast councils propose 
to establish a rule in keeping with which either the chairman of 
a council will be elected by the oblast council or this position 
will be combined with that of the chairman of the executive 
organ who will be elected by the population. The idea of 
statization of the councils and their executive organs at the 
level of oblasts and the cities of Kiev and Sevastopol failed to 
gain support. 
  Taking the above and other proposals into account, the 
Constitutional Commission proposed a somewhat different approach 
to resolving the issue of power at the oblast level. 
  The draft of the Main Constitutional Provisions envisions 
that the oblast power structures will also be built on the 
principles of self-government. It is proposed that the 
population of an oblast elect the head of executive power who 
would, at the same time, head the council. 
  It is proposed to introduce the same model at the level of 
cities, rayons, settlements, and villages. 
  The heads of executive power of oblasts, cities, rayons, 
settlements, and villages will report to and be under the 
control of the respective councils; they will be subordinated to 
the Cabinet of Ministers of Ukraine on issues of exercising the 
powers delegated to them by the state. 
  At least some of you know that there was yet another variant 
at an expanded meeting of the Constitutional Commission, as well 
as in the course of work on the draft of the Main Constitutional 
Provisions--to elect the chairman of the executive committee 
rather than the chairman of the council, and to endow him with 
the functions of the head of executive power. Therefore, an 
exchange of ideas on this issue will certainly occur today. 
  As far as rayon councils in the cities are concerned, this 
issue is regulated in the draft of the new Constitution. Taking 
into account practice and the need to perfect the management of 
city facilities, it is envisioned to transfer the resolution of 
the issues of territorial division of the cities into rayons and 
the feasibility of establishing the councils of city rayons 
directly to city councils. This provision has been criticized by 
some of you, but the majority agree with it. 
  The draft of the Constitution envisions a substantial 
reduction in the number of council members. It is feasible to 
take into account the proposals of those who recommend that the 
number of their members be determined depending on the number of 
residents in a given territory. 
  Many representatives of the local councils do not like the 
word "councilmen." Let us consult and propose a different 
version. 
  Of course, it is possible to do without local 
self-government 
and introduce rigid centralization of executive power from Kiev 
and on down to a rural council. However, such practices are only 
characteristic of authoritarian regimes. Naturally, they are 
incompatible with the notions of a civic society and a 
democratic state of law, which we want to build. 
  On the contrary, it is very important to give local organs 
more real power. At present, somebody will certainly raise the 
issue about the generation of local budgets in conjunction with 
this. Recently I had a long conversation with a group of council 
chairmen from large cities during which they made specific 
proposals that are well grounded. What kind of an authority is 
it in a city if the chairman of the council must go to Kiev to 
wheedle out mere kopeks for the needs of education, health care, 
transportation, and communal services? Why take away from them 
the funds which they would perhaps manage with greater dispatch 
and feasibility locally, usually feeling more responsible for 
the formation and use of the local budget? 
  A mechanism should be found whereby it will be possible to 
determine which proportion of the funds should finance local and 
regional needs, and which--statewide needs. At present, we do 
not take this into account, and want to make it so that the city 
or rayon has to go and ask for it if not in Kiev, then at the 
oblast seat. 
  Local authorities should be given more rights with regard to 
other issues as well. In this case, they will have more 
responsibility and, accordingly, more business sense and more 
order. 
  Now about the issue of the next elections of people's 
deputies of Ukraine. Preparations for the elections, as well as 
the elections themselves, will take place in a complicated 
socioeconomic situation. 
  However, I would like to stress from the very beginning that 
if we want political reforms to get underway, and elections to 
be held, we should take urgent measures to stabilize production, 
stop inflationary processes, furnish consumer staples to the 
people, and provide genuine assistance to the low-income strata 
of the population. 
  An imperfect banking and credit system is one of the main 
reasons for the economic crisis we are facing. Serious mistakes 
and blunders were allowed to occur in the process of its 
assertion. 
  Of course, we are concerned first of all about the difficult 
financial position of the state and inflationary processes, 
whose rates we have unfortunately not been able to slow down so 
far. All of this brings about the growth of prices and a 
considerable decline in the standard of living of the 
population. At present, the state is not in a position to ensure 
due social protection for even the most unfortunate strata of 
the population because the need for funds for these purposes is 
greater than the existing opportunities. 
  Meanwhile, world practice convinces us that no country has 
managed to stabilize its economy until those who worked in the 
sphere of material production genuinely undertook to do so. 
Appropriate conditions should be created for this to happen. No 
matter how much we talk about privatization and destatization as 
the main goal, productivity and the desired results will not 
occur unless appropriate conditions are created for work at 
associated, cooperative, collective, private, state, and other 
enterprises. 
  Regardless of the great difficulties and mistakes that were 
allowed to occur, the process of economic reform in Ukraine is 
being enhanced, albeit slowly. I will give specific numbers, 
too. As of the beginning of October of last year, the proportion 
of industrial enterprises with nonstate forms of ownership in 
the total number of enterprises exceeded 30 percent, and the 
volume of products manufactured by them--25 percent. Small-scale 
privatization is picking up steam, if slowly. Some reforms have 
taken off in rural areas. We already have more than 27,000 
owner-operated farms, although the appropriate conditions for 
their operation do not exist. 
  Unfortunately, many reports are now being received from 
localities about abuses in the process of privatization and the 
imperfection of our laws. People are seriously concerned about 
the unprecedented, and in most cases illegal, accumulation of 
capital by certain individuals. Most of our population will not 
endure such reforms. Therefore, it is necessary to introduce 
reforms under which the people will become owners of the means 
of production and will have approximately the same conditions at 
the outset. Only under such conditions will people be in a 
position to display their abilities. The experience of the Czech 
Republic, Poland, and other countries, which should be 
skillfully used, testifies to this. 
  Two days from now the Supreme Council will consider the 
draft 
of the State Plan for Economic and Social Development and the 
State Budget of Ukraine for 1994. As I have already said, the 
situation in the country is quite difficult, and we should do 
everything possible together in order to overcome crisis 
phenomena in the economic and social areas. 
  As is known, in September of last year the Supreme Council 
passed a law on early elections of the future parliament and the 
president of Ukraine, and made a determination on fundamental 
issues regarding the name of the supreme organ of legislative 
power of our state, its structure, procedures for its formation, 
and the main principles for its operations. 
  All of this definitely necessitated speeding up the 
preparation of a new election law, which was passed on 18 
November 1993. However, the search for an optimal model of 
electoral system for our state began much earlier. Favorable 
domestic and foreign experience in the organization of elections 
was taken into account in the course of development of the draft 
law. Issues of the electoral system were discussed at applied 
scientific conferences, meetings, seminars, in the press, on 
television and radio. 
  As you know, the Supreme Council gave preference to a 
majority electoral system, although some people's deputies came 
out in favor of a proportional system. There also were 
proponents of a mixed electoral system, which I supported, too. 
However, a majority of the deputies voted in favor of the 
majority electoral system. There is nothing bad about this. 
After all, elections are held in keeping with this system in 76 
countries of the world, including Great Britain, France, the 
United States, Canada, and other countries with developed 
democracies in which multiparty systems exist. Now that the law 
has been adopted, it should be strictly complied with. All talk 
about its advantages or drawbacks at present merely harms the 
cause. The election campaign has begun, and our task is to 
ensure its successful conduct. 
  A revision of the norm of the law which regulates procedures 
for holding runoff elections is the only point we might agree to. 
  Lately, voices have been heard to the effect that the 
elections will not take place, that the people, having lost 
faith in politicians, will not turn out for the elections. This 
is said by people who do not wish Ukraine well, who want to go 
on hampering economic reforms and the processes of the assertion 
of our statehood. 
  We should explain this to the population while at the same 
time shaping public opinion in such a way that deputies will be 
elected to the new parliament who are capable of advocating 
general state interests and taking an active part in the process 
of creating legislation. You know well how elections were 
organized previously, and how the 100 percent turnout at polling 
stations and the unanimous vote in favor of candidates for 
deputy were ensured. 
  At present, the situation is different: Under the law, all 
issues concerning the organization and conduct of the elections 
devolve in their entirety on electoral commissions. However, 
this does not at all mean that councils and executive organs 
should remain on the sidelines of this important political event. 
  In the course of the election campaign, it is important to 
explain to each voter that the future of Ukraine depends on his 
personal participation in the elections. The personal 
composition of those who will make policy is being formed, of 
those who will pass laws that will facilitate the development of 
a democratic state and an enhancement of the welfare of the 
people. 
  Notwithstanding the predicament we are now facing, we should 
take advantage of every opportunity to lift the spirits of the 
people. There should be no such thing as a trifle in this matter. 
  I would say that the election of the parliament on the day 
of 
the elections, 27 March, and if the referendum is also held on 
that day, its results, too, directly depend on all of us in 
attendance in this auditorium. 
  In summation, I would like to stress that it is impossible 
to 
successfully accomplish the tasks facing our state in the 
absence of a renewal of the form and content of the activities 
of all structures of power and enhancement of their role and 
responsibility. 
  Thank you for your attention. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42731 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Little Media Coverage of Election Campaign Seen </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0607A Kiev UKRAYINA MOLODA in Ukrainian 18 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0607A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev UKRAYINA MOLODA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Ukrainian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Stepan Sakhno: "Figure Out for Yourselves What </F>
the Upcoming Elections Will Be Like"] 
  [Text] Vladimir Zhirinovskiy's victory in the Russian 
elections--something which everybody is gradually becoming 
accustomed to--has cast light on, among other obvious and 
less-obvious factors, a phenomenon which is also timely for our 
own upcoming elections. The essence of this phenomenon lies in 
the fact that the average voter is far from understanding not 
only the nuances, but even the concept of political life as a 
whole; nor has he come to understand the purpose of the 
elections themselves. Behind the endeavors of the candidates to 
become deputies the average person has been unable to perceive 
what this has to do with him as a citizen, a family man, or a 
businessman (if, indeed, he has achieved this last-named 
status). The voter has become alienated from the thought that he 
will be choosing a leader for himself--a leader of the state in 
which he will somehow have to go on living, raising his 
children, and earning his daily bread. When and if the citizens' 
nerves give out, they forget the following sacramental saying: 
"Each nation gets the rulers it deserves." And, therefore, they 
likewise forget their own responsibility for the choice that is 
made. 
  The fact that this bond of "responsibility" is understood 
and 
even a common cliche for a certain politically engaged portion 
of Ukrainians certainly does not mean that it is also obvious 
for all other citizens. It is one thing to elect someone who 
speaks eloquently or who has a very attractive appearance; but 
it is quite another thing to take the trouble to analyze and 
understand well which of the candidates would move the history 
of our state in which direction. It is one thing to indulge 
one's esthetic "ego" and make a game of filling out the election 
ballot by casually running down the list of names with one's 
finger; but it is something quite different to make a conscious 
and well-informed choice--to show yourself to be a thinking 
being and a citizen. This has become incomparably complicated, 
of course, by the fact that nowadays the background of 
philosophical thoughts is an exacerbated, impoverished society. 
And within this society there is not yet any noticeable 
educational-type, pre-election work for the purpose of informing 
each persons about the importance of his individual choice, 
or--for example--creating a unique methodology for making this 
choice. 
  The first month of the election campaign is drawing to a 
close, but it is only the politicians themselves who know this. 
Television and radio are virtually silent about the upcoming 
elections; they are waiting for advertisements to come in so 
that they can sell air time. It is said that a certain 
well-endowed businessman attempted to buy up virtually all the 
air time of one non-state television channel. The channel in 
question was not averse to doing so, but the businessman had a 
foreign business; and so the channel did not sell him the air 
time--at least, not all of it. But this situation is not 
expected to last very long, and it is quite easy to foresee that 
the candidates will very quickly be divided into the following 
two camps: those who will have television air time solely within 
the limits set by the state and those who will have it on an 
unrestricted basis. Incidentally, baffled by the results of 
their elections, the Russians have calculated that during the 
election campaign Zhirinovskiy--the leader of the 
Liberal-Democratic Party--utilized the services of Ostankino, 
RTV [Russian TV], and Saint Petersburg TV more than any other 
candidate. Those of our candidates who are not duplicating this 
effort can--at least--be consoled by the fact that virtually 
nobody watches UT [Ukrainian TV] in Ukraine. Well then, those 
candidates who have the money will find us everywhere, and I am 
sure that they will do just that. 
  However, let's turn our attention now to an amazing 
phenomenon--the start of the election campaign passed 
practically unnoticed. There was very little news and 
information about this. Not primarily because of any feebleness 
or weakness of the process, but because of the tacit taboo 
imposed by the directors of the state mass media on mentioning 
the principal deeds, offices, or names of the candidates. In 
this connection, things have gotten to the point of such 
absurdity whereby--for example--a well-known politician decided 
to triumphantly comment on Clinton's arrival in Kiev; and this 
could be allowed on the air, but if this very same politician 
were to be the first one to officially register his candidacy in 
Ukraine, this "shameful" fact could in no way be broadcast. 
Thus, we might very soon arrive at such a situation as the 
following: The airwaves will be filled with quotations--for 
example--from the head of a certain party, but a timid silence 
is to be maintained concerning the fact that he is a candidate 
for the office of deputy. It is as if they were saying: Figure 
it out for yourselves, and--at the same time--figure out what 
the upcoming elections will be like.... 
  In addition to such a semi-conspiratorial start, the 
beginning of the election struggle was marked by quite a serious 
scandal in the noble family of Rukh. Upon becoming a party, 
Rukh--of course--acquired such a necessary feature as party 
discipline, a discipline which was boasted about so 
extraordinarily by the old Rukh staffers, as well as by the 
romantic young ones. The obsolescence of such devoted fidelity 
to party discipline was demonstrated quite recently by the 
people's deputy, Serhiy Holovatyy, who is not merely a member of 
Rukh, but also a member of the Rukh leadership. As we know, the 
democratic-type parties have created and organized a unique 
bloc--one whose basic task is to hopefully diminish the 
competition among democratic deputies in any one election 
district, and--ideally speaking--to support just one deputy with 
all their joint, unified authority. And, in spite of the 
above-mentioned "domestic agreement" and party discipline, 
Serhiy Holovatyy undertook to register his own candidacy in 
"someone else's" district. Such an action has quite seriously 
undermined the reputation of Rukh discipline and engendered 
doubts with regard to the monolithic nature of the party 
benches. By way of punishing this "rebel," the democratic forces 
decided upon the following, unprecedented step: to deprive this 
member of the Rukh leadership of their support in the elections. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42732 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Election Campaign Overview Given </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0658A Kiev PRAVDA UKRAINY in Russian 27 Jan 94 pp 1-2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0658A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev PRAVDA UKRAINY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vyacheslav Pikhovshek, Information Service </F>
VYBOR: "Passions around Authority: Blocs and Squabbles, Ties and 
Unions"] 
  [Text] That is all! The train has left. The nomination of 
aspiring candidate for deputy of the Supreme Council of Ukraine 
ended on 26 January. According to the Law on Elections, the 
collection of signatures, and registrations, will be conducted 
until 10 February, but the number of aspirants can only 
decrease, not increase. Those who collected 300 signatures and 
paid the entry fee in the amount of five minimum wages have 
already taken their place on the train, have arranged their 
baggage, and have started to look hard at their fellow travelers. 
  Whom do we see among the "passengers?" In what coaches and 
compartments have they settled? What kind of ties have bound 
their unions, and have the blocs not started to squabble among 
each other? 
  Alas, it appears that there will be no intimate groups on 
this train. Although it is still early to reach conclusions, the 
first results of the nominations show however that groups of 
very diverse colors have been sorted out. Thus, for each of the 
34 electoral districts of the Dnepropetrovsk region there are 
six aspirants on average; moreover, the voters proposed 129 
persons, labor collectives--58, but parties and movements--only 
17. It is noteworthy that among the aspirants about 30 are 
managers of enterprises, kolkhozes, and sovkhozes, 21 are 
representatives of commercial structures, 13 are unemployed, and 
only eight are workers. 
  As a rule, the "oldsters" are going into battle. Among the 
aspirants we see Leonid Kuchma, president of the Ukrainian Union 
of Industrialists and Entrepreneurs; Sergey Pravdenko, editor in 
chief of the newspaper GOLOS UKRAINY; Valeriy Pustovoytenko, 
deputy chairman of the board of the Expobank; and also seven 
current people's deputies. 
  The situation is the same in the other oblasts. But the 
number of aspirants differs in them: It is either feast or 
famine. While in Galicia and generally in western Ukraine the 
districts are "overpopulated," they have 20 each, and even 30 
aspirants in the Crimea (which made it possible for V. Chornovil 
to accurately call these districts "fraternal graves"); for 
example, in some of the districts, alas, there are none. 
  As for the ties and blocs, there is complete confusion here 
also. Created at the end of last year by Rukh [Popular Movement 
of Ukraine], the KNDS [Congress of National-Democratic Forces], 
and the URP [Ukrainian Republican Party], the Council of 
Democratic Organizations with a permanently operating staff 
proved to be built on sand. "The separate nominations of 
candidates of the bloc and Rukh may serve as an example that not 
everything is in order in the camp of the democrats--it divides 
the united forces of the democrats," complains Levko Lukyanenko, 
cochairman of the staff. 
  Everything comes down to the fact that the ambitions of the 
national-democrats exceed their ammunition. The managers of Rukh 
themselves admit that it is not party but personal aspects that 
come to the forefront in the election campaign. "We do not have 
a political party," thinks Sergey Golovatyy, "but there are 
clubs--the Lukyanenko, Chornovil, Pavlychko, and Moroz clubs." 
Independent observers think that Rukh is now striving to win the 
elections only with its own forces, without considering the 
needs of its Council partners, inasmuch as it is not confident 
of the effectiveness of joint actions. And already now a futile 
debate has started regarding who was the first to start to put 
whom down. 
  "One sees an interesting alliance of our right-wingers and 
the party in power," says Vyacheslav Chornovil. "They are coming 
out against Rukh in order not to let them take those 20-25 
percent that we set our sights on. Some national democrats are 
also being used for this." Its political opponents are holding 
the directly opposite opinion. "Rukh's wish is to see to it that 
a representative of Rukh and the KNDS is not simultaneously on 
the ballot in one district--this is a declaration that is not 
backed by anything," says Larysa Skoryk. 
  It appears that the interregional bloc of Volodymyr 
Hrynyov-Leonid Kuchma feels most comfortable of all in the 
"train." "Our candidates," declared Hrynyov, "are prepared to 
cooperate without quarrels and splits in the organs of state 
authority as well." This bloc is oriented on the southeast 
region, and stands for the conduct of market reforms, but one of 
the points of its program envisions introduction of the Russian 
language as the second state language. 
  It is also impossible to disregard the bloc of Volodymyr 
Lanovyy with private entrepreneurs and free trade unions. 
Lanovyy thinks that Kuchma's program generally does not talk 
about market reforms and therefore is counterposing his own 
program, whose keystone is privatization. Lanovyy's relationship 
with the miners' trade union weakens the position of parties 
that are traditionally influential in the Donbass--Merkulov's 
Liberal Party and the Labor Party. The balance worked out by 
Lanovyy between the trade unionists and the bankers from Inko 
and Pravex makes it possible for him to stand "on his own two 
feet" immediately. 
  He also does not overestimate the role of the trade unions 
themselves which, according to the Law on Elections, and in 
particular the statute on labor collectives, have gained an 
opportunity to really influence the election process. However, 
trade union leaders treat with skepticism the idea of 
establishing a bloc with political parties. "Political forces 
are engaged in what is not even an intraparty or interparty 
fight but more of a squabble," says Aleksandr Mril, chairman of 
the executive committee of the association Free Trade Unions of 
Ukraine. "They are waging a fight for seats, for some particle 
of power. We have one objective--the democratization of society, 
reforms, and a market--but the approaches and paths are 
absolutely different. We think that people should be helped at 
least regarding bread. But they do not consider that people have 
been reduced to despair." 
  In the opinion of political scientists, a bloc has also not 
been established between the Socialist, Communist, and Peasant 
Parties. Already at the very beginning, Yevgeniy Marmazov, 
secretary of the Central Committee of the Communist Party of 
Ukraine, declared that "we will not form a bloc with anyone, but 
the Communist, Socialist, and Peasant Parties will help each 
other." And it appears it was that way at the beginning. For 
example, these parties did not allocate their aspirants in 
Donetsk according to districts, but proposed that the voters 
vote according to lists so that the Communists and Socialists 
would be able to select candidates together in a majority of the 
districts. This practice began to spread to other regions also, 
and, judging by everything, it did not last long. In some 
districts the voters will have to make a choice between the 
Socialists and Communists. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42733 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Cuts in Government Staffing Planned </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0658B Kiev PRAVDA UKRAINY in Russian 27 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0658B </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev PRAVDA UKRAINY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Sokol: "From the Life of </F>
Administrators; Staff Cuts Are Drawing Near: It Is Proposed that 
Central and Local Organs of Administration Be Cut by More Than 
43,000 Persons"] 
  [Text] Speaking at a recent all-Ukrainian conference of 
representatives of local councils, Leonid Kravchuk reported that 
the government has decided to cut the central and local organs 
of state executive authority by almost 25 percent. The 
documents, which were submitted by the Cabinet of Ministers to 
parliament, expanded and defined this thesis specifically. 
  As for the state administrative structures, it is planned to 
bring them to the level that existed on 1 January 1992. This 
means that the central ministries and departments must drop 
4,200 persons (30 percent), and regional administrative 
organs--21,500 (19 percent). 
  In the context of ministries and departments--according to 
the structures of regional executive authority--the picture is 
as follows. More than all the others there will be cuts in the 
staffs of local organs of the main auditing 
administration--4,100 persons. After this come the Ministry of 
Statistics--3,000 persons, Ministry of Justice--more than 800 
persons, Ministry of Finance--more than 700 persons, State 
Property Fund--600 persons. There will be a relatively smaller 
cut--400 persons--in the organizations of the Antimonopoly 
Committee, but this figure constitutes exactly half of those who 
work here. The structures of the State Committee for the 
Protection of Consumer Rights Affairs will be cut by 158 workers 
(out of 790). It is impossible, however, to say whether this is 
good or bad. According to the idea, this department should be 
strong and capable of coming to the defense of consumers. The 
latter, unfortunately, do not feel this at all. 
  Similarly, it is also planned to cut organs of local and 
regional self-government to the level of 1 January 1992. These 
structures are supported by local budget resources, and the 
state does not lose on them. But money is money, and it should 
be spent economically. Therefore the staffs of the 
self-government institutions of authority will have to be cut by 
17,400 persons. 
  At the same time, some organizations will grow. For example, 
local tax inspection offices will increase by 12,000, 
customs--by 5,500, courts--by 1,100, and procuracies--by 927 
persons. 
  It is obvious that the current staffs are bloated, and that 
they have to be cut. But this process should not proceed 
mechanically. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42734 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nuclear Weapons Controversy Reviewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0623A Kiev NEZAVISIMOST in Russian 19 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0623A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NEZAVISIMOST </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by observer Gennadiy Korzh: "The Legacy We Are </F>
Renouncing, or Once More About Ukraine's Nuclear Weapons"] 
  [Text] What had to have happened has come to pass. 
Documents determining the nuclear-free status of Ukraine were 
signed at the tripartite consultative (?) meeting in Moscow. We 
had already written in the last issue of NEZAVISIMOST that these 
decisions had been determined in advance, as attested by the 
words of A. Kozyrev, minister of foreign affairs of Russia, who 
by no means considers the tripartite accords the main result of 
the Moscow summit, and the very vague statement of L. Kravchuk 
at the news conference in Borispol, which may be formulated 
briefly approximately thus: Ukraine cannot go against the wishes 
of the main world powers. 
  Well, let us once again spread out the cards in the nuclear 
solitaire to better understand what kind of legacy we are 
renouncing. And why. 
<H5>  Arsenal No 3 </H5>
  The reader who has been following the problem closely might 
have noticed that Ukraine's nuclear potential has frequently 
been defined as third in importance after the United States and 
Russia. What did this arsenal No. 3 represent? 
  Of the components of the strategic triad (ground-based and 
sea- and air-launched missiles), the first and the third were 
represented here. Broadly speaking, each element of the triad 
worked for the others, complementing and mutually reinforcing 
the others. 
  Strategic offensive arms (SOA) in the system of the Ministry 
of Defense of the former USSR were always considered the "holy 
of holies." In all the years that I have been writing on 
military matters not once have I spent time on operational duty 
in units of the strategic missile forces or on a nuclear-powered 
submarine equipped with ballistic missiles. Nonetheless, I 
learned a great deal in those, "stagnation," times. Although the 
main information was still obtained when the disarmament process 
was actively under way. 
  Intercontinental ballistic missiles (ICBM's) were rightly 
considered the basis of the Soviet SOA. Those in the fixed-site 
category were deployed in launch silos--most intricate 
underground structures capable of withstanding a nuclear blast. 
The shaft of the silo is covered by a special metal roof, and 
the launch canister, fitted with a reliable shock-absorption 
system, is capable of withstanding colossal impact. The 
post-boost section of the Soviet missiles could carry from 1 to 
10 nuclear warheads. 
  Almost one-fifth of the warheads of the ground-based 
component of the triad is deployed in Ukraine. This is more than 
the nuclear warheads of Britain and France put together. Two 
ICBM bases are known. SS-19's are based in Pervomaysk of 
Nikolayev Oblast, as in the environs of Khmelnitskiy. These are 
quite powerful two-stage liquid-fuel rockets. A very important 
detail: The three-stage solid-fuel SS-24's--the main part of the 
Soviet ICBM's of this type of silo basing--are deployed in 
Pervomaysk also. It is these missiles that were manufactured in 
Pavlodar, which is in the Dnepropetrovsk region. And SS-18's are 
manufactured in Dnepropetrovsk itself, at the celebrated 
Yuzhmash. These missiles, the world's only heavy type, were with 
good reason christened Satan. Each of them is capable of 
delivering to target up to 10 one-megaton warheads. 
  The air component of the triad, less significant (but with 
its advantages), was composed of heavy bombers capable of 
carrying nuclear bombs or long-range nuclear cruise missiles. 
Note that each "cruise" could carry one nuclear warhead, but 
each bomber could be fitted with 16 such missiles. There are two 
major heavy bomber air bases in Ukraine--in Kiev and Poltava 
Oblasts. 
  Although we have no test ranges or centers for instruction 
in 
work with ICBM's, there is a facility for converting and 
eliminating ICBM's in Sarny. 
<H5>  Heroic Surmounting of Difficulties </H5>
  In May 1992 in Lisbon the heads of the foreign policy 
departments of the four "nuclear" republics of the former USSR 
and the U.S. secretary of state signed a protocol to the 
Soviet-American Treaty on Strategic Offensive Arms (START I), 
which was to have been followed by the ratification of START I 
by the parliaments of these states. Ukraine, Kazakhstan, and 
Belarus not only confirmed the USSR's START Treaty obligations 
but also undertook to completely eliminate the strategic 
offensive arms deployed on their territory within seven years. 
In addition, the three states promised to subscribe to the 
Nuclear Nonproliferation Treaty as nuclear-free states. This 
step afforded Russia the opportunity to lay claim to the status 
of "sole legitimate nuclear successor of the USSR." 
  Handsome gestures, splendid declarations.... How much in our 
history have we lost on account of the ineradicable passion for 
political posturing! Without murmur, almost, we allowed the 
tactical nuclear weapons on our territory to be withdrawn. And 
although in March 1992 L. Kravchuk announced a suspension of the 
withdrawal of the tactical nuclear weapons, many observers 
merely smiled ironically at this inasmuch as they believed that 
the withdrawal was wholly controlled by Moscow. In addition, 
from the formal viewpoint this decision of the president's was 
contrary to the declaration on the nuclear-free status of 
Ukraine. Thus was the first step en route to the world 
community's distrust of Ukraine's ability to keep its word taken. 
  The euphoria from the proclamation of independence caused 
problems. We should, oh how we should, have consulted 
specialists. And then, perhaps, events would have developed 
differently. While having agreed to the destruction of our part 
of the SOA's, we could perfectly well have kept for ourselves 
the tactical missiles. We would not here have acquired so mighty 
an opponent as the United States (the strategic missiles 
deployed in Ukraine are targeted against the United States, and 
fighting Russia with them is impossible). The nuclear warheads 
would not have needed to be replaced for a very long time or the 
missiles could have been converted to deliver point weapons, 
say. There would doubtless have been problems in the 
international arena here also. Nonetheless, I believe that 
mobile and efficient tactical nuclear weapons would have been 
far more suitable for us from the viewpoint of deterrence than 
the strategic missiles, which are not only a target for the 
ICBM's of a probable enemy but which also, if launched, would 
cause the deaths of the inhabitants of the villages in the 
vicinity of the silos. 
  But the tactical missiles were removed, and only then did 
the 
bargaining over compensation begin. Bitter arguments arose over 
the SOA's also. In a word, the Ukrainian state followed the 
distressingly well-known principle: Having initially created the 
difficulties, it set about heroically overcoming them. 
<H5>  `For'... </H5>
  The West's policy in regard to the nuclear weapons that 
constitute the legacy of the USSR has in this time been quite 
clearly defined. This is how it was formulated by B. Clinton: 
Europe would be more stable were Russia to be the sole nuclear 
power-successor of the Soviet Union. Nonetheless, certain 
political scientists advocated Ukraine's nuclear status. They 
adduced as the main argument the historically difficult 
relations between Ukraine and Russia. Giving our country serious 
guarantees of its security was proposed, therefore. Forecasting 
the course of events, the scholars examined several possible 
causes of a significant deterioration in the mutual relations of 
Ukraine and Russia. They include the common unprotected border, 
the danger of hyper-nationalism, an escalation of existing 
tensions (Crimea, the Black Sea Fleet), and the problem of 
Russians in Ukraine and Ukrainians in Russia. 
  The supporters of nuclear deterrence believe that Ukraine's 
nuclear weapons could be an effective means against an attack 
involving the use of conventional armed forces or against 
nuclear blackmail. Their arguments were approximately as 
follows: In the pre-nuclear world between 1900 and 1945 there 
were two world wars, in which approximately 50 million Europeans 
died. In the nuclear era only 15,000 Europeans died in small 
wars between 1945 and 1990. And to speak of the superpowers, on 
the other hand, there was a stable peace between them. It is 
nuclear weapons, in their opinion, that have been the firm basis 
of this peace (the concept of "nuclear stalemate," when neither 
side can win inasmuch as it would itself perish, is well known). 
<H5>  ...and `Against' </H5>
  Who could have guaranteed that Russia would have handed over 
to us its nuclear weapons unimpeded? After all, we are not in 
command of them even now, essentially. Would we have had the 
experience and wisdom sufficient for correctly disposing of the 
nuclear legacy of the USSR? Their storage and maintenance have 
constituted a serious problem. And were we, for all that, to 
take over the command and control of the SOA's, Russia would 
know full well how to paralyze the launch complexes, and nuclear 
espionage would develop to exaggerated proportions, which would 
only poison the two countries' mutual relations. Add the 
political instability in Ukraine: What if forces that might want 
to make use of the missiles were to come to power? 
  It is most unlikely, observers believe, that nuclear weapons 
could resolve all the problems of Ukraine's security. The 
missiles of the nuclear powers would be retargeted on it in an 
instant. It is perfectly possible that the possession of SOA's 
would lead Ukraine's leaders into the temptation to brandish the 
"nuclear nightstick" a little. And preservation of the nuclear 
status would hardly contribute to our country's integration in 
the European process. And in conclusion, some calculations. Were 
Ukraine to want to become a medium-sized nuclear power (like 
France or Britain), it would have to spend up to $5 billion 
annually on its nuclear programs. 
  According to some estimates, Ukraine would need no fewer 
than 
10 years and expenditure put at hundreds of billions of dollars 
to make good the supplies of components and fuel for the missile 
plants, create its own enterprises manufacturing nuclear 
warheads and guidance systems, and develop the facilities and 
methods of the control and safe operation of strategic systems 
and an early-warning system, space-based missile-targeting 
facilities, and sites for testing nuclear munitions, spacecraft 
launches, and missile testing (it would, in addition, be 
necessary to obtain the consent of neighboring countries to the 
flight over their territory of the missiles being tested). 
<H5>  Blackmail and Threats </H5>
  Peering into the future, political scientists have observed 
that the basis of the new multipolar Europe will be rivalry 
between Germany and Russia in the field of security. An 
independent Ukraine could ease this rivalry. It is, after all, a 
considerable barrier between Germany and Russia. But take away 
this key barrier, and the borders of the two strongest states of 
Europe draw closer for there are weak countries between them, 
after all. Thus Ukraine becomes an arena of new political 
rivalry. 
  In the case of the nuclear weapons it is absolutely clear 
that Russia (and, broadly speaking, the United States inasmuch 
as it is the latter that is the rival of Germany in the world, 
as Russia is in Europe) has bested the FRG. Everything has been 
used to achieve this goal: from disinformation of world public 
opinion and economic blackmail through a refusal to maintain 
Ukraine's nuclear arsenals, despite current agreements. 
<H5>  One Further Option </H5>
  At the time when Russia was attacking Ukraine's nuclear 
policy "on all azimuths," in de Gaulle's well-known expression, 
the United States was deafeningly silent. But this could not 
have lasted long, and new approaches were manifested at the time 
of Les Aspin's visit to Kiev, apparently. What was Ukraine's 
nuclear potential at that time? Some 130 SS-19 missiles (six 
warheads each), 46 SS-24's (10 warheads each), and 30 strategic 
bombers, which all together can carry 416 bombs. It was rumored 
that Ukraine could aspire to definitive control of the strategic 
bombers and could launch those SS-24's that had been built in 
our country. And, indeed, had things turned out differently, 
this could have been a prospective program. Even in this case 
Ukraine's nuclear potential would have remained the third in the 
world. 
  There is reason to believe that these matters were discussed 
during the negotiations with Les Aspin. It was at this time that 
the idea of international control of the nuclear warheads from 
the missiles stood down from alert status, which would have been 
warehoused on the territory of Ukraine until a decision on the 
amounts of compensation for them had been adopted, was advanced. 
  Observers allow that Aspin's negotiations were a deft 
maneuver aimed at increasing the political isolation of Ukraine 
as a "latter-day European aggressor." This worked in the Western 
press. Many publications appeared on this subject. 
  This is why B. Clinton's speech in Brussels and, 
subsequently, his meetings in Kiev and Moscow assumed the nature 
of a sensation. 
<H5>  Way Out of the Impasse. But Which? </H5>
  Ukraine has, for all that, I believe, emerged from the 
impasse to which it had been brought by irresponsible petty 
"peacemaker" politicians. Russia has agreed to compensation for 
the withdrawn tactical nuclear weapons, the amounts of which 
will be determined by experts. On the basis of an agreement 
between Ukraine and Russia the uranium from the warheads of our 
strategic missiles will be compensated by fuel for the nuclear 
power stations. Technical assistance in the dismantling will be 
rendered. Ukraine's rating in the international arena has risen. 
Economic assistance has been promised. True, all this is 
possible, in my view, only if Ukraine sails, if not in the wake 
of Russian (or, rather, Russian-American) policy, at least a 
parallel course. 
  And whereas what we noticed at the meeting in Borispol was 
our president's forced smile, in Moscow it was his shifty eyes. 
Of what was agreed there is, as before, much that is unclear. 
The security guarantees, for example. The Treaty on Nuclear 
Nonproliferation cannot be deemed such on account of the 
imprecision and vagueness of the wording contained therein. L. 
Kravchuk's references to the "honest word" of the presidents of 
the United States and Russia are naive. 
  Or take the problem of the missile silos. How are they to be 
destroyed? Explosions would cause the region's ecology 
irreparable damage. 
  One way or another, the deed is done. In acquiring (de 
facto) 
nuclear-free status Ukraine is, it would seem, losing part of 
its independence. Ukraine has never yet throughout its history 
been absolutely independent, for that matter. The question is to 
what extent and on whom we will be dependent today. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42735 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Metropolitan Volodymyr on Interdenominational Conflicts </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0595A Kiev MOLOD UKRAYINY in Ukrainian 13 Jan 94 pp 1, 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0595A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev MOLOD UKRAYINY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Ukrainian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Metropolitan of Kiev and All Ukraine </F>
Volodymyr (Sabodan), First Hierarch of the Ukrainian Orthodox 
Church (subordinated to the Moscow Patriarchate), by Lyudmyla 
Shevchuk, under the "Interview of Current Interest" rubric; 
place and date not given: "Metropolitan Volodymyr: `If It Is 
Resolved by Violence, I Will Have Difficulty Continuing To Hold 
Back Our People...."] 
  [Text] Our interlocutor is Metropolitan of Kiev and All 
Ukraine Volodymyr (Sabodan), First Hierarch of the Ukrainian 
Orthodox Church (subordinated to the Moscow Patriarchate). 
  [Shevchuk] Your Eminence, in one of your first interviews 
after your election as the First Hierarch of the Ukrainian 
Orthodox Church by the Synod of Bishops in Kharkov, you said 
that you were returning to Ukraine to serve the interests of 
your people. What is behind these words now, a year and a half 
since? 
  [Sabodan] Our church of Christ has only one goal--to devote 
all of its efforts to the people among whom we live and whom we 
humbly serve. 
  Of course, tragic events have broken out in Ukraine in 
conjunction with the emergence of three branches of Orthodoxy. 
Many complications have resulted from two patriarchates and two 
patriarchs existing now. This is indeed affecting our relations. 
However, we must labor, pray, and be concerned about our people 
for the Lord to unite us, for accord and peace to prevail in the 
territory of Ukraine. 
  [Shevchuk] Could you tell us briefly about what your church 
amounts to at present? 
  [Sabodan] We have 6,000 parishes, 5,000 clergymen, 49 
monasteries and convents, 12 theological seminaries that train 
cadres for ministry, 28 dioceses, and 30 bishops. 
  We favor the acquisition of the status of a national 
Orthodox 
church by our church; at present, 15 such churches exist in the 
world. We should also take into account the mood of the people, 
who are now tense and frightened with these divisions, 
unifications, and separations. Unfortunately, the very word 
"autocephaly" has been compromised. We have yet to work with the 
clergy, the monks, and our lay members for them to understand 
that the path to a national church is natural. Other churches, 
which are currently independent, have also traveled it. 
  We have already repeated our point of view many times--this 
is about an autonomous, independent church; this must be done 
through an expression of the will of not just the bishops, but 
also the clergy and the believers. Otherwise, an even sadder 
split will result than the one we already have. 
  [Shevchuk] What is your connection with the Moscow 
Patriarchate at present? 
  [Sabodan] We are an independent, self-governing part of the 
Russian Orthodox Church. It is just that, in keeping with the 
statute, we refer to the name of the Most Holy Patriarch Oleksiy 
during the high mass. We are thus united with other national 
churches. 
  The Holy Synod leads our church entirely and completely. The 
patriarch does not interfere in our affairs on any issue. 
Recently, he even sent us a letter in which he stated that 
neither the Patriarchate nor he personally has any claim to 
either the church lands in the territory of Ukraine or the 
property and buildings. He testified: All that the Ukrainian 
Orthodox Church got over a millennium is its acquired property, 
and it will be the master of it. 
  [Shevchuk] To your mind, are there any prospects for coming 
together in a United Orthodox Church? Is something being done to 
this end by both parties? 
  [Sabodan] We have to put our faith in God, because only God, 
rather than the people, may unite that which is disunited, and 
save that which is perishing. 
  We now have aggravated relations with the Kiev Patriarchate, 
or more precisely, there are no relations. There have been 
attempts at the level of laymen, and they have not worked out. 
There have been attempts at the level of the clergy and 
theologians, which, unfortunately, have not been crowned with 
success, either. We will wait.... 
  [Shevchuk] We have happened to hear repeatedly from the Kiev 
Patriarchate that it has turned to you with a special appeal 
concerning unification but that you have not responded to this, 
and have, allegedly, refused to engage in any dialogue. 
  [Sabodan] Nobody has sent any appeals officially. There was 
an official invitation to the All-Ukrainian Church Council, 
which was held in October. However, we could not attend it. We 
have our own canonic principles, apostolical rules with regard 
to relations and joint prayer. Therefore, all of this has not 
been due to some whim. 
  Sometimes they accuse me of being ambitious, of allegedly 
wanting something special. I do not have any ambitions. I do not 
have a life other than that of the church, and I think I will 
not have one until I die. I was elected by the bishops, the 
people ratified this at the council, and I see my mission as 
doing everything for the Holy Church that I am capable of to the 
full extent of my energies. 
  [Shevchuk] Your Eminence, is it true that in the offices "on 
high" it was proposed to you to unite and to head the Ukrainian 
Orthodoxy? 
  [Sabodan] There was such a conversation. Just break with 
Moscow and take over everything. However, as I understand it, 
and not I alone, but the totality of our Ukrainian Orthodox 
Church, anything at all may be proclaimed, and we may break with 
anyone at all, but if there is to be a serious discussion of the 
future of the Ukrainian Orthodox Church, of all Orthodoxy in 
Ukraine, this should be done in a legitimate manner. Our church 
should be recognized by all local Orthodox churches. 
  [Shevchuk] Your Eminence, we would like to hear specifically 
from your lips why your church, in essence, failed to take part 
in the commemoration of the famine in Ukraine. After all, this 
fact has caused indignation in certain circles and is still 
being variously interpreted.... 
  [Sabodan] Indeed, there were such interpretations. We were 
accused of boycotting the commemoration of this event. This is 
not true. At the time, I was on a business trip abroad, but 
three of our metropolitans, members of the Synod, were present 
both in the Ukraine Palace and at the memorial rally. 
  This has to do with the arrangement we made: We would come 
onto this stand, but on the condition that this would be a rally 
rather than worship. When they saw that Filaret, who had been 
defrocked, proceeded in the capacity of an archpriest and 
actually led the prayers, our bishops did not come to the 
podium, because this was, as a matter of fact, a divine service. 
  We commemorated this sad event in all dioceses. I issued an 
epistle. Therefore, we did take part, and we are pure before God 
and the people. 
  [Shevchuk] By the way, your priests frequently repeat that 
the Kiev Patriarchate and its clergy are not canonic. In turn, 
the latter call you noncanonic. They say that the bishops of the 
Moscow Patriarchate have been ordained with the blessing of the 
KGB and communist propaganda.... To tell you the truth, it is 
not that easy to sort this out from the outside. What would you 
say about this? 
  [Sabodan] The now late Patriarch Mstyslav did not recognize 
the creation of this association, of this new church structure 
in Ukraine, although they consider themselves his followers. 
  What about the specifics of apostolic rules? Yes, to us this 
is a noncanonic church, and we say this for a reason. Not a 
single church in the world has recognized the Kiev Patriarchate 
as a legitimate, canonic church. These are not my conclusions, 
but rather the reality of life. 
  [Shevchuk] And what about the assertions of the Kiev 
Patriarchate? 
  [Sabodan] Everyone defends himself. Inquire with them. 
However, it is necessary to have courage and call things by 
their names. 
  [Shevchuk] Here is one more aspect. Representatives of the 
Kiev Patriarchate say that you have illegally seized 
monasteries, in particular, the Kiev-Pechora Lavra, and that 
quite recently you tried to take the Feodosiya Church forcibly. 
Does this conform to the truth? 
  [Sabodan] Together with the people, we consider 
ourselves--and this is the case--the followers of the church 
that was created by Prince Volodymyr--the Russian Orthodox 
Church of ancient Rus. We did not take anything away--we came as 
successors. Nobody seized the Lavra; it is just that 
Metropolitan Filaret was not allowed to enter it after he was 
defrocked. 
  What about the dioceses? At present, it is the practice 
precisely of the Kiev Patriarchate to seize our churches. For 
example, they recently seized one in Chernovtsy, and there was 
an attempt in the Rovno area.... The Church of Intercession at 
Solomyanka was taken from us illegally.... 
  As far as the Feodosiya Church is concerned, this is how it 
was. On the morning of 27 December, Archimandrite Valentin, the 
secretary of Metropolitan Antoniy (Masendych) and eight of the 
monks, who represented the monastery, came to me and brought all 
documents and the seal: "We ask to be admitted to the Lavra...." 
They said: The UNSO [Ukrainian People's Self-Defense Forces] 
came by the day before, we cannot endure. I told them that we 
would not display any aggressiveness. If they wanted to remain 
at the monastery and become members of the Ukrainian Orthodox 
Church in a canonic manner, through penitence, they were welcome 
to. Then they began to ask that at least someone accompany them. 
Several monks agreed. They were shown the premises and the 
chattels; however, we did not intend to have something signed 
over in a protocol. They held a supplication service at the 
church and went their own ways. 
  In the middle of the day, 20 priests of the Kiev 
Patriarchate 
came: Where are the Russkies, what did they do here? And they 
closed the church. This is how it all ended. We did not intend 
to seize it. This is not our position. This is not the way of 
the church, although our people make many complaints to me: 
Enough of being silent, they say, we should storm it.... 
Everybody, beginning with the bishops, accuses me of passivity, 
of not provoking some kind of aggression. They say that we 
should meet violence with violence. However, an 
interdenominational war would begin in that case. God forbid. I 
do not want to be involved.... 
  [Shevchuk] Your Eminence, what is your assessment of the 
withdrawal of five bishops from the Ukrainian Orthodox 
Church-Kiev Patriarchate and their switch to your church, which 
has already been publicized in the press, especially of 
Metropolitan Antoniy (Masendych), the administrator of affairs 
of the Kiev Patriarchate, who had started out in the UAPTs 
[Ukrainian Autocephalous Orthodox Church]? 
  [Sabodan] As far as Metropolitan Antoniy is concerned, he 
has 
not approached us--neither me personally nor our Church. He has 
not asked in writing or verbally to be accepted. I do not know 
his whereabouts. VECHIRNIY KYYIV reported that he has been 
assigned to the Saratov Diocese. This is not true. 
  Four bishops have approached us: of Vinnitsa--Spyrydon, of 
Kharkov and Poltava--Roman, of Zhytomir and Ovruch--Sofroniy, 
and of Yagotin--Ioan. We accepted the last two. 
  [Shevchuk] Your Eminence, to tell you the truth, I did not 
expect you to give this interview in the Ukrainian language. It 
is a pleasure to hear it from you. A question in conjunction 
with this: Why is then instruction offered in Russian in 
theological seminaries in which the boys are, for the most part, 
from rural areas? 
  [Sabodan] Subjects such as the history of Ukraine and the 
history of the Bible are taught in Ukrainian, but there are 
problems. It is not easy to provide textbooks in Ukrainian for 
the process of instruction within a short period of time. 
However, we are working on this, and we will gradually switch to 
Ukrainian.... 
  [Shevchuk] Why do your priests preach in Russian in the 
rural 
churches? What is this, a requirement? 
  [Sabodan] Precisely, a decision was made by the Synod last 
year: Where the people want it, where the majority accepts the 
Ukrainian language as that of the service--go ahead.... 
  [Shevchuk] What would you like to say in summation of our 
conversation? 
  [Sabodan] I have already told you: We should pray primarily 
for them to see the light, so that there will not be these acts 
of violence in which some people's deputies got involved and 
still get involved, beginning with the famous decision whereby 
the Supreme Council determines what is or is not canonic in the 
Orthodox Church. For example, is the Kharkov Council canonic or 
not? It would be ridiculous if it were not so serious. This 
cannot happen in any civilized state. 
  Now there is the decision about having services alternately. 
This is a new conflict; this will not happen without violence. 
It is precisely the interference from deputies, especially in 
Volyn and the Rovno area, that brings about a terrible fight and 
anger among the people. 
  If such interference from the state continues, nothing good 
will come out of it; it will be a calamity for our Ukrainian 
people, who are facing so many problems--moral, ethical, 
cultural, and political--to begin with. What if there also is a 
calamity in the church? Unfortunately, as a matter of fact, it 
already exists.... 
  I would like to finish this conversation of ours with the 
wish that God might enlighten our government and all of us, the 
people in and outside of the Church, so that the method of 
violence be eliminated from our lives altogether, because it 
will bring about horrible things. Then it will be too late.... 
If it is resolved by violence, I, for one, will have difficulty 
continuing to hold back our people. They will not listen to me 
at all. 
  [Shevchuk] Well, thank you for the statements that we heard 
from the horse's mouth. It is possible that some of the 
questions were not quite pleasant for you, but I believe they 
are timely. Our present-day life and our readers bring them up. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42736 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Parties, Political Leaders Rated </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0649A Kiev NEZAVISIMOST in Russian 26 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0649A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev NEZAVISIMOST </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Vishnyak and Valeriy Pilipenko </F>
(UNIAN): "The Political Panorama 1993: Power, Parties, and 
Politicians"] 
  [Text] Over the year we regularly informed our 
readers of changes in the level of confidence in Ukrainian state 
and public institutions, on the popularity dynamics of political 
parties, movements, and leaders. Current statistics, however, do 
not always reflect precisely the real state of affairs, do not 
provide the ability to separate the accidental from a pattern. 
General trends acquire shape only from a distance, and without 
the knowledge of these trends, it is hard to forecast further 
changes in the political situation in Ukraine in 1994. It is 
from this angle that we would like to analyze the dynamics of 
public opinion regarding power structures, parties, and 
politicians of Ukraine from January to December of 1993, because 
the trends revealed in the course of research represent more 
than historic value today. 
<H5>  I. Confidence in Authorities: No Comment Needed </H5>
  No comment is indeed needed, since the trends in changes in 
the confidence in Ukrainian power structures are quite clear and 
consistent. 


Dynamics of the level of confidence in state and public structures (%) 

State and public    Month         Complete       Share of       Confidence 
structures                        confidence     those who      index (on a 
                                                 have no        five-point 
                                                 confidence     scale) 
                                                 at all 

The president       February      15.4           24.2           2.74 

July                10.4          47.4           2.20 

September           13.2          41.5           2.37 

December            8.8           50.3           2.12 

The Supreme         February      5.4            37.7           2.14 
Council 

July                3.4           57.6           1.84 

December            3.6           60.2           1.81 

The Cabinet of      February      12.0           28.9           2.42 
Ministers 

July                5.3           49.1           2.03 

September           6.7           47.4           2.08 

December            4.2           54.3           1.90 

The Armed Forces    February      25.9           12.8           3.09 

July                31.1          22.6           3.06 

September           31.9          19.7           3.10 

December            29.1          25.2           2.96 

The security        February      16.7           21.4           2.57 
service 

September           18.9          25.1           2.63 

December            14.6          35.3           2.39 

The church          February      30.9           10.6           2.96 

June                30.5          18.6           2.96 

December            35.5          21.2           3.13 

The judiciary       July          9.6            39.8           2.23 

September           13.3          35.9           2.34 

December            11.6          38.7           2.28 

The procuracy       July          9.3            39.7           2.22 

September           12.6          34.8           2.34 

December            10.9          39.7           2.26 

Local councils      February      5.6            47.1           1.91 

July                5.9           59.5           1.88 

September           7.1           56.0           1.92 

December            6.6           57.5           1.82 

President's         September     7.9            43.5           2.04 
representatives 

December            7.3           47.7           1.96 

Trade unions        February      8.4            42.3           2.02 

June                2.7           40.6           2.11 

December            11.3          47.6           2.13 

(Data of sociological surveys conducted by the Institute of Sociology of the 
Ukrainian Academy of Sciences [February] and public opinion polls conducted 
by Sotsis-Gallup joint enterprise in July, September, and December in all 
regions of Ukraine) 


  1. Over the entire year, in the environment of deepening 
economic crisis, the level of confidence in major institutions 
of state authority in Ukraine--the president, the Supreme 
Council, and the government--steadily declined. Only the 
confidence in the president rose temporarily in September (after 
he took charge of the government), but not for long. For all 
practical purposes already in the first half of the year the 
level of Ukrainian citizens' confidence in the president, the 
government, and the Supreme Council dropped so low that a 
referendum on confidence in them would indeed be superfluous. 
  2. It would be naive to think, however, that new 
parliamentary and presidential elections would drastically 
change for the better the problem of confidence in power 
structures. First, on the local level the degree of confidence 
in the executive and representative authority is even lower than 
in the center, and also continues to drop. Which means that a 
reform of authority will not be accomplished in these elections. 
  Second, research shows that each subsequent government at 
the 
time it is elected starts off with a lower credit of confidence 
than the preceding one. The same will be true with respect to 
the new parliament and president. In order to raise this level 
of confidence, a change for the better in the economic situation 
is needed, which is even less likely in 1994. 
<H3>  II. Political Parties: Their Number Keeps Increasing, And 
They Are Still As Far Removed From the People As Before </H3>
  The number of political parties almost doubled over the 
course of 1993, to more than 30, but their popularity among the 
populace remained extremely low. As a year before, half of the 
populace did not trust any of the parties. The adoption of a 
majority-based election law exacerbated even more the crisis of 
the multiparty system in Ukraine and the split of the populace 
along political and party lines. Thus, a vicious circle has 
formed: Without multiparty elections, parties will remain 
discussion clubs, but without a politically structured society, 
multiparty elections will turn into (as happened in Russia) a 
dangerous game with unpredictable consequences. 
  That is why it is very difficult to analyze the trends in 
the 
changing popularity of parties in 1993. And although the 
popularity of the parties of national-democratic orientation 
(Rukh, the Democratic Party of Ukraine, the Ukrainian Republican 
Party) lately increased and they are faring much better than 
both left-wing parties (the Communist Party of Ukraine, the 
Socialist Party of Ukraine, and the Ukrainian Labor Party) and 
the parties of liberal-social-democratic orientation, 
nevertheless, even on the threshold of new elections this does 
not tell us much. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Dynamics of Electoral Preferences of the Ukrainian Populace Regarding Politi-| 
|cal Parties and Movements (%)                                                | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Parties and movements fo-|May-June 1993            |October-November 1993    | 
|r which respondents woul-|                         |                         | 
|d vote in the elections  |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|People's Rukh of Ukraine |7.5                      |8.4                      | 
|(NRU)                    |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The Democratic Party of  |5.6                      |14.3                     | 
|Ukraine (DemPU)          |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The Communist Party of U-|4.5                      |4.1                      | 
|kraine (KPU)             |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The Greens Party (PZU)   |4.3                      |4.0                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ukrainian Republican Par-|1.8                      |3.2                      | 
|ty (URP)                 |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The Socialist Party of U-|1.1                      |1.9                      | 
|kraine (SPU)             |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The Ukrainian Labor Part-|no data                  |1.9                      | 
|y (UPT)                  |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The Ukrainian Peasant-De-|1.6                      |1.7                      | 
|mocratic Party (UKDP)    |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The People's Party of Uk-|2.4                      |no data                  | 
|raine (NPU)              |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The Party of Democratic  |2.5                      |1.4                      | 
|Rebirth of Ukraine (PDVU)|                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The Social Democratic Pa-|1.4                      |0.5                      | 
|rty of Ukraine (SDPU)    |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The Party of Order and J-|2.7                      |no data                  | 
|ustice                   |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The Ukrainian Party of B-|no data                  |1.5                      | 
|eer Lovers (UPLP)        |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The Christian Democratic |no data                  |1.4                      | 
|Party of Ukraine (KhDPU) |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|The Liberal Party of Ukr-|no data                  |0.5                      | 
|aine (LPU)               |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ukrainian National Assem-|0.2                      |1.8                      | 
|bly (UNA-UNSO)           |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Other parties            |5.9                      |4.7                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Undecided                |34.1                     |26.9                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Will not participate in  |28.7                     |22.8                     | 
|elections                |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Data of sociological surveys by the Institute of Sociology of the Ukrainian | 
|Academy of Sciences and Democratic Initiative center)                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  First, a majority-based system will be used in the 
elections; 
in this arrangement, a candidate's personal 
popularity--especially in villages and small towns--means more 
than his party affiliation. 
  Second, a considerable number of supporters of the 
Democratic 
Party and the Greens Party represents more likely a positive 
response to the ideas of democratism and protection of the 
environment (that is, a party's pretty name) than to a 
particular party with its particular leaders. 
  Third, the process of forming political blocs has begun, 
which may change substantially the political situation on the 
threshold of the elections. For instance, a December poll of 
Kievans conducted by the Ukraine Sociology Service [as rendered] 
showed that the creation of the Kuchma-Grinev Inter-regional 
Bloc of Reforms [MBR] by itself already has changed 
substantially Kievans' electoral attitudes. While a month ago 
Kievans preferred Rukh (10 percent), the DemPU (4 percent), New 
Ukraine (4 percent), the KPU and SPU (4 percent), in December 17 
percent intended to vote for the MBR (or, to be precise, for 
Kuchma and Grinev), 15 percent--for Rukh, 6 percent--for the KPU 
and SPU, and 6 percent--for the DemPU. 
  Still, it is clear that given our patriarchal-authoritarian 
mentality, it is political leaders rather than blocs and parties 
that will determine the results of parliamentary and 
presidential elections. 
<H5>  Dynamics of Political Leaders' Ratings: No Surprises </H5>
  There were no substantive changes with respect to the 
popularity of the leading figures on the political Olympus of 
the Ukrainian leadership in 1993. 
  The main trend of the year is the struggle for the top spot 
in popularity ratings between Leonid Kravchuk and Leonid Kuchma. 
Having burst into the Ukrainian political elite at the end of 
1992, Leonid Kuchma quickly became not only one of the top five 
leaders in terms of popularity, but also surpassed the 
indisputable leader of the 1991-1992 seasons--the president--in 
the spring. And although the Kuchma government eventually 
achieved nothing with respect to reform and stabilization of the 
economy, this did not hurt Leonid Danylovych's image. As 
research shows, the prime minister's lead in June-July 1993 
became a real threat. Having "swallowed" Leonid Kuchma, the 
president regained leadership in September, but the former prime 
minister's latest steps show that he has not yet exhausted his 
potential. Quite likely, the competition for the president's job 
in the summer will center on these two figures. Right now there 
is little likelihood that Ivan Plyushch, Vyacheslav Chornovil, 
Volodymyr Yavorivskyy, and Igor Yukhnovskyy, let alone Vladimir 
Grinev, Kostyantyn Morozov, and other politicians, will be able 
to get in. As 1993 showed, ratings do not change very quickly, 
and therefore even with the remaining half a year it is almost 
impossible even for these politicians to pull enough percentage 
points away from Kravchuk or Kuchma. If the MBR nominates as its 
presidential candidate Grinev instead of Kuchma, it would be 
naive to hope that the former prime minister will be able to 
convince his supporters to vote for the former deputy 
speaker--most likely his electorate will swing to Kravchuk, 
Plyushch, and other representatives of the "power party." 


Dynamics of Confidence and Popularity Ratings of Ukrainian Political Figures (%) 

Political      Completely trust                 Do not trust at all              Total rating 
figure 

               July    September    December    July    September    December    July    September    December 

Leonid         10.4    14.5         10.5        47.4    41.3         49.9        2.08    2.28         2.07 
Kravchuk 

Leonid         20.0    15.9         15.8        26.7    33.1         38.8        2.53    2.09         2.11 
Kuchma 

Ivan           6.9     9.3          7.7         39.8    36.2         38.8        1.53    1.48         1.56 
Plyushch 

Vyacheslav     6.2     6.3          7.1         53.7    53.5         56.2        1.49    1.36         1.61 
Chornovil 

Igor           6.0     7.7          12.8        34.1    31.7         32.3        1.26    1.20         1.50 
Yukhnovskyy 

Volodymyr      -       -            12.8        -       -            23.4        -       -            1.42 
Yavorivskyy 

Kostyantyn     -       8.6          10.0        -       22.8         24.7        -       1.08         1.22 
Morozov 

Vladimir       -       5.1          6.3         -       24.6         25.8        -       0.95         1.22 
Grinev 

Dmytro         4.9     6.3          7.3         30.9    29.2         30.1        1.11    1.05         1.14 
Pavlychko 

Larisa         -       6.5          7.3         -       30.8         29.5        -       0.93         1.02 
Skorik 

Ivan Drach     3.6     4.7          5.2         33.9    31.2         30.7        1.02    0.88         0.99 

Mikhaylo       3.3     -            6.2         30.1    -            23.9        0.77    -            0.90 
Horyn 

Les Tanyuk     3.0     2.9          4.5         26.3    21.5         22.4        0.78    0.58         0.73 

Serhiy         -       3.8          6.2         -       22.3         22.3        -       0.65         0.82 
Holovatyy 

Oleksandr      4.1     -            3.0         31.4    -            25.3        0.94    -            0.68 
Moroz 

Vasyl          -       4.2          5.4         -       23.6         26.3        -       0.77         0.91 
Durdynets 

Volodymyr      0.5     0.9          1.4         24.5    24.4         26.9        0.50    0.49         0.60 
Filenko 

Petro          -       -            2.2         -       -            21.3        -       -            0.46 
Symonenko 

Igor           -       -            0.8         -       -            19.3        -       -            0.37 
Merkulov 

Vitaliy        -       -            0.8         -       -            17.9        -       -            0.34 
Kononov 

(Data from polls conducted by Sotsis-Gallup joint enterprise) 





  ------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Dynamics of Confidence and Popularity Ratings of Ukrainian Political Figures | 
|(%)                                                                          | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Politicians              |1992                     |1993                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Leonid Kravchuk          |21.99                    |21.27                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Leonid Kuchma            |7.94                     |17.11                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Vyacheslav Chornovil     |5.96                     |7.58                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ivan Plyushch            |1.69                     |6.85                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Vitold Fokin             |1.13                     |0.0                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ihor Yukhnovskyy         |1.02                     |4.16                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Viktor Pynzenyk          |-                        |3.18                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Borys Oliynik            |-                        |2.20                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Other politicians        |7.35                     |5.62                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Undecided                |51.81                    |32.03                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  In the sociological poll of Kievans, conducted by the 
independent company Ukraine Sociology Service on commission from 
UNIAN [Ukrainian National Information and News Agency] in the 
end of December, Ukrainian President Leonid Kravchuk was named 
the politician of the year--same as in 1992. Even the share of 
those who named him as the politician of the year has not 
changed, although in terms of ratings the president more than 
once lost the lead to the prime minister. We, of course, 
congratulate both Leonid Makarovych and all of us on the 
occasion. Because in the environment of continuing economic 
collapse, hyperinflation, and impoverishment of the citizens, 
few politicians in the world could hope for such support. Either 
we have a different political mentality, or there are just too 
few politicians known to the people.... 
  It is enough to look at the top eight politicians of the 
year 
to confirm that they are all familiar faces. The only difference 
perhaps is that former Prime Minister Vitold Fokin has 
disappeared into oblivion, and the only discovery of the year 
was--by now also former--Deputy Prime Minister Viktor Pynzenyk, 
who placed sixth in the poll. The year of 1994 is not only a 
Year of Blue Dog--it is also a year of parliamentary and 
presidential elections. And most likely we will be electing new 
leaders from the old deck. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|For Whom Will the Citizens of Ukraine Vote in the Presidential Elections (in | 
|%)                                                                           | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Potential candidate      |January 1993             |December 1993            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Leonid Kravchuk          |15.3                     |16.5                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Leonid Kuchma            |5.8                      |16.6                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Vyacheslav Chornovil     |7.0                      |9.1                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Vladimir Grinev          |2.8                      |4.8                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ivan Plyushch            |1.0                      |3.5                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Igor Yukhnovskyy         |1.7                      |-                        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Levko Lukyanenko         |1.5                      |2.1                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|(Data of sociological surveys conducted by the Institute of Sociology of the | 
|Ukrainian Academy of Sciences [January] and Sotsis-Gallup joint enterprise [-| 
|December].)                                                                  | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42737 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Legal Defense Provisions Explained </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0657A Kiev VECHIRNIY KYYIV in Ukrainian 27 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0657A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev VECHIRNIY KYYIV </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Ukrainian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Viktor Volodymyrovych Medvedchuk, president </F>
of the Ukrainian Society of Lawyers, by Yuriy Bondar: "The Path 
Which We Have Chosen"] 
  [Text] 
  [Bondar] Viktor Volodymyrovych, the Supreme Council recently 
decreed supplements to the Ukrainian Code of Criminal Procedure 
with regard to citizens' right to a defense. What is the essence 
of these supplements? 
  [Medvedchuk] The right to a defense is an unchanging and 
important feature of a state based on the rule of law. To a 
considerable extent, it is conditioned by what kind of role is 
played by the institution of the bar within the legal system. In 
line with the earlier enacted law entitled "On the Bar in 
Ukraine," the full weight and authority of lawyers were 
expanded. However, they were still unable to guarantee citizens' 
right to a defense. It took a year for the legislators to become 
aware of the need for supplementary legal changes. In my view, 
the most essential of these supplements is the provision 
that--from now on--a citizen who has been arrested by staffers 
of the internal-affairs organs, security service, or 
procurator's office as a suspect or an accused person shall have 
the right to see a lawyer face-to-face (and, therefore, to 
obtain skilled legal assistance) prior to the initial 
interrogation. There are also other changes and supplements with 
regard to a lawyer's participation in the preliminary 
investigation and the court trial. It must be said that their 
interpretation corresponds to the legal norms which exist in 
civilized countries. 
  [Bondar] Insofar as I know, these very demands for 
guaranteed 
rights to a defense constituted one of the demands made by the 
recent lawyers' strike. 
  [Medvedchuk] Yes, that's true. And it is important to 
understand here that--in demanding the changes which have now 
been incorprated into the legislation--neither the strike 
committee nor the Ukrainian Society of Lawyers were defending 
the rights of the lawyers themselves. The expansion of our full 
powers and authority is the expansion of the full powers and 
authority of the citizens who entrust us with the task of 
defending their rights and interests. 
  [Bondar] A short time ago the expansion of thier own rights 
was also achieved by the organs of the procuracy; and 
corresponding changes were introduced into the effective 
legislation. To what extent are these two branches of justice 
equal today, let's say--for example--in the pertinent court 
procedure? 
  [Medvedchuk] With respect to legislative acts and norms in 
both court procedures and in matters of procedural regulation, 
the procuracy and the bar are markedly equal. In this 
connection, however, I cannot--unfortunately--affirm that we 
have achieved such equality in practice. The courts (such is the 
inertia of thought) are still inclined to pay more attention to 
the ideas set forth by the procuracy. But the recent changes, 
including those in the awareness of our fellow-citizens, attest 
to the fact that--no matter what has been said there--we are, 
nevertheless, building a state based on the rule of law. And I 
am convinced that this will not be just something on paper here 
in our country. 
  [Bondar] You say that the rights of lawyers are the rights 
of 
the citizens whose interests they are defending. But to what 
extent are the rights of lawyers themselves defended and 
protected? I ask you this bearing in mind the instances whereby 
some lawyers have been persecuted for participating in the 
recent strike.... 
  [Medvedchuk] I would not view this matter in a narrow 
aspect, 
inasmuch as lawyers are not at all unique in the legal 
understanding of a portion of society; their civil rights are 
the same as those of other persons. As to specific persecutions 
of lawyers for participating in the strike, let me note the 
following: These persecutions were neither organized nor 
targeted in their nature. Leading officials in the Ministry of 
Internal Affairs, the Ministry of Justice, the Supreme Court, 
and the Procurator General's Office supported the demands made 
by the strikers; they addressed a letter on this matter to 
persons occupying the highest positions in our country. The 
violations and abuses of power were perpetrated by certain 
staffers of the law-enforcement organs on the local level. Such 
actions attested basically to a desire to take adavantage of the 
strike in order to settle some old scores with certain lawyers 
who were inconvenient for them. None of these attacks was left 
without a reaction from the Ukrainian Society of Lawyers. At 
present I can affirm that there are no illegal actions with 
regard to lawyers. 
  [Bondar] The Ukrainian Society of Lawyers recently addressed 
a proposal to the president of Ukraine, wherein they advocated 
the creation--under him--of a coordinating council for the 
defense and protection of human rights. But there are quite a 
few such committees and commissions already in existence. How 
does your proposal differ from them? 
  [Medvedchuk] The citizens' committees and commissions which 
already exist cannot encompass all aspects of the right to a 
legal defense; they are limited to merely the most blatant 
political cases. But we, as lawyers, encounter on a day-to-day 
basis violations of human rights which have nothing to do with 
politics. However, for an individual citizen, they are--believe 
me--no less painful. Moreover, a person whose interests are 
being trampled upon cannot always travel in search of justice to 
a rights-defense committee which is located in Kiev or some 
other large center. But our proposal boils down to creating a 
coordinating council which would be able to combine the 
information and efforts of lawyers (making good use of their 
organizationally repaired structure) and the other 
rights-defending organizations. It would also enact decisions 
pertaining to human-rights violations regardless of whether they 
involve--so to speak--persons who are of great power in this 
state. Because for the state there should be no difference whose 
rights are being violated--whether it is a well-known or a 
little-known person. It is certainly the case that either one is 
a citizen of this country. 
  [Bondar] To what extent, in your opinion, does the presently 
existing legislative base fully defend, protect, and guarantee 
the right of a citizen to have a defense? 
  [Medvedchuk] If we compare the system of legal defense for a 
Unkrainian citizen with what we had just a few years ago, I can 
assert the following: In our country the right to a defense is 
now much, much greater. Today we are proceeding along the path 
of building new legislation, introducing new legal norms 
which--at the legislative level--are strengthening the 
protection and defense of Ukraine's citizens. Of course, this 
path is still far from reaching the stage of full protection and 
defense. But I am convinced that there is no other path for us 
to take. I anticipate that the new Ukrainian parliament will 
also support and maintain such a stance. 
  P. S. By the way, if you have questions for the 
president of the Society of Lawyers--questions which pertain to 
the legal defense of citizens, their rights and interests--you 
can send them to our editorial offices. Viktor Medvedchuk has 
promised to answer them. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42738 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Filenko Outlines Party Economic Position </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0608A Kiev HOLOS UKRAYINY in Ukrainian 15 Jan 94 pp 6-7 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0608A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev HOLOS UKRAYINY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Ukrainian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Volodymyr Filenko, Ukraine people's deputy, </F>
chairman of the board of the Party of Democratic Renewal of 
Ukraine: "Who Does Not Learn from Other Revolutions Will Get His 
Own"] 
  [Text] This is not malicious rhetoric but an unfortunate 
fact: in the years since independence life in Ukraine has 
worsened. The eternal philosophical question "How to Live?" has 
turned for many of our compatriots into a desperate query: "How 
to Survive?" 
  Two years ago Ukraine inherited a total general crisis. 
Along 
with independence, the Ukrainian people got an opportunity to 
live by their own wits. How did they use this opportunity? 
  The Soviet Union disappeared from the map two years ago; 
yet, 
we still have a part of the Soviet economic system, not yet a 
Ukrainian economy. Production is not geared toward Ukrainian 
resources and needs but toward making output which we do not 
need from raw materials and components which we do not have. 
This is why without a radical structural overhaul of the 
Ukrainian economy based on its resources and needs we will 
neither be able to provide a normal life for the people nor 
achieve complete independence for the country. Nor will a 
structural overhaul be enough in itself. We must stop the 
printing press which churns out money. 
  This reminds me of the comic play "The Wedding in Malinovka" 
and its colorful character, Popandopulo the Financier. He is no 
miser: on the contrary, he pays readily with the money which he 
himself prints, repeating: "Go ahead, take it; I can draw myself 
new bills." It seems that the monetary policy of the National 
Bank is based on the same principle. 
  While irresponsible emission weakens the karbovanets, the 
use 
of hard currency in domestic transactions renders it totally 
useless. Until Ukrainian money becomes the only legal tender in 
Ukraine, the talk of stabilizing Ukrainian finances will only 
serve to disguise anti-Ukrainian financial policies. I am not 
proposing to restore the Iron Curtain or bring back xenophobia: 
since the exchange of currency is an integral part of a normally 
functioning economy, how come there are stores all over Ukraine, 
where Ukrainian money is not accepted? 
  An integral part of the current financial policy is the 
fixing of the dollar exchange rate by the National Bank. In 
general, it is normal to have fixed exchange rates. In Poland, 
for instance, it is one of the most important components of 
Balcerowics' brilliant stabilization plan. Nor does it matter 
what level the exchange rate is set at, as long as it is a rate 
of exchange (i.e., of free purchase and sale), and not 
confiscation. How else to call the compulsory exchange of one 
half of their hard currency earnings imposed on enterprises? 
And, to make sure that they could not make up their losses by 
selling the rest of their hard currency at the currency 
exchange, the exchange has now been shut down. 
  Money, both foreign and domestic, has a bad luck in Ukraine. 
Both experts and officials at every level have talked so much of 
new money being printed, or already printed, that monetary 
reform became unavoidable. Expectations of it in Ukraine as well 
as abroad are so strong that from the psychological point of 
view the karbovanets can no longer be stabilized. How to 
stabilize a currency that has lost all credibility and whose 
replacement is expected from one day to the next? 
  The optimal solution would be to introduce the hryvna in 
parallel with the karbovanets and then to withdraw the latter 
gradually. Perhaps other methods would turn out to be better. 
But should this candy-wrapper game go on? The choice is up to us. 
  Simple replacement of one kind of paper with another would 
not be of any use. The proper effect would be achieved only by 
coordinated monetary and banking reform in the context of 
general economic reform. What is needed is a two-level banking 
infrastructure with the National Bank at the top level and a 
broad network of flexible, independent, mainly private 
commercial banks at the lower level. 
  The hryvna may be brought into circulation from the start as 
freely convertible within Ukraine. Creating the hard currency 
stabilization fund to support the exchange rate is a feasible 
task, if it is given the highest priority. 
  However, the stabilization fund will be exhausted quickly 
unless there are goods that the hryvna can buy. Until the engine 
of the market economy starts humming, it could be mainly real 
estate and land. There is no reason to fear: privatized land 
plots will not go anywhere from Ukraine but will be utilized 
more efficiently--including also by those who band together into 
cooperatives. 
  Our state is not poor, it is rich. It is the Ukrainian 
people 
who are poor. The state owns 90 percent of all property: the 
land, the raw materials, the factories and the 
stores--practically all of Ukraine. This enormous wealth is not 
traded (at least not legally); it has been artificially 
withdrawn from the market and is not tradable. 
  Since there is a shortage of goods for sale, prices go up, 
inflation increases and money quickly loses its value. It is not 
profitable to invest into long-term projects which are necessary 
to establish new enterprises, restructure existing ones and 
effect a structural overhaul--in short, to develop production. 
As a result, money is either spent in retail trade, where it 
turns over quickly, or is siphoned abroad, where business 
conditions are much more favorable. In Ukraine, meanwhile, 
inflation, combined with the decline of output, is turning into 
stagflation. 
  In these conditions, privatization is the greatest 
anti-monopoly factor. State monopoly, on the other hand, makes 
it possible to hike prices without shame and with impunity. The 
domination of the state sector in the production of consumer 
goods and retail trade means a harsh choice between an orgy of 
price hikes which we see today and low prices with a gradual but 
inexorable withdrawal of goods from legal trade which we had in 
the past. 
  Private production and trade mean sufficient quantity 
of goods and socially acceptable prices, whereas state 
production and trade result either in out-of-this-world prices 
on down-to-earth goods or in low prices on nonexistent goods. 
  Some 2,000 years ago, in his treatise "On Duties" Cicero 
wrote as though it had long been obvious: "It is important that 
people use public property as public and private property as 
their own." Thousands of years have passed. Today's bureaucrats 
have grown accustomed to managing public property "in the name 
and on the behalf of the people," which means totally without 
accountability. If we take into account that they control land, 
residential and commercial real estate and plenty of other 
property, it would become clear that a gold mine is like nothing 
compared to what the bureaucrats have. Combined with a variety 
of permits, licenses and limitations, excessive state power 
becomes the foundation for abuse and corruption. This is why the 
black market is the only one that flourishes and constantly 
grows in Ukraine. 
  Privatization will move great quantities of goods from 
the black market to the legal one. There is no better cure from 
both inflation and corruption. 
  Ukraine is not yet democratic, but it is no longer 
totalitarian. People can talk, hold rallies and strike. 
Employees of the state sector can now press their demands, which 
are both reasonable and, at the same time, unrealistic. People 
think that the state, if it only wished, could satisfy 
everybody's demands. 
  Similar problems exist in France, Italy and other countries. 
This clearly shows that a market economy, democracy and a large 
state sector are incompatible, because a great temptation arises 
to seek improvements in the living standard not in accordance 
with economic development but by means of non-economic pressure. 
  In the West, the low point was reached during miner strikes 
in the 1970s in Great Britain, which in a large measure brought 
about the replacement of the Labor government by the 
Conservative government of Margaret Thatcher. The problem was 
solved radically and efficiently: by privatization. As a result, 
the living standard in Great Britain increased considerably, 
including that of workers, and especially that of miners. 
  For the same reasons privatization was effected in the 
Canadian province of British Columbia, in Australia and in New 
Zealand. Privatization is going on in France, Germany, Sweden 
and Italy. And in every country of the former USSR. Except in 
Ukraine. 
  These examples lead to the following conclusion: mass 
privatization has a major positive impact, both immediate and 
indirect. This is not a concession to fashion, nor another 
imported idea, but a deliberate step toward healing the economy. 
This is why the Party of Democratic Renewal of Ukraine (PDVU) 
advocates rapid, large-scale privatization of both small and 
large enterprises. 
  However, privatization alone will not suffice. We also need 
new, competitive enterprises. This is why privatization must be 
complemented by the urgent development of private enterprise, 
most importantly of the small and medium market segments. We 
have talked often enough of the back-breaking tax burden that 
law-abiding entrepreneurs cannot afford, but cause for complaint 
has not diminished. I have already mentioned the fact that the 
state takes 50 percent of hard currency earnings, paying almost 
nothing in return. I could mention many other examples of how 
private enterprise is being pressured, but what for? Questions 
whether the state creates favorable conditions for economic 
initiative or inhibits it, or whether it protects citizens from 
bureaucratic and criminal extortion or encourages it, seem 
rhetorical. 
  Nevertheless, given the lack of favorable conditions for 
business activity of the population, these are the questions of 
survival. There could have been instructions hanging everywhere 
on how to open and manage a private business, whereas organizing 
assistance to beginners could have become top priority. 
  The main goal of a private enterprise is return on 
investment, or profit. The state, on the other hand, has a 
different set of priorities. A state entrepreneur is above all a 
servant of the state. His goal is to do what is best for the 
state and for his career, not business considerations. A private 
enterprise is much more efficient than a state one. This has 
been proven by historical experience and is clearly illustrated 
by the living standards of the people in the Free World. 
  Since the Iron Curtain has fallen, only those who do not 
want 
to hear do not know this. Social Democratic parties, after 
coming to power, traditionally carried out nationalization. As a 
result, a sizable state sector exists in the West. But they have 
become convinced that this is harmful and have revised their 
programs radically. Now they advocate strong social security 
systems within the confines of the free market economy. 
  Rich people do not exist only in America: they exist 
everywhere where there is money. They existed under Stalin's 
orthodox socialism and under Brezhnev's developed socialism; 
they exist today, too, while socialism is on its death throes. 
But only the market economy helps create a large class of 
proprietors, the third estate. In developed countries it has 
become the majority of the population. It is comprised of 
businessmen and farmers, teachers and doctors, scientists and 
skilled workers. 
  Prosperity does not fall from the skies like manna, nor does 
the middle class appear out of nothing, as though by magic. It 
is built up gradually, with diligence and hard work. Neither the 
Europeans nor the Americans have always had the kind of standard 
of living they enjoy today. Nor do all countries with a market 
economy prosper yet. There is no ideal, but there are decent 
examples and, therefore, hope. The living standard in countries 
which combine the market economy with a multiparty parliamentary 
system is considerably better than in any other social structure 
that humanity has known. 
  Availability of goods, a large middle class and the 
fruits of the market economy are the guarantees of stability and 
dynamic, harmonious development of society. 
  Lack of energy and raw materials and irregularities in 
foreign commercial relations, primarily with Russia, are a 
reality. But how important can this be when gas, water and other 
valuable resources are squandered without control and the energy 
intensity of production in Ukraine exceeds considerably the same 
indicators in France, Germany and Denmark? 
  The insistence that external factors are the main cause of 
our problems is empty talk, substitution of the root causes of 
our economic crisis with other, less important ones and an 
attempt to shun responsibility for our own shortcomings. 
  Our state is not poor, our country has not been cursed with 
a 
poor climate and our land is fertile and has other resources. It 
is not Ukraine that is resource-poor; it is Iceland that lacks 
resources and is but a volcanic island battered by the winds. 
Yet, its per capita income is a little higher than in the US. 
Denmark is a country perched on dunes; yet, its people live so 
well that only after a second attempt they were persuaded to 
approve the Maastricht Treaty. The Japanese also live well. 
  The wonder is not that we live poorly but that we are alive 
at all. We live poorly because government leaders have bad 
policies which do not encourage people to work but to beg, 
demand and steal. Why do we have such policies? 
  Of course, there is plenty of incompetence and lack of 
professionalism. The traditional brain drain to Moscow and lack 
of experience governing a country and not a province and poor 
professional education under the Soviet regime all have had 
their impact. Moreover, a Soviet economist and an economist are 
not the same thing; nor is it always clear which impulse in the 
leadership would win over: that which comes from the experience 
of management or of destruction. 
  But above and beyond all these factors, the fact is that the 
ruling elite implements the kind of policy it wants. Ukraine is 
not ruled by little kids but by rational human beings who make 
conscious decisions and consciously accept their obvious, 
foreseeable consequences. 
  There is no need either to discover America, or to reinvent 
the wheel, or to seek out a nonexistent program for a quick and 
painless transition to a living standard similar to that of 
Sweden or even of Greece. The fundamentals of the true market 
economy, which are in the main identical in Japan, the EU and 
the US, are well-known. So are the blueprints for accelerated 
development of Third World countries and for the transition of 
socialist economies to the free market. Not only are they 
well-known, but they have been tested in practice, as 
continuously proven to work in Europe, Asia and Russia. Problems 
do arise, but the ultimate success of such policies is already 
clear--in those countries where they have been adopted. 
  In Ukraine, on the other hand, laws on the privatization of 
small and large enterprises that were passed a year and a half 
ago have not been implemented yet. State privatization programs 
for 1992 and 1993 were deliberately sabotaged. The same is true 
of the Cabinet of Ministers' decree on the privatization of 
backyard and dacha plots for 1993. 
  Are the authorities ignorant of this? Or perhaps they lack 
the ability? No, it is desire that they lack. Property 
without proprietors, business without businessmen allows them to 
combine without accountability the license of an owner with the 
lack of responsibility of a hired hand. If you can live like 
this you do not want to change anything. 
  But it can not go on like this. Privatization is 
unavoidable. 
Life and economic necessity will gain the upper hand. Everybody 
understands this. Preparation for large-scale privatization goes 
on. In a rather unusual way, however. Transition to a corporate 
structure, breakup of large enterprises, buyouts and 
commercialization go on slowly and in some cases only 
superficially. But, at the same time, busy replacement of signs 
and the establishment of pseudo-market entities and small 
enterprises in the state sector that live off state authority go 
full-steam ahead. 
  On the one hand, this is a way to transfer public funds and 
even property into private pockets and, on the other, a seizure 
of advantageous starting positions which, once mass 
privatization has been declared, would automatically lead to the 
transfer of better properties into privileged hands. 
  Based on this scenario, mass privatization would formally 
begin only after the de facto privatization of highly 
profitable properties has been completed. There are many tasty 
morsels, and it takes time to share them out. Privatization is 
being delayed while the lion is getting ready to leap. 
  Those who are willing to learn can learn a lesson from 
history: whenever the people realize that property is being 
distributed unfairly there is trouble. In 1961, the Russian 
Emperor granted the serfs freedom without land. The outcome is 
well-known. 
  Since the majority of the population have been excluded from 
privatization and have no chance of acquiring their fair share 
of national (and not state) property, none of the leaders will 
be able to sleep or to conduct business in peace. Freedom 
without property is a time bomb placed under the privatization 
process as well as under the economic future of the country. The 
specter of communism roams Ukraine. Who does not learn from 
other revolutions will get his own. 
  This is why the best possible method of privatization is the 
one that is most fair. Such would be a free distribution of a 
major portion (more than half) of property among all 
proprietors, i.e., all Ukrainian citizens. Some maintain that 
this would mean forced privatization, or collectivization 
backwards. It is correct. Collectivization was robbery. 
Distribution among the people would be restitution of stolen 
property. Indeed, collectivization backwards. 
  Today, this approach is used sparingly and altogether 
insufficiently. Sum total of privatization--K1.050 million--is 
clearly too little and the list of targets is too short, while 
there are few enthusiasts and information about the program is 
being disseminated poorly. We should learn from Russia or, 
better still, the Czech Republic, both how to popularize and 
explain vouchers and to offer a variety of opportunities for 
making use of them. 
  The people of Ukraine do not suffer from market reforms but 
from their absence. Not only are market reforms not implemented; 
they are being systematically discredited. Partly revised and 
partly monopoly prices are now called free prices, the ongoing 
theft of property privatization, massive fraud entrepreneurship 
and the whole thing market reform. In this way, people feel 
anger and hatred toward the market, reform and reformers. 
  Instead, we hear calls for a state of emergency in the 
economy and for responsible commissions, committees, etc. There 
is no need for any such steps. We have had a state of emergency 
in the economy for 70 years, as well as its advocates in power. 
Ukraine needs the opposite: a normal economic system and a 
normal, competent government formed by a normal, politically 
accountable parliament. 
  From this emerges the key aspect of our differences: 
politics. Economic reform is the function of power. The hope 
that it could be implemented by a group of professors of 
economics is a pipe dream. If those who have political power 
(the parliament and the president) want reforms and delineate 
their general direction, specialists will have the 
responsibility to work out the needed programs and legislative 
agenda, and administrators to carry them out. 
  Collectivization was not carried out by peasants or by 
experimental economists, but by Bolshevik leaders. The economic 
miracle in postwar Germany, achieved under the direct leadership 
of Economic Minister Erhard, had been first sanctioned by the 
Allied occupying powers and strongly supported by Chancellor 
Adenauer and the Christian Democratic Union/Christian Social 
Union in the Bundestag. Growth in the US and Britain in the 
1980s was spearheaded by the political will of Ronald Reagan and 
Margaret Thatcher and their cohorts. 
  The most important precondition for reform is the 
election of a reformist parliament and a reformist president, 
and the formation of a reformist government. 
  Can this be achieved in the coming elections? It can, but by 
accident. The majority in the existing Supreme Council, which 
only pretended to carry out reform and was busy discrediting it, 
made sure that the incoming Supreme Council was the same. To 
this end, it passed the old election law, making it worse. The 
elections will be held on a non-party basis, which means that 
the voters will be voting for individual deputies, not for a 
specific political line, politicians or policy. 
  Existing democracies have several forms of election laws. 
But 
they all are meant to establish a parliament whose members are 
divided into party factions. The majority party forms the 
government and is therefore responsible for the chosen policy. 
On the line are votes in the next election. By assessing 
election platforms of the parties and comparing them with recent 
past, the voters have a clear framework for deciding for whom to 
vote. 
  This does not, and cannot, exist in a non-party election in 
which candidates represent no organized political force or 
tradition. Political connections and true intentions of 
so-called independent candidates are all too often concealed and 
come out only when they are already in the Supreme Council. 
  Multiparty elections are a way to achieve a functional, 
well-structured and responsible government, while non-party 
elections are a way to create a politically anonymous, 
irresponsible Supreme Council. 
  Success does not come in a day. Western countries reached 
prosperity only after they combined the market economy with a 
multiparty democracy. The same process is now under way in 
countries which only recently were living under dictatorship, 
such as Spain, Portugal, Chile and South Korea. 
  It is not an accident that the Supreme Council, whose policy 
has been to impede market reforms, has chosen as its political 
priority the path of sabotaging a multiparty system. It would be 
naive to hope that a Supreme Council elected in this manner, 
whatever its composition, would improve our living standards. As 
long as supporters of economic and political democracy remain 
divided and disorganized, the party in power will continue to 
pursue its line, accompanied by vile demagoguery. 
  In short, economic and political reform can only be blocked 
due to the weakness of its supporters. The only way to be 
respected is to become strong, and the only way to do so is to 
unite. A club of like-minded people is a good idea but it is not 
enough. A voter club is also a good idea, but it is not a 
lasting one. We need permanent, stable organizations of 
citizens: parties. Do not wait for favors from above--they are 
not forthcoming. Unite instead. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42739 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> UKRAINE </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Nuclear Energy Official on Sector's Financial Woes </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0597A Kiev PRAVDA UKRAINY in Russian 14 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0597A </F>
<F P=104>  Kiev PRAVDA UKRAINY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Vasiliy Kotko, deputy chairman of the State </F>
Committee of Ukraine for the Use of Nuclear Energy, by Viktor 
Rassokha; place and date not given: "Nuclear Power Stations 
Going Around Hat in Hand. Failing To See This Today Means 
Bringing the Dark Ages Closer...in Houses and Plants"] 
  [Text] Perhaps there is no need to explain to anyone 
what energy resources mean to Ukraine and its economy at 
present, or to explain that our entire standard of living 
depends more and more perceptibly on the cost of electricity, 
coal, gas, and fuel oil. 
  A conference of the leaders of the basic sectors of 
Ukraine--the power industry, metallurgy, and the coal 
industry--held a few days ago by the Cabinet of Ministers 
indicated that there would not be an easy solution. While there 
was a general consensus to the effect that prices for products 
should be reasonably restricted, the approaches themselves to 
establishing price scales for energy resources got a mixed 
reception. 
  This is how Vasiliy Kotko, deputy chairman of the State 
Committee of Ukraine for the Use of Nuclear Energy, clarified 
the position of the employees of the nuclear power industry. 
  [Kotko] The nuclear power industry was virtually the only 
sector of the national economy of Ukraine to finish out the year 
1993 with a noticeable increment in the volume of production. 
Nuclear power stations generated a total of 75.2 billion 
kilowatt-hours of electricity, or more than one-third of all 
electricity generated in our country. This came close to the 
maximum volume in the history of the operation of Ukrainian 
nuclear power stations. These results are all the more 
significant because they were achieved in an environment of 
mounting economic crisis. They testify to the great potential of 
the nuclear power industry, its high level of viability and 
stability. 
  Nonetheless, the situation that has now emerged in the 
industry is not just difficult, but we might say catastrophic. 
All nuclear power stations are facing a most difficult economic 
situation. Beginning in the second half of 1993, virtually no 
fresh fuel has been purchased because of a shortage of funds; in 
1993, two times less fuel was purchased than in 1990. Spent 
nuclear fuel has not been shipped out for long-term storage, 
once again because of a lack of funds. Contractual relations 
between many suppliers and nuclear power stations with regard to 
equipment, spare parts, and scientific servicing of nuclear 
installations have actually been severed.... 
  [Rassokha] However, the nuclear power industry operates by 
way of complete self-recoupment and supports itself by proceeds 
from energy generated. How could the industry have virtually 
gone bankrupt financially with those kind of increments in 
volume? 
  [Kotko] This is due to the fact that the nuclear power 
industry generated electricity and sold it to the state, but the 
state has not fully settled for it. There are two reasons for 
this. The apparent reason is that our main and only consumer, 
the National Dispatching Center of the Ministry of Energy of 
Ukraine, does not pay for the electricity received from us, or 
pays late. At present, the ministry is in debt to the nuclear 
power stations to the tune of 550 billion karbovantsy, 
approximately enough for one month of our operation. However, 
this is the surface of the issue. The main reason is rooted in 
the rate policy of our government. The government is trying to 
contain the overall growth of prices in all sectors of the 
national economy, i.e. inflation, through fixed prices for 
power, coal, and gas. I will note that after the beginning of 
1993, the rate for nuclear power stations remained unchanged for 
almost half a year. The introduction of each of the new rates 
was delayed by one to two months. 
  As a result, inflation has not been stopped, but the 
resources of the power industry have been thoroughly undermined. 
Right now it is hard to even assess the damage. 
  [Rassokha] What does the rate for electricity from nuclear 
power stations come to at present? 
  [Kotko] It now stands at 118 karbovantsy per kilowatt-hour. 
On the whole our rates during all of last year were at the very 
least two times lower than those of thermal power stations. 
Nuclear power stations stand for efficient power generation. 
  In May 1993 the government raised the rate for our 
electricity by a factor of 10 all at once. However, prior to 
this we gave up the electricity almost free of charge for a long 
time, for example, in April--at 10 percent of its actual cost. 
In all of this, electricity is not the kind of product that one 
may produce, deposit at a warehouse, and wait for its price to 
grow. We have sold it, it is gone, and it is not possible to 
recover the funds anymore. 
  [Rassokha] Given this economic array, why have you not 
succeeded in persuading the government that a change in its rate 
policy is necessary? 
  [Kotko] The government has officially acknowledged the need 
for a change in the rate policy. Moreover, the government laid 
down in a decree that prices for electricity should change 
automatically if prices for energy sources grow by more than 20 
percent. However, the Cabinet of Ministers is not acting on its 
own decision. 
  [Rassokha] Why? 
  [Kotko] Because it understands that an increase in prices 
for 
energy sources and electricity will be followed by an increase 
in prices for everything else. So it is trying to hang on to 
previously established prices for a while longer. 
  Understandably, no one wants to raise prices for bread, 
butter, and even that same electricity--neither the population 
nor the government. However, this unpopular decision will have 
to be made later after all, but with more difficult consequences. 
  [Rassokha] How much longer can the nuclear power stations 
continue if this rate policy continues? 
  [Kotko] I believe that we have now reached the extreme limit 
and have depleted the resources of the industry. If this policy 
is continued, irreversible processes will begin. 
  This means that even if we do get the funds, we will no 
longer manage to turn them around because our standard reserves 
have been cut back to the limit. First of all, we will not have 
time to buy fuel and will not be able to go on operating. Our 
suppliers do not have fuel reserves either. They begin to 
produce for us only after the receipt of prepayment. The 
manufacturing cycle lasts no less than half a year; taking into 
account the difficulties we have in converting and transferring 
payments, we may receive the fuel even later. 
  I believe that if the situation is not changed right now, a 
condition may develop as soon as tomorrow whereby the shutdown 
of some power units, or perhaps of all the power stations in 
succession, will become unavoidable. 
  First of all, our rate should now be revised immediately; it 
should come to no less than 300 karbovantsy per kilowatt-hour. 
It should change with inflation and with the cost of energy 
resources taken into account. These are, at minimum, two 
necessary conditions. 
  Last year the personnel of the nuclear power industry kept 
their word and did a lot to prevent the energy crisis from 
mounting. We are geared toward giving much of ourselves, too, if 
we are given an opportunity to work normally and produce 
electricity. However, we want our labor and our products to be 
paid for accordingly. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42740 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Snegur Address on Parliamentary Elections </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0653A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 12 Jan 94 
pp 1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0653A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Address by Mircea Snegur on 10 January at the republic </F>
conference on forthcoming parliamentary elections] 
  [Text] Ladies and gentlemen, my esteemed audience! 
  The new year of 1994 is closely associated with elections to 
the new Parliament of Moldova. It was specifically this event of 
historical significance in the socio-political life of the 
republic that compelled me to insist on the conduct of this 
conference at the start of the year. The chairman of Parliament, 
the prime minister, chairman of the Supreme Court, chairman of 
the Central Electoral Commission, procurator of the republic, 
members of government, heads of state departments, section 
chiefs, state office managers, presidential counselors, chairmen 
of rayon executive committees, city mayors, Chisinau municipal 
authorities, as well as representatives of the mass media were 
invited and kindly agreed to attend. 
  Under specifics of the first parliamentary elections on a 
multiple-party basis my constitutional duties as president of 
the republic require a firm and clear-cut formulation of a 
position with regard to the forthcoming election campaign. 
  The four years that passed since the previous parliamentary 
elections were probably the most troubling and difficult times 
in our contemporary history. Despite political instability which 
evolved into an armed conflict on the Dniester, we nevertheless 
managed to move along the path toward creation of a Republic of 
Moldova in the world as an independent state, establish 
cooperation with a number of countries of the world, begin the 
realization of a strategy of economic reform which received the 
endorsement and support of international forums, and institute a 
reform of the political system of society within the overall 
concept of democratization. 
  It is known that to a great extent political life in various 
countries of the world consists of the struggle for power. The 
electoral marathon is also a confrontation between parties and 
political formations, which in the final analysis culminates 
with the coming to power of those who manage to garner the votes 
with the most convincing program. 
  The flourishing of highly developed countries is not and 
cannot be the fruit of work done by a single individual, perhaps 
even one who is highly intelligent. It is, first of all, based 
on competitiveness, and true and free competition of ideas and 
programs. It is specifically this that assures the stimulation 
and liberation of the thinking and creativity and labor of the 
free man. But competition as such cannot be considered in the 
world of today without a clearly defined selection of principles 
and laws establishing rigid rules of the game and ensuring 
control over its conduct in accordance with the situation. We 
find ourselves in that stage at the very start of the path. In 
essence that is our first step today on the way toward election 
of the new Parliament on a multiple-party basis. 
  The manner in which we comprehend and evaluate the 
importance 
of state organs ensuring equal conditions for all candidates who 
take part in this competition will to a great degree determine 
not only the course of the election and activity of the new 
Parliament, but also the degree of faith in the government among 
voters with regard to its ability to comply with democratic 
principles on the whole. In the end that will shape the image of 
our country in the world as a law-governed democratic state. 
  No matter how contradictory and sometimes even antagonistic 
the various election programs and ideas and strategies are to 
each other, some of which we already know and which are still to 
be announced to the parties, slates of candidates, and 
independent candidates, it is important not to forget that they 
are promulgated and propagandized by the sons and daughters of 
the people of this land, by our countrymen. It therefore follows 
that they must be studied tactfully and patiently and either 
adopted or rejected only by the citizens here, in our republic. 
It is in our interest to have this election campaign proceed in 
a worthy manner, wisely, in an atmosphere of tolerance. 
  I particularly wish to stress the duty of responsible 
managers and state organs at all levels to prevent, interdict, 
and decisively deal with all attempts to win a parliamentary 
mandate through the fanning of hatred and enmity toward 
brothers, as well as toward representatives of other 
nationalities, regardless of which side these attempts are 
coming from. 
  A special place during this period is allotted to the mass 
media. Its persuasive powers and role in the molding of public 
opinion are well known. Under certain conditions it could be 
decisive. Its contributions and dedication to the illumination 
of various turning points of critical significance in the past 
four years, for which it deserves respect and our gratitude, 
serve as convincing proof of that. I hope that during the 
election campaign which has already started the journalists will 
help voters separate the grain from the chaff, as Ion Drutse 
said. 
  No great effort is required in order to distinguish the good 
from the bad. Everyone does that instinctively. It is far more 
complicated, particularly under our conditions, to propose 
clearly and precisely what should be done and together with whom 
for the common good. In that regard I would like to call on 
everyone, and primarily on figures in the cultural field and 
writers, to jointly think about the following question: how is 
it that in the past two years we allowed ourselves to be 
brazenly and hypocritically called "a republic of two 
sheep-folds and three districts," "a stillborn infant," "a 
spectral republic of Bolsheviks-separatists," "the CIS jungle," 
"Snegur's whim," and so on? I know that this is not just my own 
pain, and that its elimination is found in the clear and 
decisive position of those who stand for the statehood of the 
republic, a position which must be proclaimed in a loud voice 
and not in a whisper. 
  We have forever been not only at the cross-roads of European 
geographical roads, but also in a space where the interests of 
large continental powers met and clashed, because of which we 
have constantly suffered. The empires established their regimes 
here, one more drastic than the other. Their cruelty and greed 
left a deep imprint on the soul, memory, and consciousness of 
generations. The sacrifices of our ancestors placed on the altar 
of our still fragile freedom are too great and abundant in order 
not to learn the lesson of history on this occasion as well. Are 
we going to allow the wheel of history to crush us just because 
some want to accelerate the speed at which it turns, while 
others wish to stop it? Perhaps it is time to roll up the 
sleeves and start laying the foundation of an edifice of 
integrity and prosperity, stone by stone, in a conscientious and 
diligent manner, leaving to the mercy of God those who have no 
other desire than to affix their name to it. 
  I am counting on the consciousness and sense of high civic 
responsibility among representatives of the mass media, hoping 
that their thoughts on the electoral marathon will include these 
aspects as well. 
  In connection with what was said above I would like to state 
the following: 
  First. The constitution of our country obligates the 
president of the republic to involve himself in the election 
campaign in the most direct manner when it takes place on the 
multiple-party basis. I swore on the Bible to be the guarantor 
of rights and freedoms of all citizens, which is specifically 
stated in Article 113 of the constitution of the Republic of 
Moldova. That is why I firmly intend to promote the conduct of 
elections under the most optimal conditions, calling on the 
voters to give their votes to those who firmly endorse statehood 
and independence of the Republic of Moldova. 
  Second. I have supported, support now, and will continue to 
support parties and socio-political formations which have 
conducted, are now conducting, and will continue to conduct a 
policy directed at the establishment of our state--the Republic 
of Moldova--as a sovereign and independent state, without any 
conditions or varying interpretations. Such a position clearly 
corresponds with my presidential election platform, toward which 
the electorate has clearly expressed its attitude. 
  I am for those who have supported, now support, and will 
continue supporting the integrity of the republic through 
concrete action. I call on the electorate to follow my example 
in voting for those who offer and will prove able to implement 
into life clear-cut programs and concepts that would permit us 
to eliminate the economic crisis, while guaranteeing stable 
progress in creative and interested work of free people. 
  In the new Parliament I want to see deputies who can rise 
above the vestiges and political configurations, who would be 
guided in their work by higher values and interests of the 
people, would come up with realistic and concrete proposals so 
that people who have lived for centuries in peace and harmony on 
both banks of the Dniester, could finally make peace with each 
other. 
  Third. If in the first election campaign on a multiple-party 
basis we succeed in ensuring clear-cut observance of democratic 
principles of equality and freedom for all parties, slates of 
candidates, socio-political movements, and independent 
candidates, we will thereby promote an irreversible process of 
democratization of society, and that will allow us to prove to 
ourselves and to the entire world that we have mastered one of 
the most necessary attributes of a law-governed and democratic 
state. 
  Four. In this period the task of organs of state executive 
power at all levels consists of guaranteeing to an equal degree 
to all parties, socio-political formations, slates of 
candidates, and independent candidates the necessary conditions 
for conduct of the electoral campaign in strict conformance with 
the law on election of the Parliament of the Republic of 
Moldova. These tasks are explained in detail in the edict of the 
president of the republic. 
  Five. I am expressing confidence in the fact that residents 
on the left bank of the Dniester have finally recognized who it 
was that wanted, how, and for what purpose to split us up and 
what must be done by everyone in order to prevent each vote in 
the election of the Parliament from being blocked by those who 
do not wish for us to live in peace and harmony as we have done 
for centuries. 
  My esteemed audience! I would like for us to understand and 
remember another simple truth: before saying who we are, what it 
is that we want, and where we are headed, we must first of all 
exist. All the other disasters in our life cannot even be 
compared with the real threat hanging over us today when just a 
few hundred kilometers from us in the direction of the Adriatic 
Sea the merciless fires of war are raging which the whole world 
is powerless to extinguish. That is a tragedy which we too had 
experienced recently. It is our sacred duty not to forget that. 
  In conclusion I would like to appeal directly to those 
beyond 
the walls of this building: esteemed lady, esteemed gentleman, 
all those who are listening to me right now or are reading my 
speech in the newspaper, stop for a moment, rise above the 
mundane and understand that to participate in the elections on 
27 February and to vote for those who prove that they truly can 
transform Moldova into an independent and sovereign state not 
just for a day or two, first of all means assurance of the right 
to life both for yourself and for your children, brothers, 
sisters, and parents and the right to engage in creative labor 
for the good of the people and our country--the Republic of 
Moldova. 
  Thank you. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42741 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Spokesman Refutes Allegations Made Against President Snegur </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0641A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 5 Jan 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0641A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Statement by the Official Representative of the Republic </F>
of Moldova President"] 
  [Text] With the beginning of the election campaign, some 
political formations that call themselves organizations of a 
"democratic orientation" are offering their point of view on the 
sociopolitical situation in the republic, which is quite natural 
and acceptable, providing that the truth is being told, and not 
a lie, and that arguments are presented, and not suppositions, 
or rumors. Since recently, after the transformation by 
opposition organizations of protest rallies against the 
sentencing of the so-called "Ilascu group" by unconstitutional 
Tiraspol judicial organs into an antipresidential campaign, 
during which accusations of betrayal and duplicity were made 
against the president, and since these accusations, which have 
been rejected by the head of state as absurd and unfounded, have 
not stopped, the official representative of the republic 
president is authorized to declare the following: 
  1. The president of the Republic of Moldova refutes the 
claim 
that "he did not make public the conflict in the eastern 
rayons," as was told to BASA Press Agency by one of the members 
of the Intelligentsia Congress, for the simple reason that it 
was he who invited the CSCE mission to acquaint itself with the 
situation and the real assistance to eliminate disagreements in 
the eastern rayons. In this regard, the decision of the 
ministers of foreign affairs of the country members of the CSCE 
in Rome was published, through which the mission will continue 
its activity in this direction. Moreover, Mircea Snegur has 
repeatedly come out for a revival of the quadrilateral mechanism 
for resolving problems of the eastern rayons--a question that 
was also discussed during meetings with Leonid Kravchuk. 
  2. Also inappropriate is the statement of the weekly 
LITERATURA SHI ARTA special correspondent that Mircea Snegur, 
"the one who chooses and leads," is to blame for the "economic 
catastrophe." We all know under what conditions the ministers 
were proposed and elected by parliament, and how many 
commitments, including behind the scenes, certain parliamentary 
factions assumed for themselves for the appointment of several 
ministers. It was this kind of a state of affairs that 
determined the president's decision to support the initiative on 
the dissolution of parliament and the election to a new 
parliament of one party or a coalition capable of running the 
country. 
  3. With respect to the bloody conflict on the Dniester and 
the real culprits in its unleashing, in the near future the 
president of the republic intends to come out with a statement 
in reply to the irresponsible accusations of those who are 
transforming patriotism into a profession. 
  4. Dumitru Postovan, the procurator of the republic, denied 
in the press the claim that the president of the Republic of 
Moldova is involved "in dirty deals" with a SEABECO affiliate. 
According to statements like "the procuracy...establishes, but 
it does not have the courage to go farther, so as not to alarm 
'Daddy'" ("Memory Exercise" ["Ekzerchitsiy de memoriye"], Ion 
Katsaveyka. LITERATURA SHI ARTA, 23 December 1993). The 
Procuracy should speak out. It should be noted that it was at 
the initiative of the president that a report was published on 
infractions committed by some leading persons, about whom an 
investigation has been started and whose results will also be 
published in the press. 
  Resolutely determined to conduct reforms, President Mircea 
Snegur encourages and promotes with all means a dialogue of the 
workers of ministries with representatives of the IMF and the 
World Bank. He is attending to the development of a program for 
the social protection of the masses, understanding that certain 
forces are interested in arousing tensions, in this way pursuing 
specific aims. The head of state is confident that the 
organizations participating in the current election campaign 
will dot their "i's" and that the people will make their choice. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42742 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Lebed Scores Shevtsov Behavior </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0656A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 19 Jan 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0656A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lieutenant General A. Lebed, published </F>
originally in DNESTROVSKAYA PRAVDA on 22 December 1993: "On True 
and Fake Professionals"] 
  [Text] It looks as though events in the Dniester 
Republic are reaching their apogee. Unquestionably, General 
Lebed remains the central figure in the uproar, persistently 
"finishing off" top Tiraspol officials with disclosures about 
their past and present. 
  Let us not analyze the motivation for the actions of 
the Russian general, who is indeed an extraordinary man. In this 
case we are interested, as they say, in the "process for its own 
sake." Therefore, we offer to our readers another article by the 
commander of Russia's 14th Army--this time from DNESTROVSKAYA 
PRAVDA of 22 December. Here it is: 
  DNESTROVSKAYA PRAVDA (No. 286) published an article by 
republic procurator B. Luchik "The End of Agent `Berzin.'" In 
it, among other things, the procurator unequivocally poses this 
question: "Someone apparently will have to be held to answer--in 
keeping with Russia's laws--for blowing `Berzin's cover." An 
absolutely correct conclusion. It is a pity, though, that the 
procurator's rounded statement is not directed straight at those 
directly at fault in this scandalous story. 
  We can forget about Bolshakov-"Berzin." His star has faded 
forever on both the political and entrepreneurial horizons of 
the Dniester Region. Now those who are to be held to answer by 
Russian law enforcement organs for selling state secrets have 
pause to think. In short, they should start preparing to spend 
time in a less pleasant environment. Many people detected in the 
procurator's unambiguous hint a finger pointed at Colonel M. 
Bergman. He transferred agent files to B. Luchik. Is this really 
true? If a wolf carries off a sheep from the flock, the one who 
is held responsible first is the shepherd and only then--if he 
is ever caught--the wolf. The "shepherd" of the former KGB's 
archives was and is Minister V. Shevtsov. And he was the first 
one to start the ball rolling. 
  Let us recall. A year ago, after Bergman's notorious 
interview to the weekly DNESTROVSKIY MERIDIAN, in which the 
military commandant "uncloaked" a former member of Riga OMON 
[Special Designation Militia Detachments], Antyufeyev, Minister 
"Shevtsov" immediately rushed onto television to clear his name, 
and in the heat of fervor "unmasked" Bergman by calling him, 
without proof, an agent of foreign special services and a KGB 
informer. He named his alleged code name--"Furmanov." 
  The "cocks" threw dirt at each other. Shevtsov, however, did 
not stop there and continued to wind up the unmasking campaign, 
striving to smear the commandant as much as possible with 
accusations of questionable veracity regarding unscrupulous 
conduct. 
  For instance, TRUDOVOY TIRASPOL some time later published a 
rambling statement made two years ago by former Tiraspol 
resident (currently U.S. citizen) Gelfand. The statement was 
allegedly extracted from the same KGB archives. How did this 
"document" get into Kondratovich's hands? There is only one way: 
It was placed there by Shevtsov or his people. 
  Keeping in mind the contents of the procurator's article we 
are commenting on here, Kondratovich has one of two options: 
either admit that he knowingly published a forgery and thus bury 
both himself and his tabloid by indirectly removing in the eyes 
of the public all accusations against Bergman, or tell about the 
channels through which Gelfand's statement found its way to his 
editorial offices. He will have to answer this question for the 
investigators anyway. 
  The fact that the aforementioned cases surfaced as a tool of 
revenge in Bergman's hands convinces me once more of an 
important conclusion: Shevtsov's office and the minister himself 
have turned the archives they inherited into a tool of blackmail 
and political surveillance over the politically suspect, while 
the Ministry of Security itself has deteriorated into a 
money-changing shop where morals and conscience are freely 
convertible into dirty money and willingness to be obsequiously 
obedient. The usual methods of a police state, where authority 
is propped up by bayonets. 
  One more circumstance is quite alarming. How many agents 
still undercover will rush to cover their tracks in the wake of 
the Bolshakov scandal; how many will surreptitiously hide at the 
bottom? How many more "Antyufeyevs" will be forced to transform 
themselves into "Shevtsovs"? There are many such files sold and 
"walking around;" sooner or later they will burst open in a fit 
of enmity, when rivals start pushing each other away from the 
feeding trough... 
  In his article the procurator writes that "it is 
impermissible to blow an agent's cover... This is not done among 
professionals." Quite correct. But the professionalism of the 
Dniester Republic's minister of security is rather doubtful 
anyway. A year ago an OMON member with a tarnished reputation 
came to the Dniester Region bringing a letter of recommendation 
from Comrade Alksnis. It was impossible to refuse Alksnis: He 
said they were about to take power in Russia at any time and 
would recognize the Dniester Republic. Shevtsov hustled and 
became a minister literally within a year, distinguishing 
himself in the field of disinformation and intrigues; he donned 
a general's uniform that was no longer in use anywhere. It is a 
hopeless task to appeal to vain people's conscience. But I 
personally cannot imagine how I would dare to put on a marshal's 
outfit if tomorrow, for instance, Dondushans announced secession 
from Moldova and called me under their banners as minister of 
defense. 
  I will never shake General Shevtsov's hand. Simply because 
this Nezavertaylo-like general has no honor or human decency. 
  The monopoly of the KGB archives allows him to actively 
influence the staffing of the republic state apparatus with 
persons of shady pasts, who, remembering their sins, will serve 
the powers that be faithfully and loyally and carry out their 
whims subserviently and without question. Fear of being unmasked 
suppresses everything human in them. As soon as one of them 
dares to mention his opinion, he will be immediately reminded of 
certain points in his biography, and if such free-thinking is 
repeated--they will let him have it. 
  Among those with a criminal past in our republic is a 
minister and a chief of a public organization; they address us 
from Dniester Republic television, prepare materials for 
Dniester Region radio. Watching the actions of this clique, I 
sometimes ask myself: Has the entire Kolyma moved out here? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42743 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Shevtsov Counters Lebed Charges </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0656B Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 19 Jan 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0656B </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report: "Confrontation Between the Command of </F>
the 14th Army of the Russian Federation and the Leaders of the 
Self-Proclaimed Dniester Moldovan Republic Continues"] 
  [Text] The pretext: new accusations of corruption and abuse 
leveled by the commander of the 14th Army, Lieutenant General 
Lebed, and Commandant of Tiraspol Mikhail Bergman against the 
leaders of the self-proclaimed Dniester Republic. 
  In response, anonymous leaflets were pasted this week all 
over Tiraspol, in which General Lebed is accused of preparing 
for a state coup in the Dniester Area. The leaflets' authors 
maintain that the coordinators of this coup are Konstantin 
Borovoy, leader of the Russian Economic Freedom Party, and 
Sergey Manukyan, head of this party's regional branch and a 
well-known entrepreneur in the region. 
  A correspondent of the INFOTAG agency reported from Tiraspol 
that Aleksandr Lebed described the distributed leaflets as 
"total nonsense." He emphasized that some members of the local 
leadership, mixed up in machinations and abuse, are trying in 
such a way to blame the Russian military for their own mistakes 
and the deteriorating economic situation in the region. Lebed 
emphasized that the 14th Army command is ready to cooperate in 
this respect with any organs in order to find out the truth of 
the matter. 
  In the opinion of Tiraspol observers, the author and 
distributor of the leaflets is the Dniester Area Ministry of 
Security, whose chief, Vadim Shevtsov-Antyufeyev, is at odds 
with Lebed. Speaking at the latest session of Tiraspol Supreme 
Soviet, he publicly accused the 14th Army commander of preparing 
for a "state coup." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42744 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Edict on Measures to Conduct 27 Feb Elections </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0655A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 12 Jan 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0655A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Edict of the President of the Republic of Moldova: On </F>
Measures for Preparations for and the Conduct of Elections of 
the Republic of Moldova Parliament on 27 February 1994"] 
  [Text] With a view to carrying out the provisions of 
Article 4 of the Decree of the Republic of Moldova Parliament 
No. 1613-XII, dated 19 October 1993, "On Procedures for 
Enactment of the Law on Elections of Parliament," and on the 
basis of Article 113 of the Constitution of the Republic of 
Moldova, 
  The president of the Republic of Moldova resolves: 
  Article 1.--The government and local self-government organs 
shall develop and take the necessary measures to ensure their 
close interaction with the Central Electoral Commission and 
district and ward electoral commissions for the entire period of 
preparations for the elections and their conduct in keeping with 
the Law on Elections of Parliament and the Decree of the 
Republic of Moldova Parliament No. 1613-XII, dated 19 October 
1993. 
  Article 2.--Organs of local self-government jointly with 
police organs shall ensure equal conditions for the holding of 
preelection meetings and rallies by all parties, sociopolitical 
organizations, electoral blocs, and independent candidates by 
acting upon advance requests from the relevant electoral 
commissions, and until such are established, proceeding in the 
order in which petitions are filed. 
  Article 3.--Candidates from parties, sociopolitical 
organizations, and electoral blocs, and independent candidates 
who, as of the day of registration, work for the organs of state 
executive power shall file petitions to be relieved from 
positions held in keeping with Article 47 of the Law on 
Elections of Parliament, however, no later than 40 days before 
the elections. 
  Article 4.--Chiefs of the organs of state executive power 
(the government, ministries, departments, rayon executive 
committees, the mayor's office of the city of Chisinau, and the 
mayor's offices of cities and villages) and their internal 
subdivisions, as well as their deputies, may not engage in 
preelection propaganda in favor of or against the candidates of 
parties, sociopolitical organizations, electoral blocs, and 
independent candidates. 
  The aforementioned persons who intend to engage in 
preelection propaganda shall file, with the management of the 
relevant organs, petitions to be relieved from positions held 
for the period until election day, which shall be granted 
without delay. They shall retain the positions but shall not 
draw their salaries for the duration of this period. 
  Individuals relieved from their positions through the 
procedures outlined above shall take part in preelection 
meetings and rallies and shall make presentations in the mass 
media during the entire period of the election campaign as 
private individuals. 
  Article 5.--Premises, transportation vehicles, and 
material-technical resources of the organs of state executive 
power at all levels may be used for engaging in preelection 
propaganda solely by the decision of the relevant electoral 
commissions, on the basis of available potential. 
  Article 6.--Along with information on parties, 
sociopolitical 
organizations, electoral blocs, and independent candidates 
participating in the election, propaganda materials should 
contain information on individuals responsible for issuing them. 
Dissemination of anonymous printed propaganda materials shall be 
forbidden. 
  Organs of local self-government, together with police 
organs, 
shall take measures to prevent the dissemination of anonymous 
printed propaganda materials. 
  Article 7.--The chiefs of ministries and departments and the 
officials of the organs of local executive power shall be made 
responsible for carrying out the provisions of the present edict. 
  Article 8.--The present edict shall take effect on the date 
of publication. 
  [signed] President of the Republic of Moldova Mircea Snegur 
  Chisinau, 10 January 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42745 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Election Results Predicted </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0655B Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 19 Jan 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0655B </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "The Union of Industrialists Projects </F>
the Outcome of Voting in the Parliamentary Elections"] 
  [Text] The Agrarian-Democratic Party of Moldova will get 
33-35 percent of the votes of the electorate in the 
parliamentary elections on 27 February. Such was the projection 
made in the newspaper GRAZHDANSKIY MIR by Anatoliy Gudym, chief 
of the expert center of the Union of Industrialists of Moldova. 
  He believes that "the current critical situation speaks 
against the Agrarians; after all, they have been in power for 
more than a year. What change can there be if their ticket 
includes the same few dozen current members of parliament?" 
  Gudym writes: "Next, I would rank two parties on an equal 
footing--the Social-Democratic Party (they have to their credit 
political initiatives and the European model for reforming the 
economy) and the reform party, which has sprung up unexpectedly." 
  In the opinion of the expert, the Socialists will surmount 
the 4 percent barrier for admission to the parliament, although 
they have weakened themselves by forming a bloc with the Unity 
movement. The Democratic Labor Party is making its presence 
known as a defender of the interests of industry. 
  Gudym believes that the future parliament will have more 
professional politicians, economists, lawyers, and sociologists. 
The newspaper writes: "This gives us hope that this year we will 
get a new Constitution and an administrative-territorial 
structure, refine our economic legislation, and master the 
privatization of enterprises, land, and housing in practice." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42746 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ghimpu Supports Early Elections in Dniester Region </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0655C Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 19 Jan 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0655C </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "The Leader of the Democratic Party </F>
of Moldova Supports the Concept of Holding Early Parliamentary 
Elections in the Eastern Rayons of the Republic"] 
  [Text] Gheorghe Ghimpu, chairman of the Democratic Party of 
Moldova, stated that the political entity he heads supports the 
concept of moving up by two weeks the date for holding elections 
to the Parliament of Moldova in the territory of the rayons on 
the left bank of the Dniester. 
  In an interview to the INFOTAG agency he said that the 
Democratic Party advocated rescheduling the election date in the 
eastern rayons even before an official proposal to this effect 
by the chairman of the Central Electoral Commission. 
  Gheorghe Ghimpu said: "Undoubtedly, the separatist leaders 
of 
Tiraspol will try to hinder the residents of the eastern rayons 
of Moldova who will wish to take part in the elections at 
polling stations on the right bank of the Dniester. Problems 
with transportation and vote counting and certain difficulties 
will certainly appear. Moving up the election date would 
facilitate the resolution of these issues." 
  He noted that the Democratic Party has developed its own 
concept for solving the problem of the Dniester region. It 
envisions the establishment of a territorial-administrative unit 
of republic significance with the seat in Tiraspol. It could 
consist of two uyezds--an industrial uyezd, including the 
present-day Kamenskiy and Rybnitskiy Rayons, and an agrarian 
uyezd, including the present-day Dubossarskiy, Sloboziyskiy, and 
Grigoriopolskiy Rayons. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42747 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   City Administrator Reviews Balti Hardships </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0661A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 12 Jan 94 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0661A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Vladimir Stepanovich Tonchuk, head of Balti </F>
municipal administration, by Viktor Starika in Balti (Belts in 
Russian, formerly Beltsy); date not given: "The One with the 
Most Rights Is Right"] 
  [Text] I first met Vladimir Tonchuk almost 10 years ago, 
after the city party committee had "enlisted" him to "cure" the 
chronically ill building materials combine. At that time the 
young director-"therapist" was diagnosing the illness. A great 
deal depended on the accuracy of the diagnosis. It would decide 
whether the enterprise could manage to climb out of debt and the 
labor collective could escape the constant threat of poverty and 
social disorientation. In the event of an error, the "physician 
of record" would be in a hopeless situation. Expulsion from the 
CPSU was tantamount to the loss of respect and prestige in 
society, however honest and decent a man he may have been. His 
knowledge and ability seemed dubious at first, irrespective of 
the conditions in which he was doing his work. It is clear, 
however, that although personal preferences were rarely 
considered at that time, only a courageous man would have agreed 
to take charge of a lagging enterprise. 
  I do not know whether Tonchuk gave this any thought or not. 
I 
remember that he was completely preoccupied with finding the 
reasons for the combine's inefficiency. 
  He soon found a way out of the impasse and the protracted 
economic slump, but this was not the end of his difficulties. It 
was much more difficult to carry out his plans when everything 
had to be approved and "okayed" from above, and no one even 
dared to think about autonomy or the freedom from tutelage the 
young director wanted. 
  Not everyone could or would make the only correct decision 
at 
a crucial time and assume all of the responsibility for the 
consequences. This takes more than physical stamina and a strong 
will: It also takes a somewhat prophetic nature. Otherwise, 
self-destruction is a distinct possibility. 
  They say that someone who never takes risks never drinks 
champagne. This is only partly true. Risks have to be reasonable 
unless a person wants to break his neck. 
  Tonchuk had checked and rechecked everything, and for this 
reason he did not retreat from his own convictions until he had 
demonstrated the accuracy of his approach. The collective he 
headed climbed out of the hole where it had been buried almost 
up to its chin and became the leaseholder of the building 
materials combine. 
  Now almost 10 years have gone by, and this is the fourth 
year 
that Director V. Tonchuk of the building materials combine has 
occupied the biggest, most spacious office in the Balti 
municipal government building, with direct telephone lines to 
the president and government of the Republic of Moldova. He is 
the head of the municipal administration in Balti. My 
conversation with him, oddly enough, was about the same kind of 
autonomy with which he began his tenure as director of the 
building materials combine. 
  [Starika] Judging by the constant calls from Chisinau, it 
appears that there have been no significant changes in 
administrative methods in spite of the changes in our country's 
economic and political goals. Am I mistaken, Vladimir 
Stepanovich? 
  [Tonchuk] It is easier to exercise rights than to fulfill 
obligations. It is easier to change laws than to change human 
habits, and the most difficult thing of all is to surmount 
bureaucratic obstacles and break through the web of interlocking 
interests and long-standing faulty ties and instructions. 
  [Starika] The human being is an intricate mechanism. 
Experience has confirmed, however, that he can be led in 
virtually any direction: toward good and evil. We know this from 
specific cases and general trends. Remember how a whole nation 
turned toward fascism in the 1930s under Hitler's influence.... 
  [Tonchuk] And I will remind you of Stalin's crimes--the 
forced collectivization, the firing squads, the prison camps, 
and the resulting spiritual corruption. 
  The effects of Stalinism and the communist totalitarian past 
will continue to be felt for a long time. Announcements, 
resolutions, and sporadic anti-bureaucratic measures are not 
producing the necessary results yet. Every remedy has been 
tried, but the illness continues. It is as if we are fighting a 
phantom. 
  [Starika] Are you saying that we will not have 
self-government soon? 
  [Tonchuk] The experience of the last few years has convinced 
us that we will have to begin by surmounting not only 
doctrinaire obstacles and ideological jingles, but also the 
frequent and understandable anxiety caused by changes in rules 
and guidelines. We are seeing signs of inflexibility, passive 
resistance, and the fear of violating individual and regional 
interests, which are often concealed behind pseudo-reformist 
verbosity. In the simplest terms, these are signs of a difficult 
and sometimes fierce battle between the old and the new, between 
statewide interests and emerging private interests. 
  [Starika] Let us imagine the ideal situation or one close to 
the ideal. You, as the head of the municipal administration, 
have been entrusted with all of the reins of government. Will 
you be able to guarantee the normal economic and political life 
of Balti? 
  [Tonchuk] Life is normal in the city. Residential 
neighborhoods have a constant supply of heat and scheduled 
supplies of hot water. Vegetables, fruit, dairy products, baked 
goods, and other foods are delivered to stores on schedule and 
in sufficient quantities. The municipal transport network is 
operating without any interruptions. 
  Believe me, this is not such a simple accomplishment under 
present conditions. 
  [Starika] But what about municipal industry, construction, 
and freight deliveries? They are on their last legs, so to 
speak.... 
  [Tonchuk] The difficulties all of us have had to endure are 
mainly the result of shortages of crude resources, materials, 
and money. We have also encountered a form of resistance caused 
by conservative tendencies and the inability to act under the 
new conditions. Furthermore, this is true of enterprises and of 
republic agencies of economic administration. 
  Measures in priority fields--the economy, education, 
medicine, and other socially vital areas--should be coordinated 
by the center. All other administrative prerogatives, after 
certain sums have been deposited in the republic budget, should 
be transferred to the local level. And the main one is the right 
to dispose of generated revenue. Incidentally, one such attempt 
was already made. In the middle of 1991 the government issued a 
provisional statute on so-called municipal self-government. It 
was impossible, however, to use this statute as a guide. Each 
ministry and department still felt obliged to interfere in 
municipal affairs, and particularly in the municipal economy. It 
seemed that people there thought they knew more about what we 
should be doing here. Therefore, there is no reason yet to think 
of the city as an autonomous administrative and economic entity. 
This can only be finalized after the passage of the appropriate 
laws and, in particular, the strict observance of the law on the 
budget. 
  [Starika] Nevertheless, at the recent conference of 
representatives of local government agencies in the north of 
Moldova and the heads of regional gas utilities, which was held 
in Balti by General Director Boris Karandyuk of the republic 
State Department of Gasification, the first step in this 
direction seemed to have been taken. 
  [Tonchuk] It has already become impossible for the 
Department 
of Gasification to fulfill its obligations or even to exercise 
its rights. This is why its powers have been transferred to the 
local level. It was a civilized decision. Now we have been 
self-reliant for a long time, and others will have to make their 
own decisions on the installation of gas supply lines. 
  Other sectorial ministries should follow the example of this 
state department, especially if they cannot give weak 
enterprises any help. Let them turn their resources over to the 
city, and we will use them wisely. 
  [Starika] Then we will reach the point at which the Balti 
administration will have to conclude its own agreements, on 
shipments of apples or cucumbers, for instance, directly with 
Glodeani or another region in Moldova. 
  [Tonchuk] I do not see anything bad about this. The existing 
economic, cultural, and other ties between Balti and the 
Glodeani, Riskani, Falesti, Floresti, Singerei, and other 
regions of the republic and with nearby and distant foreign 
countries have proved that it is simpler, easier, and safer to 
work without middlemen. 
  [Starika] In view of this, do you believe it would be 
advisable to establish a free economic zone in the northern 
region, with all of the ensuing obligations and rights? After 
all, it is no secret that dozens of vehicles race from the 
regions to Chisinau, burning up tons of scarce and costly fuel, 
on every minor pretext, but our problems generally remain 
unresolved. 
  [Tonchuk] I believe this might be a good thing, but I have 
no 
jurisdiction over the administrative structure of Moldova. 
  [Starika] Nevertheless, as the head of the administration of 
one of Moldova's largest cities, you must have your own opinion. 
  [Tonchuk] We already have autonomous regions--the 
self-proclaimed PMR and the Gagauz Republic.... 
  [Starika] You have misunderstood me, Vladimir Stepanovich. I 
am referring to economic self-rule and the obvious benefits this 
would mean for an independent, indivisible, and sovereign 
Moldova and the people living in it. 
  [Tonchuk] I am not afraid of defending my own point of view 
on any level when I am certain that I am right. As far as the 
creation of what you propose, a Balti economic zone or something 
similar, is concerned, I can only repeat that I believe this 
might be a good thing. As they say, however, we have to be 
certain that we are not leaping from the frying pan into the 
fire. We are not entitled to any more mistakes. Hasty decisions 
can cost too much. We have seen the result of the forced 
institution of the official state language and the threats of 
certification. We know that the pitiful state of our economy is 
a result of severed economic ties with the republics of the 
former USSR and the implacability of the Moldovan parliament and 
the different parties that blocked the ratification of the 
republic treaty on membership in the CIS economic union. 
  History does not forgive mistakes. It does not allow us to 
ignore the laws of economics with impunity. It also does not 
tolerate implacability and contempt for the feelings of the 
laboring public. This is why we have to hear the voice of the 
people and tell the people the truth, even when it is 
disturbing. We can see farther from above, but details can be 
seen more distinctly from below. 
  [Starika] Recently the city has made a great effort to 
become 
a political center as well as the economic and cultural center 
of northern Moldova.... 
  [Tonchuk] It is true that political parties have been more 
active in our city. 
  [Starika] As the head of the city government, what kind of 
relationship do you have with the parties, to which party do you 
belong, and which do you support? 
  [Tonchuk] None of them, although several have offered me 
their hand and heart. They have promised me a place on their 
party tickets in the elections for the new parliament. 
  It takes time to be active in politics, and I do not have 
the 
time. I hardly have enough time to keep up with municipal 
affairs. As for my relationship with the parties and their 
leaders, it is as it should be--detached and impartial. I 
support those who can do something good for the city and for 
Moldova as a whole. 
  [Starika] What if the party that wins the election does not 
care for Tonchuk? 
  [Tonchuk] Then I will start selling sneakers.... 
  [Starika] But seriously? 
  [Tonchuk] I am an engineer, and I am not afraid of 
resigning. 
Besides, people today are being judged on their ability instead 
of their political views. 
  [Starika] It seems to me, however, that the upcoming power 
struggle will not bypass Balti and the head of its 
administration. 
  [Tonchuk] Fights, arguments, and conflicts have always been 
part of our life. We have to be ready for them. It is difficult 
to imagine that they will disappear someday. 
  We are instituting reform in a time of dramatic 
difficulties. 
This is just like making major repairs on a ship in a severe 
storm. I am certain, however, that the storm will soon be over 
and we will finish the repairs. The Moldovan state will be 
strong, capable, and just. It will have the respect of its 
citizens and, in turn, it will respect their dignity and 
beliefs. I have to repeat, however, that democracy cannot exist 
without a legal system. We will be able to attain our goals 
after we have reinforced the structures securing the observance 
of laws for the government and for all citizens. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42748 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Botnaru Reviews Foreign Affairs Priorities </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0660A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 19 Jan 94 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0660A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Ion Botnaru, acting foreign minister of </F>
Moldova, by Boris Marian; place and date not given: "`Moldova Is 
Condemned To Be Independent'"] 
  [Text] On New Year's Eve the Foreign Ministry 
displayed an interesting initiative, initiating, perhaps, a new 
tradition. It is hard to select an appropriate term for the 
occasion, but what we are talking about is this: Mr. Ion 
Botnaru, acting foreign minister, invited to his office for 
conversation over a cup of coffee the chief editors of a number 
of Moldovan newspapers, press agencies, radio, and television. 
He described in confidence Moldovan diplomacy's first steps and 
its successes, failures, and problems, listening to the 
journalists' observations, proposals, and, of course, impartial 
questions and responding to the majority of them. He was 
assisted by Mr. Cubuk, deputy minister, together with the heads 
of leading departments and the press office. 
  This relaxed roundtable conversation served as the 
basis for this interview with Mr. Ion Botnaru. 
  [Marian] Mr. Minister, what, from the viewpoint of the head 
of Moldovan diplomacy, was characteristic of the past year of 
1993, the year of the rooster? 
  [Botnaru] The fact that the rooster quite often sang out of 
place--and he has now ended up as New Year's jelly. And the fact 
also that the reaction of the disintegration of the former 
USSR--this colossus on the world map--continued, that is, 
serious interethnic conflicts, regional wars, and dangerous 
friction, but as did also a meshing between many of the states 
that arose on the ruins of the Union. Europe's most dangerous 
political volcano, in Yugoslavia, continued to erupt. 
  Moldova, despite all the complexity of its domestic 
situation, managed to secure for itself peace, albeit fragile, 
and also to progress along the path of self-assertion in the 
world arena. In this respect, if compared with other former 
Soviet republics, we finished more successfully. 
  The all-European economic crisis continued to intensify. 
There was a redistribution of spheres of influence along the 
entire diplomatic front. Relations between blocs deteriorated, 
and some states increased their economic pressure for the 
purpose of deriving political benefits. All the former socialist 
countries, including the European Soviet republics, endeavored 
to make their way into Europe--more precisely, into its 
international structures, where quite a line and crush have 
already formed. We managed to open certain doors a little. 
  [Marian] On which, as can be seen, the springs had been too 
tight. Can you, Mr. Botnaru, point to the miscalculations of 
Moldovan diplomacy? 
  [Botnaru] We have weak points, but we will not tell you 
them--find them yourselves and tell us! It should be borne in 
mind, however, that, as a state, we are still at an early age, 
and there have for this reason been many mistakes, and they are 
inevitable. I would mention in this sense the current notion of 
West and East, of political blocs, of the near and far abroad. 
We inherited it, as it were, from the former regime. Thanks to 
this, we would set off for conferences or negotiations with our 
Western partners in more self-disciplined and responsible 
fashion and more ready to ward off any unpleasantness than at, 
say, meetings within the framework of the CIS. Out of habit, 
perhaps, we consider these partners "our people," relaxing our 
diplomatic vigilance, and at times we would let slip a good 
opportunity and yield "in our own way" an important position. We 
forget that there is now no difference between countries of the 
near and far abroad--each defends its own interests, seeks its 
own advantage. We also should do the same. 
  [Marian] About the CIS, incidentally. May it be considered 
that, following a certain period of vacillation, our policy in 
respect to this bloc has been determined? And that the attacks 
of the opposition demanding a reorientation toward close 
economic cooperation with West Europe and Romania--just as long 
as it is not with the "CIS Empire"--are not confusing our 
diplomacy? 
  [Botnaru] I will use the words of Krylov's fable: "How many 
times have we told the world".... But many remain deaf to the 
official explanations as regards the CIS. Their essence, 
confirmed also at the recent Ashgabat meeting of heads of state 
of the CIS, is as follows: Moldova is participating merely in 
the economic programs of the Commonwealth, and the final 
decision on its affiliation to the CIS has been left to the new 
parliament. But, if you like, my colleague, Mr. Cubuk, deputy 
minister, will tell you about this in more detail and more 
precisely inasmuch as he is in charge of CIS matters with us. 
  "I do not understand why we have so often to justify 
ourselves in connection with participation in the CIS if, as 
they say, there is no other way and there is evidence of 
economic benefit," Mr. Cubuk began. "It is common knowledge that 
both the Europeans and the Americans are endeavoring to conquer 
this eastern market, the Russian market, in particular. We, on 
the other hand, should, apparently, abandon it to them, 
demolishing industrial and economic and purely human relations 
which evolved long since in deference to someone's ideology. Is 
this not foolish?" 
  [Marian] For what percentage of Moldova's foreign trade 
turnover does the CIS account, for all that? 
  [Cubuk] Seventy-two percent altogether--Russia for 35 
percent 
plus the remaining CIS countries for 37 percent. 
  [Marian] Thank you, Mr. Cubuk. Now a question to you once 
more, Mr. Botnaru: Is it true that virtually no one in the world 
knows our Moldova? If this is so, what has your department done 
to create a picture of it, an "image," as we say today, and 
convey it to the world community? 
  [Botnaru] I would ask you not to rush to conclusions, Mr. 
Editor! Who told you that the world does not know Moldova? Some 
apology for a businessman or a serious politician? Who does not 
know of the existence of Moldova? Once again, the petty Hong 
Kong tradesman or the senior statesman? I will tell you 
something else: Our republic has been recognized by 133 
countries, and our tricolor flutters atop the UN building in New 
York. President Snegur has traveled round half the world, and 
the news media have notified the world of this. Aside from this, 
we participate actively in various international forums, and, 
finally, in connection with the Dniester conflict, all the top 
newspapers have written about and all television and radio 
stations have broadcast on Moldova.... And as far as the 
republic's image is concerned, this is a difficult question. We 
have along our lines done a great deal, of course, to convey to 
the world community the truth about our republic and its 
situation and policy. But our enemies have not been slumbering 
either, distorting its image. The so-called patriots have done 
their bit in this case also. And the former parliament, which 
was unable in the wake of fruitless debate to untie the Gordian 
knot of the Dniester region or release the Gagauz problem from 
deadlock, did a poor job of enhancing Moldova's prestige. 
  [Marian] I understand that in the broad and true sense a 
country's image is not created by diplomats alone or just the 
president and members of parliament but by all of us--from the 
academician through the janitor. In this respect I agree, Mr. 
Botnaru, that we have done insufficient work. But what are your 
complaints about the media? What, in your view, are the most 
annoying "gaffes" of my writing brethren in presenting the 
international theme? 
  [Botnaru] It is regrettable that not one newspaper and not 
one channel or program regularly covers international life in 
general and the work of our diplomacy in particular. All confine 
themselves mainly to information concerning official visits to 
Moldova or from Moldova to other countries or to infrequent and, 
as a rule, sharply worded, barely indicative commentaries on the 
overseas travel our leadership and the government agreements 
that have been reached. Our press lacks, unfortunately, 
journalists who are specialists in international affairs and 
permanent columns on this subject. Articles are written by 
whoever and however. And the generally respected "Messenger" 
program, for example, is in the habit of cutting our reports, 
which are concise as it is. This frequently shifts the emphases 
and distorts what has been said. In my opinion, it is 
impermissible to edit texts of an official nature. The 
emendations could be coordinated, at least. After all, your 
brethren, to use your term, frequently confuse an ambassador 
with a consul and a consul with a consultant, and what is meant 
by a treaty, what is meant by an agreement, what is meant by a 
protocol is all the same for some of them. 
  In addition, according to the rules of a civilized press, 
reports of official receptions should follow in a particular 
order. It is impermissible that information on the president's 
reception of the ambassador of a foreign state, say, follow a 
report on the opening of an agricultural exhibition, even if the 
ambassador of another state was in attendance. I could give 
examples. 
  [Marian] In order to close the subject, as they say, tell us 
what efforts should be made by all of us, diplomats 
particularly, to achieve true independence, "please" the West, 
and be accepted in the European family? 
  [Botnaru] We need to take as our reference points here the 
priorities and values of Western democratic society. The 
permanency of the Helsinki principle of the inviolability of the 
postwar borders is a cornerstone of its policy. Consequently, a 
peaceful solution of the Dniester and Gagauz problems, the 
transition to a market economy, the adoption of a constitution, 
the democratic arrangement of the national minorities, and the 
conflict-free transition to a Western-type society with the 
preservation of a strong executive--this is what Europe expects 
of us, and it is on these terms that we can become integrated in 
its structures. 
  [Marian] Thus there is just one solution for us: sticking to 
the chosen sovereign path of development, in which we are 
supported by West and East? 
  [Botnaru] Yes. This is what fate has ordained: Moldova is 
condemned to be independent. 
  [Marian] I highly appreciate your modesty, Mr. Minister, but 
would ask you, all the same, to list the achievements of 
Moldovan diplomacy in the past year. 
  [Botnaru] In 1993 our ministry channeled its main efforts 
into a strengthening of international confidence in Moldova and 
the creation of an attractive image for it. Diplomatic missions 
were opened in Minsk, Kiev, Brussels, and Washington. Work 
continues on the formation of new embassies and consulates. 
Treaties and agreements on cooperation in various fields were 
signed in this period with Romania, the United States, France, 
the CIS, Ukraine, Latvia, Estonia, the Czech Republic, Slovakia, 
and other states. 
  Via the United Nations, the CSCE, the Council of Europe, and 
other international organizations our diplomats notified the 
world community of the sociopolitical situation in Moldova and 
the negotiations on a peaceful settlement of the conflict in the 
eastern parts of the republic and also aroused world public 
opinion in connection with the inhuman treatment of political 
prisoners in Tiraspol and their illegal conviction by an 
anticonstitutional Tiraspol court. 
  A priority concern was increased cooperation with the 
permanent mission of the CSCE on the question of a settlement of 
the Dniester conflict and the withdrawal of the Russian 14th 
Army from the territory of Moldova. As a result of our 
participation in the Rome meeting of foreign ministers of the 
CSCE members on 30 November of last year, new prospects for a 
solution of the above-mentioned questions with the support of 
this organization were revealed. 
  The purpose of all these efforts is to become firmly 
established in the international arena as a civilized state 
which has conclusively opted for democracy and political 
pluralism and as a dependable partner and peace-loving neighbor. 
  [Marian] It remains merely to thank you for your initiative 
and this interview. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42749 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Institute Director on Energy Policy Concerns </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0639A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 4 Jan 94 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0639A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Vitaliy Mikhaylovich Postolatiy, director of </F>
the Institute of Energy of the Academy of Sciences of Moldova, 
doctor of technical sciences, and corresponding member of the 
Academy of Sciences of the Republic of Moldova, by Gennadiy 
Valentik; place and date not given: "Problems of Science. A 
Passion for...Energy"] 
  [Text] 
  [Valentik] Vitaliy Mikhaylovich, the subject of our 
discussion is the present and probable future of Moldovan energy 
engineering. But first--about the conflict between you and the 
institute's scientific council, which has been given 
unjustifiably broad publicity. You are accused of abuse of 
power, protectionism, incorrect use of funds allotted to the 
institute, and other sins. With the exception of the one article 
in MOLODEZH MOLDOVY, from the other publications the readers 
received essentially one-sided information about the essence of 
the conflict. And your silence in this situation seems somewhat 
strange. 
  [Postolatiy] I admit that among the accusations that have 
been hurled at me there are some that are fair. But in the flow 
of fabrications, squabbles, and fact juggling they make up too 
small a part to cause us to believe that my opponents are really 
concerned about affairs of the institute and the development of 
energy engineering in Moldova. 
  I have nothing against sweeping the garbage out of the hut 
and placing it in the garbage can. But my colleagues and 
subordinates have spread it out in the street for everyone to 
see, brought in garbage from the outside, and they shout: "Look 
at how neat and clean we are!" It seemed to me that my 
differences with that part of them, namely the part of the 
scholarly council, was a matter for within the institute. 
Therefore, if you will, out of delicacy I did not make a 
statement in response. Then, when the mass attack against me was 
turned into a witch hunt it was not easy to find a publication 
that would publish the arguments of the other side in spite of 
the relatively well-developed public opinion. 
  [Valentik] Well, you have found such a publication. So what 
is the essence of the conflict? 
  [Postolatiy] Last year the Ministry of the National Economy 
allotted us less money than was anticipated. I raised the 
question of its distribution at the scholarly council of the 
institute, which on 5 May adopted a decision regarding this 
issue. In particular, it decided to freeze certain work under 
the state order. And the job of dealing with the workers 
discharged in this was magnanimously assigned to the director. 
There was only one solution: to reduce the number of workers by 
25-30 percent. But for our recently created institute it would 
be a great mistake to lose skilled personnel even in such an 
extreme situation. The general meeting of institute workers 
convened on my initiative arrived at the same opinion. Moreover, 
note, there was not a single objection. They started pouring 
down when on 31 May I issued an order for redistribution of 
budget funds taking the real situation into account. Certain 
members of the scholarly council regarded this as the director's 
disrespect for the decision they had adopted previously and they 
declared war on me. 
  [Valentik] So first the scholarly council decided to reveal 
the truth by a majority of votes and then they decided to 
clarify it by an even larger majority. 
  [Postolatiy] I set a more modest task for myself--to 
preserve 
the collective and fulfill the plan for scientific research work 
as completely as possible. 
  [Valentik] As I understand it, the council is created in 
order to advise the director, and not to make decisions for him. 
You are the leader but, excuse me, not God's dandelion blown by 
the breath of others' opinions. Were you not motivated by a 
desire to share with the council the responsibility for the 
institute's affairs. 
  [Postolatiy] Whatever the advice from the scholarly council 
may be, the responsibility is placed squarely on the shoulders 
of the director. In this case I did not want to make a decision 
that was not in keeping with the interests of the matter. After 
that it went like this...the Ministry of Economics granted us 
the right to change the volume of work. As a result of 
adjustments that were made the financial situation in the 
institute improved somewhat. Moreover, in conjunction with the 
scholarly council, we managed to decide the fate of the workers 
who had been left without wages. Now it was possible to adopt 
the council's previous recommendations of 5 May. I made this 
compromise for the sake of the cause. But not all the members of 
the scholarly council were satisfied with this outcome of the 
matter. As they say, give them an inch and they will take a 
mile. And they began an even more vicious attack on the 
director. August and September were a time when the institute 
was overwhelmed with full inspections. Defamatory statements, 
anonymous letters, and other charming things like this came 
pouring in. But not a single proposal about improving the 
institute's work was received from our opponents. There followed 
a resolution according to which the laboratory headed by the 
director was left essentially without funds. 
  [Valentik] In that case you could sooner be accused of 
inability to wield power than abuse of it. As far as I know, 
even your irreconcilable enemies are not accusing you of 
incompetence or of violating the law either. The presidium of 
the Academy of Sciences considered you worthy of heading the 
institute in the future. And you probably cannot be held to 
blame for the thoughtlessness of members of the presidium. Why 
are your opponents still unable to make peace? What are they 
trying to achieve? 
  [Postolatiy] Some of them want anyone at all to be the 
director as long as it is not me. 
  [Valentik] But since you are the director, let us get down 
to 
business. In my view, something strange is happening with 
Moldova's energy potential now. The republic ships in almost all 
its fuel (98 percent) from other countries. It ships in less 
each year: in 1991--13 million tonnes of conventional fuel, in 
1992--11.6 million. The output of electric energy is dropping 
correspondingly: from 13.2 billion kilowatt-hours in 1991 to 
11.1 billion in 1992. In 1990 we produced 16 billion 
kilowatt-hours of electric energy. It was sufficient, but no 
more than that. Now the deficit is being felt in all spheres of 
the republic's life. The population has been deprived of hot 
water. The heating batteries are not heated to their full 
capacity. In order to avoid paying outrageous prices for 
electric energy, pensioners use stearine candles. Yet Moldova 
exports electric energy abroad. Particularly to Romania and 
Bulgaria. 
  [Postolatiy] Our institute has nothing to do with the 
redistribution of fuel and electric energy. But do not forget 
that commercial structures now have the right to purchase energy 
sources and produce energy from them. They use some of it at 
their own discretion. As for the state sector, here the 
situation is different: Because of the sharp decline in 
production a kind of reserve of energy capacity has been created. 
  [Valentik] So perhaps my colleague from the newspaper TSARA 
is right when, referring to the opinion of experts, he writes 
that "If we had an energy system with high-voltage lines in the 
countries of Eastern Europe (Bulgaria, Turkey) we could export 
electric energy at advantageous prices and at the same time 
obtain a profit of approximately $50-70 million. 
  [Postolatiy] In the first place, as one can see from his 
article, your colleague is confusing kilowatts with kilovolts; 
in the second place, apparently, he met his match in the 
experts. If you build a high-voltage transmission line, the 
immediate reason for doing so lies not in Turkey or Bulgaria, 
but in Moldova--with the prospect of entering the unified 
European energy system. As for the reserves of electric energy 
that have now been formed, this is a temporary, ephemeral 
phenomenon. The predictions of real specialists tell us that the 
consumption of fuel and energy resources by 1995 in our country 
will reach the 1990 level and will grow in accordance with the 
increase in production volumes. Here it is necessary to take 
into account that the proportional expenditure of energy 
resources on the manufacture of a unit of output in our country 
exceeds world indicators by 1.5-2 times. And our industry can 
hardly count on utilizing advanced energy-saving 
technologies--at least in the next decade. 
  The situation now is such that our energy sector is being 
finished off as they try to skim of the good parts. And this is 
at a time when 44 percent of the republic's energy equipment has 
outlived its service life and needs to be replaced. We are 
"burning" our fixed capital, which is in need of modernization 
and development, for the sake of momentary advantage. 
  We have an immense deficit in the financing of energy 
deliveries. The handling capacity of the republic's external 
electrical communications with our neighbors, especially 
Romania, is clearly inadequate. The schedule for loading in the 
energy system is not uniform--the fluctuations reach 30-40 
percent of the maximum. In the next few years the situation 
could develop in such a way that energy engineering in Moldova 
will not be in a condition to provide the economy with 
electricity and heat in a balanced way. And they are talking to 
us about tens of millions in profit for exported electric energy! 
  The basis of the strategic development of energy engineering 
is the provision of a self-balance of electric and thermal 
capacities. Calculations show that it will always be more 
advantageous to buy fuel resources than to import pure energy. 
This means that the development of generating capacities must 
become one of the most important areas in the development of 
energy engineering. 
  [Valentik] In such an alarming situation, why are the funds 
received from the sale of electric energy abroad by the state 
sector not invested in the development of the republic's energy 
engineering? That would be only fair. 
  [Postolatiy] That is necessary. But that question is not for 
me but for the republic government. 
  [Valentik] Let us say that I asked it of the government. 
Vitaliy Mikhaylovich, the demand: "Give us what we need--today!" 
is the curse of all basic sciences. Your science, perhaps more 
than others, can be regarded as an applied science. What can 
your Institute do for Moldovan energy engineering today? 
  [Postolatiy] Practical return is very important. But without 
basic research we would have nothing to give. The work of all 11 
of the institute's laboratories encompasses problems of energy 
engineering almost to a maximum. They include modelling the 
development of energy systems and conditions for their 
operation; reliability of energy supply; controlled electricity 
distribution; microprocessor control systems; diagnostics of 
energy equipment; electro-physics and high voltage technology; 
controlled electric energy accumulators; economics, energy 
saving, automation, the application of computer equipment, etc. 
  Along with other organizations we have drawn up a draft 
program for the development of energy engineering of Moldova up 
to the year 2010 and submitted it to the republic government. 
Speaking on the whole, the main direction of the institute's 
activity is to increase the effectiveness of energy systems and 
energy supply systems. 
  [Valentik] It is known that you assign a significant role in 
the development of Moldovan energy engineering to extensive 
introduction of USVL (controlled self-compensating high voltage 
electric power transmission lines) and varieties of them--SVL 
[self-compensating high voltage power transmission lines] and 
VLSF [expansion not identified]. But some members of your 
institute's scholarly council have their doubts about the 
effectiveness of these lines and certain specialists from 
similar departments think that their introduction into practice 
is unpromising. Essentially the same conclusion was reached by 
the commission of the republic's Academy of Sciences. 
  [Postolatiy] At the beginning of our discussion you 
correctly 
noted that it is impossible to establish the truth by a majority 
of votes. So I am convinced that the USVL and varieties of it 
are the immediate future for Moldovan energy engineering, and 
not just Moldovan. This is also shown by experience with their 
practical utilization. 
  It would take us 10 years to convince specialists that, 
particularly with respect to power transmission lines with a 
voltage of 10 kilovolts, it would be possible to place 
high-voltage supports every 90-100 meters instead of 60-70. Now 
we will probably have to--God forbid that this will take 10 
years too--convince many of my colleagues of the need to use 
USVL. And yet these lines provide for considerably greater 
reliability of electric power supply. Their application reduces 
the number of power failures by 30 percent, it reduces 
expenditures on servicing, transmission, and distribution of 
electric energy, it reduces losses of it by 2-4 percent, it 
increases the handling capacity by 15-40 percent, and it 
significantly reduces the impact on the environment. 
  Among the opponents of the USVL are specialists--true, not 
many of them--who simply cannot understand that the future lies 
with these lines. That is, because of certain considerations 
they do not want to understand. I am prepared to discuss all 
issues with them under the condition that they not be guided by 
a desire to prove that they are right by any means but 
exclusively by the interests of the matter. 
  [Valentik] Apparently the World Bank will grant Moldova 
credit in the amount of $30 million for the development of 
energy engineering with a rate of 7.5 percent. How, in your 
view, should this money be used? 
  [Postolatiy] For transportation for the delivery of fuel and 
for storage facilities. This will be recouped 100-fold. For 
increasing the effectiveness of the processing and utilization 
of fuel. To do this it is necessary to update and reconstruct 
equipment. For reinforcement of energy ties with our neighbors, 
that is, the construction of high-voltage power transmission 
lines that link us to energy systems of Russia, Ukraine, 
Romania, Bulgaria, etc. For reinforcement of connections among 
energy systems inside the republic. 
  Russia is proposing a joint project for the assimilation of 
the Yamal gas deposit and the deposits of Western Siberia. I 
think that it is simply necessary for Moldova to participate in 
them. Along with this it is necessary to study the possibility 
of obtaining fuel resources from other countries. 
  [Valentik] We shall hope that we will not spread out the 
American credit among the various ministries and departments 
and...well, I wish success to your institute and to you, its 
leader. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42750 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Edict Sets New Minimum Wage Rates </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0640A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 5 Jan 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0640A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Edict of the President of the Republic of Moldova: On the </F>
Minimum Amount of Wages and Additional Social Protection 
Measures for the Population"] 
  [Text] With a view to reinforcing social protection for the 
population, and in conjunction with the growth of prices and 
rates, I decree: 
  1. Effective 1 January, the minimum wage shall be set at 
13.5 
lei per month. 
  2. Proceeding from the new amount of the minimum wage, the 
following shall be effected on 1 January 1994: 
  the establishment of specific pay scale rates and position 
salaries of the employees of establishments and organizations 
financed from the budget; 
  an increase in scholarships for participants in 
post-doctoral 
and doctoral programs, students at institutions of higher 
education, and students of colleges and vocational technical 
schools; 
  a raise in the amount of allowances and payments pegged to 
the size of the minimum wage; 
  the recomputation of all types of retirement benefits 
granted 
in keeping with the Republic of Moldova Law "On State Retirement 
Benefits in the Republic of Moldova." 
  The introduction of the minimum wage for economic agents not 
financed from the budget shall be effected as internal funds are 
accumulated for these purposes, but no later than 1 March 1994. 
  3. It shall be established that, with a view to providing 
additional support for the needy and low-income strata of the 
population, effective 1 January 1994: 
  the pay scale rates and position salaries of 
employees of establishments financed from the budget, which are 
computed in keeping with the labor compensation grades of the 
uniform pay scale, shall increase in keeping with the following 
coefficients: 
  1.30--for employees classified as Grades 1 through 5; 
  1.17--for employees classified as Grades 6 through 8; 
  1.05--for employees classified as Grades 9 through 12. 
  If economically accountable units have internal funds 
available they may use the above coefficients to increase pay 
scale rates for the hourly workers of corresponding categories; 
  the recomputed retirement benefits shall increase 
for retirees: 
  who receive social pensions (except for Categories I and II 
handicapped since childhood and crippled children under age 
16)--by 40 percent; 
  who receive retirement benefits in the amount of one minimum 
old-age retirement benefit inclusive (including Categories I and 
II handicapped since childhood and crippled children under age 
16)--by 35 percent; 
  who receive retirement benefits in the amount of one to two 
minimum old-age retirement benefits inclusive--by 30 percent; 
  who receive retirement benefits in the amount of two to 
three 
minimum old-age retirement benefits inclusive--by 20 percent; 
  who receive retirement benefits in the amount of three to 
five minimum old-age retirement benefit inclusive--by 10 percent. 
  With a view to partially offsetting additional outlays 
incurred by the needy and low-income strata of the population, 
as well as in conjunction with a sharp increase in prices and 
rates for gas used for heating, monthly targeted 
allowances shall be paid beginning on 1 January 1994: 
  to nonworking retirees whose retirement benefits received do 
not exceed three times the amount of the minimum old-age 
retirement benefit--in the amount of the minimum wage, 
  to families with many children (number of children no less 
than three) whose combined monthly income per family member in 
the preceding quarter did not exceed the amount of the minimum 
wage--in the amount of one minimum wage per family; 
  to needy and low-income citizens whose combined monthly 
income per family member in the preceding quarter did not exceed 
the size of the minimum wage--in the amount of one-half of the 
minimum wage per family. 
  Nonworking retirees who use liquefied gas (bottles and 
multiunit gas installations) shall be paid a targeted allowance 
amounting to one minimum wage on a quarterly basis beginning on 
1 January 1994. 
  4. It shall be determined that additional outlays shall be 
covered: 
  for raising the wages of the employees of establishments 
financed from the budget and scholarships--from the monies of 
the state budget; 
  for the payment of targeted allowances envisioned in Point 3 
of the present edict--50 percent out of the monies of the state 
budget and 50 percent out of the monies of the social fund; 
  for raising retirement benefits and allowances paid by the 
social fund--out of the monies of this fund. 
  5. With a view to ensuring the implementation of the present 
edict, it shall be established that: 
  effective 1 January 1994, actual outlays on compensation for 
labor, however, not exceeding six times the minimum wage per one 
average employee on the payroll engaged in the main line of 
business of the enterprise, shall be taken into account in 
outlays on manufacturing and selling products (work, services) 
when calculating taxable profits; 
  In the event that actual outlays on compensation for labor 
which are included in the producer cost of products (work, 
services) in keeping with legislation in effect exceed, after 1 
January 1994, double the standard amount established by 
paragraph 2 of the present point, the indicated excess amount 
shall be taxed at the rate established in Point 2, Article 4 of 
the Republic of Moldova Law "On Tax on Enterprise Profits" for 
the purpose of calculating the taxable profit; 
  the taxation of windfall profits envisioned by Point 2, 
Article 4 of the Law "On Tax on Enterprise Profits" shall apply 
only to monopoly enterprises, beginning with profits generated 
from 1 January 1994 on. 
  6. It shall be established that the income tax shall be 
charged on the income (earnings) of individuals received after 1 
January 1994 at the following rates: 


Size of taxable monthly income         Tax rate 

up to five minimum wages               10 percent of the amount of taxable 
                                       income 

between five and 10 minimum wages      15 percent of the amount exceeding 
                                       five times the minimum wage 

between 10 and 15 minimum wages        20 percent of the amount exceeding 10 
                                       times the minimum wage 

between 15 and 20 minimum wages        25 percent of the amount exceeding 15 
                                       times the minimum wage 

between 20 and 25 minimum wages        30 percent of the amount exceeding 20 
                                       times the minimum wage 

between 25 and 30 minimum wages        40 percent of the amount exceeding 25 
                                       times the minimum wage 

between 30 and 40 minimum wages        50 percent of the amount exceeding 30 
                                       times the minimum wage 

between 40 and 50 minimum wages        60 percent of the amount exceeding 40 
                                       times the minimum wage 

over 50 minimum wages                  70 percent of the amount exceeding 50 
                                       times the minimum wage 


  Income tax shall be levied on remunerations based on the 
results of operation in 1993 without taking into account amounts 
previously paid during the year at the rates of the tax as of 
the moment of the computation of remunerations. 
  7. Within two weeks, the government shall: 
  confirm procedures for granting and paying targeted 
allowances; 
  revise procedures for granting compensation payments and 
allowances for children envisioned by the Government Decrees 
dated 30 August 1993 No. 548 and dated 16 April 1993 No. 198, 
and the current size of these payments and allowances; 
  index the cost of hot breakfasts provided free to students 
of 
grades 1 through 4 in general schools, lyceums, and grammar 
schools, and the two meals provided to students in extended-day 
programs; 
  develop and confirm a statute on the accountability of the 
managers of state enterprises, establishments, and organizations 
violating Article 4 of the Decree of the Republic of Moldova 
Parliament dated 25 February 1993 No. 1306-XII "On Enactment of 
the Law on Compensation for Labor"; 
  confirm a standard profitability level for monopoly 
enterprises in 1994; 
  submit to the Parliament of the Republic of Moldova for 
consideration additions to legislation in effect, including the 
Law "On Tax on Enterprise Profits" and the Law "On Individual 
Income Tax"; 
  amend its regulatory acts in keeping with the present edict. 
  8. The Edict of the Republic of Moldova President dated 1 
November 1993 No. 182 "On the Amount of the Minimum Wage in the 
Republic of Moldova" shall be pronounced void. 
  9. The present edict shall take effect on the day of 
signing. 
  [Signed] Mircea Snegur, president of the Republic of Moldova 
  City of Chisinau, 29 December 1993 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42751 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Edict on Hard Currency Regulation </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0663A Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 18 Jan 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0663A </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Edict of the President of the Republic of Moldova: On </F>
Certain Measures To Ensure Foreign Exchange Regulation on the 
Territory of the Republic of Moldova"] 
  [Text] With a view to ensuring compliance with the 
provisions of the Law "On the State National Bank of Moldova 
(National Bank of Moldova)" and the Decree of the Republic of 
Moldova Parliament No. 600-XII dated 11 June 1991, until the 
insertion of relevant additions to legislation in effect, and in 
keeping with the powers established by the Decree of the 
Republic of Moldova Parliament No. 1579-XII dated 4 August 1993, 
  the President of the Republic of Moldova resolves: 
  Article 1.--It shall be recommended that the National Bank 
of 
Moldova set forth procedures for foreign exchange regulation on 
the territory of the Republic of Moldova and enact them on 17 
January 1994. 
  Article 2.--With a view to ensuring foreign exchange 
regulation, the following punitive sanctions shall be 
established for enterprises and organizations registered as 
resident through procedures set forth in legislation in effect: 
  for opening a foreign exchange account beyond the borders of 
the Republic of Moldova without the requisite permission of the 
National Bank of Moldova--in the amount of 100 times the minimum 
wage; 
  for failure to credit proceeds to accounts at the authorized 
banks of the Republic of Moldova (failure to repatriate foreign 
exchange proceeds)--in the amount equal to the sum of proceeds 
not received; 
  for failure to recover an advance payment for imports in the 
event of cancellation of an import contract or nonreceipt of 
merchandise under the contract--in the amount of twice the 
advance payment for imports; 
  for performing operations with foreign exchange, performance 
of which requires a permit from the National Bank of Moldova, in 
the absence of a proper permit--in the amount of 50 times the 
minimum wage. 
  Article 3.--It shall be established that: 
  the punitive sanctions established by Paragraphs 2 and 5 of 
Article 2 of the present edict shall be imposed by the economic 
police, the Finance Guard, and the National Bank of Moldova, and 
those established by Paragraphs 3 and 4 of said article--by the 
National Bank of Moldova and the authorized banks; 
  the fines shall be collected without recourse, in foreign 
exchange or in the Moldovan lei equivalent at the exchange rate 
of the National Bank of Moldova as of the day the amount of the 
fine is debited from the account. 
  The amounts collected shall be credited to the revenue of 
the 
republic budget. 
  Article 4.--It shall be recommended that, within three 
months, the National Bank of Moldova submit proposals for making 
additions to legislation in effect which follow from the present 
edict to the Republic of Moldova Parliament for consideration. 
  Article 5.--Edict of the Republic of Moldova President No. 
24 
dated 8 February 1992, as amended and added to by Edicts No. 151 
dated 4 July 1992, No. 208 dated 30 September 1992, No. 260 
dated 29 December 1992, and No. 92 dated 23 June 1993, shall be 
pronounced void. 
  Article 6. The present edict shall take effect on the date 
of 
signing. 
  [Signed] President of the Republic of Moldova Mircea Snegur 
  Chisinau, 13 January 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42752 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94033" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> WESTERN REGION </F>
<F P=101> MOLDOVA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Edict on Natural Gas Tariffs </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0663B Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA in Russian 21 Jan 94 
p 1 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0663B </F>
<F P=104>  Chisinau NEZAVISIMAYA MOLDOVA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Edict of the President of the Republic of Moldova: On </F>
Rates for Gas Sold to the Population"] 
  [Text] In conjunction with a sharp increase in prices for 
natural gas, and with a view to providing additional social 
protection for the population, 
  the president of the Republic of Moldova resolves: 
  Article 1.--The Edict of the Republic of Moldova President 
No. 256 dated 27 December 1991 "On Liberalization of Prices and 
Rates and Protection of the Domestic Market," as amended and 
added to by Edicts No. 216 dated 30 October 1992, No. 219 dated 
3 November 1992, and No. 222 dated 12 November 1992, shall be 
amended as follows: 
  the following items shall be omitted from the List of 
Products and Services for which prices and rates are set, or 
procedures for their setting are established by ministries, 
rayon executive committees, and the mayor's offices of cities 
reporting to the republic (Appendix No. 2, for the Ministry of 
Finance): "natural and liquefied gas"; 
  the following items shall be added to the List of Products 
and Services for which prices and rates are set by the 
Government of the Republic of Moldova (Appendix No. 1): "natural 
and liquefied gas." 
  Article 2.--It shall be established that, effective 1 
January 
1994, natural gas will be sold to the population for the purpose 
of heating dwellings at rates amounting to 50 percent of the 
unrestricted rates, within the limits of the following norms per 
person per month: 
  if gas meters are absent--nine square meters of heated area; 
  if gas meters are available--90 cubic meters of the gas 
used. 
  Payments for natural gas used in amounts above the indicated 
norms shall be set at the level of unrestricted rates. 
  Article 3.--The State Department for Gas Supply shall be 
authorized to offset the loss of profits by gas enterprises due 
to using the rates established in Point 2 of the present edict 
out of the monies of the reserve fund established for these 
purposes. In the process, the maximum profit margin for setting 
prices for natural gas sold to industrial enterprises shall not 
exceed 10 percent. 
  Article 4.--Within 10 days the Ministry of Finance, jointly 
with the State Department for Gas Supply, shall develop and 
approve the Statute on the Establishment and Use of the Reserve 
Funds to Offset the Losses to Gas Enterprises. 
  Article 5.--Within 10 days the government: 
  shall specify the maximum level of the price for liquefied 
gas and the norm of heated area per person for individual 
categories of the population which, in keeping with legislation 
in effect, are entitled to a reduction in the established fees 
for the use of heating and liquefied gas; 
  shall make amendments following from the present edict in 
the 
Main Provisions on the Composition of Outlays to Manufacture and 
Sell Products (Work, Services) Which Are Included in Their 
Producer Cost, and on Procedures for Calculating the Financial 
Performance of Enterprises, confirmed by Decree of the 
Government No. 340 dated 2 June 1993. 
  Article 6.--The present edict shall take effect on the date 
of signing. 
  [Signed] President of the Republic of Moldova Mircea Snegur 
  Chisinau, 14 January 1994 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42753 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94034" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Andres Sarri Named Businessman of the Year </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0533A Tallinn aRIPaEV in Estonian No 146, 24 
Dec </F>



<TEXT>
93 p 29 
<F P=103> 944K0533A </F>
<F P=104>  Tallinn aRIPaEV </F>
 Language: <F P=105>Estonian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Margus Mets: "Andres Sarri--1993 Businessman of </F>
the Year"] 
  [Text] 
  Andres Sarri (35), chairman of the board of AS Eesti 
Talleks, and a man completely unknown to Estonia's world of 
business only three years ago has, by now, become one of the 
major pullers of strings in the small state's economic life. 
After a nervous albeit successful year, Sarri has finally 
privatized Talleks, risen to lead the Central Industrial 
Alliance, assumed control of the former Esttex Bank 
[Esttexpank], created the Taxpayers' Association, along with 
some influential friends and, to top it off, was named 
businessman of the year by aRIPaEV. 
  As director of a private company that purchased one of the 
first large enterprises to be privatized, and the other 
protagonist in the court epic initiated by Paul Treier, former 
director of the excavator company, Andres Sarri has made a name 
for himself both at home and abroad. 
  The first business experiences of Sarri, a graduate of 
machine construction technology at the Technical University, 
goes back to a small business venture Tipnet, founded at TPI 
[Tallinn Polytechnical Institute, Technical University's 
previous name] in the early stages of the cooperative era. The 
groundwork, however, for the first of his companies AS Kadeks 
that went into wholesale business and ran a grocery store on the 
Talleks premises, was laid while he was working at the state 
enterprise Talleks in 1989. 
  Even though this year's 100-million kroon sales volume 
projected for AS Talleks and its affiliates, now headed by 
Sarri, represents a big jump from the one-time shop, it is far 
from being the ultimate achievement for an active man like 
Sarri. "If I had been engaged in business activity in a firm 
that is exclusively mine, I would have been a millionaire for 
sure," he admits. But since his energies are spent on companies 
dealing with production that will start paying off later, he'll 
have to wait a little. "I forego quite a few things today, so as 
to get more tomorrow." 
  About his shares in Eesti Talleks Sarri says that, right 
now, 
his participation percentage can be noted by a single digit, but 
he has an agreement with the board of the corporation 
stipulating that, upon meeting certain objectives, the chairman 
can buy additional shares to have control of about one fifth of 
Talleks. 
<H5>  Sarri Also Became Owner of a Bank </H5>
  Compared to some of his fellow members of the taxpayers' 
club, Sarri was more like a poor cousin up until this fall. At 
the end of November, Sarri made it to the league of men by 
having acquired a controlling interest in Esttexpank in the name 
of his companies. 
  Today, the bank that was created to be a money machine for 
Estar by Juri Kraft five years ago is controlled by 
corporations Kadeks and Hobeseekel [Silver Shekel]. The 
latter was created by Sarri in cooperation with Meelis Milder 
(Baltika) and other entrepreneurs specifically for investing in 
the bank. "The purchase of shares was handled by an unknown 
company, so as not to create unnecessary emotions," the 
businessman of the year hinted. 
  In addition to owning the bank, Sarri's first company Kadeks 
also deals in gasoline and is building a gas station in 
Parnu. Local construction firms make no secret of their 
displeasure, because Sarri has been owing them 200,000 kroons 
for some time now. The man has promised, however, that 
everything will be straightened out before Christmas. 
<H5>  TKP--Sarri's Lasting and Painful Memory </H5>
  Sarri, who was appointed chairman of the commission to 
liquidate TKP [Tartu's Bank of Commerce] by Bank of Estonia 
president Siim Kallas in January, went on believing way into 
March, that the Tallinn City Court will declare Eesti 
Kutus 
[Estonian Fuel] bankrupt, and that the millions thus regained 
will be used to compensate the shareholders of the failed bank. 
  In May Sarri made a magnificent gesture of dropping the 
claim 
for the amount which, according to an interim-agreement 
negotiated by Laar and Kallas with the fuel company's Toomas 
Saks, had passed the billion mark, counting all the late fees. 
Estonian Fuel admitted its liability to the liquidated bank to 
be 125 million kroons, out of which a little over 35 million had 
been paid back at the time. The state, as owner of the fuel 
company, however, has not seen fit to transfer the money, and 
debate over the validity of the agreements has made its way back 
to the court. 
  "For me, it will be a long and painful memory," Sarri admits 
in mid-December, as he comments on the TKP problems, and voices 
his hopes for the umteenth time to have this bank's affairs 
staightened out as soon as possible. In the meantime, other 
members of the commission have voiced strong criticism of Sarri, 
as a person not overly interested in the daily activities of the 
commission. 
  In March, Sarri assumed another important honorary position. 
At the Central Alliance of Estonian Industry [ETKL: Eesti 
Toostuse Keskliit], power went from old industrial 
leaders Veskivali and Kraft to entrepreneurs of the new 
generation. Sarri became chairman of the ETKL council, and 
Meelis Milder, chairman of the board at Baltika, became his 
deputy. 
  In the course of the year, Sarri has had a lot of dealings 
with Milder, as he has with the other 12 members of the 
Taxpayers' Club because, for some reason, many business dealings 
in Estonia will have to go through these men. "The Club simply 
evolved from a group of people who like to meet for dinner, 
occasionally, have some wine and talk," Sarri explains, looking 
his public straight in the eye, just like all the other 
prominent club members. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42754 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94035" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Troop Withdrawal Progress Examined </TI></H3>
<H4>   Bases, Military Units Listed </H4>
<F P=102> 944K0610A Tallinn RAHVA HaaL in Estonian 4 Jan 93 
p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0610A </F>
<F P=104>  Tallinn RAHVA HaaL </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Estonian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tiit Tambi: "Russian Troops Leaving, But Not </F>
Fast Enough"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  December Last </H5>
  According to the foreign ministry, the following additional 
objects have been turned over by the Russian army, since 
December 1, 1993. 
  The 144th motorized rifle division turned over the remainder 
of the Aegviidu polygon, roughly 300 hectares. Since the rest 
had been received before, Aegviidu is now fully turned over. 
  The Piirsalu storage facilities were taken over from the 
navy, making Laanemaa the 13th district that is 
`clean.' 
  One third of the fuel terminal at Tallinn's North Harbor has 
been taken over. Documents to be signed are with the commander 
of the Northwest sector, as are those for the Hydrographic 
Service of the Baltic fleet. 
  During the last week of the year just ended, roughly 40 
armored vehicles were taken out by rail from the Klooga and 
Tallinn units of the 144th motorized rifle division. 
<H5>  The Mines of Naissaare </H5>
  Out of the previously determined number of 330 newer type 
sea 
mines at Naissaare, 282 had been removed by December 25. Only 48 
mines are left that can be put on one ship of the `Girocompass' 
type. There were also 1,454 mines of the older type. Out of 
those 828 have been destroyed by burning, leaving a balance of 
626. However, the pace of work has slacked off a bit lately, 
because out of the 37 navy personnel, only 18 are left. 
According to authorities at the Tallinn naval base, mine 
clearing at Naissaare should be completed by April 1, even 
though experts think the job could be completed within a month. 
<H5>  Packing Noted at the Radio Reconnaissance Station </H5>
  Packing is also going on at the radio reconnaissance center 
at Vana-Aaviku, near Juri, in the Harjumaa district. At 
one 
time, this object belonged to KGB, but was later turned over to 
the navy. Its operating reach covered the coastal areas of the 
United States and Canada, and the Mediterranean region, not to 
mention the continent of Europe. The center itself did not pose 
any particular danger to Estonia but, since it was aimed from 
our territory against other states, it was that much more 
troublesome politically. 
  Now, the dismantling of receivers has begun. The senders are 
still in place, but the station as a whole is no longer 
operational. Local commanders think that dismantling will be 
completed in February. After that, the buildings and antennas 
will be turned over to Estonia. (The equipment is obsolete and 
Estonia does not need it). In contrast to many others, this 
object is in good order, nothing has been broken. 
  In summary, one could say that foreign troops are leaving, 
indeed, but at a very slow pace. In tomorrow's paper, we shall 
try to analyze why this is so. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42755 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94036" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> ESTONIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Troop Withdrawal Progress Examined </TI></H3>
<H4>   Progress Difficult To Measure </H4>
<F P=102> 944K0610B Tallinn RAHVA HaaL in Estonian 5 Jan 94 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0610B </F>
<F P=104>  Tallinn RAHVA HaaL </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Estonian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tiit Tambi: "A Look Behind the Parting Pains of </F>
the Russian Military"] 
  [Text] 
  In yesterday's paper, we published a short listing of 
objects that have been taken over from the Russian military 
during the month of December last year, and came to the 
conclusion that troop removal is progressing too slowly. 
However, this could only be said speculatively since, to the 
knowledge of the undersigned, there is no accurate way of 
determining how many foreign troops we actually have here? 
<H5>  What is an object? </H5>
  We talk about military objects, but what are they? Let me 
bring a few examples. The air defense division located in 
Estonia had 14 radio-technology batallions and 39 missile 
divisions. If one batallion served several divisions, then how 
many objects should we be talking about? 
  There were also three border guard units in Estonia. They 
were in charge of more than 40 check points and 52 technical 
observation posts. Another picture puzzle: How many objects were 
there? 
  The staff headquarters of Kaitseliit [Protection League] has 
17 objects within a certain system registered in Tallinn, and 11 
in the Harjumaa district. These include staff headquarters, 
ports, storage facilities for ammunition, food, chemicals and 
fuel, radio technology centers and detached communications 
batallions, naval divisions, the amari airport, a medical 
batallion, a tank regiment, an artillery regiment, and also some 
anti-artillery and anti-tank divisions. 
  The foreign ministry, however, has a listing of over 500 
objects, based on the information received from the staff 
headquarters of Defense Forces. What accounts for such 
divergence of data, by a whole order of magnitude? It turns out 
that the latter method is based on the number of land tracts. 
The number of land tracts is also the number of objects. 
  The data used for evaluations differ depending on the 
objectives. When talking about taking over objects, the 
condition of land and structures is of primary importance, and 
will be evaluated, to the extent possible. Determining, however, 
the possible danger of attack, other things would have to be 
considered, like combat technology and the number of troops. 
<H5>  Playing With Numbers </H5>
  Russia has been playing with numbers from the very 
beginning. 
When the Estonian-Russian negotiations started in the Spring of 
1992, the Estonian delegation was told that there are roughly 
20,000 military personnel here. According to our data, there 
must have been close to 40,000. And there were. After looking 
into it, it turned out that the Russian delegation had 
conveniently left out the border guard and the naval personnel, 
thus politely attempting to conceal their presence. For some 
reason it was to their benefit to show these numbers smaller 
than they actually were. Maybe because Estonian independence was 
viewed at the time as a passing phenomenon? 
  Then a sudden about-face occurred. The word from Moscow was, 
for example, that there were 4,170 men in the air defense 
division. Local commanders of the division, however, spoke 
openly of 1,500. There was also a time at which five or six 
different Russian agencies all came out with numbers that, on 
occasion, differed from each other by up to 5,000 men. Our 
experts explained this with the realization on the part of 
Russians that they really must leave. But, to get more aid out 
of the Western countries, they tried to inflate the actual 
figures at the outset, only to show afterwards how vigorously 
they are leaving! 
<H5>  Everything Hinges on Political Will </H5>
  One small example. Last spring Vassili Svirin, head of the 
Russian delegation for negotiations, said that they still had 
7,600 men here. This number decreased rapidly throughout the 
summer, but that decrease came to a sudden halt in October. Why? 
A little later president Yeltsin issued an ukaz about 
stopping the removal of troops... 
  By now, we have heard that talk about stopping removal in so 
many versions, and on so many different occasions. At the same 
time new arguments emerge. When, at first, it was said that the 
troops have no place to go that fast, then now it is spelled out 
clearly: The troops are here to defend the Russian minority. 
However, it seems that even that is not the ultimate truth. More 
and more factors indicate that this minority being `defended' is 
another pretext. The actual reason is part of the need to 
preserve Russia's avant guarde positions, territories conquered 
at some point in history and now in danger of slipping away. Our 
eastern neighbors are programmed for imperialism, and there is 
little we can do about it. 
<H5>  Behind the Broad Back of Veterans </H5>
  Now, a new pretext has been found. Those retired officers 
numbering 10,000 to 11,000 who, according to the foreign laws 
and government regulations should be leaving the country, have 
supposedly no place to go. This is nothing more than a military 
version of protecting the national minority. That, too, has been 
programmed into our lives a long time ago. 
  During the 70's, Moscow came up with an ingenious plan to 
ease the pressure of seniors on the city. It was decided to 
scatter them to the warmer parts of the huge homeland. The 
Baltic countries received their share, especially in the form of 
retired or reserve officers. This had its reasons. A good 
network of roads and relatively decent communications would make 
it possible for them to be recruited, in case of a general 
draft. Back then, this was necessary against external enemies. 
But now? 
  Construction units put up the houses, after which some of 
them were turned over to be administered by local authorities. 
But it was military personnel who took up residence there. The 
officer may have served in the Northern Arctic region but, after 
entering reserves, chose to live in Tallinn. The `creative 
construction' of the Estonian SSR was obviously none of his 
business. There are many like him. Others stayed on living in 
housing space assigned to the military. Yet others were given 
apartments bought from the city's housing authority by the 
Soviet ministry of defense. 
  Just try to get rid of them now. It could not be done 
without 
setting off loud complaints about human rights violations. To 
make things worse, the officer did not come alone, there is 
usually a family in tow. At Tapa, for example, there are roughly 
1,000 people living on the military base, only 600 of them 
military personnel. 
  So, we get to the next step. Russia does not have to take 
its 
officers out, it can demobilize them here. The number of troops 
decreased? Decreased. If and when men are needed, the same 
people can be recruited, but now under contract, as civilians. 
<H5>  Other Hocus Pocus Tactics </H5>
  For some time now, I have been wondering if diplomat Svirin 
really knows, for example, the number of military personnel 
staying here. He gets his information from the foreign ministry 
who, in turn, gets it from the defense ministry. And the latter 
could be easily fooled. One air defense unit only had five men 
left, plus a commander, who was already a board member of some 
corporation or other. You may recall the incident behind the 
Marja store in Tallinn, a few years ago. That object, too, had 
been pawned off to some corporation. One of its board members, 
however, was an officer of the unit stationed there. When 
members of Estonia's Defense Forces came to take over the 
object, marines were summoned promptly, who trampled our boys in 
the mud, face down. 
  By now, such transformations into businessmen have become 
part of Russia's national policy. Let us in every way support 
military and other kinds of businessmen! Could one really 
believe that the marines who had for a while stayed at the 
Laidoner estate have left by now? According to some sources, 
about a third of them are in Tallinn. They live in the city and 
wear civilian clothes. 
  So much for the military security of the state of Estonia. 
And, should these pseudo-military corporations get state funds 
or some other capital to back them up, it could well be the end 
of our economic independence. But that is another topic. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42756 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94037" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> LATVIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official Government Statement on Russian Generals' Arrest </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0635A Riga NEATKARIGA CINA in Latvian 11 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0635A </F>
<F P=104>  Riga NEATKARIGA CINA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Latvian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Statement by the Chairman of the National Security Council, </F>
State President G. Ulmanis: "Statement by the National Security 
Council"] 
  [Text] On January 10 of this year, during the process of 
reclaiming Russian army properties in Riga, in the Vidzeme 
Suburb, a sharp conflict arose between the Vidzeme Suburb 
Council Chairman A. Rucs and two generals from the Russian North 
Western Military Forces Group (NWMFG). At the time of the 
conflict, A. Rucs ordered the municipal police representatives 
to place both generals, one of which was the Deputy to the 
Commander of the NWMFG, in handcuffs and transport them to the 
Latvian-Russian border. Under guard, they were placed in a light 
motor vehicle and taken in an undisclosed direction. At the same 
time, Rucs gave the order to use firearms to repel any attempts, 
even by security divisions of the Republic of Latvia, to free 
the detainees. It was later learned that, under orders by A. 
Rucs, also detained was the chauffeur and automobile of one of 
the generals. 
  Commander Mayorov of the NWMFG reacted sharply against this 
action. He personally contacted Latvian State President G. 
Ulmanis, informing him of what had happened and warning that 
--if the detained generals are not released, Russian army 
operatives will become involved in the course of events. 
  At this same time, in the offices of the Latvian State 
President, a regularly scheduled meeting of the Latvian National 
Security Council was taking place, which was interrupted. All 
state security structures were given the order to find and 
release the detained generals. The matter was complicated by the 
fact that A. Rucs did not wish to disclose the direction in 
which the detainees were taken. 
  A. Rucs was summoned to the National Security Council (NSC) 
meeting in order to provide an explanation of what had occurred. 
At the State President's offices, A. Rucs did not wish to submit 
to orders -- to turn over his personal firearms to the State 
President's guard. Only after A. Rucs (according to his own 
words) had conferred with Saeima Deputy R. Milbergs, did he turn 
over two pistols to the President's adjutant. 
  Several times, A. Rucs, in the presence of Attorney General 
J. Skrastins, stressed to the members of the NSC that his 
actions were perfectly correct because "only in this manner -- 
from a position of power, is it possible to speak to Russia, 
because it only recognizes power". A. Rucs performed all of the 
described activities through the municipal police force, 
inviting in the National Guard 13th battalion National Guards to 
provide additional security. 
  Commander Mayorov of the NWMFG repeatedly turned to the 
State 
President. Today, in the name of the Russian government, 
Russia's Extraordinary and Official Envoy to Latvia, A. Rannih, 
presented a note and explained that, despite diplomatic 
immunity, gun barrels were pointed at him on January 10 at 7:50 
in the morning while he was on his way to the embassy as he 
drove past the building at 9a. Nicgale Street. 
  Carrying out the NSC order, after several hours, it was 
finally possible to locate and release the illegally detained 
Russian army generals. Afterwards, Mayorov reported by telephone 
that the detainees has suffered minor damage to their skin from 
the handcuffs. Mayorov reported that Russia's President B. 
Yeltsin had given the order to carry out energetic anti-actions, 
and various relocated Russian armed forces divisions on the 
Latvian border were already in full combat readiness, as well as 
one military airforce division. To avoid any possible clashes, 
President G. Ulmanis personally contacted the Russian State 
President's Office by telephone. 
  This incident occurred as a result of the provocational 
actions by Rucs, in which he overstepped his legally defined 
authority. This could have resulted in a loss of lives. The 
incident created by Rucs has undoubtedly harmed the prestige of 
the state and has created international consequences, which may 
be hard to predict. It has threatened the talks between Latvia 
and Russia, which were supposed to resume today, as well as 
possible higher level meetings. 
  Based on the aforementioned, we request that the Cabinet of 
Ministers: 
  1) examine the facts of this matter; 
  2) relieve A. Rucs from the office he is holding; 
  3) carry out an official investigation of the National Guard 
and municipal police; 
  4) prepare a response to Russia regarding these events; 
  5) define regulatory acts to regulate the procedure for 
reclaiming Russian army property. 
  State President, National Security Council Chairman G. 
Ulmanis. Riga, January 10, 1994. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42757 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94038" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> LITHUANIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Sajudis Holds 4th Congress </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0552A Vilnius LIETUVOS RYTAS in Lithuanian 21 Dec 93 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0552A </F>
<F P=104>  Vilnius LIETUVOS RYTAS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Lithuanian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Kestutis Jauniskis: "The 4th Sajudis Congress: A </F>
Rejection of Politics?"] 
  [Text] The more than 500 delegates who came to Vilnius for 
the fourth Sajudis congress Saturday did not expect significant 
disagreement on the future of Sajudis; the previously publicized 
reports of the Sajudis city and district conferences that took 
place earlier had indicated that most of the participants in 
those conferences were in favor of Sajudis remaining a mass 
organization. Of 3572 Sajudis members polled, 304 stated that 
Sajudis should cease its activities, only 18 of those polled 
were prepared to reorganize Sajudis into a political 
organization, and 344 expressed the view that Sajudis should 
remain a mass political movement. 
  V. Landsbergis, the honorary chairman of Sajudis, opened the 
proceedings by asserting that Sajudis had always been 
consistent, that during its five years of activity it had 
created and nurtured its party--the National Union [Tevynes 
Sajunga]. In V. Landsbergis' opinion, that was the final task of 
Sajudis, and it was now necessary to think about new forms of 
activity which would help defend against internal and external 
threats. The professor mentioned several of these in his 
speech--the "Zhirinovskyization" of Russia, as well as her 
efforts to acquire the mandate of peacekeeper, to which the 
statements of the Russian and British foreign ministers in the 
English press testified, the attempts to recreate the Bolshevik 
party and soviet rule in Lithuania, as well as the actual 
readiness of the LDDP [Lithuanian Democratic Labor Party] to 
accept the Russian yoke. 
  V. Landsbergis cited the rejuvenation of Lithuania as the 
primary assignment for the new Sajudis. Sajudis could look after 
volunteers, farmers, and the Lithuanian schools. It could rally 
the forces of the political right. "Sajudis must be Lithuania's 
mainstay," said V. Landsbergis. 
  In an analysis of the results of the last two years of 
Sajudis activity, Chairman A. Katkus of the Sajudis Seimas 
Council said that those were years of intense political 
struggle, which were overshadowed by the victory of the LDDP. 
"The leaders of Sajudis could be blamed, or even condemned, but 
the clock cannot be turned back, nor the previous status quo 
restored," said A. Katkus. In his opinion, Sajudis had made 
mistakes--it had not psychologically prepared the people for 
reforms, it had not taken over the means of mass communication, 
and it had dissociated itself from Supreme Council deputies that 
it had formerly supported. A. Katkus also informed the delegates 
to the congress of his resignation from the Sajudis chairmanship. 
  A wide range of opinions were expressed in the discussions 
that took place after lunch. They were greeted by the delegates 
either with approving applause, or with a stamping of feet and 
retorts indicating dissatisfaction. Much criticism was directed 
at S. Valentinavicius and R. Gajauskaite, ex-leaders of the 
Vilnius city Sajudis council; according to V. Narbutas, they had 
expressed extremist opinions and had wanted to separate Sajudis 
from the National Union. V. Nezgada said that no party can claim 
the Sajudis name. "We may help the National Union, but we cannot 
cater to it exclusively. Conversely, it cannot adopt the 
attitude that 'we can do whatever we want with Sajudis.'" In V. 
Nezgada's opinion, this congress can make no decisions 
concerning the future of Sajudis, for two-thirds of the deputies 
belong to the National Union, which is already speaking of 
future victories, though there is no way of knowing whether they 
will take place or not. 
  One delegate asked why Sajudis should not remain what it has 
always been, a mass political movement, and further, why it was 
that people who called themselves democrats could not seem to 
tolerate dissenting opinions and began to stamp their feet, 
while others said that those Sajudis members who are trying to 
seize Sajudis were functionaries who even dealt in threats. 
  The vote on the future of Sajudis confirmed the results of 
the poll of the Sajudis rank and file--468 delegates came out in 
favor of making Sajudis a mass organization, 30 wanted Sajudis 
to become a mass political organization, and 32 felt that 
Sajudis should cease its activities. 
  After the results of the voting were announced, member of 
the 
Seimas K. Uoka took the floor and read a statement that 
expressed disagreement with any change in the status of Sajudis. 
According to the authors of the statement, prior to the congress 
in-depth discussions of the future of Sajudis had been avoided, 
there had been no assessment of the mistakes made during the 
period in power, nor of the reasons for the defeat in the Seimas 
elections and of the loss of the press. The statement went on to 
say that a new group was being organized, which will be open to 
present and future members of Sajudis. 
  By the way, at the 3rd congress of Sajudis, which took place 
on December 14-15 of 1991, K. Uoka said that Sajudis was 
torturing Lithuania with scripts and speeches, upbraided the 
then-current government of G. Vagnorius, and said that it had to 
be kept in line by "strong blows from outside." The speech K. 
Uoka gave then was greeted with a thunderous ovation, and soon 
signs appeared, reading "K. Uoka for Chairman of Sajudis." 
  When asked by LIETUVOS RYTAS at the press conference that 
took place Saturday evening for his opinion about the decision 
of his colleague K. Uoka to create a new Sajudis group, V. 
Landsbergis said that it would be a new organization, and would 
not be Sajudis. To do this, in the professor's opinion, would be 
a political mistake--just like the one K. Ouka made when during 
the presidential elections he announced his candidacy and 
thereby split the rightist forces. According to V. Landsbergis, 
Sajudis should remain a movement uniting those who dread the 
word "party," or who are not yet inclined to join any party. 
  According to A. Katkus, a participant in the press 
conference, it is difficult to create a viable organizational 
structure within Sajudis because its membership is concerned 
solely with Lithuanian independence. In recalling the 
suggestions that were made at the 3rd Sajudis congress to recast 
Sajudis into a party, V. Landsbergis observed that at that time 
Sajudis was affected by destructive forces, and that in the 
meantime, the National Union had matured as the Sajudis party. 
"That was combined with political blows and losses," emphasized 
V. Landsbergis. 
  The congress confirmed the Sajudis platform and bylaws, 
according to which former CPSU-Lithuanian CP secretaries of the 
national, district, and city organizations, current members of 
the Lithuanian Democratic Labor Party, and former KGB employees 
were barred from participating in Sajudis. R. Batura, the holder 
of a doctorate in history, was elected chairman of the Sajudis 
council. The Sajudis council also includes Seimas members A. 
Racas, I. Uzdavinys, and A. Vaisnoras. 
  The congress accepted several resolutions, statements, and a 
declaration. Among other things, the last states that "the day 
of the old forces is drawing to a close. We are convinced that 
by peaceful, democratic means, we will soon reach the point at 
which the helm of the country will be taken by people who are 
genuinely concerned with the welfare and fate of the nation." 
The resolution "On Lack of Confidence in Lithuanian Democratic 
Labor Party's Economic Policy," like a resolution of the 
National Union conference, came out in favor of holding Seimas 
and municipal elections concurrently. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42758 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94039" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> LITHUANIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Official Unemployment Statistics Questioned </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0552B Vilnius LIETUVOS RYTAS in Lithuanian 22 Dec 93 p 9 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0552B </F>
<F P=104>  Vilnius LIETUVOS RYTAS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Lithuanian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tomas Juknevicius: "Government Officials are </F>
Disseminating Erroneous Information about Unemployment in 
Lithuania. Who Can Interpret the Puzzling Unemployment Curve?"] 
  [Text] For more than a year now, according to the official 
statistics, the unemployment rate in Lithuania has been stable 
at 1.5 percent, and sometimes has even dipped below that figure. 
Is that at all possible? And if so, what does it mean? 
  V. Slekaitis, general director of the Labor Exchange, told 
LIETUVOS RYTAS that on December 1 of 1993, 30,848 people in 
Lithuania were registered as unemployed. Of these, 13,551, or 
43.9 percent were in urban areas, and 17,297, or 56.1 percent, 
were in the districts. Of all those registered as unemployed, 
there were 19,078 (or 61.8 percent) blue collar workers, and 
11,770 (38.2 percent) white collar workers. Of the total, 17,615 
(or 57.1 percent) were women, and 13,233 (42.9 percent) were men. 
  Official documents from the Lithuanian Labor Exchange also 
indicate that the proportion of unemployed blue collar men and 
unemployed women in the cities has increased. 
  The documents show that the unemployment rate for Lithuania 
as a whole is 1.5 percent. It is lowest in the Anyksciai, 
Moletai, Plunge, Kedainiai and Varena districts, and is only 0.4 
percent in the city of Marijampole. In the cities of Kaunas and 
Klaipeda, as well as in the Pasvalys, Prienai, and Vilkaviskis 
districts, it is under one percent. The unemployment rate is 
highest in the Taurage (6.2 percent), Silute (4 percent), Akmene 
(3.4) percent, and Raseiniai (3.1 percent) districts, as well as 
in the cities of Panevezys and Druskininkai (2.5 and 2.2 
percent, respectively). 
  No further information was provided to the LIETUVOS RYTAS 
reporter by either V. Slekaitis or his advisor V. Zaksauskaite 
(other employees are not allowed to talk to the press). 
  When asked how many Lithuanians work only part of the day, 
or 
part of the week, the heads of the Labor Exchange said that that 
information was for internal use only, and was not made public; 
under the Public Employment [Gyventoju Uzimtumo] Law, the Labor 
Exchange was not required to collect this information. 
  Upon being asked whether the General Director of the Labor 
Exchange was aware of the real situation in the employment 
market, Mr. V. Slekaitis responded that "we are doing a better 
job than anyone else!" 
<H5>  The real situation in the job market </H5>
  According to LIETUVOS RYTAS data, on December 1, 4258 job 
openings were listed with local labor exchanges (there were 700 
more in November). Urban labor exchange listings contained 78.7 
percent of all job openings. 
  Each available job had 7.5 unemployed applicants; 6.2 for 
each blue collar position, and ten for each white collar one. In 
Kaunas, Anyksciai, Lazdijai, and Moletai, each available job had 
about three applicants; each one in Vilnius, Klaipeda, Alytus, 
Mariampole, Mazeikiai, Pakruojis, Pasvalys, Plunge, and 
Vilkaviskis had about five; each one in Siauliai, Panevezys, 
Druskininkai, Svencionys, and Telsiai had over 50; finally, each 
one in Sakiai, Skuodas, Jurbarkas, Taurage, and Rokiskis had 200 
unemployed applicants. 
  There were no openings for white-collar applicants on 
December 1 in Jurbarkas, Rokiskis, Skoudas, and Sakiai. During 
November, 2685 people found jobs, or 746 fewer than did so in 
October. 
<H3>  The unemployment rate is three times higher than the 
official figures indicate </H3>
  We were able to find out that on December 1, in 146 
Lithuanian enterprises, a total of 17,300 people were on 
enforced vacation, in 107 firms 32,300 worked less than a full 
week, and in 253 firms a total of 50,000 people worked away from 
their regular jobs, or in jobs that did not match their 
qualifications. In November, about a hundred thousand people in 
Lithuania worked without a clear timetable. The Lithuanian 
Labor Exchange has this kind of information, but does not make 
it public. 
  Experts assert that the unemployment rate is actually three 
times higher than officially reported. The discrepancies between 
the fictional official statistics and the real ones can be 
explained by the unacknowledged existence of reduced work weeks, 
unpaid vacations, and other such tactics. 
  Compared to November 1, the number of people on enforced 
vacations has increased by 1.1 times, because they work less 
than a full week, or less than a full day, because the employer 
lacks raw materials or fuel, it is impossible to sell the 
products or there are no orders for them, many firms are not 
profitable, or their accounts are in a state of disorder. 
  Most commonly, the under employment of employees can be seen 
in industry (91.4 percent). Things are considerably better in 
transportation (4.4 percent), construction (2 percent), and 
agriculture (1.7 Percent). 
<H5>  The rural labor exchanges </H5>
  In the opinion of J. Adomaitis, senior scientific associate 
of the Agrarian Economics Institute, by the year 2000 the rural 
population will decline by 1.5 percent, and the working 
population by 6.5 percent. Hidden unemployment will continue to 
flourish in the countryside, for people will find it impossible 
to make a living on a 2-3 hectare piece of land. The situation 
will be aggravated by a shift in commuting flows--about 23,000 
women used to work in the cities. 
  Since transportation has become more expensive, people want 
to work closer to home. Ex-agricultural experts would like to 
continue to work in their specialties, which will cause the 
supply of labor in the countryside to exceed demand by that much 
more. There will be a real threat of the migration of the rural 
population to the cities. 
  In the opinion of J. Adomaitis, rural employment offices 
should seek out the unemployed, and arrange employment for them 
as close to their homes as possible. Only a privately 
capitalized, government-supported rural labor exchange could 
accomplish this. 
<H3>  What are the tens of thousands who are not employed, not in 
school, and not registered anywhere, doing? </H3>
  J. Jagminas, Director of the Vilnius Labor Exchange, 
believes 
that in the capital there are 366,400 gainfully employed 
individuals. Only 285,000 are insured by "Sodra." Of these, 
190,800 work in the public sector, and 94,100 in the private 
sector--69,800 in corporations or closed stock companies, 11,400 
in agricultural companies, and 4,800 in privately held 
companies. Public organizations employ 4,300 people. 
  About 79,500 inhabitants of Vilnius officially pay no taxes 
of any kind, said J. Jagminas. He also asserted that in Vilnius 
alone, there are about 32,400 people who do not have jobs, do 
not go to school, and are not registered with the Labor 
Exchange. In other words, are there as many unemployed in 
Vilnius alone as the official figures say there are in the whole 
country? 
  The director of the Vilnius Labor Exchange thinks that most 
of the large firms in the capital are headed for bankruptcy. 
Officials of the aforementioned offices do not want to give to 
the Labor Exchanges any data on their plans to lay off 
employees, for future partners might not want to have anything 
to do with a company that has many laid off employees. 



<FIG ID=JPRS-USR-013C-88A>             Dynamics of Unemployment in Lithuania (1991 - 1 Dec </FIG>




</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42759 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94040" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> LITHUANIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Duma Deputy on Prospects for Relations with Baltics </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0665A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian 28 Jan 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0665A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Vyacheslav Igrunov, state Duma deputy and </F>
member of Committee on CIS; date and place not given: "Patriotic 
Aims Are Unavoidable in Russian Policy"] 
  [Text] The incident involving the arrest of Russian 
generals in Riga, the debates over Lithuania's chances of NATO 
membership.... The tension in relations between Russia and the 
Baltic countries is mounting. State Duma Deputy Vyacheslav 
Igrunov ("Yabloko"), member of the Committee on the CIS, 
answered OBSHCHAYA GAZETA's questions about the prospects for 
the development of these relations. 
  [OBSHCHAYA GAZETA] Do you feel that the friction in Russia's 
relations with the "Baltic troika" has grown more intense 
recently? 
  [Igrunov] Yes, probably. Whereas the status of the 
Russian-speaking minority in the new independent states was of 
little interest to most people in Russia at one time, now there 
is so much concern about this problem that it has even resulted 
in the revision of policy guidelines. Politicians from the 
"patriotic" camp and even those who are customarily called 
democrats have displayed profound impatience with their 
neighbors because of the status of their fellow countrymen. 
  In a certain sense the new round of conflicts in relations 
with the Baltic countries was unavoidable. We are caught in a 
vicious circle: The deterioration of conditions in Russia is 
motivating the political class in the Baltic countries to seek a 
place under NATO's protective umbrella. Any Western concessions 
in this respect then evoke an unhealthy reaction from Russia. We 
were too late to do everything possible for the Russian-speaking 
minority during a relatively calm period, and now we have to 
take extraordinary steps to keep the situation from getting 
worse, and all of this is being done today, now that we have a 
new parliament, where the absolute majority of deputies are in 
favor of the restoration of the USSR or of dramatic measures to 
protect Russian interests. Similar changes have taken place in 
the agencies of the executive branch of government. This is 
making a grievous impression on our northwestern neighbors, an 
impression which will be exceptionally difficult to dispel. 
  [OBSHCHAYA GAZETA] If the majority of Duma deputies are in 
favor of restoring the USSR, then why did the number of deputies 
signing up for the parliamentary committee on the CIS fall short 
of even the number required by the rules of procedure for the 
formation of a committee? 
  [Igrunov] There is no contradiction here. On the contrary, 
the committee is supposed to find civilized ways of establishing 
cooperation within the CIS for progress in integration, but most 
deputies do not even acknowledge the CIS as an entity worthy of 
consideration. They are not concerned about these matters and do 
not feel that they warrant attention. They prefer simple 
solutions--either economic pressure or the use of force in some 
form. They are acting according to Zhirinovskiy's logic: "They 
will crawl to us on their knees and beg to become Russian 
provinces." 
  [OBSHCHAYA GAZETA] Will the recent decisions of the Brussels 
session of the NATO Council influence the leaders of the Baltic 
states to give up their plans to join this military bloc? 
  [Igrunov] No, they will continue to seek membership. The 
experience of recent years has shown that, despite the West's 
cautious stance, the persistence of the Baltic countries has 
always brought them success. Apparently, the leaders of those 
states are now hoping for the exacerbation of the situation in 
Russia, which could change the NATO stance. 
  [OBSHCHAYA GAZETA] Which are the problems that could 
escalate 
tension in the near future? 
  [Igrunov] One example is the military transit traffic 
through 
Lithuania to Kaliningrad Oblast, which is still part of Russia's 
territory and one of its main military bases. Any attempt to 
limit this traffic could evoke a regrettable response. 
Furthermore, there is a Lithuanian minority living in 
Kaliningrad Oblast. This ethnic minority has assimilated well 
and has not displayed any particular interest in its historical 
roots, but it still might be exploited for the escalation of 
tension. 
  [OBSHCHAYA GAZETA] Are you saying, in other words, that 
difficulties can be anticipated primarily in relations with 
Lithuania? 
  [Igrunov] No, they are more likely to occur in relations 
with 
Latvia and Estonia. In my opinion, this will be caused primarily 
by the deterioration of economic conditions. Russia is unlikely 
to continue allowing the free re-export of its nonferrous metals 
and fuel through the Baltic countries. These operations are now 
being conducted with the active participation of the 
Russian-speaking population there; the restriction of the 
re-export operations could have an adverse effect on this 
minority's economic status and cause ethnic and cultural 
conflicts. 
  Besides this, there is the extremely acute problem of the 
civil rights of our fellow countrymen. Latvian and Estonian 
politicians are trying to exploit the tension resulting from 
Zhirinovskiy's victory. A third of the Russian-speaking 
population in Latvia will be ineligible to vote in local 
government elections. There is little difference between this 
and the situation that existed in South Africa until recently. A 
legislative bill on the prosecution of individuals who were 
engaged in anti-Estonian activity during the years of Soviet 
occupation is being deliberated in Estonia. According to this 
document, the laws of the Estonian Republic remained in force 
during the whole period when Estonia was part of the Soviet 
Union, and all of the people who violated these laws are 
criminals and should be punished. It is true that there have 
been verbal stipulations that these legal standards were not 
completely in force at that time, but this does create the 
possibility of judicial proceedings against any individual who 
lived in Estonia during the Soviet era. Most of the 
Russian-speaking population did not even know anything about 
these laws. Obviously, the new law--if it is passed--will be 
enforced selectively--on ethnic grounds. There are already some 
suggestions of this. 
  Relations with the Russian-speaking population have been 
relatively calm to date in Lithuania (just as, incidentally, 
recent relations with the Polish minority). This could continue 
if A. Brazauskas' economic policies do not fail. In all other 
respects, Lithuania will be extremely active and is most likely 
to be more persistent than the others in seeking NATO 
membership. Nevertheless, if the Russian Government and 
parliament behave prudently, Lithuania could serve as a bridge 
to the two other Baltic states for the improvement of relations 
with them. 
  [OBSHCHAYA GAZETA] Do you feel that Russian policy toward 
the 
new independent states is acquiring new aims? 
  [Igrunov] Patriotic aims are unavoidable in Russian policy. 
In my opinion, Zhirinovskiy is not simply a Russian problem, but 
a global one. Look at what is happening in Germany or the United 
States. We can only wonder whether European civilization is 
capable of a reasonable response to its own challenge. If we 
view the matter from this vantage point, Zhirinovskiy is a 
permanent factor, and not a temporary one, in our policy. The 
alternative is politicians like Luzhkov, and not the democrats. 
We are running out of time, we will have to make our move soon, 
and now we must decide how we can preserve our own values in 
this situation. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42760 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94041" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> LITHUANIA </F>
<H3> <TI>   Ministers Assess 1993 Political, Economic Achievements </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0616A Vilnius LITAS in Lithuanian 4 Jan 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0616A </F>
<F P=104>  Vilnius LITAS </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Lithuanian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Jonas Bagdanskis: "Five Ministers' New Year's </F>
Soliloquies"] 
  [Text] Viktoras Baublys, press representative for the 
government leadership, organized a New Year's Eve reception for 
journalists with no fewer than five ministers. Finance minister 
Eduardas Vilkelis, who is currently acting prime minister, 
interior minister Romasis Vaitekunas, health minister Jurgis 
Bredikis, agriculture minister Rimantas Karazija, and social 
security minister Mindaugas Stankevicius attended the press 
conference. Each of the high government officials stressed what 
had been accomplished in the past year at the ministry he 
headed; none of them either censured themselves or boasted of 
their accomplishments. 
  Summing up the results of the past year's economic-financial 
activity, Vilkelis indicated that the government budget had 
gotten more than 800 million litas in supplementary revenue. The 
minister noted that there had been fully nine increases in the 
salaries and pensions of workers at budgetary institutions. 
About 350 million litas from supplementary budget income was 
included in the funds used for these payments. Local 
governments, which are experiencing difficulties, also received 
supplementary aid. 
  According to the minister, this year's national budget will 
be even more "stretched". At year's end, inflation is supposed 
to be about 10 percent, but it might be higher. In planning 
budget outlays, the government leadership was forced by the 
Seimas to forego certain investments and agreed to allocate more 
funds for social welfare requirements. However, this does not 
mean that economic entities will have to do without financial 
aid. Aid will be provided through commercial banks, using 
credits allocated to Lithuania by international financial 
organizations and foreign countries. Vilkelis said that there 
would be more such sources of credit than last year, when some 
of these sources had to be tapped to cover the country's debts 
for energy resources. So this year there would be more favorable 
conditions for developing private business, and there should be 
no difficulty in getting these credits because the government 
leadership plans to relinquish its role of distributing them. 
  R. Vaitekunas, who has worked for almost three decades for 
law protection entities, said that this past year had been the 
most difficult of all, and it was as if he had had absolutely no 
personal life. The minister felt the heavy burden of 
responsibility towards the people who had selected him for this 
post. In his words, it was only in midsummer that interior 
ministry agencies had gotten in step and had started to work 
normally. This happened not because the people themselves had 
changed, but rather because there was a change in the way in 
which the government and other national institutions viewed the 
structures of interior ministry agencies and their work. There 
was agreement with the assertion that the greatest danger to the 
country was coming from within, from the criminal world. Because 
of this, the interior ministry received fundamental material 
assistance, and at the same time it also undertook to influence 
improvements in the system of law and order. This enabled it to 
leave its "state of weightlessness", recognize its strength, 
gain greater trust, and achieve results that are already 
tangible. 
  Leaving it up to the Lithuanian people to assess the work of 
the interior ministry, the minister said that in starting the 
new year--unlike last year--"we already know where to go and how 
to get there." The basic structures needed for the battle with 
organized crime have been created, and they will be constantly 
strengthened. A department staffed by solid academic experts and 
other specialists has been established at the ministry to draft 
laws, and the ministry's collaboration with foreign interior 
ministries has been expanded. Last year, treaties of cooperation 
were signed with the interior ministries of Russia and some 
other eastern countries, and this year, similar treaties are 
expected to be signed with counterpart ministries in Germany, 
France, and other western countries. The minister was also 
pleased that matters relating to the technical outfitting of the 
interior ministry were being handled successfully. 
  "I took over a very neglected health ministry, and 
unfortunately the standpoint of other governmental institutions 
on health security is not yet what it should be," minister J. 
Bredikis said. Nevertheless, the ministry is being gradually 
reorganized. The bureau of health security reform that has been 
created indicates that the entire system will continue to change 
fundamentally. Several international organizations will also 
earmark substantial funds for this in the new year. The minister 
maintained that the activities of health insurance plans would 
be substantially expanded this year already, as the foundations 
of insurance-based medicine are created. With the assistance of 
foreign experts, a well-functioning system for providing drugs 
and medications is also supposed to be set up this year. The 
leadership of the ministry clarified the ways in which other 
assistance received from abroad would be used. Important 
agreements for cooperation have been made with colleagues 
abroad; some of these agreements are already being implemented. 
For example, nurses are being retrained in Denmark. The Swedes 
are providing a sizable amount of financial aid in implementing 
certain projects. Thanks to assistance from foreign countries, 
Lithuania's medical professionals are performing in Lithuania 
joint transplants, orthopedic operations, eye operations, and 
other very complex operations for which patients previously had 
to be sent abroad. The minister noted that we should also be 
thankful to many charitable organizations in western countries, 
whose assistance in treating children sick with leukemia, 
performing kidney transplants and other operations is simply 
priceless. Knowing that there is a great shortage in our 
country's budget of funds needed to provide medical care, and 
knowing that we will not have the amount of necessary funding 
for a long time yet, the minister urges everyone to conserve 
their strength and the health which they inherited from their 
parents. 
  Despite the many and well-known troubles of rural Lithuania, 
R. Karazija tried to persuade us that there were also some 
changes for the better. First of all, the current Lithuanian 
leadership is trying to make land reform a controllable process. 
Not only was land reform not stalled at mid-year, as some are 
trying to assert, but, to the contrary, it is continuing to pick 
up speed, following amendments to the laws regulating land 
reform and restoration of property, the adoption of decrees on 
the price of land and its rent, and the preparation of other 
legal acts. Last year, land was returned to more than 33,000 
owners, and the number of farmers already totals approximately 
110,000. When they were polled, 19 percent indicated a 
determination to continue farming and 24 percent will try to 
continue living in rural areas. The minister said that we can 
only be pleased that the rural countryside will really not 
become deserted and that the production of agricultural output 
will be expanded. He believes that the mechanism of the land 
market will be regulated legally at the beginning of this year, 
and this will create the conditions for the establishment of 
large-size commodity farms. And we would now have fewer 
difficulties with respect to food products if we hadn't gotten 
tangled up with mutual reimbursements and if the futile 
experiment to regulate prices through administrative measures 
had not been tried. In addition to dealing with the 
aforementioned problems, the new year will see the attempt to 
accelerate cooperative processes for agricultural output and to 
modernize the processing industry enterprises that are being 
privatized. Farmers, too, are expected to be among the 
shareholders of these processing enterprises. In an attempt to 
create more favorable conditions for the farmers to cover 
production expenses, the minister expects substantial increases 
in the purchase prices for produced output. This year, for 
example, plans call for the purchase of about 500,000 tons of 
grain at prices which are at about 80 percent of world prices. 
While increasing the purchase prices, ways will have to be found 
to increase the use of local agricultural products. It is 
thought that higher salaries and other earnings will have a 
positive effect in this regard. In addition, after signing a 
free trade agreement with the European Union, a portion of 
agricultural production will be able to be exported in 
accordance with established quotas. 
  Minister M. Stankevicius noted, that there had after all 
been 
success in 1993 in halting the fall of the inhabitants' real 
income and he considers this to be a significant achievement of 
the current government. Last year, prices rose by a factor of 
2.7, whereas wages rose by a factor of 2.9, and pensions by a 
factor of 3.0. Although they might be small, real wages rose by 
approximately 5 percent. 
  The minister reminded us that we have about 350,000-400,000 
people who need social assistance. They should be supported and 
aid will be given to such people. The most important thing, 
however, is to create the conditions for them to earn money for 
themselves. The efforts of the ministry will be oriented towards 
this goal in the new year. Another important direction for the 
ministry's efforts will be to strengthen local wardship and 
guardianship centers. More people are now working at these 
facilities, which are computerized and have the task of 
accurately identifying the people who truly need and require 
government wardship. 
  The minister informed us that a draft law on pensions has 
already been prepared. When it goes into effect, we will 
apparently retire to our "well-deserved rest" a few years later 
than we previously did. The minister thinks that the law will go 
into effect in the year 2000. But things could also turn out 
differently. And the biggest worries at present, according to 
the minister, are the small salaries for the workers at the 
budgetary institutions, which the government is going to try to 
raise to the level of the average inhabitant's income. Another 
big problem is unemployment. We will not solve it easily. M. 
Stankevicius believes that some people are unnecessarily 
reconciling themselves to the loss of their jobs and are 
avoiding retraining. He assured us that there were jobs and 
professions where there was a shortage of people. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42761 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94042" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Human Rights Violations Against Ethnic Russians in Estonia, Latvia </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0644A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 21 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0644A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Abdulakh Mikitayev, chairman of the Commission </F>
on Citizenship Issues under the President of the Russian 
Federation, and Eduard Nekhay, expert with the Citizenship 
Issues Department of the Administration of the President of the 
Russian Federation, under the rubric "Carte Blanche": "The 
Development of Institutions of Citizenship Continues: But Latvia 
and Estonia Are Not Fulfilling Undertaken Obligations"] 
  [Text] In 1991 we witnessed the disintegration of the USSR 
and the formation of a number of new independent states, which 
became full-fledged members of the world community. Having 
proclaimed their sovereignty, they among other things assumed a 
heavy burden of responsibility: New independent states 
encountered the need to deal with the difficult task of building 
their statehood in keeping with the principles of democracy. 
  The institution of citizenship as one of inalienable 
attributes of a state represents a stable legal connection 
between the individual and the state, which is expressed in the 
totality of their mutual rights and responsibilities and is used 
for determining the relationship between a citizen and "his 
state," between a citizen and a foreign state, and between a 
foreign state and this particular citizen's state. 
  In essence the institution of citizenship is closely tied to 
human rights, and refusing to grant citizenship leads to 
negative consequences both in this area and in other, no less 
important, ones. First of all, this infringes on such 
inalienable rights as the right to vote, the right of free 
movement (traveling abroad is impossible without properly 
formalized documents, in order to receive which, in turn, it is 
necessary to establish that one belongs to a certain state), and 
some social rights and freedoms. In addition, a state cannot 
extend diplomatic protection to persons who are not its citizens. 
  Persons without citizenship residing in a state create an 
extremely undesirable situation when the question arises as to 
which state bears responsibility for such a person traveling 
abroad, or to the territory of which state he may return when 
necessary. It may also be a potential source of an international 
conflict. Forty years ago such arguments brought into existence 
the 1954 International Convention on the Status of Stateless 
Persons, which defines the basic rights and responsibilities of 
persons not considered by a state within its legal framework as 
citizens. 
  International law traditionally applies a norm that 
envisages 
that every state has the right to decide which persons are and 
are not citizens. This norm is codified in a convention produced 
as long ago as 1930 in the Hague. 
  According to Article 1 of this convention, each state, in 
accordance with its laws, has the right to determine who may be 
a citizen. Regardless of this, however, it should be noted that 
the state bears responsibility for not increasing the number of 
stateless persons living on its territory. This is confirmed by 
Article 4 of the same convention, in which another principle of 
international law is enunciated, which limits the sovereignty of 
states with respect to the issue of citizenship: "Citizenship 
laws are recognized by other states to the extent that they 
correspond to international conventions, international customs, 
and the commonly accepted principles of law with respect to 
citizenship." 
  Finally, Article 15 of the Universal Declaration of Human 
Rights of 1948 sets forth: "Each person has a right to 
citizenship. No one may be arbitrarily deprived of citizenship 
or the right to change his citizenship." 
  In the opinion of some scholars and specialists in the area 
of citizenship, the provisions of this article may not serve as 
a decisive argument in favor of limiting the sovereignty of 
states with respect to issues of citizenship, since they do not 
mention which state precisely must grant citizenship. 
Nevertheless, in most instances it is possible to identify such 
states by taking into account the principle of a stable 
association between the person and one or another state. This 
argument is particularly topical in the case of disintegration 
of the USSR and, in particular, as applied to the policy 
conducted by Estonia and Latvia with respect to ethnic Russians 
living on their territory. 
  A change in sovereignty of one or another territory as a 
rule 
affects the citizenship of persons living within its 
boundaries--in other words, results in loss of such. This 
immediately brings up the issue of acquiring the citizenship of 
a state that has been formed in place of the "old one" by the 
persons who live in it. 
  The principle of stable association in this case assumes 
that 
the state formed on this territory has an obligation, in 
accordance with customary international law, to grant 
citizenship to all permanent residents of this territory, with 
the exception of citizens of third countries. 
  Nevertheless, the Russian-speaking population living in 
Estonia and Latvia has fallen into the category of foreigners 
who are de facto persons without citizenship. Part 3 of Article 
20 of the Estonian Republic law on foreigners (1993) says 
directly: "A foreigner who has resided in Estonia since before 1 
July 1990 and continues to live in Estonia, resides in Estonia 
on the basis of a permanent residence permit of the former 
Estonian SSR until he receives permanent resident status, but 
for not more than two years from the moment this law goes into 
effect." 
  Moreover, in 1991 Russia signed agreements "On the 
Foundations of Interstate Relations" with Latvia and Estonia, in 
which the states take upon themselves the obligation to 
guarantee those living on their territory the right to preserve 
or obtain citizenship of one of the parties to the agreement in 
accordance with the freely expressed will of these persons. 
  By conducting a policy of discrimination against ethnic 
Russians, Estonia and Latvia are thereby grossly violating not 
only generally accepted principles of international law and 
international agreements, but also the principles codified in 
their own constitutions, namely, the primacy of international 
law over domestic legislation. 
  One of the positive examples of a solution to this problem 
was the signing on 23 December 1993 of an agreement between 
Russia and Turkmenistan, which represents an important step 
forward on the road of the development of the institutions of 
citizenship in the newly independent states. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42762 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94043" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> BALTIC STATES </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Surplus Road Machinery From Sweden </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94EN0194Z Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER in Swedish 11 Jan 94 p 10 </F>
<F P=103> 94EN0194Z </F>
<F P=104>  Stockholm DAGENS NYHETER </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Swedish </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Road Machinery for Baltic States"] </F>
  [Text] (TT)--The government is recommending that the 
National Road Administration send surplus equipment to the 
Baltic states. 
  One result of that agency's reorganization was to make 
certain road machines and trucks superfluous. 
  The National Road Administration is selling off its surplus, 
but there is no demand for some of its older equipment. There is 
, however, a serious lack of that kind of equipment in the 
Baltic states. The government therefore considers it reasonable 
that the National Road Administration should send its unsalable 
older equipment over there. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42763 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> COMMONWEALTH AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     CIS Interstate Machine-Building Council Created </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0421A Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA in Russian 1 Feb 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0421A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Georgiy Dolzhenko, RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA </F>
correspondent: "Talk Will Get You to Kiev, If It Is Talk of 
Cooperation"] 
  [Text] Kiev--Without waiting for politicians to begin to 
correct the aftereffects of the "divorce" of the republics of 
the former Union, the managers of the ministries and departments 
of machine-building of the CIS countries who assembled in Kiev 
created an interstate council that is supposed to coordinate and 
direct the cooperation of the separated enterprises. 
  It is operating on the principles of full voluntariness and 
collegiality. Groups of experts of each of the countries are 
preparing questions which will be submitted later for the 
consideration of the members of the council that assembles each 
time in one of the founder-countries. Four such meetings have 
already been held--in Tashkent, Moscow, Minsk, and Kiev. At the 
last one, the Kiev meeting, a resolution was passed on the 
organization of a permanently operating secretariat of the 
council. 
  Numerous urgent questions have piled up. The council members 
were instructed to complete the development of lists of 
organizations and joint-stock companies involved in the 
conclusion of bilateral treaties. The development of 
multilateral agreements is considered unsuitable. It was 
proposed to continue the extension of credits of accounts for 
mutual supplies, the exemption of machine-building enterprises 
from customs duties, the allocation of quotas, and the issuance 
of licenses. To reinforce mutual relations and simplify 
settlements it was decided to begin joint conversion to 
joint-stock companies of related enterprises and establish joint 
enterprises and joint-stock companies, transnational 
financial-industrial groups, and other types of joint economic 
activity. Without putting the matter off indefinitely, Belarus 
signed a treaty on bilateral cooperation with Georgia, Moldova, 
Tajikistan, and Ukraine; Georgia--with Tajikistan and Ukraine; 
and Ukraine--with Moldova, Russia, and Tajikistan. 
  The next important decision was the adoption of a long-term 
program of joint investment and support of capacities in the 
most important types of products. Joint investment will be 
conducted by means of the creation of enterprises with shared or 
joint forms of ownership. Such treaties between the Goskomprom 
[State Committee for Industry] of Belarus and Roskommash 
[Russian Federation Committee on Machine Building] were signed 
for five installations: the Tver machine-building plant AO 
[joint-stock company], the Altayvagonmash AO, the Demikhovo 
machine-building plant AO, the Minsk engine plant, and the Minsk 
tractor plant, and between the Ministry of Industry of 
Kazakhstan and Roskommash for four installations, between the 
Radioelektrontekhpribor concern of Uzbekistan and Roskommash for 
the Vostoklift enterprise. Unfortunately, Ukraine has rejected 
joint investments. It has no money. For the same reason, Ukraine 
did not contribute resources to the charter fund of the 
International Bank of Machine-Building Development MBM-Bank, 
though fully supporting the idea of its creation. It will 
significantly speed up the movement of payments and will promote 
purposeful investment and credit extension. In a word, payments 
to the charter fund were made only by Russia, Moldova, and 
Tajikistan--30 million rubles [R] each. The others either do not 
have the resources or the legislative basis is lagging. 
  It must be said that the last factor was a dissonance in the 
activity of the council. For example, because of this there was 
a delay of two months in the preparation of founding documents 
and state registration of the transnational joint-stock company 
on the basis of the UralAZ [Ural Automobile Plant] AO and the 
Kustanayskiy diesel plant. An agreement was reached to prepare a 
proposal in the governments of the states in the first half year 
about making refinements and additions in them, taking into 
account the convergence of legislative principles and the 
formation of an integrated investment space. 
  The first months of work of the council once again confirmed 
an old truth: It is always simpler to destroy than to create. 
Revival of the market space and integration within the framework 
of the CIS is proceeding slowly, at times painfully. This is 
associated first and foremost with the fear of a return to the 
former relations, and it is also associated among machine 
builders with the work that has been started in the republics on 
national programs for the structural restructuring of the 
economy. However, V. Lyashchev, deputy minister of 
machine-building of the VPK [military-industrial complex] and 
conversion in Ukraine, noted that neither one nor the other 
should be feared. Already today the council is viewed as a 
former CEMA, in its similarity, and relations are being built 
between the council's member states. 
  Much has been said about the creation of a machine builders' 
newspaper of council member states. But why engender a new 
publication, it was heard in debates, when there is a newspaper 
that fits the profile and is published in all the CIS 
countries--RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA. It could put out supplements, 
special issues, and enclosures for machine builders, would help 
them join other related branches of industry, and this would be 
cheaper, simpler, and with a high level of professionalism. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42764 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> COMMONWEALTH AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Tashkent Businessmen's Meeting Calls for CIS Coordination </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0421B Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA in Russian 1 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0421B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Tashkent Memorandum of International Congress of </F>
Industrialists and Entrepreneurs": "From Economic Slump to 
Stabilization of the Economy"] 
  [Text] The participants of the sixth meeting of the Council 
of the International Congress of Industrialists and 
Entrepreneurs, which assembled in Tashkent, the capital of the 
Republic of Uzbekistan, to consider the prospects and mechanisms 
of economic integration, believe that the greatest event in 
recent times was the decision of the CIS states to create an 
economic union. This qualitatively new step in international 
relations opens up the real possibility for the Commonwealth 
states to move away from economic slump toward stabilization of 
the economy under market conditions. This opportunity must not 
be missed, as has occurred more than once. 
  Unifying processes are supreme and predominant in the modern 
world. New economic associations are arising on practically all 
continents. An integral economic space of countries of Central 
Asia is being formed. The Maastricht agreements are establishing 
a higher level of integration of the Common Market in Europe. A 
break in economic relations between our countries not only 
weakens their position in the world, not only impacts on the 
destinies of the people, creating the threat of degradation for 
new generations, but also contradicts world trends. 
  Constructive calls for peace, harmony, and cooperation have 
been heard from Tashkent more than once. Now, heading toward the 
turn of the 21st century, the industrialists and entrepreneurs 
who have assembled in this city, who united two years ago in the 
International Congress, perceive with satisfaction both the 
Moscow and Ashgabad (1993) agreements of the heads of states and 
governments of the CIS countries concerning the creation of an 
Economic Union, and firmly declare the intention to create a new 
economic community step by step. 
  It is perfectly obvious that the Treaty on Creation of an 
Economic Union denotes only the first stage of long-term and 
multifarious work. Its effectiveness will in many ways be 
determined by the quality of the mechanisms of the Economic 
Union that are created and the actions of all the participants 
in their implementation. The role of effective interaction with 
the states and interstate organs of associations of 
industrialists and entrepreneurs will be exceptionally great in 
these processes. However, frequently there is no desire to 
listen to them, or they are simply ignored. 
  The direct participation of industrialists and entrepreneurs 
in the activities of the structures of the Economic Union that 
are being formed would make it possible in a timely way to 
coordinate decisions being made with the interests of the main 
subjects of economic management--enterprises and organizations. 
  National associations-participants of the International 
Congress of Industrialists and Entrepreneurs will actively 
promote setting up civilized trade and forming a customs union, 
a common commodity market, services, capital, and manpower for 
the development of a mutually interrelated investment policy and 
cooperation in the field of investment activity. 
  The paramount tasks are normalization of monetary and 
settlement relations, consistent movement toward a currency 
(monetary) union, organization of direct relations between 
product producers, commercial and banking structures, and 
development of production cooperation. 
  The Council of the International Congress of Industrialists 
and Entrepreneurs appeals to the heads of states and parliaments 
that are members of the Economic Union not to delay ratification 
of the signed treaty and to complete it in accordance with 
existing constitutional norms by mid-1994. This will give a new 
impetus to the intensification of economic reform and will 
promote the acceleration of industrial production, the 
stabilization and development of other vitally important 
branches of the economy, and, on this basis, the strengthening 
of the sovereignty of each state. 
  The emergence of a new nucleus of Eurasian economic 
integration will stimulate the revival of economic relations 
among the states of Central and East Europe, the Baltics, and 
other countries, and responds to the basic interests of their 
industrialists and entrepreneurs, and of all people. 
  Today the foundations of a unique economic community are 
being laid at the juncture of Europe and Asia. The realization 
of opportunities--this is the call of the times, the true path 
to the formation of the economy of the 21st century that will 
ensure for our countries and people peaceful development and 
well-being and a suitable life for future generations. 
  The Tashkent forum of business people is for real 
integration 
processes and mutually beneficial cooperation! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42765 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> COMMONWEALTH AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     CIS Socioeconomic Statistics for Jan-Nov 1993 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0390A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian 10-16 Jan 94 pp 16-17 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0390A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Economic statistics report by the Statistics Committee of </F>
the Commonwealth of Independent States: "Economics of the 
Commonwealth of Independent States for January-November 1993"] 
  [Text] The change in main socioeconomic indices of 
countries of the Commonwealth observed in January-November of 
last year as compared with the same period of the previous year 
is characterized by the following: 


                    January-November 1993 as percentage of January-November 1992 level 

                    Net           Total industrial     Wholesale      Monetary income   Monetary          Retail commodity 
                    material      production volume    price index    of the            expenditures of   turnover (in 
                    product (in   (in comparable       of             population        the population    comparable 
                    comparable    prices)              industrial                       for goods and     prices) 
                    prices)                            enterprises                      services 

Azerbaijan          88.3          92.7                 1,176          884.4             548.7             50.7 

Armenia             76.5          70.0                 879            855.9[.sup]1[/]    458.2[.sup]1[/]    58.3 

Belarus             89            87.2                 2,147          1,305.0           1,206.7           87.0 

Kazakhstan          82.5          85.0                 1,444          1,056[.sup]1[/]    849.0[.sup]1[/]    80.7 

Kyrgyzstan          83.5          74.9                 920            657.7             553.9             81.2 

Moldova             ...           107.8[.sup]2[/]/89    1,116          848.1             789               74.0 

Russia              87            83.7                 991            1,099.7           1,049.0           101.2[.sup] 3[/] 

Tajikistan          ...           79.7                 1,127          1,028.1           899.1             85.2 

Turkmenistan        ...           107.6                1,670          1,715.6           1,103.2           76.5 

Uzbekistan          97.3          103.4[.sup]2[/]/93    1,221          1,069.7           1,042.3           122.0 

Ukraine[.sup]4[/]    87.0          85-90                ...            ...               ...               71.8 

Average             87.4          85.3                 1,107          11-fold           10.4-fold         95.1 
throughout the 
Commonwealth 

[.sup]1[/] January-October. 

[.sup]2[/] First figure proceeds from enterprise reports on production output in cost terms; second figure proceeds from an 
estimate based on production data for basic production varieties in physical terms. 

[.sup]3[/] Including commodity turnover of unregistered enterprises and the sale of products by private individuals in free 
trade. For officially registered trade enterprises, this figure is 99.6 percent. 

[.sup]4[/] Here and henceforth--data according to estimates and bilateral exchange of information. 


  The foreign trade turnover of states of the Commonwealth 
(not 
including trade transactions among themselves) in 
January-November 1993 amounted to $80.3 billion in current 
prices. This is 7 percent less than the level for the same 
period of 1992. The volume of exports increased by 7 percent, 
while imports decreased by 22 percent. The balance with respect 
to export and import operations of states of the Commonwealth in 
January-November was positive in the amount of $15.5 billion. 
  The number of unemployed persons who applied to the 
employment service seeking work exceeded 1.6 million on the 
whole throughout the Commonwealth as of the end of November. 
This is 2.4 times greater than the need for workers as stated to 
employment services. 
  For every vacant job position in Azerbaijan, there were four 
persons unemployed, as opposed to 3.4 in January. In Armenia 
these figures were 53 and 75, respectively. In Belarus, they 
were four and 1.5; in Kyrgyzstan, 2.4 and 1.3; in Moldova, 22 
and 18; in Russia, 2.7 and 3.4; and in Tajikistan, six and 33. 
  The number of persons out of work and registered with the 
employment services amounted to 1.1 million as of the end of 
November, or over 70 percent of the unemployed population (this 
figure for the end of January was 0.9 million, or 61 percent). 
The dynamics of persons out of work in countries of the 
Commonwealth in 1993 is shown below (as of the end of the 
reporting period, numbers of individuals): 


               First       Second      Third       October     November 
               quarter     quarter     quarter 

Azerbaijan     7,700       6,700       19,100      18,800      18,900 

Armenia        76,700      87,600      95,900      98,600      100,700 

Belarus        52,800      54,900      63,400      65,800      67,300 

Kazakhstan     39,300      37,600      37,200      39,100      39,800 

Kyrgyzstan     2,400       2,700       2,800       3,200       3,100 

Moldova        12,800      9,800       10,400      10,800      11,000 

Russia         730,000     717,100     706,000     728,400     779,200 

Tajikistan     9,700       11,700      16,500      18,000      20,500 

Uzbekistan     14,900      15,100      14,400      14,100      13,500 

Ukraine        79,500      73,300      78,700      79,500      80,500 


  The most significant proportion of people out of work is 
attributable to workers laid off from enterprises and 
organizations: Their share as of the beginning of October 
constituted 56 percent in Kyrgyzstan, 49 percent in Moldova, and 
28 percent in Russia. One out of every five persons out of work 
is a rural resident. Young people account for 55 percent of the 
total in Kazakhstan, 30 percent in Kyrgyzstan, and 37 percent in 
Russia. The share of individuals receiving unemployment 
compensation fluctuates from 24 percent in Azerbaijan to 64 
percent in Russia. 
<H5>  Industry </H5>
  In January-November 1993, the total volume of industrial 
production throughout countries of the Commonwealth decreased by 
14.7 percent from the level of the same period of 1992. 
  The change in production of consumer goods in 
January-November 1993 as compared with the level for the same 
period of 1992 for states of the Commonwealth is characterized 
by the following data (in percentages): 


                     Consumer    Including: 
                     products 

                                 Food        All         Nonfood     Nonfood 
                                 products    nonfood     products    products 
                                             products    of light    for 
                                                         industry    cultural, 
                                                                     domestic, 
                                                                     and 
                                                                     household 
                                                                     use 

Azerbaijan           90          94          96          93          98 

Armenia              73          52          78          85          75 

Belarus              96          90          99          98          99 

Kazakhstan           85          83          90          90          89 

Kyrgyzstan           80          76          86          93          75 

Moldova              88          82          96          103         90 

Russia               89          89          90          79          93 

Tajikistan           89          94          87          86          89 

Turkmenistan         99.2        97          106         113         78 

Uzbekistan           112         108         116         115         119 

Ukraine              83          84          79          75          81 
(January-October) 

Average across the   90          89          90          86          94 
Commonwealth 


  The output of foodstuffs diminished. Industrial output of 
meat in Kazakhstan and Uzbekistan was 10 percent less than in 
January-November 1992; in Russia and Belarus, 16-18 percent 
less; Moldova, 38 percent less. Whole milk output in Russia 
decreased by 16 percent; in Kazakhstan, by 34 percent; and in 
Kyrgyzstan, by 41 percent. In most of the Commonwealth 
countries, production of vegetable oil was reduced, as was that 
of fish as an edible commodity, flour, macaroni products, and 
cereals. 
  A reduction was seen in the production output of the main 
light industry varieties. A 25 percent reduction, on the 
average, was seen in the production of fabric of all varieties 
and footwear in the Commonwealth, as compared with 
January-November of last year. Production of fabric in Russia 
decreased by 29 percent; production of footwear in Russia, 
Kazakhstan, and Kyrgyzstan decreased by 29-32 percent. 
  In a number of states, the output of major varieties of 
major 
home appliances has exceeded the level for the same period of 
last year. Production of television sets, refrigerators, and 
freezers in Russia grew by 10-11 percent over this period. The 
output of washing machines in Uzbekistan increased by 25 
percent; in Moldova, by 21 percent; and in Belarus, by 15 
percent. In Kazakhstan, production of tape recorders increased 
by 13 percent. In Moldova, the output of refrigerators and 
freezers grew by 9 percent. At the same time, the production of 
certain varieties of these items decreased as compared with the 
level of January-November 1992. In Belarus, the output of tape 
recorders decreased by 34 percent, of television sets--by 25 
percent; in Kazakhstan, production of washing machines decreased 
by 26 percent; in Russia, output of tape recorders decreased by 
18 percent, and of radios and radio equipment--by 28 percent. 
  Generation of electric power in January-November decreased 
by 
6 percent on the average across the Commonwealth as compared 
with the same period of 1992. Production of electric power by 
individual states of the Commonwealth in January-November 1993 
is characterized by the following data: 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |Billions of kilowatt-hou-|Percentage of January-No-| 
|                         |rs                       |vember 1992 level        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Azerbaijan               |17.1                     |96                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Armenia                  |5.7                      |70                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Belarus                  |30.1                     |89                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Kazakhstan               |69.0                     |93                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Kyrgyzstan               |9.8                      |92                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Moldova                  |...                      |...                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Russia                   |820                      |95                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Tajikistan               |16.4                     |105                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Turkmenistan             |11.2                     |94                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Uzbekistan               |44.3                     |96                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Ukraine (January-October)|188                      |92                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Coal production over the January-November period decreased 
by 
10 percent in Russia and by 12 percent in Kazakhstan, including 
reduced production of coking coal of 13 and 11 percent, 
respectively. Production of gas was 4 percent lower than the 
level for the same period of last year in Russia, while this was 
5 percent higher in Uzbekistan. Production of gas in 
Turkmenistan increased significantly--by 13 percent. This was 
the main factor determining the increase in total volume of 
industrial production in the republic. Production of oil in the 
Commonwealth diminished as compared with January-November 1992 
levels, including by 13 percent in Russia, by 10 percent in 
Kazakhstan, and by 15 percent in Turkmenistan. Production of 
motor vehicle gasoline decreased by 14 percent, diesel fuel--by 
16 percent, and furnace fuel oil--by 13 percent. The output of 
motor vehicle gasoline in Turkmenistan decreased by 22 percent, 
of diesel fuel and furnace fuel oil--by 29 percent. These 
figures for Belarus were 31, 32, and 35 percent, respectively. 
In Uzbekistan the level of production of main oil products 
increased over last year's level. 
  The output of finished rolled ferrous metals decreased by 8 
percent from the levels of the same period of last year. The 
decline in total production volume in machine building was not 
overcome. Output of metal-cutting machine tools in Kazakhstan 
decreased by 26 percent, in Russia--by 18 percent, and in 
Belarus--by 15 percent. Production of forging and pressing 
machines here decreased by 10, 55, and 67 percent, respectively. 
Production of tractors in Russia was reduced by 30 percent, in 
Uzbekistan--by 36 percent, and in Kazakhstan--by 57 percent. 
  In the chemical industry, the output of mineral fertilizers 
in Russia decreased over January-November by 21 percent, in 
Belarus--by 36 percent, and in Kazakhstan--by 66 percent. Some 
26 percent less of chemical fibers and filaments were produced 
in Russia than in January-November of last year; 25 and 23 
percent less--of soda ash and caustic soda, respectively. In 
Belarus the output of chemical fibers and filaments decreased by 
22 percent, of synthetic resins and plastics--by 23 percent. 
  The production of paper decreased across the Commonwealth by 
21 percent, as compared with the same period of 1992. 
  The production of building materials diminished. Thus, 
output 
of cement was reduced by 19 percent on the average for the 
Commonwealth, as well as for Russia; in Kazakhstan and 
Kyrgyzstan, cement output was reduced by 37-40 percent, and in 
Tajikistan--by 46 percent. 
  Intergovernmental agreements for the delivery of many 
technical and industrial production varieties for 1993 are not 
being implemented, although the volumes pertaining to the 
above-mentioned agreements are significantly reduced from 1992 
volumes. Nonfulfillment of the agreements is due to the fact 
that Commonwealth countries have introduced restrictions on 
product exports under conditions of declining production, and 
the fact that consumer enterprises are not able to make payments. 
<H5>  Agriculture </H5>
  Purchases of the main varieties of plant product output in 
states of the Commonwealth changed in 1993, as compared with the 
same period of 1992, in the following manner (in percentage of 
1992 level): 


                Grain    Sunflower    Sugar        Raw       Potatoes    Vegetables 
                         seeds        beets        cotton 
                                      (factory) 

Azerbaijan      102      -            -            105       73          75 

Armenia         37       -            -            -         375         8 

Belarus         105      -            164          -         80          91 

Kazakhstan      49       34           -            -         110         73 

Kyrgyzstan      113      -            -            79        34          25 

Moldova         147      42           48           -         200         82 

Russia          109      47           70           -         53          74 

Tajikistan      167      -            -            166       89          80 

Turkmenistan    172      -            -            104       55          72 

Uzbekistan      111      -            -            103       ...         ... 

Ukraine         128      79           113          -         78          94 

Average         99       68           96           105       66          78 
throughout 
the 
Commonwealth 


  Livestock production output at agricultural enterprises of 
states of the Commonwealth over the first 11 months of 1993 is 
characterized as follows: 


                     Meat (live weight)             Milk                           Eggs 

                     Tonnes     Percentage of       Tonnes     Percentage of       Quantity    Percentage of 
                                January-November               January-November                January-November 
                                1992 level                     1992 level                      1992 level 

Azerbaijan           47,000     69                  151,000    71                  105         44 
                                                                                   million 

Armenia              2,000      19                  5,000      44                  9 million   12 


Belarus              923,000    84                  3.425      90                  1.885       101 
                                                    million                        billion 

Kazakhstan           914,000    97                  2.348      96                  1.659       90 
(January-October)                                   million                        billion 

Kyrgyzstan 

all categories of    342,000    97                  832,000    95                  352         68 
farms                                                                              million 

including            93,000     78                  270,000    78                  140         49 
agricultural                                                                       million 
enterprises 

Moldova              119,000    71                  479,000    71                  223         56 
                                                                                   million 

Russia               6.012      86                  28.369     93                  26.313      93 
                     million                        million                        billion 

Tajikistan           33,000     75                  117,000    66                  104         45 
                                                                                   million 

Turkmenistan         79,000     110                 203,000    102                 121         79 
                                                                                   million 

Uzbekistan           202,000    91                  875,000    99.6                731         83 
                                                                                   million 

Ukraine              2.4        76                  12.2       91                  5.500       82 
                     million                        million                        billion 

Total for the        10.815     84                  48.408     92                  36.788      90 
Commonwealth         million                        million                        billion 


  In the majority of Commonwealth states, an increase is being 
seen in the proportion of livestock production output produced 
at farms run by the populace. Thus, of the total volume of meat 
output throughout the Commonwealth overall, the proportion 
produced by the populace increased from 37 percent in 1992 to 41 
percent in 1993; of milk--from 37 to 40 percent; and of 
eggs--from 33 to 34 percent. At the same time that the volume of 
livestock production purchases by procurement organizations 
decreased, livestock output sales through other channels 
increased (sales on the market, direct ties with trading 
organizations, barter transactions, and so on). 
<H5>  Construction </H5>
  The commissioning of facilities in the social sphere by 
state 
enterprises and organizations in states of the Commonwealth in 
January-November 1993 is characterized by the following: 


                       Housing,    General-education    Preschool        Hospitals,    Walk-in 
                       square      schools, student     institutions,    beds          clinics, 
                       meters of   spaces               spaces                         visits 
                       total                                                           per shift 
                       area 

Azerbaijan             451,100     9,809                1,660            475           1,940 

Armenia                187,200     7,105                690              -             - 

Belarus                1.4355      18,518               4,700            647           3,025 
                       million 

Kazakhstan             1.8196      15,783               4,170            387           1,230 
                       million 

Kyrgyzstan             54,200      6,667                280              110           - 

Moldova                120,200     1,198                720              -             200 
(January-September) 

Russia                 11.8487     159,045              24,128           6,303         17,574 
                       million 

Tajikistan             114,500     10,698               700              724           325 

Turkmenistan           370,500     27,909               4,035            902           580 

Uzbekistan             767,700     79,041               9,224            2,488         4,862 

Ukraine                4.800       64,000               13,500           1,550         4,500 
                       million 

Total for the          21.9692     399,773              63,807           13,586        34,236 
Commonwealth           million 


  Over the first 11 months of 1993, a greater volume of 
housing 
was commissioned than during the same period of the previous 
year in Armenia (by 27 percent) and Turkmenistan (by 4 percent); 
of general-education schools in Azerbaijan (by 3 percent), 
Armenia (by a factor of 2.6), Kyrgyzstan (by 68 percent), Russia 
(by 2 percent), and Uzbekistan (by 8 percent); of preschool 
institutions in Azerbaijan (by 35 percent) and Armenia (by 7 
percent); of hospitals in Belarus (by 18 percent), Russia (by 66 
percent), Turkmenistan (by a factor of 2.2), and Uzbekistan (by 
31 percent); of walk-in clinics in Azerbaijan (by a factor of 
4.2), Belarus (by 4 percent), and Turkmenistan (by a factor of 
4.3). 
<H5>  Transportation </H5>
  Less freight was shipped (loaded) by general-use rail 
transportation in January-November 1993 in all the Commonwealth 
countries than was the case during the same period of the 
previous year: 


                Freight shipped (loaded) in     1993 as percentage of 1992 
                1993, tonnes                    level 

                January-November    November    January-November    November 
                                    alone                           alone 

Azerbaijan      17.0 million        1.3         80                  78 
                                    million 

Armenia         1.0 million         0.04        38                  40 
                                    million 

Belarus         66.1 million        5.2         74                  77 
                                    million 

Kazakhstan      202.7 million       15.0        79                  70 
                                    million 

Kyrgyzstan      1.9 million         0.2         56                  60 
                                    million 

Moldova         5.6 million         0.5         65                  73 
                                    million 

Russia          1.2440 billion      100.1       82                  84 
                                    million 

Tajikistan      1.1 million         0.1         69                  51 
                                    million 

Turkmenistan    16.9 million        1.4         80                  89 
                                    million 

Uzbekistan      55.4 million        4.8         94                  116 
                                    million 

Ukraine         496.3 million       38.6        72                  71 
                                    million 

Total for the   2.108 billion       167.2       79                  79 
Commonwealth                        million 


  Coal shipments by railroad over the first 11 months were 
reduced in Kazakhstan by 14 percent and in Russia--by 12 
percent; shipments of oil and oil products were reduced in 
Belarus by 32 percent, Kazakhstan--by 29 percent, and in 
Russia--by 10 percent; of ferrous metals in Belarus--by 22 
percent, Kazakhstan--by 15 percent, and Russia--by 10 percent; 
of ferrous metal scrap in Belarus--by 20 percent, Kazakhstan--25 
percent, and Russia--21 percent; of chemical and mineral 
fertilizers in Belarus--by 32 percent, Kazakhstan--by 48 
percent, and Russia--by 25 percent; of lumber freight in 
Kazakhstan--by 49 percent, and in Russia--by 25 percent. 
  Passenger transportation turnover increased on the rail 
lines 
of Belarus, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Moldova, Russia, 
Turkmenistan, and Uzbekistan (from 4 to 14 percent). 
<H5>  Monetary Income and Expenditures of the Populace </H5>
  Monetary income and expenditures of the populace in 
January-November were as follows (in rubles): 


                     Monetary income of      Total monetary          Monetary expenditures   Monetary               Increase in monetary 
                     the populace            expenditures of the     for goods and           expenditures for       accumulation 
                                             populace                services                mandatory fees and 
                                                                                             payments 

                     1992        1993        1992        1993        1992        1993        1992       1993        1992       1993 

Azerbaijan           70.5        623.1       51.8        305.0       46.7        256.2       5.1        48.8        18.7       318.1 
                     billion     billion     billion     billion     billion     billion     billion    billion     billion    billion 

Armenia              22.0        188.4       14.3        68.9        13.0        59.6        1.3        9.3         7.7        119.5 
(January-October)    billion     billion     billion     billion     billion     billion     billion    billion     billion    billion 

Belarus              311.2       4.0616      274.9       3.4474      249.1       3.0058      25.8       441.6       36.3       614.2 
                     billion     trillion    billion     trillion    billion     trillion    billion    billion     billion    billion 

Kazakhstan           249.7       2.6368      149.0       1.4511      127.3       1.0811      21.7       370.0       100.7      1.1857 
(January-October)    billion     trillion    billion     trillion    billion     trillion    billion    billion     billion    trillion 

Kyrgyzstan, soms     214.8       1.4124      165.3       928.2       147.3       815.7       18.0       112.5       49.5       484.2 
                     million     billion     million     million     million     million     million    million     million    million 

Moldova              60.8        515.7       52.8        421.9       47.1        371.8       5.7        50.1        8.0        93.8 
                     billion     billion     billion     billion     billion     billion     billion    billion     billion    billion 

Russia               5.4458      59.8863     4.4889      46.8495     4.0205      42.1755     468.4      4.6740      956.91     3.0368 
                     trillion    trillion    trillion    trillion    trillion    trillion    billion    trillion    billion    trillion 

Tajikistan           31.0        318.4       21.8        196.2       20.0        179.6       1.8        16.6        9.2        122.2 
                     billion     billion     billion     billion     billion     billion     billion    billion     billion    billion 

Turkmenistan,        117.0       2.0072      57.4        656.4       49.5        546.1       7.9        110.3       59.6       1.3508 
manat                million     billion     million     million     million     million     million    million     million    billion 

Uzbekistan           197.0       2.1069      128.3       1.34        115.2       1.2004      13.1       139.6       68.7       766.9 
                     billion     trillion    billion     trillion    billion     trillion    billion    billion     billion    billion 

Ukraine              ...         ...         ...         ...         ...         ...         ...        ...         ...        ... 


  In all states of the Commonwealth, as compared with the same 
period of last year, the rate of growth of monetary income of 
the populace outpaced the rate of growth of expenditures for 
goods and services. Thus, monetary income over the period in 
question increased from 8.8-fold in Azerbaijan to 13-fold in 
Belarus, while expenditures for the purchase of goods and 
services varied from 5.5-fold to 12.1-fold, respectively. In 
Azerbaijan, Belarus, Kyrgyzstan, and Moldova, this was caused by 
accelerated rates of increased amounts of cash accumulated by 
the populace and correspondingly lower rates of population 
expenditures on goods and services. In Russia, the rate of 
growth of monetary income was greater than the rate of consumer 
expenditures primarily because of greater increases in the 
purchase of securities and freely convertible currency. 
  The growth of monetary accumulations in January-November in 
Moldova amounted to 18.2 percent of income, in Russia--21.8 
percent, and in Turkmenistan--67.3 percent. 
  The change in wages in nominal terms (including material 
assistance and social benefits) in January-October throughout 
the Commonwealth countries is characterized by the following 
data (average per month): 


                Rubles                        As percentage of same         October       For 
                                              period of 1992                1993 as       reference, 
                                                                            percentage    minimum 
                                                                            of            wage in 
                                                                            September     effect in 
                                                                            1993          October 

                January-October    October    January-October    October 
                1993               1993       1993               1993 

Azerbaijan      17,053             26,249     955                656        103.6         5,000 

Armenia         9,318              21,338     764                1,032      151.2         7,350 

Belarus         45,999             111,144    1,129              1,482      148.3         15,000 

Kazakhstan      44,182             106,247    1,304              1,599      132.6         14,600 

Kyrgyzstan,     67.9               127.5      859                856        113.0         32.0 
soms 

Moldova         23,376             46,239     969                1,122      110.6         7,500 

Russia          51,303             100,931    1,042              1,068      111.7         7,740 

Tajikistan      11,194             23,128     694                818        131.2         8,000 

Turkmenistan    ...                ...        ...                ...        ...           9,600 

Uzbekistan      21,317             45,979     1,199              1,169      110.2         13,500 

Ukraine,        85,603             272,396    ...                ...        122.0         20,000 
karbovantsy 


  In October 1993, the gap between average and minimum wage in 
Azerbaijan was 5.3-fold, in Armenia--2.9-fold, 
Belarus--7.4-fold, Kazakhstan--7.3-fold, Kyrgyzstan--4-fold, 
Moldova--6.2-fold, Russia--13-fold, Tajikistan--2.9-fold, 
Uzbekistan--3.4-fold, and Ukraine--13.6-fold. 
  Real wages (taking the consumer price index into account) in 
January-October 1993 dropped from the level of January-October 
1992 in Belarus by 23 percent, in Kyrgyzstan--by 28 percent, in 
Moldova--by 37 percent, and in Tajikistan--by 51 percent. In 
Russia, Kazakhstan, and Uzbekistan, the growth of wages over the 
period in question exceeded the growth of consumer prices. 
  Data concerning the rate of growth in nominal terms of 
monetary income of the populace and of consumer prices for goods 
and services (calculated based on change in the cost of the 
family consumer basket) are as follows: 


                January-October 1993 compared to January-October 1992,    Coefficient indicating how increase in 
                factor multiple                                           prices outpaced increase in: 

                Consumer    Average     Wages     Pensions    Stipends    monetary    wages    pensions    stipends 
                prices*     per         per                               income 
                            capita      worker 
                            monetary 
                            income 

Azerbaijan      ...         9.7         9.6       8.1         7.1         ...         ...      ...         ... 

Armenia         ...         8.6         7.6       7.1         ...         ...         ...      ...         ... 

Belarus         14.7        12.3        11.3      11.2        9.0         1.2         1.3      1.3         1.6 

Kazakhstan      10.9        10.6        13.0      10.7        6.7         1.0         0.8      1.0         1.6 

Kyrgyzstan      11.9        6.9         8.6       7.6         9.7         1.7         1.4      1.6         1.2 

Moldova         15.5        8.5         9.7       ...         6.8         1.8         1.6      ...         2.3 

Russia          10.0        11.1        10.4      9.5         8.5         0.9         0.96     1.1         1.2 

Tajikistan      14.2        9.6         6.9       ...         ...         1.5         2.1      ...         ... 

Turkmenistan    14.1        16.5        ...       10.2        10.4        0.9         ...      1.4         1.4 

Uzbekistan      9.0         12.4        12.0      8.3         9.8         0.7         0.7      1.1         0.9 

Ukraine         ...         ...         ...       ...         ...         ...         ...      ...         ... 


<H5>  Prices </H5>
  Prices for consumer goods continued to rise in November in 
all states of the Commonwealth. Their level in the organized 
trade network on average for the month throughout the 
Commonwealth increased by 28 percent. The increase since the 
beginning of the year (November as compared to December of last 
year) amounted to a 12.4-fold rise. On the whole for the 
11-month period, prices increased 17.2-fold as compared with the 
same period of last year. These changes in states of the 
Commonwealth are characterized as follows (in percentages): 


                      November 1993       November      January-November 
                      compared to         1993          1993 compared to 
                      October 1993        compared to   January-November 
                                          December      1992 
                                          1992 

Azerbaijan            154.6               479           1,033 

Armenia               392.5               3,003         1,016 

Belarus               149.9               1,897         1,395 

Kazakhstan            148.1               1,370         1,221 

Kyrgyzstan            118.8               963           1,262 

Moldova[.sup]1[/]      131.3               1,888         1,090 

Russia                116.4[.sup]1[/]      700*          1,019* 

Tajikistan            143.0               3,254         1,396 

Turkmenistan          468.8               5,681         1,930 

Uzbekistan            121.4               528           813 

Ukraine               139.4               3,967         3,788 

[.sup]1[/] Consumer price index for commodities 


  The maximum increase in November prices took place in 
Turkmenistan, where a 4.7-fold rise was observed over the 
October level. In this regard, the prices of food products 
increased almost 8-fold, nonfood products--2.3-fold; in Armenia 
prices increased 3.9-fold, including a 4.5-fold increase in 
prices for food products and 1,7-fold increase in nonfood 
products. 
  The prices of food products in stores of Azerbaijan almost 
doubled. Those in stores of Belarus and Kazakhstan increased 
1.5-1.6-fold, in Moldova, Tajikistan and Uzbekistan--by 
approximately one third, and in Kyrgyzstan--by 20 percent. 
  Prices of nonfood products increased by a factor of 1.5-1.6 
in Belarus and Tajikistan in November alone, and by one-third in 
Kazakhstan and Moldova. In Azerbaijan the level of prices of 
nonfood products increased by 9 percent, in Kyrgyzstan--by 18 
percent. 
  Gaps in price levels throughout states of the Commonwealth 
for certain consumer products (especially food products) 
continue to remain extremely significant. Thus, as of 30 
November, the maximum price of beef, registered in the organized 
trade network of the capitals of Commonwealth states and a few 
oblast centers of Russia, exceeded the minimum by a factor of 
5.4 (in Dushanbe--R7,330 [rubles] per kilogram, 
Volgograd--R1,368), of cooked sausage--by a factor of 6.1 (in 
Dushanbe--R9,300, Bishkek--R1,531), butter--by a factor of 3.3 
(in Minsk--R5,120, Baku--R1,560), and vegetable oil--by a factor 
of 7.6 (in Minsk--R4,580, Voronezh--R600). The difference in 
prices of milk, more recently than the above-mentioned date, was 
9.3-fold (in Yekaterinburg--R336, Dushanbe--R36), eggs--7.2-fold 
(in Tashkent--R2,300 per ten, Kazan--R320), granulated 
sugar--5.7-fold (in Yerevan--R3,000, Baku--R530), and wheat 
bread--7.6-fold (in Moscow--R454, Minsk--R60). (Prices in the 
capitals of states that shifted to national currencies are 
calculated in rubles according to the exchange rates officially 
published by national banks). 
  A quite significant increase in prices was also observed in 
November in the city markets of a number of states. As compared 
with October, the level of prices for agricultural products in 
markets of the cities of Armenia increased 10.5-fold, 
Kazakhstan--4.3-fold, Tajikistan--2.8-fold, and 
Uzbekistan--2.6-fold. In Kyrgyzstan, Azerbaijan, Moldova, 
Turkmenistan, and Ukraine, products on the markets increased in 
prices by a factor of 1.3-1.6. 
  On average throughout the CIS, prices in the markets during 
November increased 1.8-fold over October levels; the increase 
was 23.5-fold on the whole for the 11 months of 1993 as compared 
with the same period of last year. 
  Prices and rates for paid services to the populace rose 
23.2-fold in November as compared with November of 1992, and by 
37.1 percent as compared with October of 1993. The maximum 
increase in prices was observed in Turkmenistan (32-fold and by 
848 percent, respectively) and in Armenia (28.3-fold and by 80.4 
percent); the minimum was seen in Uzbekistan (12.7-fold and by 
98.5 percent) and Tajikistan (16.8-fold and by 9.9 percent). 
  Fees for child care in preschool institutions increased in 
November, as compared with November 1992, by from 7-fold in 
Armenia to 29.9-fold in Kyrgyzstan and 32-fold in Kazakhstan; as 
compared with October 1993 these fees increased by 40 percent in 
Armenia, by 70.2 percent in Kyrgyzstan, and by 25.3 percent in 
Kazakhstan. 
  The costs of sanatorium and resort facility services 
increased more than 43.9-fold in Turkmenistan as compared with 
November 1992, and 29.6-fold in Kazakhstan. The least amount of 
cost increase was observed in Kyrgyzstan--an 8.9-fold rise. 
  Housing and municipal services increased significantly in 
cost in Uzbekistan (by 522.2 percent as compared to October 1993 
and 12.4-fold as compared to November 1992), Kazakhstan (by 
207.4 percent and 22.5-fold), and Armenia (by 59.8 percent and 
33.1-fold). 
  Passenger transportation services increased in price as 
compared with November 1992 from 11.0-fold in Uzbekistan and 
15.4-fold in Tajikistan, to 33.7-fold in Turkmenistan and 
25.4-fold in Moldova. 
<H5>  Trade and Services </H5>
  The dynamics of retail commodity turnover in states of the 
Commonwealth in January-November are characterized by the 
following data: 


                   Rubles,     January-November    January-November    January-November 
                   actual      1993 as             1993 as             1993 as 
                   prices      percentage of       percentage of       percentage of 
                               January-November    January-November    January-November 
                               1992, actual        1992, comparable    1991, comparable 
                               prices              prices              prices 

Azerbaijan         194.0       524                 50.7                19.7 
                   billion 

Armenia            72.1        592                 58.3                15.9 
                   billion 

Belarus            2.6815      1,212               87.0                69.3 
                   trillion 

Kazakhstan,        3.59        1,062               80.7                49.3 
tenge              billion 

Kyrgyzstan, soms   970         876                 81.2                28.3 
                   million 

Moldova*           417.9       893                 74.0                37.1 
                   billion 

Russia[.sup]1[/]    49.8        1,030               101.2               65.9 
                   trillion 

Tajikistan         175.0       1,189               85.2                27.8 
                   billion 

Turkmenistan,      690         1,372               76.5                52.0 
manat              million 

Uzbekistan         1.1039      1,000               122.0               87.2 
                   trillion 

Ukraine,           28.1337     2,720               71.8                56.0 
karbovantsy        trillion 

[.sup]1[/] Including commodity turnover of unregistered enterprises and the sale of goods 
by private individuals in free trade, determined by the Russian State Committee for 
Statistics as amounting to R21.2 trillion, or 74 percent of the commodity turnover of 
officially registered trade enterprises 


  Over the 11 months of 1993, the volume of retail commodity 
turnover (including public kitchens) on the whole throughout the 
Commonwealth exceeded the level for the same period of the 
previous year by a factor of 9.5, in actual prices. While the 
trade mass volume, that is, commodity turnover in comparable 
prices, was 5 percent lower than in January-November of the 
previous year, and 37 percent lower than the 1991 level. 
  Stocks of consumer goods on hand as of 1 December 1993 in 
the 
organized trade network of countries of the Commonwealth could 
support trade over the course of 45 days, just as was the case 
as of the same date the previous year. In this regard, the 
supply of stocks in the trade network of Armenia decreased 
almost by a factor of 3 (from 53 days as of 1 December last year 
to 18 days), as well as in Tajikistan (from 83 days to 30 days). 
In Moldova, trade was supported by a 23-day supply; as of the 
same date in 1992--by a 39-day supply. A drop of 8-13 percent 
was observed in product supplies available to support the trade 
network in Belarus, Kazakhstan, and Ukraine. Stores on hand 
throughout Russia comprised a 46-day supply on the average, as 
opposed to a 43-day supply as of 1 December 1992. 
  Data characterizing the performance of paid services 
throughout states of the Commonwealth in January-November 1993 
are provided as follows: 


                     Rubles,       As percentage of      As percentage of 
                     actual        January-November      January-November 
                     prices        1992, actual prices   1992, comparable 
                                                         prices 

Azerbaijan           39.7          798                   53.2 
                     billion 

Armenia              19.8          808                   38.6 
                     billion 

Belarus              258.1         1,149                 69.0 
                     billion 

Kazakhstan*, tenge   490 million   1,126                 66.7 


Kyrgyzstan, soms     200 million   1,128                 54.7 


Moldova*             59.5          1,031                 60.7 
                     billion 

Russia[.sup]1[/]      4.758         1,169                 70.0 
                     trillion 

Tajikistan           19.4          720                   53.1 
                     billion 

Turkmenistan*,       60 million    1,112 
manat 

Uzbekistan           156.2         1,133                 99.8 
                     billion 

Ukraine,             2.8062        2,951                 78.8 
karbovantsy          trillion 

[.sup]1[/] Including services of unregistered enterprises and private 
individuals amounting to R1.6 trillion according to the Russian State 
Committee for Statistics, or 51 percent of the volume of services by 
officially registered enterprises in the services sphere 


  Overall throughout the Commonwealth, the volume in cost 
terms 
of paid services performed was greater than in January-November 
1992. In actual prices and rates it was 10.6 times greater, more 
than 90 percent of the volume of services being attributable to 
increased prices and rates for individual services. As a result 
of the sharp increases in cost of paid services, a significant 
reduction was seen in their demand by the population. Visits by 
citizens to enterprises engaged in providing everyday services 
decreased, and the reduction in numbers of such enterprises was 
quite noticeable. Some 39 percent fewer services (in comparable 
prices) on average throughout the Commonwealth were performed 
for the populace in November than in November 1992. On the whole 
over the 11 months, the reduction amounted to 29 percent as 
compared with the same period of 1992. 
<H5>  Crime </H5>
  Data concerning the number of registered crimes in states of 
the Commonwealth are provided as follows: 


                 January-November     January-November     January-November 
                 1992                 1993                 1993 as compared 
                                                           to 
                                                           January-November 
                                                           1992, percent 

Azerbaijan       19,843               16,110               81.2 

Armenia          14,416               11,974               83.1 

Belarus          85,554               91,454               106.9 

Georgia          20,965               18,132[.sup]1[/]      86.5 

Kazakhstan       180,937              191,794              106.0 

Kyrgyzstan       39,318               38,226               97.2 

Moldova          41,916[.sup]2[/]      42,912               102.4 

Russia           2,484,117            2,512,540            101.0 

Tajikistan       22,623               22,179               98.0 

Turkmenistan     16,418               14,385               87.6 

Uzbekistan       84,721               82,825               97.8 

Ukraine          431,508              478,633              110.9 

Total for the    3,442,336            3,521,164            102.3 
Commonwealth 

[.sup]1[/] For officially registered administrative-territorial entities 

[.sup]2[/] Does not include data for the city of Bendera 


  A slackening of the rate of growth of registered crimes was 
observed on the whole across states of the Commonwealth in 
January-November 1993. This rate increased by 8 percent during 
the first quarter of 1993 as compared with the same period of 
the previous year, by 5 percent--for the first half-year, by 3 
percent--over the period January-September, and by 2.3 
percent--for the 11 months. 
  Symbols used in tables: - phenomenon does not occur; ... 
data 
lacking (not provided); * estimate, calculation. 
  Statistics Committee of the Commonwealth of Independent 
States 
  The CIS Statistics Committee is the only disseminating 
agent of official economic statistical information on the 
socioeconomic state of the CIS and provides information service 
on a permanent basis. 
  Telephone: (095) 207-42-37, 207-46-51. Fax: (095) 
207-45-92. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42766 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> INTERSTATE AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Presidential Council Member Migranyan Assesses Policy Toward FSU </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944Q0144A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 12 Jan 94 pp 
1, 4 </F>

<F P=103> 944Q0144A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Andranik Migranyan: "Russia and the Near Abroad: </F>
Formation of a New Foreign Policy Course of the Russian 
Federation (Introductory Observations)"] 
<H5>  [12 Jan 94 pp 1, 4] </H5>
  [Text] NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA today begins publication 
of an article by Andranik Migranyan, member of the Presidential 
Council, devoted to Russia's relations with the independent 
states that have emerged in the place of the former USSR. The 
author needs no further introduction, and his article, as 
always, focused, interesting, and contentious in places, is 
essentially a concise, but fundamental outline of the problems 
and trends whose development NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA has tried to 
follow closely and for an analysis of which it has begrudged no 
space. 
  The complexity and contradictoriness of the process of the 
formation of Russian foreign policy, particularly following the 
disintegration of the USSR, are explained by a totality of 
subjective and objective factors. 
  Mention should be made primarily among the objective factors 
of the fact that the presence of a subject of international 
relations, that is, a state with its established institutions in 
a particular geopolitical space, is required for the shaping of 
foreign policy. As far as Russia is concerned, it is still in 
the process of formation of its statehood in both the 
institutional and geographical respects since its external 
borders not only were not determined in 1991, they have not yet 
been determined now either. The unity and territorial integrity 
of Russia have already been challenged by Chechnya and 
Tatarstan, and Tuva, Bashkortostan, and a number of other 
republics and regions of the Russian Federation are moving in 
this direction. 
  A second objective factor not contributing to the shaping of 
foreign policy as a whole and policy in respect to countries of 
the near abroad in particular is the analogous process of the 
incompletion of the formation of statehood in the former Soviet 
republics and the amorphous and friable nature of the 
institutional system in them. The internal fragmentation and 
imprecision of the borders of these republics have become the 
cause of innumerable interethnic and regional conflicts that 
have hit these countries since the disintegration of the Soviet 
Union. A graphic example of this is the situation in Azerbaijan 
in connection with the war in Karabakh and in Moldova on account 
of the virtual detachment of the Dniester region; Georgia and 
Tajikistan, which are rent by civil war and interethnic wars; 
and so forth. 
  Even in the republics where things have not progressed as 
far 
as armed clashes and the open defection of individual 
territories, very serious tension in terms of the ethnic and 
regional gauges is being felt. This applies both to Ukraine and 
Kazakhstan and the Baltic republics. 
  These factors in aggregate are preventing Russia from 
defining its external and internal borders. It should be 
considered that the Russian Federation was an artificial 
formation within the old Soviet Union with arbitrarily 
established administrative borders not geared to the fact that 
they might all of a sudden unexpectedly become international. 
  Since the disintegration of the USSR a paradoxical situation 
has taken shape, in which the Russian Federation has on the one 
hand found itself to be less than Russia, if it is considered 
that more than 25 million Russians are outside it, and, on the 
other, more than Russia, considering the fact that the national 
autonomies have declared themselves republics, and some are 
trying to withdraw from the Russian Federation without prior 
arrangement. 
  Thus to summarize the totality of objective factors that 
have 
complicated the process of the shaping of foreign policy, it may 
be concluded that the difficulties Russia is experiencing in 
relations with its immediate surroundings have been caused 
largely by the absence of a subject of international relations 
and the uncertainty of the borders of the Russian state, which 
have prevented the possibility of a precise and clear 
determination of Russia's neighbors, which, incidentally, are 
themselves in a similar position, determination of friends and 
enemies, and ascertainment of geopolitical interests, 
particularly in regions of the near abroad. 
  To this should be added the not inconsiderable fact that 
Russia has for many decades had no experience or traditions of 
the establishment of interstate relations with the former Union 
republics and that, as a result, Moscow has found itself without 
the personnel, traditions, and notions of Russia's interests in 
these regions. However, a role of considerable importance in the 
amorphous and uncertain nature of Russian foreign policy in 
relation to the near abroad has been performed by subjective 
factors partially inherited from the old Union by young Russian 
diplomacy and the new Russian state and partially on account of 
an incorrect appreciation of Russia's place and role in the 
post-Soviet space and in the world in general made by Foreign 
Minister Kozyrev and a number of other leaders of the new 
Russian state. It should be noted that among the subjective 
factors inherited from the old Union and the 
Gorbachev-Shevardnadze foreign policy has been the fact that 
both the Union leadership in the perestroyka years and the 
Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs failed even in general 
outline to formulate a positive foreign policy with regard to 
the national and state interests of the USSR and Russia. The 
attempts to revise the old foreign policy of the USSR made by 
Gorbachev and Shevardnadze, which were undoubtedly of positive 
significance in terms of their stated goals, developed in their 
realization into unilateral concessions culminating in the 
disorderly flight of the USSR from all areas of the world of 
critical importance to it, where the USSR had great influence, 
without adequate compensation for this from the West. 
  As a result a foreign policy designed to be an important 
factor creating the stability of the political system and 
contributing to the successful implementation of domestic policy 
reforms within the framework of perestroyka became an additional 
factor of the destabilization of the domestic political 
situation in the Soviet Union, gave rise to serious tension in 
the army sphere and in society as a whole, and resulted in 
colossal irretrievable losses in the military-political sphere. 
  The unilateral concessions of Soviet foreign policy were 
aimed at obtaining economic and political support for 
Gorbachev's reforms, but these expectations ended in total 
failure. The proposals for the neutralization of the GDR and the 
"Finlandization" of East Europe, in particular, which I made in 
1989 were ignored by the architects of the policy of perestroyka 
and, as a result, the unification of Germany and the departure 
from East Europe were paid for with symbolic amounts of aid, 
empty prattle, clamorous applause, and friendly pats on the back 
for Gorbachev and Shevardnadze from the leaders of the United 
States and other Western countries. 
  Thus the one-dimensional superpower, as the USSR was called, 
the reference being to the military aspect, which had made this 
state a superpower, was unable as a result of the hapless policy 
of the Soviet leadership to exchange its military might and 
geopolitical presence in Germany and East Europe for tangible 
economic and political benefits at the time of realization of 
the reform of the economic and political system within the 
country. 
  An example of a total absence of a positive foreign policy 
was the Soviet Union's position at the time of the war in the 
Persian Gulf. While each ally of the United States was making 
its participation in the war or support for the United States' 
action against Iraq dependent on all kinds of economic or 
political benefits, the Soviet Union, on whose position the fate 
of the UN mandate for the realization of military intervention 
depended to a decisive extent, was, in the channel of the 
already traditional romantic foreign policy supporting the 
United States and Western countries in the Security Council, 
proceeding from utopian and philanthropic considerations and 
receiving nothing in exchange. The Russian Ministry of Foreign 
Affairs inherited this foreign policy from the Union ministry, 
and if it is considered that Minister Kozyrev and other leaders 
of Russia's Foreign Ministry were "even more Catholic than the 
pope" in asserting the unity of goals and values of Russia and 
the United States and the Western community as a whole, it comes 
as no surprise that the evolution of the foreign policy of the 
USSR and, subsequently, of Russia also reached its logical 
conclusion following the disintegration of the Soviet Union. 
Kozyrev and other Russian leaders substituted for one 
ideological purpose, Marxist-Leninist, in accordance with which 
it was essential to expand the Soviet model all over the world 
and counteract the policy of the United States and the West on 
all azimuths, another ideological purpose, in accordance with 
which there has since the liquidation of the CPSU and 
Marxist-Leninist ideology been a complete unity of goals and 
values between the United States and the West and Russia. 
Russia, according to this logic, automatically became a part of 
the civilized world community, and for this reason the need for 
the formulation of specific national-state interests of Russia 
in respect to the far abroad was no longer an issue. And as far 
as the near abroad is concerned, it was assumed that the former 
Union republics and the socialist countries of East Europe had 
immediately become wholly detached and independent and in 
respect to which Russia has no specific interests and that in 
respect to all current or newly emergent problems in these 
regions Russia would act with the United States and other 
Western countries, sharing with them joint responsibility for 
political and economic stability in these regions. 
  Mention should also be made among the subjective factors of 
a 
serious miscalculation of the Russian leadership, which hoped 
that it would be possible after the Belovezha agreements to 
dissolve the USSR to preserve the common military-political and 
economic space within the framework of the newly created 
Commonwealth. Nor was the Russian leadership prepared for a 
number of republics not joining the CIS at all or for others, 
particularly Ukraine, speeding up the formation of their own 
armies and the process of demolition of the common 
military-political and economic space. 
  I would like to emphasize once again a most important 
subjective factor which for a long time prevented the Russian 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs from formulating a clear 
understanding of Russia's place and role in the post-Soviet 
space. Neither the leaders of the Foreign Ministry nor 
politicians of a higher level were aware of the transitional 
nature of the formation of statehood either in Russia or the 
other republics, the conditional nature of the administrative 
borders, which had overnight become international, and the 
presence of the deep-lying factors of a demographic, economic, 
historical, and geopolitical nature, which objectively did not 
allow of a mechanical transference to the relations between 
Russia and these republics of the standards and rules which 
existed between the Soviet Union and the countries of the far 
abroad. 
  As a result of the miscalculations in the appreciation of 
the 
role and place of Russia and the deep-seated nature of the 
relations between Russia and the countries of the near abroad, 
the leaders of Russia's Foreign Ministry and other of the 
country's political leaders drew the strategically erroneous 
conclusion that Russia should turn in upon itself within the 
borders of the Russian Federation, move out of all the former 
republics of the USSR, not intervene in the interethnic and 
regional conflicts of the former Union, and contribute to the 
internationalization of the process of a resolution of these 
conflicts, thereby openly and publicly renouncing any special 
rights or interests in the post-Soviet space outside of the 
borders of the Russian Federation. This position of the Russian 
leadership was expressed in greatest relief at the conference on 
Russia's foreign policy problems organized by the Foreign 
Ministry in February 1992 in the Moscow State International 
Relations Institute and formed the basis of the report of 
Foreign Minister Kozyrev and Supreme Soviet Chairman 
Khasbulatov. It is no accident that these propositions of 
Kozyrev's report formed the basis of the first version of the 
concept of foreign policy of the Russian Federation prepared by 
the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the Russian Federation in the 
spring of that same year. But the events that occurred in 1992 
in Russia and the republics made appreciable adjustments to the 
understanding of Russia's place and role in the post-Soviet 
space. Although the objective factors noted above are still to a 
considerable extent impeding the formation of an adequate 
foreign policy, the subject factor has undergone considerable 
change. It has been recognized increasingly distinctly among the 
serious part of the political establishment and analysts, by no 
means only among those who, in Kozyrev's words, represented and 
continue to represent the "war party," that Russia has a special 
role in the post-Soviet space. The profound involvement of 
Russia in the military conflicts in the Dniester region, 
Abkhazia, and Ossetia made obvious the proposition of those 
analysts that, first, Russia would not manage to "remain aloof" 
beyond the borders of the Russian Federation, not intervening in 
conflicts on the perimeter of its border; second, the 
international community, burdened with a multitude of problems 
in the former Yugoslavia, Africa, and other parts of the world, 
is not consumed by a desire to participate actively in a 
resolution of these conflicts on the territory of the former 
USSR, and even were there such a burning desire, it could hardly 
do anything for a resolution of these crises without the active 
participation of Russia itself; and, third, the conflicts along 
Russia's perimeter, involving it in them directly or indirectly, 
have begun to exert a considerable influence on the domestic 
political process and the struggle of various political forces 
in Russia itself. 
  The conflicts in the Dniester region, when for the first 
time 
ethnic Russians found themselves involved in military 
operations, and then in South Ossetia and in Abkhazia, where 
Russia came to be involved in the military operations directly 
since kindred peoples of the North Caucasus within the Russian 
Federation were acting in support of their brethren with weapon 
in hand, cleaved the erstwhile unified idea of Russia's foreign 
policy in the near abroad. Several centers involved in the 
process of the shaping of foreign policy in the near abroad were 
formed. Mention may be made of at least three of these centers, 
which existed right up until 1992. These were first and foremost 
the Foreign Ministry, which attempted to stay within the 
framework of the aims in respect to the former republics that 
had been formulated by the minister, which evoked sharp 
criticism of both the Foreign Ministry and the minister himself 
on the part of many representatives of political and academic 
circles. A serious independent factor of the formulation of 
Russia's foreign policy was for a long time Vice President 
Rutskoy, who largely by his support of the operations of the 
14th Army in the Dniester region and his hard line in respect to 
the leadership of Moldova contributed to a stabilization of the 
situation in the Dniester region. His numerous statements 
against the leadership of Ukraine--on the question of 
Crimea--and Georgia--on account of the latter's behavior in 
respect to Russian troops--worked to increase the popularity of 
Rutskoy himself, particularly if it is considered that this was 
accompanied by criticism of the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of 
the Russian Federation and was thickly interspersed with 
patriotic rhetoric. The third center attempting to shape or, at 
least, influence Russia's foreign policy, particularly in the 
near abroad, was the Supreme Soviet. Considering the political 
views of the vast majority of the corps of deputies, it is no 
wonder that the Supreme Soviet was an implacable opponent of the 
policy of Yeltsin and Kozyrev, losing no opportunity on each 
convenient occasion to accuse Kozyrev of a betrayal of Russia's 
national interests, and Yeltsin, of having torn apart the united 
Russian state, as a result of which millions of Russians had 
become foreigners in their former homeland. Considering the 
sentiments of the corps of deputies, Supreme Soviet Chairman 
Ruslan Khasbulatov was together with the opposition deputies the 
first high-ranking politician to demand of the government and 
the president more decisive actions in the conflict zones in 
which Russia had come to be directly or indirectly involved. As 
if in competition with Vice President Rutskoy, Khasbulatov 
categorically demanded of Georgia the termination of military 
operations against South Ossetia, threatening otherwise that 
Russia would recognize the independence of the latter. 
  I formulated for the first time in a number of articles in 
ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA the central idea which subsequently became 
determining in the understanding of Russia's role and place in 
the post-Soviet space with all leading politicians of Russia, 
from the president through Foreign Minister Kozyrev. It amounts 
to the fact that the entire geopolitical space of the former 
Soviet Union is a sphere of Russia's vital interests. Lest 
anyone be in any doubt as to what I had in mind by vital 
interests, I drew a parallel with the Monroe Doctrine. I 
attempted in a sense to formulate a Russian Monroe Doctrine with 
reference to the present situation that has taken shape 
following the disintegration of the Soviet Union. Initially this 
concept was criticized in the democratic press and in circles 
close to the Foreign Ministry, but it received considerable 
support among quite a large number of politicians and 
specialists in international relations and, what is very 
important, full support on the part of Yevgeniy Ambartsumov, 
chairman of the Russian Parliament's International Relations 
Committee. By the summer of 1992, I believe, such an 
understanding of Russia's role and place had, despite the 
opposition of the Foreign Ministry, gradually come to prevail in 
political and public circles. There was great significance in 
the fact that not only the neocommunists and national patriots, 
whose arguments Kozyrev was able to ignore, accusing them of 
being members of the "war party," but people who had earned in 
society the reputation of responsible and sober analysts and 
politicians were speaking in support of such an understanding of 
Russia's place and role, which subsequently exerted a decisive 
influence on the shaping of the new foreign policy paradigm in 
relation to the near abroad. 
  Just a few months later Kozyrev, competing with Rutskoy and 
Khasbulatov in patriotic rhetoric, began to speak about the 
geopolitical space of the former USSR as a zone of Russia's 
special interests. In March 1992 this thought was heard from the 
lips of the president of Russia himself. The importance of the 
fact that this concept was formulated not in the 
national-patriotic or communist environment was that the 
president was able to accept and support this concept and 
identify with it. And it would have been difficult for both 
Kozyrev and politicians and analysts in the West to discern in 
such an evolution of Russia's foreign policy line an increase in 
the influence of reactionary forces in the weakening of the 
positions of the democrats. Although Western politicians and 
analysts did not under the influence of Kozyrev's simplistic 
black-and-white interpretation of the Russian domestic policy 
situation allow of the thought even of the possibility of the 
formation of a positive foreign policy concept enjoying broad 
support in national elite groups and not being the result of the 
one-sided ideological domination of radical-democratic or 
national-patriotic forces. Concluding the introductory part of 
this study, I consider it necessary to note that it is in this 
broad context of the formation of Russia's foreign policy 
doctrine that I propose to examine subsequently Russia's 
relations with the former republics of the USSR. 
<H5>  [18 Jan 94 pp 4-5, 8] </H5>
  [Text] 
<H5>  Ukraine </H5>
  It is impossible to speak about Russian-Ukrainian relations 
without at least a cursory description of the process of the 
formation of Ukrainian statehood. Twenty-three percent of the 
population of Ukraine is composed of Russians. From 40 to 50 
percent of the population speak Russian and were raised on 
Russian culture. This applies particularly to Left-Bank Ukraine, 
where the scientific and technological and industrial potential 
of Ukraine is concentrated, in the main. Following the 
announcement of its independence, Ukraine, like all the other 
former Union republics, encountered a dilemma in the business of 
its constitutional development. Either it should have taken the 
path of the creation of a national state like the Baltic 
republics, Georgia, and others, where what is understood by the 
idea of national state was a state of the titular nationality, 
which would ultimately have led to the creation of an 
ethnocratic state with all the ensuing conflicts and 
contradictions, which are already being encountered on this path 
by the said states, where brutal conflicts between the titular 
nation and other national groups are occurring. This path was 
barred to Ukraine at the first stage on account of the complex 
national-cultural situation since attempts at the immediate 
creation of an ethnocratic state, considering the presence of 
the Russian factor, could have signified a split of the young 
fledgling Ukrainian state along ethno-cultural lines. This is 
why Ukraine opted for the second path of formation of the state, 
which presupposed that the Ukrainian state would be a state of 
all the ethnic groups, regardless of whether they were titular 
or not. The set task, therefore, was the creation of a political 
nation, which was to have averted demarcation along 
ethno-cultural lines, which could have prevented the formation 
of the young state. This approach of the Ukrainian leadership 
was perfectly justified and largely corresponds to contemporary 
notions of the national state. But it required a number of 
conditions for its realization. In order to consolidate a 
political nation and on this basis build a national state a 
sufficiently high level of socioeconomic development as would 
contribute to the integration in an organic whole of the 
representatives of the different ethnic groups is necessary. 
This is particularly important if account is taken of the factor 
that this state, with a large ethnic minority, borders a vast 
country which was yesterday even considered the homeland of this 
minority. We are speaking of Russia, of course. If at the 
initial stage Ukraine's relative economic prosperity worked in 
favor of Ukraine's independence [sentence as published]. Many 
Russians voted in December 1991 for an independent Ukraine, and 
many analysts rightly explained the results of the referendum by 
the fact that cheaper "sausages" in Ukraine were of decisive 
significance for the citizens in the voting at the referendum. 
Nor, of course, can we forget such an important factor as Russia 
in this period undergoing a profound internal economic and 
political crisis expressed in the conflict between the Union 
center and the leadership of Russia and many people, not only 
Ukrainians but Russians also, having voted for the independence 
of Ukraine, voting for "sausage," stability, and order. But as 
the economic situation deteriorated, the attempts to create a 
political nation in Ukraine and the creation on this basis of 
Ukrainian statehood became increasingly problematical. By the 
end of spring 1993, according to the data of sociological 
surveys, more than 50 percent of Ukrainians were expressing 
regret in connection with the disintegration of the USSR. This 
figure was over the 60 percent mark in the east of the republic. 
The end of 1992 and the whole of 1993, as a consequence of the 
incessant deterioration in the economic situation in Ukraine, 
testify to a waning of the impulses from the west of Ukraine 
aimed at the speediest detachment of Ukraine from Russia and an 
intensification of the process of the Ukrainianization of the 
eastern and southern regions of the country and the renunciation 
of all forms of Ukraine's close economic and military-political 
cooperation with Russia both within the framework of the CIS and 
on the basis of bilateral relations. 
  As a counterweight to this, the impulses coming from the 
East, where both the bulk of the republic's industrial base and 
the Russian-speaking population, with its cultural and 
linguistic gravitation toward Russia, are concentrated, are 
intensifying. It is these regions that have experienced the most 
devastating consequences of the slump in industrial production 
on account of the severance of business ties to Russia and as a 
result of the energy starvation. Only thanks to powerful strikes 
which encompassed the eastern regions of the country did Premier 
Kuchma sign off on economic Union with Russia and Belarus, and 
Kravchuk begin to speak of the possibilities of 
military-political cooperation between Ukraine and Russia and of 
the possibilities dual citizenship in Crimea. Russia's present, 
still indeterminate, policy in respect to Ukraine cannot be 
understood without regard to all these factors. Three approaches 
in relations with Ukraine may be distinguished in Russia today 
among politicians and analysts. The Foreign Ministry formally 
adheres to the position that Ukraine is a self-sufficient 
independent state and that Russia has no territorial or other 
claims on this country. The Foreign Ministry notes here, of 
course, the unsolved questions in the sphere of nuclear weapons 
on account of Ukraine's continuing refusal to fulfill the Lisbon 
Agreement or to ratify the CIS-I [as published] Treaty, which de 
facto makes Ukraine a nuclear power. But, on the whole, the 
approach proceeds from the fact of the independence and 
territorial integrity of Ukraine as a self-sufficient state. 
This position of the Foreign Ministry, with which the president 
also identifies in fact, was most savagely criticized by the 
Supreme Soviet of the Russian Federation. 
  As of 1992 the Supreme Soviet underpinned Russia's 
territorial claims on Ukraine on the Crimea issue with legal 
foundations. The Supreme Soviet of the Russian Federation deemed 
illegal the transfer of Crimea to Ukraine in 1954 and in July 
1993 adopted the decision that Sevastopol was, is now, and will 
remain a Russian city. Furthermore, the Supreme Soviet also 
adopted a decision on the indivisibility of the Black Sea Fleet. 
For a number of politicians in Russia, Crimea and the Black Sea 
Fleet are of paramount significance for a normalization of 
relations between Russia and Ukraine, and they, proceeding 
partially from these considerations and partially taking 
advantage of this factor to take a stab at the president and the 
Foreign Ministry and also to score points with the Russian 
public, presenting themselves as the sole patriots zealous for 
Russia's interests, have been harping constantly on the problems 
of Crimea, creating tension in Russian-Ukrainian relations. 
  In the opinion of another part of Russian politicians and 
analysts, this position of national patriots concerned for 
momentary populist benefits for themselves is counterproductive 
since it affords Kravchuk and other politicians of a nationalist 
persuasion in Ukraine an opportunity to inflame anti-Russian 
hysteria and to present Russia in the role of potential 
aggressor encroaching on the territorial integrity of Ukraine 
and on this basis to consolidate their power, muffling the 
public's discontent with the serious economic situation and 
justifying the renunciation of closer economic and 
military-political cooperation with Russia. This group of 
politicians and analysts believes that Ukraine is a fragile, 
artificial, heterogeneous ethno-political formation lacking any 
real chance of the formation of its own statehood and that a 
deterioration in the socioeconomic situation will lead to the 
further division of this formation along ethno-regional lines 
and confront the Ukrainian leadership with the dilemma of either 
agreeing to closer economic and military-political integration 
with Russia directly or within the framework of the CIS in order 
to preserve Ukraine's territorial integrity, or, on the other 
hand, this will lead to the breakup of Ukraine into several 
parts with possible civil war between the different regions. In 
both cases Russia, without putting direct pressure on Ukraine, 
as is being done with Crimea, mistakenly, in my view, is in a 
position to bring Ukraine back into the orbit of its interests, 
preventing the use directly of the anti-Russia card for 
consolidation of the fledgling Ukrainian statehood. 
  In examining the current questions of Russian-Ukrainian 
relations it is impossible not to dwell, if only briefly, on the 
question of Ukraine's nuclear weapons and the Black Sea Fleet. 
Speaking of Crimea, we partially broached the problem of the 
Black Sea Fleet. The difficulties connected with the fleet are 
explained by the fact that it is has today become obvious to the 
majority of officers that a division of the fleet could lead to 
its destruction. Ukraine is not in a position to maintain such a 
fleet. Thus the fleet is like some independent unit struggling 
for its own survival. And although, it seems to me, the 
decisions of the Supreme Soviet of Russia on the indivisibility 
of the fleet and the status of Sevastopol are insufficiently 
thought out strategically since it is difficult to realize them, 
particularly as far as the transfer of Sevastopol to the 
jurisdiction of Russia is concerned, they were dictated by the 
actual interests of thousands of officers and their families, 
whose fate neither Russia nor Ukraine is in a position to decide 
otherwise. 
  In the opinion of certain Russian politicians, a solution of 
the problem of the Black Sea Fleet could be the preservation of 
Sevastopol as the base of the Russian fleet with Russia being 
given other rear support units and on-shore installations in 
Crimea capable of ensuring the combat capability of the Russian 
part of the Black Sea Fleet with the simultaneous allocation 
from the Black Sea Fleet of a small part for Ukraine with the 
rebasing of this part outside of the Crimean peninsula. 
  Whatever the case, every effort should be made to keep the 
question of the Black Sea Fleet and Crimea a problem of as 
minimal a significance as possible for Russia on the basis of 
the strategic line in respect to Ukraine that it will not be in 
a position in the next few years to build its own statehood 
without closer integration with Russia in this form or the other 
in the economic and military-political spheres. 
  As anticipated, the meeting between Yeltsin and Kravchuk and 
the decisions on these matters were blocked by the Ukrainian 
parliament and once more bore out the opinion that such 
questions as the Black Sea Fleet and Crimea are individual 
tactical questions in the overall strategy of relations between 
Russia and Ukraine. 
  And, in conclusion, literally a few words about the fate of 
Ukraine's nuclear weapons. Despite Ukraine's multiple statements 
concerning its desire to become a nonnuclear power and the 
signing of the Lisbon Agreement in 1992, the present Ukrainian 
leadership has adopted a policy of conversion of the country 
into a nuclear power. This line of behavior is explained and 
justified publicly and privately by Ukrainian politicians by the 
following circumstances. 
  First, Ukraine believes, not without reason, that with the 
elimination of nuclear weapons it will lose a considerable part 
of its significance and possibilities of influencing 
international relations. Put more crudely, it would not have the 
possibility of nuclear blackmail of the world community in order 
to obtain economic assistance. This line is quite well known and 
was employed extensively in the period of Gorbachev's rule, when 
the reason given for the need for assistance to the USSR was the 
fact that it was essential to guarantee a certain level of life 
support to avoid chaos and confusion in a starving country 
packed with nuclear weapons. 
  Second, many Ukrainian politicians and analysts assume that 
the possession of nuclear weapons could guarantee the formation 
of independent Ukrainian statehood, and in this case these 
weapons are perceived as a possible factor against, as they 
believe, the expansionist aspirations of Russia in respect to 
Ukraine. 
  Third, in declaring the nuclear weapons on its territory its 
own property Ukraine wants to obtain its share from the sale of 
the nuclear fuel which could be formed as a result of the 
dismantling of the nuclear missiles. 
  Whatever the motives of the Ukrainian leadership, it would 
seem to me that the presence or absence of nuclear weapons in 
Ukraine is not a serious factor threatening the interests of 
Russia itself. Nor do I believe that Russia should display 
particular zeal in seeking Ukraine's nuclear-free status. Nor, 
simultaneously, should Russia fear possible blackmail on the 
part of the West in that the West might counterpose a Ukraine 
possessing nuclear weapons to Russia. 
  In the event of the close integration of these two states, 
nuclear weapons could only augment the overall power of these 
two states or the CIS as a whole. In the event of Ukraine not 
complying with the Lisbon agreements and the terms of the START 
I Treaty, the possibilities of ratification of the START II 
Agreement between Russia and the United States, which, in the 
opinion of many experts and politicians in Russia, affords the 
United States many advantages, would in practice be undermined. 
  So Ukraine's nuclear status is a headache with uncertain 
consequences both for Ukraine's neighbors in the West and the 
world community as a whole, which they should understand. But 
under no circumstances should Russia engage in this sphere in 
any rash and ill-considered activity, which could cause 
undesirable tension in relations between these two Slav 
countries. 
<H5>  Belarus </H5>
  The reason for this procedure of the consideration of 
Russia's relations initially with Ukraine and then with Belarus 
and Kazakhstan and only then with the other republics is the 
fact that the very day following the disbandment of the USSR 
demands among both politicians and analysts came to be heard 
from all sides concerning the need for some new form of Russia's 
association primarily with these newly formed states since only 
in this case could Russia or the state which might be formed as 
a result of such an association preserve opportunities for 
restoring its global superpower status. 
  Russia's relations with Belarus are distinguished by a 
number 
of particular features. As distinct from Ukraine and the 
republics of the Baltic and the Transcaucasus, the mood in 
support of secession from the USSR and the formation of an 
independent state was not so strong in Belarus. The most radical 
supporters of this line from the People's Front enjoyed 
negligible influence among the people. Another difference 
between Belarus and Ukraine is the fact that there have never in 
this republic been stable anti-Russian sentiments, nor has there 
been profound psychological trauma among the people from 
unrealized Belarusian statehood, which tormented the souls of 
many Ukrainian nationalists throughout the period that Ukraine 
was part of the Russian Empire and, subsequently, of the USSR. 
Aside from this, Belarus felt itself to a greater extent to be 
part of the common Russian linguistic and ethno-cultural habitat 
and whence, to some extent, the independent Republic of Belarus 
emerged, contrary to its wishes, after the Union center had lost 
control of the republics and it was decided to get rid of this 
center in December 1991. 
  Although Belarus is today beginning to acquire a taste for 
republic elite groups, as the leaders of a big independent 
state, the multitude of ties of an ethno-cultural, linguistic, 
and economic nature and the absence of any stable antagonisms 
between the Belarusian and Russian peoples create favorable 
conditions for future closer convergence between Russia and 
Belarus, particularly if it is considered that Belarus receives 
raw material and energy resources mainly from Russia and that 
the market for the sale of finished commodities for this 
republic is Russia also. 
  This also explains Belarus' position on economic and 
military-political questions in relations with Russia. Belarus 
is as yet the only one of the three nuclear republics, aside 
from Russia, which has without any hesitation agreed to put 
under Russia's control the strategic nuclear forces deployed on 
its territory. The republic advocates close cooperation with 
Russia in the military sphere, not least considering the fact 
that everything the Belarusian Army is equipped with is made in 
Russia. Although Belarus has declared itself a nuclear-free 
neutral country which is not a member of any military-political 
blocs, there is in this republic today, nonetheless, serious 
pressure on the part of parliament, and this line is supported 
by Prime Minister Kebich, in the direction of the republic's 
closer military-political integration within the CIS framework. 
This became particularly graphic in the example of the 
discussion of the question in political circles of the 
republic's attitude toward the Collective Security Treaty signed 
by a number of countries of the CIS in Tashkent in 1992. The 
parliament of Belarus required its chairman, Shushkevich, to 
sign this agreement and become a full member of the Collective 
Security Treaty, whereas Shushkevich and the forces supporting 
the chairman of parliament refused to comply with the demands of 
the corps of deputies, giving as their reason for this the fact 
that such a step on the part of Belarus would be a violation of 
the declaration on neutrality and nonparticipation in 
military-political blocs. Parliament Chairman Shushkevich and 
his supporters are afraid that, having subscribed to the 
Collective Security Treaty, the Belarusian armed forces could be 
drawn into foreign wars in Central Asia or the Transcaucasus, 
where, it seems to them, Belarus has no interests which they 
should be defending with armed forces. But these forces are 
interested in a closer military-political alliance with Russia 
on a bilateral basis for the joint protection of the two states' 
common border, the exchange of intelligence information, and the 
creation of an early warning system and in a number of other 
areas of military-political cooperation. The trends toward the 
closer connection of Belarus and Russia and sentiments in 
support of the unification in this form or the other of the 
disintegrated country are so strong in the country that 
Shushkevich's refusal to sign the Tashkent Collective Security 
Treaty just about cost him his job, and the opposition was just 
a few votes shy of removing the present chairman of the Supreme 
Soviet, who had refused to comply with the Supreme Soviet's 
decisions. 
  All these factors testify that there are in Belarus serious 
sentiments in favor of a strengthening of both multilateral 
relations within the framework the CIS as a whole and bilateral 
relations between Russia and Belarus. The culmination in this 
respect was the recent agreement on the conclusion of an 
economic Union of Russia, Ukraine, and Belarus, which was signed 
by the premiers of these three countries and which prepared the 
ground for the development of the provisions of this agreement 
at the September summit in Moscow, where an agreement on 
economic union within the framework of the CIS was concluded and 
a decision on the creation of a single ruble zone, to which 
Belarus subscribed, was adopted. 
  The integration trends that have been manifested almost 
everywhere in the space of the former USSR are prompting 
politicians to find in avoidance of a continuation of the 
economic recession and the collapse of their national economies 
mechanisms of the restoration of the severed ties in order to 
deflect from themselves responsibility for the abrupt 
deterioration in the socioeconomic position of the populace in 
their republics. 
  It is obvious to the vast majority today that 
sovereignization and independence were the cause of the 
catastrophic deterioration in the position of millions of people 
in the republics, where the people were not ready to make such 
sacrifices for the sake of sovereignty and independence. 
Considering all these sentiments, many politicians in the 
republics, and this may be observed both in Belarus and in 
Ukraine, are attempting to come to terms with these changed 
sentiments and to play in the political struggle with one 
another the card of the changed mood in support of integration 
processes within the framework of the former Soviet Union. 
  This is being manifested particularly graphically in the 
overt and covert rivalry between the leaders of the legislative 
and executive organs of power in Russia, Belarus, and Ukraine. 
In these three republics the premiers are acting as the 
catalysts of these integration processes, enhancing here their 
popularity and building up their political capital. It cannot be 
ruled out that the psychological factor that Yeltsin, 
Shushkevich, and Kravchuk are in the eyes of the public to blame 
for the disintegration of the unified state and personify 
separatism and sovereignization is working to their advantage 
also. 
  It is not least this rivalry also which in Russia between 
president and parliament, in Belarus between Shushkevich and 
Prime Minister Kebich, and in Ukraine between Kravchuk and 
Kuchma is forcing Yeltsin, Shushkevich, and Kravchuk, lest they 
hand over a monopoly on integration to their political 
opponents, to appreciably adjust their positions in the 
direction of support for closer integration processes within the 
framework of the CIS. 
  This is why the contradiction between the legislature and 
the 
executive, particularly in Russia, has on the one hand played a 
positive and, on the other, a negative part for the formation of 
an adequate policy in respect to the integration trends that 
have been manifested in the former republics of the Soviet 
Union. Attempting to extract public applause and act the part of 
unifying force of the old state, the Supreme Soviet of Russia 
was prepared to make serious concessions in the economic sphere 
for the achievement of these goals, considering these republics' 
present considerable dependence on Russia in the financial, 
economic, and military-political spheres. 
  Whereas, considering the difficult position of Russia itself 
in the economy, the government was not prepared to agree to 
reckless concessions in the economic sphere without tangible 
benefits in the military-political and integration spheres. 
  Thus the central trend in Russia's relations with Belarus is 
movement in the direction of closer military-political and 
economic integration, which, with a favorable development of the 
political situation in Russia, could create a stable union of 
Russia and Belarus as a dependable nucleus within the framework 
of the CIS. And the final point of which mention should be made 
in the relations of Russia and Belarus is that the integration 
trends, at this stage, within the framework of the CIS, at 
least, are considerably reducing the threat of the advance into 
Belarus of third countries to the detriment of Russia's 
interests and are making unlikely the possibilities of the 
formation of a Baltic-Black Sea commonwealth, in which a key 
component was to be Belarus for the purpose of the isolation of 
Russia and the creation of a cordon sanitaire between Russia and 
the rest of Europe. 
<H5>  Kazakhstan </H5>
  By virtue of a number of factors of a geopolitical, 
ethno-cultural, and military nature, Kazakhstan occupies a 
special place in Russia's foreign policy. It is no accident 
that, as observed above, with all the possible configurations 
pertaining to the organization of the post-Soviet space, 
politicians and analysts of various persuasions unequivocally 
consider essential the enlistment of Kazakhstan in the closest 
possible economic and political relations with Russia. This is 
explained not only by the vastness of the territory of this 
republic and its resources, the presence of nuclear weapons on 
its territory, and Russia's geopolitical interests in this 
region, but primarily also by the fact that Russians constitute 
almost 40 percent of the population of Kazakhstan, which is 
equal to the numbers of Kazakhs in this republic. It should be 
noted that Nazarbayev, president of Kazakhstan, also clearly 
recognizes the potential threat of this ethno-demographic 
situation. This explains to a considerable extent the fact that 
Nazarbayev consistently advocates the preservation and 
strengthening of the CIS and the creation of coordinating 
economic and military-political structures within the framework 
of the CIS, understanding full well that the total exclusiveness 
of Kazakhstan as an independent state fenced off from Russia by 
guarded borders, customs, and a local regime would inevitably 
lead to the division of this state along ethnic lines. In 
addition, there are in Russia quite influential forces which do 
not recognize the territorial integrity of Kazakhstan and the 
existing borders between it and Russia, considering North 
Kazakhstan, which is populated chiefly by Russians and Russian 
speakers, a natural part of Russia. The particular 
ethno-cultural situation in Kazakhstan makes an appreciable 
imprint on the choice of the policy line of Nazarbayev and the 
present Kazakh leadership. They have to pursue a virtuoso policy 
in order, while displaying assertiveness within the CIS 
framework and acting the part of defenders of the trends of 
integration with Russia, not to cause open antagonism on the 
part of elite groups in Russia. It has to be said that 
Nazarbayev has been preeminently successful in gratifying both 
right and left, both democrats and patriots, both President 
Yeltsin and the Supreme Soviet of the Russian Federation by his 
political line aimed at the preservation of a common post-Soviet 
economic and military-political space. This aspect of 
Nazarbayev's policy is the most extensively publicized aspect, 
although little is said about the fact that it is largely 
explained not by a love for or loyalty toward Russia but, 
rather, by the presence of the explosive factors mentioned above. 
  But Kazakhstan is also pursuing here another policy, one 
that 
is less publicized, but that is not escaping the attention of 
observers and analysts and has a different orientation and 
different goals. While paying lip service to the integration 
trends within the framework of the CIS and the orientation 
toward Russia and being simultaneously an Asian state with a 
Muslim titular population, Kazakhstan is attempting to use its 
own economic and military-political potential in order to find 
for itself a place in the community of Turkic states. Kazakhstan 
is displaying great assertiveness in this sphere in respect to 
the consolidation of the Central Asian, predominantly Turkic, 
states and, simultaneously, supporting these states' orientation 
toward Turkey. 
  Thus having a highly vulnerable ethno-cultural makeup, 
Kazakhstan is attempting to find for itself a niche in different 
communities simultaneously. 
  At the same time, on the other hand, the framework of this 
second policy accommodates a number of measures that are being 
implemented by the Kazakh leadership to strengthen the national 
statehood of this new formation. Pertaining to such measures 
first and foremost are the decisions that have been adopted on 
the announcement of Kazakh as the official language, whereas 
Kazakhs constitute less than half of the population of the 
republic. Kazakhs are simultaneously being moved from the 
southern oblasts of the republic and from Mongolia to the 
territories of the Northwest in order to change the 
ethno-demographic situation in this region. Throughout the North 
and in the Northwest the names of cities and communities founded 
by Russians as the Urals and Siberia were colonized are being 
changed. The state authorities of Kazakhstan have virtually 
driven underground organizations of the Southern Urals Cossacks 
and are pursuing a most brutal policy of suppression of all 
actions which could cause interethnic discord and unconcealed 
separatist opposition. Without consideration of this second line 
in Kazakhstan's foreign and domestic policy it is impossible to 
correctly understand and evaluate either the line in 
Nazarbayev's policy which is oriented toward the preservation 
with Russia of close integration ties in all vitally important 
spheres. 
  Considering the possibilities of a change in the 
ethno-demographic situation in this republic in connection with 
the difference in the birthrate among Russians and Kazakhs and 
the existence of the stream of refugees from Kazakhstan, who, 
under the influence of the events in Tajikistan and many other 
interethnic clashes in the republics of Central Asia, are, 
fearful for themselves and their children's future, leaving in 
good time this potentially explosive region, it cannot be ruled 
out that Kazakhstan will within a relatively short period of 
time have succeeded in radically changing the ethno-national 
composition in favor of the titular nationality. 
  At the present, as we observed in the introductory part of 
this work, although there are objective difficulties in the 
shaping of foreign policy priorities in relation to various 
republics of the former Union on the part of Russia, one has the 
impression that the present Russian leadership, understanding 
the vulnerability of this republic, recognizes the possibilities 
of influence on Kazakhstan's foreign policy line. In my view, 
this explains also the fact that Russia, being at the initial 
stage of the formation of its statehood, was at the end of 
1991-start of 1992 itself uninterested in the molding of 
integration processes within the CIS, fearing that Ukraine, 
Kazakhstan, and states of the CIS might unite in the 
coordinating structures of the CIS and become a counterweight to 
Russia within the Commonwealth. 
  It is this that could explain the fact that Russia pursued 
throughout 1992, despite the formal preservation of the CIS, a 
policy of the strengthening of its own statehood and of a shift 
of the center of gravity in relations with the former Union 
republic members of the CIS from a multilateral to a bilateral 
basis, clearly recognizing that, being manifestly stronger in 
the economic and military-political respects than each republic 
of the former Union individually, Russia could achieve more 
advantageous positions for itself in these relations. And it is 
not fortuitous that it is after the relative stabilization of 
the financial and economic situation in Russia itself and the 
virtual collapse of the financial and economic systems of the 
former republics that Russia, with stronger positions, has been 
attempting to stimulate new integration processes within the CIS 
framework. It is in the channel of this strategy that Russia, to 
prevent the appearance of a serious counterbalance to itself 
within the framework of the CIS, is attempting to gradually 
build up the nucleus of the Commonwealth. It is no accident that 
the problem of an economic union between Russia and Belarus was 
discussed first, therefore. Ukraine was forced to associate with 
it, and only then were Kazakhstan and the other members of the 
CIS plugged in. 
  I would like in conclusion to dwell on one further sphere of 
the mutual relations of Russia and Kazakhstan. I am talking 
about the Kazakh nuclear weapons. And on this matter Kazakhstan 
occupies an intermediate position compared with Belarus and 
Ukraine. It does not lay claim to nuclear status and is not 
declaring these weapons its property but nor is it formally 
transferring these weapons to the control of Russia, although 
the weapons are in fact under the control of Russia. Both the 
nuclear weapons and the Baykonur space complex are being used 
and may subsequently be used as factors of bargaining and 
pressure on Russia. But since the Russian leadership recognizes 
Kazakhstan's lack of interest in creating tension in relations 
between the two countries, it is treating the possible fate of 
the nuclear weapons and the space complex in Kazakhstan with 
relative composure. 
<H5>  Moldova </H5>
  Before turning to an examination of the nature of Russia's 
relations with the three main regions of the former 
Union--Central Asia, the Baltic, and the Transcaucasus--we 
should briefly define the nature of the relationship of Russia 
and Moldova. 
  The development of relations with this small republic has 
had 
a big impact both on the domestic policy process in Russia and 
in the change in the Russian political establishment's 
understanding of Russia's role in the post-Soviet space. As 
observed above, the end of 1991 and, particularly, the period 
immediately following the Belovezha agreements was characterized 
for Russian society and the new democratic leadership by a 
desire to walk away from all the conflict zones and foreign 
interethnic wars, which had begun under Gorbachev even within 
the framework of the old Union and in which young boys from 
Russian peacekeeping forces had died. The "Afghan syndrome" led 
to the opinion that, following the disintegration of the USSR, 
Russia has neither specific goals nor interests outside of the 
Russian Federation. This was manifested particularly vividly in 
the example of the Karabakh conflict, when both public opinion 
and the Russian leadership decided that the loss of Russian 
soldiers in a war alien to Russia made no sense and 
unequivocally supported the withdrawal of Russian troops both 
from Armenia and Azerbaijan and from Karabakh. This was a 
demonstration that Russia had neither the forces nor the desire 
to become entrenched in this region. 
  As already observed, the Foreign Ministry and the new 
Russian 
state were prepared to make this principle the basis of foreign 
policy with all the former republics of the Union. But it very 
quickly became obvious that what had worked in the case of 
Karabakh, where a lengthy and bloody war had been going on for a 
long time and where Russia's presence at the time of the 
withdrawal of the troops was undesirable both on the part of the 
two Transcaucasus republics and public opinion and political 
elite groups of the vast majority of Russians, was not working 
in the case of Moldova and Georgia, albeit for different 
reasons. We will have more to say about Russia's relations with 
Georgia, but the attempts, meanwhile, on the part of the 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the Russian Federation to pursue 
in Moldova and Georgia a policy analogous with Karabakh ran into 
various obstacles. It had become obvious under Gorbachev even, 
during discussion of the question of the possibilities of the 
conclusion of a new Union treaty, that as a counterweight to the 
separatist trends of the Union republics and the "sovereignty 
parade," the Union center had begun to play the card of existing 
national-territorial autonomies or of new ones about to be 
formed as a lever of pressure on the republics in the event of 
their attempting to secede from the USSR. 
  Thus prior to the disintegration of the Union even two 
self-proclaimed republics: Dniester and Gagauz, had been formed 
within the Moldavian Republic. In addition, conflicts between 
the Dniester region and Chisinau, which developed into armed 
clashes between Tiraspol and Chisinau, had begun within the 
framework of the Union even. The conflict was of an 
ethno-cultural nature, and besides the threat of Romanianization 
within Moldova itself, the Slav part of the population of the 
Dniester region was threatened by incorporation in Romania since 
activists from the People's Front were earnestly pursuing the 
policy line of the unification of Moldova and Romania. 
  The conflict in the Dniester region affected the interests 
of 
both Russia and Ukraine since ethnic Russians and Ukrainians 
found themselves involved in it. Ukraine occupied a position of 
neutrality in this conflict. Encroachment on Moldova's 
territorial integrity was unacceptable for it since this could 
have created a dangerous precedent for Ukraine itself. 
Immediately following the announcement of Ukraine's 
independence, both Russia itself and Crimea began to raise the 
question of territories and the borders between Russia and 
Ukraine. Russia, on the other hand, was in a very tricky 
position. On the one hand it recognized Moldova's independence, 
on the other, the war that had begun between Tiraspol and 
Chisinau had come to be used by the opposition against Yeltsin 
and the democrats in the struggle for power in Russia itself, 
and the leadership could not simply have ignored the fate of the 
Russians who had become party to this military conflict. The 
situation was further complicated for Russia by the fact that it 
has no direct border with the Dniester region, and much depended 
on the position of Ukraine since the Russian 14th Army stationed 
on the territory of the Dniester region was supplied via the 
territory of Ukraine, in the main. 
  At the start of 1992 the Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs 
attempted to escape direct involvement in the conflict. To this 
end Russian diplomacy attempted to enlist international 
organizations in a resolution of the conflict. Attempting to 
internationalize the problem, Russia agreed to participate in 
multilateral negotiations within the CSCE framework. The 
peacemaking efforts within the CSCE framework and the attempts 
to internationalize the Dniester problem produced no results 
since none of the parties involved in a settlement of the 
conflict agreed to the participation of representatives of the 
Dniester Republic in the multilateral negotiations. The war, 
meanwhile, became increasingly bitter and large-scale. The war 
in the Dniester region was a catalyst of the domestic political 
struggle in Russia. Volunteers, particularly Cossacks from 
Southern Russia, set out for the conflict zone from all of 
Russia. The patriotic and neocommunist press and political 
circles in the Supreme Soviet accused the Yeltsin administration 
of the betrayal of Russians who had against their wishes found 
themselves abroad on account of the disintegration of the USSR. 
It was on the Dniester issue that Vice President Rutskoy for the 
first time openly occupied a position of criticism of the 
Foreign Ministry and Minister Kozyrev, accusing him of a failure 
to understand national interests and the Foreign Ministry's lack 
of a deliberate policy in relation to the "near abroad." 
  It should be considered that the escalation of the conflict 
in the Dniester region coincided with the peak of the shock 
therapy being implemented by the Gaydar government and that by 
this time many politicians in parliament and in the presidential 
structures had begun to distance themselves from the domestic 
policy of Yeltsin and his team and to score points among the 
public here, presenting themselves as defenders of the people's 
interests. Competition among the vice president, Supreme Soviet 
Chairman Khasbulatov, and the irreconcilable opposition as to 
who could derive the most benefits from criticism of the policy 
of the president and the government began. In this open 
demarcation on questions of economic reform a pretext for 
demarcation on foreign policy matters was added also. The first 
such matter was the military conflict in the Dniester region and 
the approaches of various politicians in Russia in respect to a 
resolution of this conflict. 
  In the spring of 1992 at the Sixth Congress of People's 
Deputies the government was subjected to withering criticism on 
account of the economic policy it was pursuing, and the Foreign 
Ministry and Kozyrev, on account of Russia's "toothless" policy 
in the Dniester region. Rutskoy, Khasbulatov, and the opposition 
in the Supreme Soviet stood for a harder line in relation to 
Moldova and the exclusion of Romania from the negotiating 
process and insisted on a direct dialogue between Tiraspol and 
Chisinau. The Supreme Soviet, in the shape of its majority 
consisting of the opposition and the vice president, supported, 
in fact, the operations of General Lebed, commander of the 
Russian 14th Army, who threatened to march on Chisinau and who 
actively involved the Russian Army in the conflict between 
Chisinau and Tiraspol on the side of the Dniester people. 
  Originally this policy in relation to an independent state 
recognized by the international community, Moldova, was 
unacceptable to the Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs and the 
radical democrats for a number of reasons. First, it could have 
led to the Yugoslavization of the former USSR, which would have 
strengthened the positions of the military, patriotic, and 
neocommunist forces calling for the restoration of the Union. 
Second, such a policy could have caused serious complications 
between Russia and the countries of the "near and far abroad," 
intimidating both with the fact that Russia was endeavoring to 
restore the old empire. But after the Western countries, 
frightened that some drastic steps against Russia on account of 
the operations of the 14th Army in the Dniester region would 
under the conditions of destabilization and the polarization of 
forces in Russia and the condemnation of the social base of 
Yeltsin and the democrats on account of the shock therapy be an 
additional burden on the shoulders of the as yet infirm power 
structures led by the democrats, had refrained from serious 
protests to Russia, the Foreign Ministry position also began to 
change in the direction of unconditional defense of the Dniester 
republic and direct negotiations between Tiraspol and Chisinau. 
Today, in fact, all political forces in Russia occupy close 
positions on the question of relations with Moldova, making 
these relations dependent on Chisinau's policy in relation to 
the Dniester region. Russia's support for the Dniester Republic 
has to a large extent been a factor complicating the process of 
the unification of Moldova and Romania, whereby Moldova would be 
deprived forever of the Dniester region. The Dniester factor 
will for a long time to come seriously influence the nature of 
Russian-Moldovan relations until the status of this 
self-proclaimed republic has been determined. Not least is this 
factor, together with others, today prompting the Moldovan 
leadership to join the CIS. 
  To conclude this section I would like to mention one further 
circumstance which, possibly, played an important part and will 
in the future do the same in relations between Russia and 
Moldova. I am talking about Ukraine. It cannot be ruled out that 
the change in Ukraine's position in respect to the Dniester 
conflict is connected with a tacit understanding between Russia 
and Ukraine, according to which the incorporation in time of 
this territory, in the event of the unification of Moldova and 
Romania, in Ukraine was, possibly, contemplated. The set of 
problems that today lie on Russia's shoulders in connection with 
the Dniester region would be transferred to Ukraine here. 
Ukraine would obtain here an increase in its territory and human 
and material resources, and Russia, an additional region within 
Ukraine with a strong gravitation toward Russia. 
<H5>  The Baltic </H5>
  Russia's relations with the Baltic republics occupy a 
special 
place in Russia's foreign policy in the "near abroad." Many 
factors go to explain this. Mention should be made among them of 
the proximity of this region to West and North Europe, the 
experience of independent statehood between the two world wars, 
integration in the Union as a result of the 1939 
Molotov-Ribbentrop Pact, the United States' nonrecognition of 
the legality of the incorporation of the Baltic republics in the 
USSR, the presence of an active lobby in the United States 
advocating American support for these countries in their 
relations with Russia, and a number of others. Aside from those 
mentioned, two further factors, which were recognized back in 
the period of perestroyka, when the Baltic countries raised for 
the first time the question of secession from the Union, would 
appear very serious. It is a question of the presence of 
millions of Russian speakers in these republics and of their 
fate following these republics' achievement of full independence 
and of Russia's special geopolitical interests in this region, 
since the ports and lines of communication of the Baltic were 
Russia's outlet not only to the West but also to Kaliningrad 
Oblast, which has in this case become an enclave territory. 
Considering all these factors, and not only as a result of an 
obdurate aspiration to preserve the integrity of the Union at 
all costs, Gorbachev and his circle considered it essential that 
the divorce suit take at least five years. 
  This period of time was needed for the solution, in the 
event 
of a clear expression of the will of these peoples to 
independence, of such serious questions as the property and 
interethnic questions, questions of citizenship and the status 
of the troops and military bases, and the fate of the ports and 
the lines of communication. Although Gorbachev was sharply 
criticized at that time on the part of the democrats, who 
considered that his real purpose was merely preservation of the 
empire, it is in practice obvious even to the schoolboy today 
that the wholesale severance of relations and Russia's instant 
recognition, following the failure of the putsch, of the 
independence of the Baltic republics was a serious mistake, 
which resulted both in serious complications for the Russians 
and Russian speakers in these republics and the continuation of 
tension in relations between Russia and these countries in the 
solution of questions of the withdrawal of the troops and arms 
from these republics and in the determination of the status of 
the Russian speakers in the sphere of property and political 
relations. Today many people in Russia, particularly from the 
camp of the opposition to Yeltsin, are accusing the United 
States and the West of having been very quick to recognize the 
independence of these republics and of having contributed to the 
disintegration of the USSR, which has led to the kindling of 
interethnic conflicts and wars. 
  However, we should agree with the American Sovietologist D. 
Simes, who, participating in the "Red Square" Russian television 
program, observed that the main blame for the recognition of the 
former Union republics without the preliminary resolution of 
problems of the citizenship and property rights of the 
Russian-speaking population in these republics, particularly in 
the Baltic, lies with the present leadership of Russia, not the 
West, since the United States and the Western countries 
recognized these republics only after Russia had done so. And 
the naivete and dilettantism of the new Russian leadership show 
through in the case of the rash recognition of the Baltic 
republics, as is now obvious even to one who is an ignoramus in 
international relations. 
  The calculation was that deliverance from the hated center, 
against which the democrats had fought, both in Russia and in 
the Baltic, would afford the allies in this anti-imperial 
struggle an opportunity to build interstate relations with one 
another amicably and on democratic foundations. The Russian 
leadership was visibly counting here on gratitude on the part of 
the leaders of these republics for their liberation since the 
main part for the demolition of the Union and the liberation of 
the other republics had been assumed by Russia. Nor can it be 
forgotten here that it was on the basis of this understanding of 
serenity in relations with these republics that the Russian 
leadership, when the Union was still in existence even, 
concluded treaties with them. 
  True, at the time of the signing of these treaties Russia 
itself was not yet a state in the direct meaning of this word 
since the Union leadership controlled all the power structures 
and the economy of Russia, and there was scant likelihood that 
these treaties would ever really determine relations between 
Russia and the Baltic republics. But the impossible occurred. 
The Union fell apart, and Russia and the Baltic republics were 
independent states with agreements which failed to provide for 
the resolution of a tangled knot of military, political, 
national, property, and other problems. 
  Immediately following the disintegration of the USSR, the 
leaders of the Baltic republics lost no opportunity to show 
their democratic allies in the struggle against Gorbachev's 
center that not only did they not feel any gratitude in respect 
to democratic Russia but that they altogether drew no special 
distinction between the present Russia and the USSR. It was 
particularly offensive for both democrats in Russia and many 
Russians in these republics who had supported the movement of 
"people's fronts" in these republics hearing that both the 
Russian troops and the Russian-speaking population in these 
republics were occupiers, who had to be gotten rid of as quickly 
as possible. The accelerated formation of ethnocratic states, 
particularly in Latvia and Estonia, with the exclusion from the 
ranks of citizens of more than 1.5 million of the nonindigenous 
population, plus the immediate demands for the withdrawal of 
Russian troops immediately complicated relations between Russia 
and the Baltic republics, threatening to influence Russia's 
relations with the United States and other Western countries 
also. 
  Let us examine in more detail these two groups of problems: 
citizenship and troop withdrawal, which have become a stumbling 
block and are hampering the normalization of Russia's relations 
with this region. Let us start with the problems of citizenship. 
A very great deal has already been said about this, and without 
going into details, therefore, I will merely note in outline 
what this problem represents for Russia. In practically all 
social strata and among political elite groups representing the 
entire spectrum of political forces in Russia there is agreement 
on the question of the fact that Russians and other ethnically 
nonindigenous groups in Latvia and Estonia have become 
second-class citizens and that racist regimes are being 
installed in these republics for the purpose of squeezing out 
"foreigners" into Russia and a change in the ethno-demographic 
situation in favor of the indigenous population. This problem 
has become a serious factor in Russia's domestic political life 
and an instrument in the hands of the opposition in the struggle 
against the Yeltsin administration and, particularly, the 
Foreign Ministry and Kozyrev. 
  There is a danger that the "extrusion" of Russians will 
either lead to tens and hundreds of thousands of people, having 
left the Baltic, supplementing the ranks of refugees who have 
already arrived from the Transcaucasus and Central Asia and 
becoming fertile material for the patriotic and neocommunist 
forces, which will use them for their own purposes. Or, on the 
other hand, the situation could develop in accordance with the 
Dniester region scenario, and the events in Estonia show that 
the formation of ethno-territorial formations in the areas of 
the compact residence of the Russian-speaking population in the 
northeast of the republic cannot be ruled out. It is perfectly 
obvious here that no government in Russia could remain 
indifferent were conflicts and clashes to begin between Russian 
speakers and Estonians on the border with Russia. 
  The problem of the Russian speakers in the Baltic has 
spotlighted one further important problem. The position of the 
United States and the West on this issue has largely influenced 
a change in the mood in Russia in the broadest political circles 
in relation to these countries. It has become obvious to many 
people that the problem of human rights and a commitment to the 
principles of respect for these rights are not for the West a 
universal fundamental line of behavior and that it was used 
merely against the Soviet Union, as American liberals of the 
left said, as an ideological stick to break up the Soviet 
Empire. The United States and Western countries have displayed 
an almost total disregard for the problems of the rights of the 
Russian speakers and have not lifted a finger to influence the 
nationalist governments of Latvia and Estonia. 
  Instead such strategists and analysts as H. Kissinger, P. 
Goble, and others have maintained in a number of publications 
and speeches at international conferences and seminars that the 
West's reluctance to take up in earnest the defense of Russian 
speakers in the Baltic is connected with the fact that Russia is 
allegedly artificially raising the problem of the Russian 
speakers, that this is camouflage for its real purposes, and 
that by using this factor it is attempting to restore the 
empire. Nor have Russian interests in the question of defense of 
the rights of the Russian-speaking population been supported 
within the UN or CSCE framework either. Mention should, of 
course, be made here also of the serious fault of the Foreign 
Ministry and Kozyrev, minister of foreign affairs, who has 
failed to properly convey to Western leaders the degree of 
importance of this question for the survival of the present 
leadership of Russia in the domestic political struggle. 
  During the discussion of these questions at a 
Russian-American conference in Moscow in September 1992, F. 
Fukuyama and S. Sestanovich expressed in conversation with me 
bewilderment at the opposition's unhappiness in connection with 
the West's policy and observed that if the West is not taking 
account of Russia's interests to the proper extent, this is 
largely explained by the fact that the Russian foreign policy 
department is formulating them and defending them insufficiently 
clearly in its contacts with its partners in the United States 
and West Europe. Kozyrev's belated bellicose statements have 
failed to bring about any serious changes in the positions of 
Western countries or the Baltic leaders. The action of the 
Council of Europe on acceptance of Estonia as a member of this 
organization was perceived as a slap in the face for Russia. 
  An angry letter to this organization sent by Minister 
Kozyrev 
in connection with Estonia's admittance as a member of this 
organization was not even vouchsafed the attention of leading 
circles of the Council of Europe, and Catherine Lalumiere, the 
chairman of this organization, observed ironically in the 
lobbies of the Council of Europe that this letter had been sent 
by Kozyrev mainly for domestic consumption in order that he 
might show himself in the eyes of the opposition to be a fighter 
for the rights of the Russian speakers in the Baltic. 
  This position has now alerted both moderate and centrist 
circles concerning the true aims of Western countries in 
relation to Russia. This position of the Western countries on 
the question of human rights appears particularly suspicious 
against the background of these countries' very great 
assertiveness on another key issue--the withdrawal of the troops 
from the Baltic. 
  Russia is experiencing on this matter constant pressure, the 
linkage of economic assistance with an acceleration of the troop 
withdrawal, and the activation of UN and CSCE mechanisms. 
  This position of the West cannot fail to evoke serious 
suspicions in Russia. The Baltic is a sphere of Russia's 
geopolitical interests. The Baltic countries have raised 
repeatedly the question of the possibilities of the creation of 
a Baltic-Black Sea commonwealth. These ideas have been supported 
by a number of influential strategists and politicians in the 
United States and in the West, and the departure of Russian 
troops from this region without determination of the future 
nature of this region and the fate of hundreds of thousands of 
the Russian-speaking population represents a difficult choice 
for Russia. 
  Even if a cordon sanitaire by way of the design of a 
Baltic-Black Sea commonwealth is not created, the calls of 
influential politicians in these republics concerning possible 
membership of NATO or the acquisition of some security 
guarantees from NATO are evoking serious suspicions in Russia. 
  It would seem to me that although there is much that has 
been 
let slip by the Russian leadership for a regularization of 
relations with the Baltic countries on questions of the civil 
rights of the Russian speakers, the status of the Russian 
troops, and the fate of the military bases, it is perfectly 
obvious that the position on all these matters even in the 
present government is becoming increasingly hard-line since 
doubts are appearing in Russia's political circles as to their 
Western partners' sincerity when it comes to considering 
Russia's geopolitical and military-strategic interests in this 
region and contributing in conjunction with Russia to the 
defense of the rights of the Russian speakers by the local 
authorities. The abrupt movements of the Baltic republics in 
these two key spheres, the rights of the Russian speakers and 
military-strategic matters, could cause a complication of 
Russia's relations with these republics, and the refusal of the 
United States and other Western countries to effectively 
demonstrate a regard for Russia's interests in this region would 
be a factor contributing to a growth of distrust of the United 
States and other Western countries as regards their true 
purposes and intentions in relation to Russia and would 
strengthen the position of those who advocate the restoration of 
the empire within the old borders. The Western countries still 
have an opportunity to influence the domestic political process 
in Russia and to support the present leadership and its domestic 
and, particularly, foreign policy. This opportunity is afforded 
them in the case of the Russian-Baltic contradictions and 
conflicts. No one is demanding of the Western countries the 
unequivocal defense of Russian interests. All that is required 
is the adoption of a position of equal distance from the parties 
to the conflict and a consideration of the interests of Russia 
as, still, a great power. 
<H5>  Central Asia </H5>
  The events unfolding on the Tajik-Afghan border and the 
tumultuous debate in the Russian press concerning Russia's 
possible policy in respect to this conflict and region in 
Central Asia as a whole has manifested once again the entire 
complexity and painfulness of the possible adoption by Russia of 
decisions of both a strategic and tactical nature. It seems 
obvious to many people that Russia has simply not defined its 
policy in relation to Central Asia and, in particular, in 
relation to the hottest point of this region--Tajikistan. Others 
believe that, following the events at the Moscow border post, at 
which Russian border guards died, Russia has at the very least 
formulated a certain strategy in respect to the region, meaning 
the statement of five states--Russia, Uzbekistan, Kazakhstan, 
Kyrgyzstan, Tajikistan, and Turkmenistan--on measures to 
stabilize the Tajik-Afghan border and the Declaration on the 
Inviolability of Borders, which records: the Tajik-Afghan border 
shall be deemed the border of the CIS and shall be defended 
collectively. 
  Perfectly justified opinions to the effect that Russia's 
chosen strategy at this stage in relation to the Tajik-Afghan 
conflict could in the future seamlessly pull Russia into an 
endless and bloody war with immense outlays of material and 
human resources without any chance of a propitious outcome of 
the war, defeat in which would result in catastrophe for the 
young Russian democracy and the market reforms, are being 
expressed also. The supporters of this view believe that Russia, 
with its allies in Central Asia, would not be in a position to 
hold the 1,400 km of the Tajik-Afghan border. 
  Having noted in brief the essence of the arguments "for" and 
"against" Russia's involvement in the conflicts in Central Asia, 
we should examine the factors that are prompting Russian 
analysts and politicians to support at this stage Moscow's 
decisions on the announcement of the Tajik border as the forward 
frontier of the CIS. It should be noted that, following the 
Russian parliament's ratification of the 1992 Tashkent 
Collective Security Treaty, the parties undertake to render one 
another military support in the event of any subscriber to the 
treaty being subjected to aggression or armed attack. 
  It is obvious that the prolonged misgivings of the Russian 
members of parliament and the reluctance to ratify this 
agreement were explained largely by fears that armed conflicts 
arising in "flash points" of the former Union between republics 
of the former Union that had signed the treaty with their 
neighbors, which would signify the automatic involvement of 
Russia in a war with the countries, contrary to its own wishes 
and interests, could not be ruled out. Although, on the other 
hand, the ratification of this treaty formalized de facto and de 
jure Russia's special claims to the role of guarantor and 
stabilizer of the geopolitical space of the former USSR and 
confirmed the opinion expressed by analysts and politicians that 
the entire space of the former USSR is a sphere of Russia's 
vital interests. 
  But, in my view, it is in respect to this region that the 
strategic aims and interests of Russia, including an 
understanding of this region as a sphere of Russia's vital 
interests, should have been more carefully considered. This 
region has, in my view, a number of particular features which 
demand closer analysis, after which the long-term and short-term 
foreign policy line in relation to it could have been finally 
formulated. 
  The supporters of Russia's more active presence in this 
region justify their position primarily by the presence there of 
millions of Russians. Let us briefly see how serious a problem 
this is in the long-term and short-term perspectives. Truly, as 
of this time Russians constitute more than 2.5 million persons 
in the countries of this region. It is obvious that the Russian 
population has no prospect of survival in these countries in the 
long term. According to the data of sociological studies, the 
level of migration mobility currently fluctuates, with the 
exception of Turkmenistan, between the extreme level--in 
Tajikistan--and a very high level--in Uzbekistan and Kyrgyzstan. 
This is explained by a number of factors: the danger to one's 
life on account of unconcealed military conflicts, the 
Islamization of the way of life, the deterioration in the 
conditions for career advancement and the possibilities of 
acquiring higher education for the nonindigenous population, and 
the qualification of the rights of the nonindigenous population 
in the process of privatization, the purchase of land, 
entrepreneurial activity, and the imparting of official status 
to the indigenous language, which is complicating the 
possibilities of the Russian and Russian-speaking population 
adapting to the changed conditions. 
  Aside from all this, mention should be made of one further 
very important fact. Historical experience shows that Russians 
accustomed to identifying with the Russian Empire and, 
subsequently, with the Soviet state also are not accustomed to 
finding themselves in the role of nonstate, nonindigenous 
nation. Having become overnight a nonindigenous nation in the 
"near abroad," deprived of direct state support, and, in 
addition, in a different cultural and linguistic environment, 
Russians, as a rule, display extreme inefficiency and an 
incapacity for rapid nonstate, spontaneous-social 
self-organization. This makes them highly vulnerable in a 
political and sociocultural respect even in the republics where 
their numbers are almost equal or only barely inferior to the 
indigenous nation. Such is the situation in Estonia, Latvia, and 
Kazakhstan. This is why it is not surprising that where they 
constitute up to 10-15 percent of the population they have 
practically no chance of organization of their ethnic group as 
an effective political force. 
  It should be considered here that in Central Asia, 
particularly, they are concentrated in urban industrial centers, 
inadequately interconnected, and, in fact, dissolved among the 
indigenous population. Thus with the disintegration of the USSR 
and the formation of independent states the Russian population 
has, by virtue of objective and subjective factors, been 
deprived of the possibility of an equal and full-blooded life in 
this region, as a consequence of which the vast majority of the 
Russian population will sooner or later leave Central Asia. 
Russians will hold on in this region merely in the event of the 
restoration of a unified state. But it is unlikely that the old 
totalitarian regime throughout the territory of the former USSR 
could be restored, and, on the other hand, even could this be 
done, it would hardly be worth Russia's while attempting to 
achieve this in the case of Central Asia. The demographic and 
ethno-cultural factors indicate that the 150 year-plus attempt 
of the Russian Empire and, subsequently, of the Soviet Union 
also to integrate this region and these peoples in a single 
linguistic and cultural space has failed. 
  If it is considered that in Russia today the demographic 
situation is highly disturbing on account of mortality exceeding 
the birthrate, it is obvious that, with the present rate of 
demographic growth of the Muslim population of Central Asia, 
radical changes in the demographic situation in favor of the 
non-Russian, primarily Muslim, population could be expected very 
quickly within the framework of a unified state such as was the 
USSR, which would create a serious threat of an intensification 
of an ethno-cultural and religious crisis within the framework 
of the unified state on account of the impossibility of the 
integration within the framework of a common language and 
culture of two nations roughly equal in terms of numbers, 
language, and religion: the Russian-Christian and the 
Turkic-Islamic. This is why, in my view, the defection from 
Russia of the four Central Asian republics means strategically 
in a sense the prevention of possible more serious problems for 
Russia and Russians. 
  Thus Russia should hardly in the long term be seeking the 
integration of this region in a given state with Russia on a 
federative basis, yet preserving here with the states of this 
region, of course, close economic and military-political 
relations. As far as the Russian and Russian-speaking 
nonindigenous population is concerned, a plan of special 
operations to provide for their move to Russia for the further 
strengthening of ethno-cultural unity and the improvement of the 
demographic situation in Russia should be drawn up even now. It 
is by no means obligatory to move the entire Russian-speaking 
population all at once. We should start by helping to fix up the 
approximately 200,000 Russians left in Tajikistan. This would 
afford Russia freedom of maneuver both in its operations in 
Tajikistan and for the immediate future throughout Central Asia. 
  The absence of the factor of the Russian population in 
Tajikistan would remove the problem of the guarding of the 
Tajik-Afghan border since the presence of Russia in this 
republic today signifies not its protection against aggression 
but direct involvement in a civil war, in which it will 
inevitably come up against the opposition of many close and 
distant contiguous Muslim countries. In my view, and this is 
borne out by specialists studying this region, the threat of 
Islamic fundamentalism both for Tajikistan and Central Asia as a 
whole and for Russia particularly is manifestly exaggerated. In 
my view, Russia's involvement in this conflict could only 
increase this threat. In actual fact, granted the preservation 
of Islamic traditions, there was nonetheless in the years of 
Soviet power in Central Asia a process of de-Islamization of 
this region. Even if the Islamists gain the ascendancy in 
Tajikistan, it would still take them a long time to re-Islamize 
the population and the way of life. 
  Re-Ismalization would by no means lead to the installation 
of 
aggressive and bellicose fundamentalism and the triumph of 
religious fanaticism. The process would most likely take a very 
long time and could take its natural course. The aggression of 
one state against another could be halted by a collective 
security treaty, but I doubt that it is possible via a system of 
collective security to intervene in a civil war on the side of 
one of the warring parties, even less prevent the spread of this 
religious idea and movement or the other. Russia has no reason 
today to involve itself in this enervating process, which is 
absolutely futile for it. In time, if fundamentalism really 
becomes the predominant trend in Central Asia, it will always 
have time to fence itself off from this threat, establishing new 
borders with the Central Asian countries. Until then the maximum 
form of Russian participation in the region could be exclusively 
the development of economic relations and the training of 
national armies and arms supplies, but under no circumstances 
participation in internal showdowns in these republics on this 
side or the other. 
  Since the process of re-Islamization, even if it occurs 
without serious resistance, will, for all that, take quite a 
long time, it will be possible in this time to withdraw the rest 
of the Russian and Russian-speaking population from the other 
Central Asian republics. True, when solving these two important 
questions: the nonparticipation of Russian troops in a civil war 
and the withdrawal of the Russian population from the region, 
Russia will have to resolve the problem of the protection of its 
geopolitical interests in this region. Neither individually nor 
together nor as a result of the acquisition of various 
configurations on account of the possible disintegration of 
Afghanistan along ethnic lines would the newly formed countries 
of Central Asia be in a position for a long time to come to 
seriously threaten Russia's interests. Unless some other 
contiguous regional superpower appears in this region and 
attempts to stabilize the situation, these countries themselves 
will be within the sphere of Russia's economic and 
military-political influence. 
  Russia will try here to harmonize interests and resolve 
conflicts both within these countries and between them. Without 
aiming to attract these countries into a given state, Russia's 
long-term strategy will at the same time quite clearly be to 
prevent the advance into this region of third countries aiming 
to become a dominating force. Russia will also prevent attempts 
at the possible enlistment of these countries in 
military-political and economic alliances with any other 
regional great power, be it Turkey, Iran, Pakistan, or another 
state. Russia has for this a sufficiency of both economic and 
military-political potential and diplomatic resources. 
  This is the sole region of those constituting the former 
USSR, perhaps, which Russia should keep in the sphere of its 
influence or as a neutral buffer zone to avoid the formation of 
some serious military-political alliance with the participation 
of third countries in what is for it the most vulnerable 
geopolitical zone--the southeast of the country. 
<H5>  The Transcaucasus </H5>
  The Caucasus region is a traditional political boundary and 
object of struggle for spheres of influence among Turkey, Iran, 
and Russia. In civilization terms the Caucasus is divided into a 
zone of predominantly Christian and a zone of Muslim 
orientation. The Transcaucasus and North Caucasus are divided 
into a zone of predominantly Christian and a zone of Muslim 
orientation. The Transcaucasus and North Caucasus represent a 
single geopolitical zone in which similar processes are 
occurring. The incorporation of the North Caucasus in the sphere 
of influence of Russia practically simultaneously brought about 
also Russian expansion in the Transcaucasus, which stopped at 
the natural boundaries of the southern spurs of the Lesser 
Caucasus and the River Araks. The displacement from these 
boundaries of Russia in the period of the 1917-1920 revolution 
entailed not only the defection of the Transcaucasus but also a 
loss of control over the entire Caucasus region, which was 
restored anew with the use of force in 1920-1921. The Caucasus 
represents a cultural, religious, and ethnic mosaic, and, beyond 
the control of the great powers bordering it, the peoples of 
this region, by virtue of their cultural and historical 
singularities, are unwilling to or cannot realize full 
integration. But the creation of independent states in the 
Caucasus outside of the system of influence of one of the great 
powers adjacent to the region is impossible also owing to the 
ethnic mix of the population, the small dimensions of such 
states, the limited economic potential, and the geopolitical 
isolation. 
  It is for this reason that the states of the Caucasus never 
in the visible past enjoyed full state independence and were 
always either part of the territory or vassals of Persia, 
Turkey, or Russia. 
  The incorporation of the Caucasus in the Russian state at 
the 
start and in the middle of the 19th century led to the rapid 
cultural development of practically all the peoples of the 
Caucasus and the conversion of the Caucasus into an economically 
prosperous region. At the start of the 20th century no political 
party in the Caucasus advocated separation from Russia but 
proposed merely this version or the other of cultural-national 
or territorial autonomy. Only the extremely unpropitious 
political situation and the victory of the communists in Russia 
forced the Caucasus peoples to proclaim their total independence 
of their northern neighbor. 
  The new forcible incorporation of the Caucasus in the Soviet 
Union was marked on the one hand by a continuation of the rapid 
economic and, to some extent, cultural development of the 
region, on the other, by the suppression of entire layers of 
cultural-national and religious consciousness and, what is 
particularly tragic, an attempt to wipe out entire peoples. In 
not one region of the communist world did mass deportation 
assume such proportions as in the Caucasus. The total disregard 
for the zones of settlement and ethno-cultural interests of the 
peoples who lived in the Transcaucasus when the internal 
administrative boundaries were drawn in the Soviet period 
increased the potential tension of conflict in this region. It 
was checked only by the totalitarian pressure of the Soviet 
state. And following the disintegration of communist statehood, 
the Caucasus was the first region of the USSR in which war 
erupted. 
  The economic prosperity of the Caucasus in the Soviet period 
was brought about for the most part by the natural-climatic 
character of the region, unique for the USSR, with borders 
practically closed to foreign trade in analogous commodities. 
  Heavy and manufacturing industry, which had been actively 
developed, was oriented entirely toward the all-Union market and 
satisfied only to a small extent the requirements of the 
Caucasus republics themselves. 
  The well-developed system of higher and specialized 
education 
produced considerably more skilled workers than was needed for 
the requirements of the Caucasus republics themselves. Thus the 
cultural and economic well-being of the region depended entirely 
on its connection with the remaining space of the USSR. And in 
the event of the severance of the Caucasus from the northern 
market, poverty, social inequality, and general economic 
degradation were just as inevitable as interethnic wars. 
  But the national elites, particularly the national 
intelligentsia, of the states of the Caucasus did not, for the 
most part, notice the danger connected with state independence. 
They assumed and were able to convince the people that the level 
achieved within the framework of the USSR would not only be 
preserved but would also be appreciably surpassed after the 
Caucasus peoples had detached themselves from Russia and united 
with peoples culturally and historically close to them. 
  Azerbaijan anticipated a conjunction with Turkey and, to a 
lesser extent, Iran, the small Muslim peoples of the Caucasus 
put their hopes in support from the Islamic world, and Armenia 
and hoped via the big national diasporas in the Western 
countries and the traditional orientation toward Europe to 
become a little Europe in the Transcaucasus. But from the very 
first steps national independence was doomed by all the 
above-identified sum of negative factors. Throughout the period 
1988-1993 the Caucasus rapidly became a zone of complete 
military opposition and conflict and an area of social disaster 
and the impoverishment of the populace down to levels 
incommensurable with other regions of the USSR. This evoked 
general disenchantment with the ideology of nationalism even in 
the leaders who, preaching it, had come to power at the time 
these states achieved independence. The more radical the mood of 
the national leaders, the greater the extent to which they lost 
the support of the populace when the consequences of the 
severance from Russia became obvious. The ouster of the 
Gamsakhurdia administration in Georgia in 1992 and that of 
Elchibey in Azerbaijan in 1993 is merely the most graphic 
testimony to this. 
  As far as Armenia is concerned, the leadership of this 
republic, confronted with the need for self-preservation under 
the conditions of the blockade and all-out war with Azerbaijan 
for Karabakh, saw earlier than the other countries of the 
Transcaucasus an orientation toward Russia as the sole 
possibility of survival. This explains the comparative weakness 
of the antigovernment mood in the masses of the Armenian 
population. Alternative political programs of a continuation of 
the detachment from Russia enjoy a certain support in the broad 
masses of the population of the Caucasus at this time only in 
the regions that remain within the Russian state (the republics 
of the North Caucasus). Where, on the other hand, separation 
from Russia has become a reality, anti-Russian orientations 
persist only with part of the national intelligentsia and the 
political elite, not being shared in practice by the people. 
Following the disintegration of the USSR, the Caucasus has 
proven to be an area of priority attention, primarily of the 
powers that have traditionally rivaled Russia for influence in 
this region. Both Iran and Turkey are making consistent efforts 
to establish their political and economic hegemony in the 
Caucasus. Two antagonistic world groupings can to a considerable 
extent be discerned behind these regional powers: behind Turkey, 
the Western world, behind Iran, the movement of Muslim 
fundamentalism. Aside from this, Western countries also have 
their own direct interests in the Transcaucasus. It may be 
assumed that a struggle for priority influence on Georgia, 
Armenia, and Azerbaijan between Germany on the one hand and the 
Anglo-Saxon countries on the other will unfold in the very near 
future. The United States is trying to play the part of neutral 
arbiter here in the conflict of interests in the Transcaucasus. 
The United States' aim of making democratic and West-oriented 
Turkey the leader in this region as a counterweight to Islamic 
fundamentalism, which is dangerous to the West and whose 
representative in the region is Iran, can be discerned here. All 
the foreign powers agree here that Russia, as a geopolitical 
force, should leave the Caucasus region. Russia should hardly be 
deceived by the constant statements of Western countries to the 
effect that they recognize Russia's interests in the 
Transcaucasus. 
  Considering Russia's special interests in this region, where 
it is directly or indirectly involved in all local conflicts, it 
will have to determine its priorities and defend them 
consistently to stabilize its southern borders and preserve its 
influence in the Caucasus. 
  The fact that the economies of these republics are fully 
tied 
to Russia and that the popularity of the idea of integration 
with Russia is growing among the population is of considerable 
significance here. 
  Considering that disintegration processes are at the present 
time increasing both in Azerbaijan and in Georgia (the virtual 
independence of Ajaria, Nakhichevan, Nagornyy Karabakh, 
Mengrelia, the Talysh region, and Lezgistan the Kurdish Sunni 
movement), in order to achieve stability and peace in this 
region Russia should establish itself as the guarantor of the 
national and territorial autonomy of these formations. Only 
observance of the rights of the small peoples and cultural 
communities guaranteed by Russia should permit the Russian 
authorities to guarantee and ensure the territorial integrity of 
these new states. The de facto federalization of Azerbaijan and 
Georgia is under way. The enshrinement of this situation de jure 
with Russia's guarantees could restore peace in this region. 
Such a federalized Caucasus would need for national and cultural 
self-preservation and economic and geopolitical stability close 
economic and military-political integration in the space of that 
particular one of the rival powers in the Caucasus which is able 
to the maximum extent to ensure political democracy and a 
dispassionate attitude toward the self-government of the 
national groups populating the Caucasus. 
  At the present time neither Turkey nor Iran, burdened with 
national and religious intolerance and also inclined toward 
authoritarian methods of statehood, could, obviously, ensure the 
minimum rights not only of the Christian peoples of the Caucasus 
but even of their same-faith Muslim peoples, with minorities of 
which both Turkey and Iran have big problems within their own 
borders (the population of South Azerbaijan, the Kurds of 
Turkey, and the North Caucasus peoples living in Turkey). Only 
Russia, built on the principles of a secular territorial 
federation and ensuring the rights of the peoples and religious 
groups as political aggregates, could be attractive to the 
Caucasus. Considering also the continued attachment of the 
Caucasus to Russia, the integration of a federalized Caucasus 
space together with the Russian Federation within the framework 
of the CIS would seem perfectly possible. It should be 
considered that the defection of the Transcaucasus from the CIS 
would inevitably signify a destabilization of the North Caucasus 
and the pushing back of the Russian border to the line of the 
Don and Volga estuaries, which would seem catastrophic for 
future of Russia. 
  The defection of the Caucasus (from the CIS or even its 
Muslim part alone) would afford an opportunity for the unimpeded 
advancement of Islamic hegemonism on the territory of Central 
Asia and Kazakhstan with its possible appearance in internal 
territories of Russia populated by peoples confessing Islam. 
Russia's active policy in the Transcaucasus and the integration 
of this entire region in the geopolitical space of the CIS, 
therefore, is of paramount significance for the stability of the 
entire Russian state both in the immediate future and in the 
long term. 
<H5>  Conclusion </H5>
  Summing up the analysis of the formation and evolution of 
Russia's foreign policy, policy in respect to the "near abroad" 
in particular, several very important conclusions may be drawn. 
  First, the process of the shaping of Russia's priorities 
both 
in relation to the "near abroad" as a whole and in relation to 
each country and region of the former Soviet Union is taking 
place with difficulty, in a conflict between different 
departments (particularly the Ministry of Foreign Affairs and 
the Ministry of Defense of the Russian Federation), in a debate 
between politicians and analysts, and in a confrontation of the 
corps of deputies and the executive. Centrifugal trends have 
given way to centripetal trends, and the return of all the 
former republics of the Union, other than the Baltic republics, 
within the CIS, the conclusion of the economic union, and the 
creation of the ruble zone and a common border by a number of 
republics testify that Russia is feeling its way toward general 
reference points of its policy in relation to the countries of 
the "near abroad." 
  Second, these countries will, by all accounts, occupy for a 
long time to come a special place in Russia's foreign policy, 
and the general yardsticks which are employed in an evaluation 
of the relations and the methods of the pursuit of the policy of 
Russia with countries of the "far abroad" could hardly be 
applied in respect to them. The common economic roots, the 
degree of integration of the economies and cultures, and the 
presence in a number of countries of common ethnic and religious 
roots make essential for Russia the pursuit of two types of 
foreign policy: one with countries of the "near abroad," the 
other, with those of the "far abroad." True, this by no means 
signifies that Russia would like to enshrine the transitional 
nature of relations with the former Soviet republics for all 
time. The two foreign policies of Russia will, most likely, be 
of a temporary nature. 
  The transitional nature of foreign policy with countries of 
the "near abroad" could last until the completion of the process 
of the formation of national states, detached from one another, 
in all 15 republics with the independent adaptation of these 
states in international economic and military-political 
structures or, on the other hand, as the result of an 
intensification of integration processes around Russia within 
the framework of the CIS, until the formation on the basis of 
these states of a new state, federative-confederative, possibly. 
  Until then Russia's policy in the "near abroad" will be of a 
particular, transitional nature incorporating not only the 
traditional diplomatic channels of interaction. 
  And, finally, Russia has clearly declared its special 
interests throughout the space of the former USSR, and the 
attempts of third countries to impede the processes of the 
integration of this space around Russia and the stabilization of 
the situation with its help in this space will be regarded by 
Russia as unfriendly actions in relation to it and could signify 
a complication of the Russian Federation's relations with these 
countries. The attempts of any countries whatever to become the 
guarantors of the evolved borders between the republics of the 
USSR and to hinder the natural and peaceful process of these 
countries' integration in a common economic and 
military-political union, hints at which are contained in 
publications that analyze shifts in the United States' foreign 
policy strategy in relation to Russia and the former republics 
of the USSR, could seriously complicate the process of the 
formation of the new world order and evoke misgivings in Russia 
as to whether the United States and its other partners in the 
West are seriously prepared to take account of Russia's 
geopolitical interests. The "near abroad" will in the very near 
future become the first proving ground of the durability of the 
partner relations between Russia and the United States and other 
Western countries and of the parties' readiness to understand 
and take stock of one another's vital interests. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42767 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> INTERSTATE AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Kozyrev's Policy Adviser Responds to Migranyan on FSU Policy </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944Q0152A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 19 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0152A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Open letter to A.M. Migranyan from Galina Sidorova, policy </F>
adviser to the minister of foreign affairs of Russia: "What 
Should Russia Be Doing in the Near Abroad?"] 
  [Text] Esteemed Andranik Movsesovich, henceforward I, like 
other readers of NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA of 12 January, know who 
saved Russia, its foreign minister, the Presidential Council, 
and the president himself from the great delusion, to which, as 
follows from your publication, all had succumbed simultaneously 
under the leadership of the Foreign Ministry. 
  The delusion or, as you go on to specify, the policy of 
Yeltsin and Kozyrev, was "expressed in relief" and "formed the 
basis of the report of Foreign Minister Kozyrev and Supreme 
Soviet Chairman Khasbulatov at a conference organized by the 
Foreign Ministry in February 1992 at the Moscow State 
International Relations Institute." 
  It, I quote from your article, "was that Russia should turn 
inward within the borders of the Russian Federation, leave all 
the former republics of the USSR, and not get pulled into 
interethnic and regional conflicts of the former Union..., 
thereby publicly having renounced all special rights and 
interests in the post-Soviet space." It is nice to know that 
there are people who are not afraid to assume responsibility and 
to open the eyes of the public. "I formulated for the first 
time," you boldly acknowledge, "the central idea which 
subsequently came to be determining in an understanding of 
Russia's role and place in the post-Soviet space among all 
leading politicians of Russia, from the president through 
Foreign Minister Kozyrev. It amounts to the fact that the entire 
geopolitical space of the former Soviet Union is a sphere of 
Russia's vital interests." 
  While not in the least disputing your contribution to the 
elaboration of policy in this most important field, I would like 
merely to call your attention to certain nuances which you 
either failed to hear or failed to read through to the end. 
  First, A.V. Kozyrev and R.I. Khasbulatov delivered, for all 
that, at the said conference not one common but each his own 
report. And whereas the chairman of the Supreme Soviet really 
did let slip that "Russia should not permit itself to be pulled 
into interethnic conflicts; even acting the part of arbiter on 
these issues on the territory of other countries of the CIS is 
dangerous for it for these issues are not resolved in a short 
historical period," the foreign minister in his speech (see the 
journal MEZHDUNARODNAYA ZHIZN, issue for March-April 1992) said 
literally the following: "The formation of the CIS occupies a 
special place in Russia's foreign policy. Here lies our 
paramount vital interest, if you will. Fundamental questions of 
Russia's reconstitution in the civilized world.... In this area 
also Russia will defend its interests firmly, `strictly,' where 
necessary, making use of all the opportunities available to us. 
Exclusively on a legal basis, of course.... Our special 
attention to human rights and to the rights of Russians, in the 
countries of the CIS included and in particular." And, further: 
"Understandably, the fate of the CIS will largely be decided not 
only in the European direction but in the south of the 
Commonwealth also. It is not a matter of indifference to Russia 
what kind of path the development of the former Union republics, 
now independent states, located there takes, who will influence 
this development and how...." 
  Second, I would also like to remind you, Andranik 
Movsesovich, of certain statements of the president pertaining 
to this time and also of some things that were said by A.V. 
Kozyrev both before and in development of the speech to which 
you refer. "Russia recognizes the full extent of its 
responsibility for the Commonwealth of Independent States 
becoming a ponderable factor of stability in the world" (from 
B.N. Yeltsin's speech at the top-level UN Security Council 
session on 31 January 1992). "The 25 million of our compatriots 
in these states must not and will not be forgotten by Russia.... 
An agreement on the creation of a peacekeeping force in the 
Commonwealth has already been signed within the framework of the 
CIS.... 
  "But the legal mechanisms of the formation and use of this 
force have yet to be worked out and legalized (the Supreme 
Soviet was in no hurry here--G.S.)" (from B.N. Yeltsin's speech 
at the Sixth Congress of People's Deputies of the Russian 
Federation of 7 April 1992). 
  "The Commonwealth is in the formation phase, which is 
proceeding in extremely painful and contradictory fashion. The 
position of our compatriots in the CIS countries.... will 
largely depend on how stable the Commonwealth is. It has to be 
frankly acknowledged that we are doing an inadequate job of 
protecting our compatriots as yet. At the same time, on the 
other hand, attempting to resolve such problems with the aid of 
force and ultimatums, via armed confrontation with the republics 
even more, as some people are proposing, is nothing other than 
political recklessness. Agreeing to this would mean knowingly 
putting our fellow citizens in the position of enemies and 
inciting an avalanche of violence against them" (which, 
unfortunately, we observed as a result of the activity of former 
Vice President Rutskoy in the Dniester region and in a number of 
other regions--G.S.) (from B.N. Yeltsin's speech at the Sixth 
Congress of People's Deputies of 21 April 1992). "The main 
priority of Russian diplomacy is the formation of the 
Commonwealth of Independent States.... We cannot deny ... the 
entire complex set of problems connected with the processes of 
the acquisition of independence by all of us. It is for this 
reason that a transitional period, which would make it possible 
to avoid a repetition of rash Bolshevik decisions and afford 
opportunities for the smooth transition of the totalitarian 
empire to a commonwealth of democratic independent states, is 
needed. 
  "Equality does not absolve Russia of its special 
responsibility entrusted to it by history" (from A.V. Kozyrev's 
article in IZVESTIYA of 2 January 1992). 
  "Essentially the CIS is the sole possible form of renewal of 
the Union, which you advocated in the historic Declaration of 
State Sovereignty.... The real choice, which we can and must 
make, is between the arduous and multistage process of formation 
of the CIS and continued uncontrolled collapse and the 
exacerbation of relations with neighbors, a choice between the 
addition brick by brick of a belt of good-neighborliness around 
Russia and the `Yugoslav option' of the hopeless and devastating 
use of force. 
  "...If we ourselves wish to live in a democratic state at 
the 
highest standard, we must build in exactly the same way also the 
relations with our neighbor CIS states without any allowances 
and without attempts to return to the idea that we have not yet 
matured to democratic standards. This does not, however, mean 
that we should not apply quite strict methods, power methods 
included, of the defense of Russian interests and human rights, 
on the contrary, it implies a mastery of such levers, but 
strictly in accordance with contemporary rules of international 
law and ideas. ... The fact that Russia is becoming firmly 
established in its integral statehood in the Commonwealth is 
also a factor of political reality" (from A.V. Kozyrev's speech 
at the Sixth Congress of People's Deputies of the Russian 
Federation of 18 April 1992). 
  "Two extremes--the reckless withdrawal of troops from the 
former Union republics, particularly Asia and the Transcaucasus, 
especially with provision not having been made for their new 
living arrangements, and, on the other hand, continuation of the 
present situation--cannot be allowed. The Foreign Ministry sees 
as the solution a base strategy on treaty principles. The main 
thing is that we simply cannot walk away from this historical 
geopolitical and humanitarian sphere of our vital interests and 
responsibility" (from A.V. Kozyrev's speech at the Council for 
Foreign Policy on 27 November 1992). 
  "It would be desirable for us to speed up and approve the 
submittal to the Supreme Soviet of the Russian Federation of a 
bill prepared by the Foreign Ministry and the Ministry of 
Defense and already approved by the Supreme Soviet Presidium on 
the principles and mechanisms of Russia's participation in 
peacemaking operations along CIS, CSCE, and UN lines" (which was 
not done--G.S.) (from A.V. Kozyrev's speech at an enlarged 
session of the International Affairs Committee of the Supreme 
Soviet of the Russian Federation on 26 January 1993). 
  Please excuse the lengthy quotation. But I would like to 
hope 
for a more attentive attitude toward what is actually being said 
and done by the Foreign Ministry on the part of experts and also 
the new parliament. For under the old one Smolenskaya Square 
missed a professional discussion about foreign policy not 
burdened by political games. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42768 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> INTERSTATE AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Evolution, Possible Variants of Ties to Central Asia Discussed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944Q0153A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 19 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0153A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yakov Plyays, doctor of historical sciences: </F>
"Russia and Central Asia: Evolution of the Foreign Ministry's 
Ideas on the Country's Interests in the Region"] 
  [Text] With the disintegration of the USSR and the 
formation of the CIS, an important new phenomenon has emerged in 
the world: the foreign policy and other relations between 
Commonwealth countries and also these countries' relations with 
the rest of the outside world. As experience shows, these 
relations are shaping up in complex and frequently dramatic 
fashion even. The priority relations within the CIS are those 
between Russia and its Commonwealth partners. It is Russia that 
is having to seek solutions and approaches that were never 
practiced formerly. 
  Of the overall directions of Russia's foreign policy which 
have been identified in the just over two years of the CIS' 
existence, and this means the Baltic, Belarus, Ukraine, the 
Transcaucasus, Central Asia, and, finally, interior regions, the 
most complex is the Central Asia direction. The further things 
progress, the more it is this region that is creating for Russia 
as a whole and for its Foreign Ministry in particular most 
complex problems. 
<H5>  Reasons for Russia's Interest in Central Asia </H5>
  Although this way of framing the issue does not at first 
sight seem all that warranted (the dramatic Russian-Ukrainian 
relations, the problems of the Transcaucasus republics, 
relations with the Baltic, and so forth immediately come to 
mind), it is, in my view, perfectly legitimate. For the 
following reasons, at least: 
  on account of the strategic importance of the Central Asia 
region for Russia. It has since ancient times been indisputable 
both from the military and economic and any other viewpoints; 
  on account of the growing penetration of Russia via Central 
Asia by Islamic extremism, which is fraught with the danger of 
the proliferation of weapons, social tension, and civil war 
throughout this space; 
  on account of the active development of the international 
and, particularly, religious ties of the states of Central Asia, 
which are reported regularly by the news media and which are 
already bearing certain fruit, and this is for Russia not only 
of positive significance (inasmuch as it is reducing its 
economic burden to a certain extent) but also negative 
significance: markets for the sale of its industrial products 
and raw material sources are narrowing, the most complex problem 
of hundreds of thousands of refugees is having to be resolved, 
and so forth. 
  There are more than sufficient examples showing that these 
ties are developing dynamically. And nothing bad should be seen 
in this (the Soviet republics should have had this opportunity 
since the time they emerged). It is important merely that the 
international ties not develop to the detriment of the CIS 
partners. Were, on the other hand, the strengthening of the 
independence of the countries of Central Asia, as also the 
development of their international relations, to be accompanied 
by a weakening of economic and other ties to Russia, this would 
for the latter be fraught with the emergence in the 
not-too-distant future of problems of the movement and 
demarcation of its borders, the division of contiguous 
territories, with Kazakhstan specifically, and so forth, the 
resolution of which would not only be incredibly complex but 
also fabulously costly and manifestly beyond the capacity of the 
thoroughly undermined Russian economy. Such a version of the 
development of events cannot, unfortunately, be ruled out, 
particularly if we bear in mind the trend toward the regional 
exclusiveness of the Central Asian states, which was manifested 
shortly after the signing of the Belovezha Agreement and which 
has clearly intensified in recent months, particularly in the 
course of Russia's maladroit maneuvers around the creation of a 
common ruble zone. 
  Speaking of the reasons for Russia's attraction to and 
interest in the Central Asia region, the reverse interest has to 
be seen also. But the reasons for this interest are now far from 
what they were not so long ago. Thanks primarily to Russia, 
these countries have not only risen to a new level of 
development but, and this is the main point, have acquired a new 
national self-awareness and become, it may be considered, quite 
modern nations with a highly developed sense of national pride. 
It follows from this that they are considerably more capable of 
defending their own interests than before. But militarily their 
dependence on Russia and the common defense system is, as 
before, great, if not absolute. But is this the main dependence? 
Has not the economic aspect become more important than the 
military aspect for the modern state? 
  The said reasons are today, generally, recognized by the 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs of Russia. This is clearly indicated 
by, specifically, the interviews of former deputy foreign 
ministers Georgiy Kunadze, who was until recently in charge of 
this area, and Anatoliy Adamishin, who also dealt with problems 
of Central Asia (see NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA of 29 and 30 July 1993). 
  If there really is understanding (and this is not to be 
doubted), to what extent is the present practical policy of the 
Foreign Ministry in the Central Asia direction adequate to the 
country's interests? In addition, how has Foreign Ministry 
policy in respect to Central Asia in the years of Russia's 
independence evolved? 
<H3>  Evolution of the Foreign Ministry's Views on Relations With 
the Countries of Central Asia </H3>
  The evolution of the views of the Foreign Ministry has been 
expressed primarily in the actions of this institution and also 
in the change of opinions of its leaders. 
  Let us see how it has occurred. 
  A month after the August (1991) putsch, when there was still 
a Union Foreign Ministry, Andrey Kozyrev, head of the Russian 
foreign policy department, said that the foreign policy 
interests of the Russian state should be subordinated to the 
historical mission of the conversion of Russia "from a dangerous 
sick giant of Eurasia into a participant in the Western 
coprosperity zone." As the sovereignty of the republics 
strengthened and centrifugal sentiments grew, particularly in 
October-November 1991, the position of the Russian head of the 
foreign policy department underwent pronounced changes. While 
continuing to maintain that "the pointer still moves toward the 
United States, West Europe, and Japan," that is, toward the most 
developed Western countries, Kozyrev at the same time defined 
the first circle of Russia's interests horizontally--the 
sovereign states situated on the territories of the former Union 
republics. 
  Despite the fact that by the start of 1992 the Ministry of 
Foreign Affairs of Russia, as, most likely, the Russian 
leadership as a whole, had a general idea of how to build 
relations with the former Union republics, this cannot be said 
in respect to Central Asia. 
  The misunderstanding of Russia's new policy in this region 
was directly reflected in the work of our embassies in the 
Central Asian states. Immediately after they had been opened, in 
the fall of 1992, they encountered a multitude of problems--a 
lack of both official and residential premises and a clear 
understanding of the specific missions and directions of work. 
It was for this reason also, I believe, that Filipp Sidorskiy, 
ambassador of the Russian Federation in Uzbekistan, termed the 
near abroad "a zone of risk-fraught diplomacy." 
  The situation was complicated by the fact that the Russian 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs had not up to a certain point (when 
things became hot on the Tajik-Afghan border and when the threat 
of the penetration of Russia by Islamic extremism had become 
real) paid sufficient attention to the Central Asia problem. 
Prior to the events on the border, the attitude of the Ministry 
of Foreign Affairs of Russia toward this region had been 
manifestly different. The business of Minister Kozyrev's tour of 
Central Asia, which was interrupted on 8 April of last year, is 
highly indicative in this respect. 
  Up to a certain point (until the spring-summer of 1992) the 
Central Asia direction had been discerned in only very nebulous 
fashion in the Foreign Ministry's activity as an independent 
direction and could be viewed merely in the context of Russia's 
general policy in relation to the CIS members. This policy 
proceeded, in my view, mainly from the fact that, following the 
acquisition of independence, each Commonwealth country was 
required to arrange its destiny independently and least of all 
from the fact that the monolithic nature of the former Soviet 
Union excluded immediate and, in addition, uncoordinated steps 
of its individual members, albeit former, inasmuch as they would 
certainly be detrimental to the rest. 
  In this period the Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs 
pursued, in my view, two main missions: the first: furthering 
Russia's entry into the circle of the world's most developed 
states; the second: contributing to the formation of a viable 
commonwealth of former Soviet republics. 
  Having very soon convinced itself that accomplishing these 
two missions was extraordinarily difficult (to put it no more 
strongly), the Russian Ministry of Foreign Affairs switched, 
under the pressure of circumstances, to a resolution of specific 
problems in defined areas. It was at this time that both the 
Russian-Central Asia direction and the particular Tajik 
direction took shape. This stage, like the preceding one, did 
not, in my view, last long: just several months--from 
spring-start of summer 1993 through September of the same year. 
  Having convinced itself that it was difficult to achieve any 
positive results in these directions also, the Russian Ministry 
of Foreign Affairs adopted a policy of the formation of a closer 
alliance of the former Soviet republics. An important moment in 
the realization of this policy were the negotiations of the 
heads of state of the CIS in Ashgabat on 23-24 December 1993 
devoted to the creation of an economic union, in the main. It 
may be assumed that subsequent efforts also will develop in this 
direction. 
  What kind of new relations should Russia have with the 
countries of Central Asia in this case? 
<H3>  Possible Versions of the Development of Russian-Central 
Asian Relations </H3>
  In deciding the question of relations with the countries of 
Central Asia, Russia should on the one hand not lose sight of 
that to which these countries aspire and the kind of development 
model that will, most likely, take with them and, on the other, 
that to which Russia itself aspires and its development model. 
Nor can the external orientation of this model or the other be 
forgotten either. 
  Even now the differences are very appreciable and will, of 
course, be even greater. A great deal follows from this both for 
Russia and for the Central Asian states. 
  What are the possible versions of the development of the 
situation? They are, in my view, three. 
  1. The situation develops in accordance with the scenario 
that is predominant at this time. Russia endeavors to 
restructure its social and political and economic system in a 
Western, monetarist key, whereas the Central Asian states will 
try to realize something akin to the Chinese development model 
with all its attributes. The parties will move further and 
further away from one another here. Sooner or later this will 
inevitably signify the need for a solution of the problems of 
borders, including new borders for Russia, and the problem of 
disputed territories both between Russia and these states and 
between the Central Asian states themselves. Unless it is 
forgotten that there have never been precisely drawn borders 
here, it may be confidently maintained that it will hardly be 
possible to avoid most serious conflicts and a big war. If we 
add to this the expansion of Islamic extremism and the tension 
that accompanies this process, we could arrive at the perfectly 
definite and clear conclusion that this tragic version suits 
neither Russia itself, nor the countries of Central Asia, nor 
the entire world community as a whole. And inasmuch as it is 
this version that is currently predominant, Russia should do as 
much as it can to interrupt this development of events. 
  2. Russia "adapts" its development to the development of the 
countries of Central Asia, that is, takes as the basis a 
likeness of the Chinese model. In my view, this was possible up 
to August 1991, more precisely, before the middle of 1990. But 
this is now no longer possible. And not only because there is no 
unified force regulating the processes of social development but 
also because the parties have already gone quite far in their 
separate ways. 
  3. Russia does not copy the Western countries but develops 
in 
accordance with its own salient features as a Eurasian state, in 
a close alliance with the countries of Central Asia, creating 
which is as yet still possible. At a price of considerable 
mutual concessions, it is true. There is no other way. Russia is 
condemned to this path, if it wishes to avoid a great tragedy. 
The sooner and more assuredly this version is implemented, the 
better it will be for all. But we are already late, and this is 
leading to growing losses. 
  A voluntary alliance of Eurasian states created on the 
territory of the former USSR would not only halt the present 
destructive processes in this space but also avert a catastrophe 
of immense proportions. 
  But events are as yet, unfortunately, developing mainly 
according to the first scenario, from which it follows that it 
is the Central Asia direction that is potentially the most 
dangerous for Russia. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42769 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr013___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-013 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> INTERSTATE AFFAIRS </F>
<F P=101></F>
<H3> <TI>     Conflict Over Crimea Seen Possible </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0626A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 22 Jan 94 pp 
1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0626A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Nikolay Gonchar, Federation Council member, </F>
under the "Russia and Ukraine" rubric: "Situation in the Crimea: 
"The Center Line or the Frontline; on a Possible Variant of the 
Development of Events"] 
  [Text] A lot seemed utterly unrealistic and fantastic not 
very long ago. Few could have conjectured that Armenia would be 
at war with Azerbaijan and the Dniester region with Moldova, 
that the mojahedin would destroy Russian border posts, that war 
would ruin and plunder prosperous Yugoslavia.... 
  Today, we are on the threshold of yet another conflict, 
which 
in scale could surpass all of the others that we have seen thus 
far. What is in question is Crimea. 
  It is said: "If you want peace, prepare for war." The people 
in Crimea want peace very much. The tension is growing rapidly. 
The noise of the engines of military vehicles can be heard 
behind the reports of the first round of the presidential 
elections in Crimea. Thirty-eight percent of the votes received 
by Yuriy Meshkov, the leader of the Republican Party and a 
supporter of Crimean independence, against 17 percent of the 
votes for Nikolay Bagrov, the chairman of the Supreme Council of 
Crimea, established the two candidates of the second round of 
elections. In the second round on 30 January, Meshkov could 
receive another 30 percent--the votes of other candidates who 
came out for the actual secession of Crimea (in one or another 
form) from the structure of Ukraine. But Ukraine does not plan 
to give Crimea to anyone anywhere. 
  In this situation, an inevitable worsening has already 
started, and it is dangerous, because it makes it possible for 
various political forces to play the "Crimean card" for their 
own interests. I picture the situation in Crimea sufficiently to 
declare: The very first spilled blood will create a prolonged 
conflict from which Russia will be unable to stand aside. The 
marking off is already actually not from the "center line," but 
from the frontline. 
  The presidential elections have already given one important 
result: The referendum of 1991, when a majority of Crimeans 
expressed themselves for locating the peninsula in the structure 
of Ukraine, has already passed into history. 
  The increase in pro-Russian attitudes is fully explained by 
the well-known difficulties of the Ukrainian economy, the 
coupon-ruble exchange rate, and also by a rejection of some of 
the actions of Ukrainian authorities by an appreciable part of 
the population of the peninsula. It is the increase in 
pro-Russian attitudes that is making the worsening of relations 
between Moscow and Kiev very probable and that is creating the 
possibility of an acute political crisis in both Russia itself 
and in Ukraine. 
  The actions of a politician depend on the conditions in 
which 
he is placed. As "a candidate in independent" Crimea, he will 
inevitably be subjected to pressure on the part of Kiev. It 
cannot be otherwise, because even President Kravchuk and the 
Ukrainian Government will end up in their turn under the 
pressure of nationalists who also have sufficient strength for 
their own actions on the peninsula. But because each action 
gives rise to a counteraction, the answer will be a further 
increase in sympathy for Russia, right down to direct appeals 
for "reunification." 
  Not one president who might be elected to this post will be 
able to ignore the will of the people. Only a very mature 
politician in this situation will be able to "pass over a 
blade," without tearing the status quo with one striking but 
incorrect step. There are a lot of opportunities for such steps, 
including those capable of directly influencing the situation in 
Russia. 
  It is possible to let the situation go a little further and 
simultaneously to appeal to President Yeltsin and to the State 
Duma with a request to examine the question and accept Crimea 
into the Russian structure. After the president most likely 
answers "No," the Duma will express itself somewhat differently, 
and some parties will habitually deploy a detail of volunteers 
to Crimea. When there is the smell of a big war with a nuclear 
Ukraine (in fact) that is not badly armed overall (at the 
expense of the Soviet Army), the president could be faced with 
the choice: the Duma or war. And what is he supposed to choose? 
  It is reassuring that the leaders of Crimea and the leaders 
of Russia understand all of this perfectly well. But under what 
conditions will they operate? No kind of common sense and 
political experience will withstand "the pressure of interests" 
that are reinforced by the demands of the voters. 
  Crimea is tied to Ukraine and to Russia with a thousand 
invisible threads. It is necessary to be aware that there are 
those for whom a conflict is advantageous. Someone is already 
hoping to make money on the supplies of weapons and equipment, 
to profit on food and medicine, to extract a triple price for 
transporting refugees, and so on. All of this has already 
happened in "hot spots." 
  Interests can be confronted only by other interests. Indeed, 
it was only several years ago that no one believed that Georgia 
would be at war with Abkhazia, but, after all, neither was it 
believed there would be a unified Europe or that the Berlin Wall 
would be destroyed. There is also a solution to the "Crimean 
question." It is very complicated, but there cannot be a simple 
solution here. The solution is not only for Crimea to go 
halfway, but also for Russia as a whole. Rapprochement is the 
only alternative to confrontation. The only alternative to 
Russian-Ukrainian confrontation (if not because of Crimea, 
another reason will be found) is a Russian-Ukrainian union. 
First and foremost, an economic union. Its pluses are apparent 
to many in Ukraine: Almost 90 percent of the oil and 70 percent 
of the gas come from Russia, many Ukrainian goods are already 
squeezed out of the Russian market (even Ukrainian sugar is more 
expensive than Cuban sugar), and the rate of exchange of the 
coupon to the ruble speaks for itself. 
  The economic union has a lot of supporters and opponents--in 
both Russia and Ukraine. The "opponents" in Kiev talk about the 
inevitable loss of independence in the event of a union. The 
"opponents" in Russia--about Ukraine's sponging and the state 
charity at the expense of the taxpayer.... 
  There are very many different aspects to any form of 
economic 
cooperation (more so with a union). Actually, the Ukrainian 
economy today is more seriously disorganized than the Russian 
economy. However, very soon the inevitable sharp increase in the 
rates of inflation in Russia (which have already started) are a 
reminder that Ukraine, nonetheless, is a fraternal country and 
that the ruble, nonetheless, is closer to the coupon than to the 
dollar or to the mark. Given the increasing rates of inflation, 
many will stop being frightened by "subsidization" of the 
economies of the countries of the former USSR. 
  In any case, the variants of a possible development of 
relations of Ukraine and Russia today lie between two extremes: 
from confrontation all the way to military conflict and an 
economic union with a unified monetary system, "transparent" 
borders, and so on. The question is what is more advantageous 
and what responds to the interests of the parties more. 
Yugoslavia received its experience, and even in a purely 
economic sense does not speak in favor of war. 
  Under our conditions, it is not only the economy that 
determines policy, but also vice versa. Life has shown that the 
breakup of the country is capable of bringing political 
dividends. The practical question rests on how to make an 
economic union politically advantageous to its supporters. Up 
until now, all of the technology of mutual relations in the CIS 
proved its unsuitability. All of the countries of the 
Commonwealth and the new abroad are at a very complicated stage: 
Without new political technologies and operational developments, 
all that will be left will be to discuss questions of 
humanitarian assistance with the West. 
  Discussions about the fact that "Russia is the first among 
equals" are simply not technological. Ideas are needed that 
would set the beginning of an evolution in a new direction. The 
balance of interests must show in precisely what direction. But 
whatever this direction is--today it is a direction away from 
the frontline. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42770 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94001" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   ZAVTRA Writers on State Duma, Zhirinovskiy </TI></H3>
<H4>   Limonov Calls Zhirinovskiy `Enemy of Russian Nationalism' </H4>
<F P=102> 944F0296A Vladimir ZAVTRA in Russian No 1, Jan 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0296A </F>
<F P=104>  Vladimir ZAVTRA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Eduard Limonov: "The First Grenade"] </F>
  [Text] Every hand grenade expresses only the opinion 
of the person who throws it. 
  I concluded my report in GAZETA DUKHOVNOY OPPOZITSII for 1-7 
October with the words "We have placed our soldiers under the 
command of deputies of the Supreme Soviet. Be worthy of our 
soldiers." 
  In the recent elections we nationalists were again forced to 
place our soldiers under alien commanders because our parties, 
organizations, and commanders were eliminated from the 
competition even before the elections--by the tanks of October. 
By the ban on the activity of our parties. By the Central 
Electoral Commission in November, with its magnifying glass 
checking the signatures of "our people" while their people were 
not checked. We were defeated again by the perfidy and treachery 
of our allies. And, of course, by our own disagreements. No 
unified Russian nationalist bloc was ever organized. 
  Because of the absence of nationalists on the ballots, the 
winners were those who resemble them: the pink (essentially 
social-democratic) party of Zyuganov, the Communist Party of the 
Russian Federation, and Zhirinovskiy's "jurist" party. Again 
Russia has a parliament without a Russian national party. And no 
other party can raise the spirit of the Russian people, inspire 
them to enthusiasm so that the people will raise Russia out of 
the ruins. We cannot get by without a national revolution. 
Without a strong national Russian party (it will lead the 
national revolution-revival) the country will not rise up, and 
the Russian nation will not survive. 
  In the next few months Russia can expect rounds of fruitless 
struggle between President Yeltsin and company, on the one hand, 
and "jurist" and company, on the other, supported by Zyuganov. I 
say "fruitless" because a victory for Yeltsin in this struggle 
would be a defeat for nationalist forces and a victory for 
Zhirinovskiy would also be a defeat for us. Yeltsin has proved 
himself. 
  But Vladimir Volfovich is a populist, a clever manipulator, 
and he is just as close to the Russian people as the humorist 
Zvenetskiy, but he is just as removed from them as Borovoy. 
Zhirinovskiy on the political scene is a slap in the face of the 
Russian people and Russia. Is it really not degrading that a 
former activist of the Jewish movement (my article in NOVYY 
VZGLYAD, No. 117, and L. Aleynik's article in RUSSKOY MYSL for 
15 January 1993) with a focus on Odessa informs us from the 
television screens of his plans to protect Russians? 
  In essence Zhirinovskiy is a successful Borovoy and Borovoy 
is a failed Zhirinovskiy. A smart political operator, 
Zhirinovskiy is dangerous not only because of his alleged 
"fascism" but also because of the fact that it will take time 
for the country to figure out that he is another False Dmitriy. 
(It took me seven months after I first heard of him.) 
Zhirinovskiy is an enemy of Russian nationalism, he is merely 
using Russians and the Russian people for personal ends. 
  Russian nationalists must get rid of their illusions today. 
We must understand that an alliance with anybody at all will be 
fatal to the nationalists. We have no allies. And we have never 
had any. It seemed to us that we had them. Zyuganov's pink 
communists cast us, their allies, aside as soon as they believed 
that they could function as an independent force. The first to 
be convinced of their treachery was Alksnis: Back before the 
elections to the Supreme Soviet of Russia the Communist Party of 
the Russian Federation promised him their support but they ran 
their candidate against him. Baburin has also experienced the 
love of these allies. And during the last elections I had 
occasion to feel in my bones how they really felt about me. And 
I was a true fellow traveler of the communists. 
  Enough, gentlemen, from now on the national movement will 
act 
independently, and you have proved that you are not our friends. 
You are protecting your own interests. Thank God our paths will 
part here. The pink communists will go their way and we 
nationalists will go ours. It is a pity that this did not happen 
sooner. We have spent so much time trying to gain your favor and 
support instead of building our own powerful national party of 
Russians, of Russia! We walked side by side with you and we sang 
the same song. 
  But during those black days it turned out that we were your 
brothers but you were not ours! Well, and so we part. We will no 
longer increase your ratings by exposing our boys to bullets. 
After all, who actually defended the Supreme Soviet and your 
freedom and ours along with it? Who, which organization left 
more bodies there, in the White House? Who went to storm 
Ostankino with their bare hands? 
  Your people were not there, Messrs. Zhirinovskiy and 
Zyuganov! The boys who were there were from the nationalist 
parties and groupings, the ones you shunned like relatives from 
the sticks and did not invite (or invited through clenched 
teeth) to your endless meetings. The nationalist youth defended 
the Supreme Soviet, Khasbulatov, and Rutskoy with their blood. 
The army did not come to their defense, the Ministry of Security 
did not come to their defense, but the nationalists, forgetting 
recent offenses (have Rutskoy and Khasbulatov been branded 
nationalist-"fascists" for long!), they came to their defense. 
  But we will come no more. Figure it out for yourselves. We 
will function as an independent force. And against you, just as 
we are against Yeltsin. If your blood is destined to be shed, 
let it spill on the unshakeable eternal ideals of the Russian 
nation and the Russian state. 
  I am confident that among the nationalists there are people 
who will want to draw lessons from the October tragedy and the 
tragedy of the elections (and this was a tragedy too) and they 
will insist on the previous alliances and the typical 
compromises. But there will not be many of those. The appearance 
of a powerful new nationalist movement is inevitable. Russia has 
no future without a national Russian party. Without such a party 
the False Dmitriys will replace one another, competing for 
power, and Russia will die. And it is dying. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42771 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94002" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   ZAVTRA Writers on State Duma, Zhirinovskiy </TI></H3>
<H4>   Nationalist, Communist Deputies on Duma </H4>
<F P=102> 944F0296B Vladimir ZAVTRA in Russian No 2, Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0296B </F>
<F P=104>  Vladimir ZAVTRA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Comments by Duma members recorded by N. Mikhaylov: "Our Men </F>
in the Duma: Impressions, Opinions, and Assessments From 
Deputies Expressed After the Opening of the Yeltsin Parliament"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Aman Tuleyev, Deputy of the Federation Council </H5>
  I did not want to go to the elections knowing that they were 
illegal. But still they were elections in which the people had 
the right to vote, and I entered my candidacy. Why? In order to 
appear here again, in Moscow, and tell the executive power: You 
drove me away with tanks but I returned. I returned not by my 
own wish. The people sent me--80 percent of all the voters of 
the Kuzbass. I represent their interests, and I ask that you not 
consider me--policy must be corrected for them and at their 
behest. 
  My word of honor, right up until the first session of the 
Federation Council I thought the bureaucrats would look out from 
the Kremlin and Old Square at me and others like me and declare: 
We are beginning to adjust our political course. We respect the 
will of the voters who voted for a multitude of candidates from 
the opposition and we are making a commitment to cooperate with 
them. Well, you cannot go on endlessly with the same old song 
and dance, which nobody wants to hear either in Siberia or 
outside the Moscow Ring! It turns out that they can. 
  The regulations had not even been worked out properly before 
the democrat Chernichenko demanded from the main microphone: We 
must elect a chairman of the Federation Council--the world is 
waiting. And they began to elect one. Shumeyko's candidacy never 
got off the ground. And that same Chernichenko was turning 
himself inside out: The repeat vote had to be postponed. The 
world immediately stopped waiting for the chairman to appear 
because it was necessary to lobby the deputies so that they 
would look more favorably on Shumeyko. 
  I did not see how they twisted the arms of the deputies who 
were hanging from the administrative hook. But I heard many 
times: After Shumeyko had received 81 votes, and Romanov 79, 
there were endless negotiations and dinner parties with the 
deputies whose positions depended on the president and the 
government. And the next day 17 more votes were cast for 
Shumeyko. 
  The executive power drew no conclusions from the results of 
the elections. Yeltsin's people grabbed tightly onto the 
steering wheel, they do not intend to let anyone else get near 
it, and they do not wish to turn in the direction of common 
sense. I place my hopes in just one thing: There are quite a few 
intelligent people in the Federation Council, including those 
who have been granted power in the regions. And perhaps, taking 
advantage of their deputy mandates, they will at least change 
something in the country. 
<H5>  Anatoliy Lukyanov, Deputy of the State Duma </H5>
  I can see how little power the Duma has. I know how many 
people want to stand in the way of its work. But I do not feel 
pessimistic. The Duma did not end up in anyone's pocket. Judging 
from the first days, the authorities should not count on 
subduing it. That is the first thing that consoles me. And the 
second thing is that the Duma, while elected according to 
principles of purely Western parliamentarianism, did not abandon 
the traditions of domestic democracy. 
  I came to politics when Molotov was still alive and well. 
Much of our history is stamped on my memory. I can say that not 
everything in it was bad and not everything needs to be 
repudiated. The Duma has preserved the merits of the Soviet 
system--the connection between the deputies and the labor 
collectives, the use of the voters' mandate, and the possibility 
of interaction among the deputies regarding territorial and 
branch interests. But at the same time the Duma is a completely 
new institution of power for us, where group and party interests 
"rule the roost." I will not try to predict whether or not this 
peculiarity will play a favorable role. But I think it is absurd 
to find fault with the Duma and revile it from its very first 
steps, as the democratic press is doing. The Duma should be 
allowed to stay and work peacefully. 
<H5>  Yuriy Lodkin, Deputy of the Federation Council </H5>
  I was dismissed from the position of head of administration 
of Bryansk Oblast the night before the House of Soviets was 
fired upon. Let me emphasize: I was dismissed by an edict from 
Yeltsin even though he did not appoint me; I was elected by all 
the population of Bryansk Oblast. Since then I have been unable 
to get a minute of air time either on oblast radio or on 
television. The elections gave me the opportunity to have a 
rostrum--to speak on the air and to meet with people. And for me 
there was no question as to whether or not to participate in the 
elections. 
  But after becoming a deputy to the Federal Assembly I still 
think that the Federation Council and the State Duma are 
temporary parallel organs of representative power along with the 
now banned Congress of People's Deputies and the Supreme Soviet. 
To forget about their existence and about the way they were 
removed from the political scene would mean to legitimize 
arbitrary rule. 
  I thought that the meetings of our chamber, like the 
meetings 
of the State Duma, would begin with a detailed report on the 
results of the referendum on the new Constitution. The figures 
from this referendum for the various regions have not been made 
public yet and, consequently, it has not been confirmed that 
there was no falsification when the votes were counted in the 
Central Electoral Commission. 
  But we have not managed to raise the question of verifying 
the referendum in the chamber. They immediately began dividing 
up portfolios, and in an unpardonable way. Just look at the 
attempt to count Galazov's telegram as a vote in favor of 
Shumeyko. 
  The executive power has obtained the main post in the 
Federation Council. But I do not think that it will control it 
completely and therefore I expect that fairly soon a campaign 
will begin to defame the new deputy corps. And actually it has 
even already begun. 
  As I was riding to the first meeting I heard on the radio in 
the bus: $500 million has been allotted for the construction of 
a new parliament center. How wonderful! They have not yet 
managed to find $60 million to build a medical rehabilitation 
center for the eight oblasts that were contaminated with 
radiation from the Chernobyl disaster. But for the parliament 
center--help yourself. 
  Listen, you sick and dying residents of Bryansk, your Deputy 
Lodkin will be living and working in comfort while you are 
quietly dying. From the very first days the deputies have been 
acting like parasites, eating up the people's money. But will 
this continue? 
<H5>  Yuriy Vlasov, Deputy of the State Duma </H5>
  The authorities did not get the State Duma they planned to 
get. And now it is becoming clear that they will try to bury the 
Duma. From the first days it was clear: The government faction 
Russia's Choice are not at all squeamish about dragging out, 
artificially complicating, and stultifying the work of the 
chamber. What next? The democratic deputies will go over the 
structures of executive power and start eating away at the Duma. 
It is now written in the draft regulation that the chamber's 
decisions will be made by half of its members. And I hope that 
the Duma will avoid the kind of legitimized depopulation that 
befell the Supreme Soviet and Congress of People's Deputies. 
  In my opinion there are many strong and intelligent people 
in 
the Duma. The opposition factions and the deputy groups are 
fairly heterogeneous. But regarding the major issues their 
interests converge, and the Duma can solve the problems facing 
it. And, without ingratiating themselves to the now almighty 
executive power, it is important to preserve and protect the 
Duma, for its existence is our guarantee of freedom of speech 
and protection from arbitrary behavior and theft by the new 
democratic nomenklatura. 
<H5>  Petr Romanov, Deputy of the Federation Council </H5>
  During the first two days, when I was running for the post 
of 
chairman of the chamber, along with Shumeyko, I was frequently 
asked whether, if elected, I would be in conflict with the 
government. I answered: I am against confrontation with anybody. 
I came to the Federation Council to fight "for"--for a normal 
course of reforms. And I think I and other deputies of the 
Federation Council still have a chance to do this, regardless of 
who heads up the chamber. 
  I began my work biography as a laborer and became the 
manager 
of an extremely large combine, having climbed all the steps on 
the career ladder at my enterprise. I did my work to the glory 
of the great Russian weapon during the years of the so-called 
stagnation, and I am doing it now as well. After the reduction 
of the defense orders our combine mastered the production of 
several kinds paints and industrial lighting items and created 
large shops for producing furniture. On the territory of the 
combine we have 37 bath houses and 10 swimming pools for the 
workers, we have 40,000 rose bushes, and we breed sturgeon. 
  I am mentioning all this in order to say that it is not one 
system or another that decides everything. The people and their 
ability to work decide everything. Therefore I am against all 
kinds of jumps and leaps and about-faces, which can create 
nothing but interference with normal work. 
  I am confident that my viewpoint is shared by all who are 
doing their work and answering for its results. And there are 
quite a few of these people in the Federation Council. It has a 
chance to do something so that we can stop trembling from shock 
therapy and so that the responsible producer will be protected. 
But a very great deal will depend on who is in charge of the 
chamber's activity, who is sitting on both sides of the 
chairman, and who occupies the chairs of the committee 
leaders--theoreticians with rosy pie-in-the-sky ideas or 
practical people with immense work experience. Everything is 
being decided by the cadres now. 
<H5>  Aleksandr Nevzorov, Deputy to the State Duma </H5>
  There are more of our people in the Duma. Our people are 
smarter and stronger. But those who oppose the opposition are 
pure hooligans who see their role as subverting, talking to 
death, and impeding all of the Duma's work. We can and should 
stop and silence the members of Democratic Russia. And the main 
thing is that we must make sure that the people know about 
everything that is done in the Duma. In brief, we must have 
television broadcasting from the Duma, for otherwise it will 
become a puppet theater in some remote location. 
<H5>  Vasiliy Starodubtsev, Deputy to the Federation Council </H5>
  I came to the Federation Council for one purpose--to put a 
stop to the insanity of the so-called reformers, to stop the 
destruction, disintegration, and theft they are perpetrating. As 
a peasant farmer who has already been severely burned by 
politics, it is rather unpleasant for me to crawl back here. But 
I cannot sit with my hands folded and be silent and watch how 
our immense production potential accumulated over the decades is 
being shattered and how thieves in the bureaucracy are making 
off with public property bit by bit. 
  The composition of the Federation Council is fairly complex. 
According to my extremely rough estimates, half of the deputies 
are people who, as before, are hungering to destroy everything 
and close their eyes to the thievery, and the other half are 
those who are against both extremes and want normal reforms. The 
former half are better organized. The election of the chairman 
of the chamber showed that. 
  When Shumeyko was nominated to the post of chairman, I spoke 
out and said: Arguments have been given here as to why Vladimir 
Filippovich deserves to be chairman, including that he has an 
excellent knowledge of the political kitchen. And there are not 
many people like this in the Federation Council. In my view, 
Shumeyko is not only an expert on this kitchen but is also one 
of the most talented cooks in it, who will successfully prepare 
a broth that will poison a large part of the country's 
population. 
  After all, everyone can see the results of Shumeyko's 
activity in the government. But they are making him the number 
one man in the upper chamber of parliament. And now how can this 
chamber demand answers from the government when it is headed by 
one of the top government bureaucrats? 
  It seems to me that the future of the Federation Council is 
fairly cloudy. I have no grounds for thinking that reason will 
inevitably take the upper hand in the chamber, but one can still 
hope for this. There are both experienced managers and talented 
administrators in the Chamber and it is possible that their 
patience and submissiveness will run out sooner or later. 
<H5>  Sergey Baburin, Deputy of the State Duma </H5>
  The spectrum of political forces in the Duma reflects fairly 
precisely the attitudes of various social strata in society. The 
number of supporters and opponents of the government in the 
chamber in terms of percentages is approximately the same as it 
was in the Supreme Soviet and the Congress of People's Deputies. 
During the recesses between the sessions when I see the restored 
building of the House of Soviets I ask myself: Why did Yeltsin 
have to start shooting and spill the blood of hundreds of 
people? Was it not so that the authorities could steal the 
property of the Supreme Soviet and make money on repair 
contracts? 
  The organization of the work in the Duma went much more 
quickly than when the Supreme Soviet was established. The 
experience in parliamentary procedure was in evidence here. The 
disorder among representatives of various factions and deputy 
groups, it seems to me, will soon come to an end. There will be 
a consolidation according to interests and the position of the 
majority of the Duma will be clearly demonstrated. In spite of 
my expectations, the formation of the deputy group of patriots 
called the Russian Way is proceeding fairly successfully now. As 
of today it has more than 20 deputies, and I do not rule out the 
possibility that this group in conjunction with representatives 
of other groups and factions will make up the patriotic majority 
of the Duma. 
<H5>  Nikolay Gonchar, Deputy of the Federation Council </H5>
  According to plan, the Federation Council should be an organ 
of conciliation--conciliation between the executive power and 
the Duma, whose laws it is supposed to ratify. But what have we 
seen during the first days? Deputies of the Federation Council 
are unable to reach an agreement on regulations and they were 
split right down the middle in the election of the chairman. 
What kind of conciliation can there be when they have to 
approve, say, the principles of the tax policy? Here branch, 
regional, and political interests immediately make themselves 
known. And how can they adopt anything if each deputy votes only 
according to his own scenario? 
  We need to learn the art of compromise. That is the main 
condition without which the Federation Council cannot exist as 
the upper chamber of parliament. And to learn to compromise is a 
quite realistic task. But we must remember that compromise 
requires talent and work. 
<H5>  Mikhail Lapshin, Deputy of the State Duma </H5>
  Even at the first session one could see the aggressiveness 
and destructiveness of deputies from Russia's Choice, who took 
the presidium literally by storm trying in spite of all rules of 
decorum to dislodge the presiding elder of the Duma. The 
aggressiveness of Russia's Choice shows its powerlessness. 
  The alignment of forces in the Duma was clearly not to the 
advantage of the pro-government bloc, and the results of the 
voting showed this. The Duma did not allow them to create a 
multitude of small factions and it thwarted attempts to use all 
kinds of regroupings to subject it to endless shakeups. By now 
we have every possibility of working constructively and 
fulfilling the promises we made to our constituents. 
<H5>  Vitaliy Sevastyanov, Deputy of the State Duma </H5>
  The Duma has many fewer rights than the former parliament of 
the Russian Federation. In the Supreme Soviet and at the 
Congress of People's Deputies it lost essentially everything it 
could lose, and when it came to its senses it was back where it 
started: All the levers of power had been seized by the 
president and the government. 
  But now that the opposition has a clear idea of what it 
needs 
and what it does not need and organizationally it is completely 
combat ready, even with modest authority it is quite capable of 
having a real effect on politics. 
<H5>  Gennadiy Zyuganov, Deputy of the State Duma </H5>
  I dare say that three-fourths of our present deputy corps 
are 
people with common sense, who understand that the country has 
reached the edge of a precipice and that it must be saved not 
according to schemes from across the sea but taking into account 
the real circumstances of our life. 
  During the past year Russian society has been experiencing a 
difficult recovery of mental health and public opinion has 
changed to the favor of state-patriotic forces. This is 
confirmed both by the composition of the Duma and by the results 
of the first votes in it. 
  Even in the Russia's Choice bloc, the bloc that was 
conceived 
and created in order to justify presidential policy regardless 
of anything else, one can see quite healthy motives for 
behavior. Russia's Choice did not succeed as a monolithic 
pro-presidential faction. It contains people who are inclined to 
reassess the values imposed on society, and it is possible to 
cooperate with them. 
  I think the Duma's open opposition to the executive power 
will soon be a fait accompli. Will it perhaps share the fate of 
the disbanded Supreme Soviet? Quite possibly. But the Duma's 
viability will depend only on itself. If during the first weeks 
of its work it demonstrates fidelity to the will of the voters 
and proves its ability to develop a policy of common sense, 
there will not be another version of Edict No. 1400. 
  The authority of the Duma is with the people--this is the 
only thing that can save parliamentarianism in Russia. Will we 
win this authority? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42772 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   ZAVTRA Writers on State Duma, Zhirinovskiy </TI></H3>
<H4>   `Den' Movement Registered </H4>
<F P=102> 944F0296C Vladimir ZAVTRA in Russian No 2, Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0296C </F>
<F P=104>  Vladimir ZAVTRA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Own Information": "`Den' Movement Registered"] </F>
  [Text] A conference of the 'Den' Movement took place at the 
Rodina House of Culture on the outskirts of Moscow on Saturday. 
  The authorities banned the newspaper DEN even before the 
guns 
were fired at parliament. It disappeared for a month and then 
began to come out under a different name. There was the threat 
that it would be cut off from its readers. But the people who 
were united by the one-time newspaper and by participation in 
all of its activities never lost contact with one another. 
Moreover, recently the active newspaper's readership created an 
organization out of the simple club and officially registered 
it. Those attending the conference at the Rodina House of 
Culture heard a report from the coordinating council of the 
social-educational organization 'Den' Movement and discussed 
plans for its further work. The movement is open to all who do 
not see history as black and white, who recognize the seal both 
with the double-headed eagle and with the hammer and sickle, and 
who want to do something real for the revival of great Russia. 
  The editor in chief of DEN and ZAVTRA, Aleksandr Prohanov, 
and workers of these publications, Yevgeniy Nefedov and Nikolay 
Anisin, participated in the work of the conference. 
  In the next issue of the newspaper ZAVTRA we will give a 
contact telephone number for the 'Den' Movement. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42773 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Rybkin Views Duma Politics, Functioning </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0691A Moscow ARGUMENTY I FAKTY in Russian No 6, Feb 94 p 
2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0691A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ARGUMENTY I FAKTY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Ivan Rybkin, chairman of the State Duma of </F>
the Russian Federation, by ARGUMENTY I FAKTY correspondent 
Dmitriy Makarov: "An Optimist in a Sea of Pessimism"] 
  [Text] [Makarov] Many Russian politicians and political 
scientists are filled with gloomy predictions today. Production 
is declining, inflation is on the rise, ethnic conflicts are 
raging on Russia's periphery, and conservatives have come to 
power in the Russian Government. Tell me, how do you see 
Russia's immediate future? 
  [Rybkin] I would call myself a cautious optimist. Yes, of 
course, the crisis is all-encompassing, and it will not be easy 
to overcome it, but it seems to me that we have reached a point 
where people have begun to understand not only down below but 
also here, in the upper echelons of power, that a creative 
principle and national accord are more important than anything 
else. This is the main source of my optimism. 
  The most important thing that distinguishes the present 
government and parliament from those that existed before October 
of last year is that they are prepared and have already begun to 
work together. This has always been difficult, but today the 
absolute majority of those who have left the government at 
various times are working in the State Duma and the Federation 
Council. They or people with similar convictions are working 
today in key posts of committees and commissions of parliament. 
  Leaders of the Duma and the government have just prepared a 
consolidated report on the condition of the country's economy. 
In the next few days it will be submitted for parliamentary 
hearings. 
  [Makarov] I am very much afraid that words about working 
together, although they sound very nice, will end up as 
meaningless noise. The government, without asking anyone, has 
already allotted a trillion for agriculture. You and I are well 
aware that this money will immediately end up on the stock 
market, because you cannot obtain from the land such gigantic 
profits as you can on the stock market playing the game with the 
rise of the exchange rate of the dollar. The money simply will 
not make its way to the peasants, and the Russian economy will 
follow the path of the Ukrainian. 
  [Rybkin] Your misgivings are quite justified. We must not 
turn Russia into a universal social security department.... 
  [Makarov] But what if the government does this without your 
permission? 
  [Rybkin] The Duma has a powerful means of control--the 
budget. Gathered together in the budget committee are the most 
powerful economists and financial experts, who belong to various 
factions--M. Zadornov, A. Pochinok, G. Kulik. Like many of my 
colleagues, I am categorically against thoughtlessly pumping 
money into the economy, and therefore the budget will be fairly 
austere. The budget is the law for the government, and in order 
to monitor it an Accounting Chamber has been created, in which 
530 people will be working. In the near future Duma organs will 
be able through their own committees to monitor the granting of 
credit precisely for the final result. 
  [Makarov] According to the Constitution, you have to give 
your consent for the appointment of a prime minister. But for 
Chernomyrdin the consent was given by the Congress of People's 
Deputies, and for some reason they did not ask for your consent, 
even though almost the entire government changed. 
  [Rybkin] It was explained to us that this was a 
reorganization, and not a change of the cabinet. We must not get 
ahead of ourselves. We must wait until 18 February, when the 
president delivers his message in the Duma. 
  [Makarov] I am afraid that even having control over the 
government will not do much. The power is gradually making its 
way to the bureaucrats, who are answerable neither to the 
parliament nor to the government. 
  [Rybkin] It only seems that way. I am convinced that the 
power is indeed trickling away. But not from the government into 
the presidential structures, but from the center to the regions. 
And thank God. But we need a clear-cut delimitation: What part 
of the authority should go to the regions so that they will eat 
better and not suffer from indigestion, and what should remain 
at the federal level. This has not been done so far. 
  Additionally, all three branches of power must be clearly 
separated: Who should be in charge of what. A bureaucrat who has 
gotten out of control is transformed into a power in his own 
right. 
  We have the advantage over the other power structures that 
our discussion of candidates for any post is public. We form 
public opinion. And the further we go, the more strongly its 
voice will be heard. Today, perhaps, a person who has no use for 
the parliament will achieve local success, but ultimately he 
will meet with defeat, immense and all-destroying. It is no 
accident that promising young politicians have gone to the 
Duma.... 
  [Makarov] They are preparing a place in case Chernomyrdin 
does not accept them into the government. 
  [Rybkin] Not only that, but there is undoubtedly an element 
of horse sense here. Just look at what kinds of people have 
gathered here! They are highly intelligent and purposeful. They 
are vitally interested in raising the status of the Duma. 
  [Makarov] You have said that bureaucrats must be under 
control, but the Federation Council is made up of provincial 
bureaucrats in the absolute sense. How can they be controlled 
locally if the Federation Council is the supreme power in the 
country? That would be the worst version of the Supreme Soviet. 
  [Rybkin] I will not deny that I am apprehensive about this. 
But I will say something else too. Be that as it may, all of 
them have passed through the filter of the elections. That was 
not easy. Along with leaders of the regions, there are also 
people who hold insignificant positions or no positions at all. 
And still their high potential for reform was observed in the 
elections. And you know that in any assembly at least 10 percent 
of the people are the most powerful irritant. And in the 
Federation Council there are plenty of these irritants on both 
the left and the right. It will not be easy for a bureaucrat to 
remain a bureaucrat there. He will have to think on the scale of 
the state. 
  [Makarov] Ivan Petrovich, the Army is causing a very great 
deal of uneasiness. With relatively small salaries, they still 
are not paid for several months at a time. Someone in the 
Russian leadership is persistently playing with fire. Can you 
make an official statement regarding this? 
  [Rybkin] I am very familiar with this problem; my brothers 
are serving in the Army. At the session of the State Duma on 4 
February, we heard a promise from the finance minister and 
chairman of the Central Bank to immediately rectify the 
situation that was created. I personally will monitor its 
implementation. 
  [Makarov] Have you met with the president since you were 
elected to the post of chairman of the State Duma? 
  [Rybkin] Three times. One meeting was during our trip to St. 
Petersburg for the 50th anniversary of the breaking of the 
blockade, and we took two business trips. I have had a detailed 
exchange of opinions with the president regarding the entire 
range of issues we have just discussed. Ultimately, we arrived 
at the conviction that we have similar views regarding many 
issues. 
  [Makarov] Tell me, cross your heart, do you still consider 
yourself a communist? 
  [Rybkin] Well, what is a communist? In 1918, when we adopted 
the new name for the party, it was a time of militant communism. 
Then everything really was shared equally, in a communist way, 
in both the country and the city. In a state of euphoria over 
the civil war, we departed from social democracy. During the 
years of the NEP [New Economic Policy] we returned to it again, 
but later we tried to prolong the condition of military 
communism again. And we experienced severe disturbances because 
of this. 
  Things are now such that we must get away from all nicknames 
and titles as quickly as possible and not look back. Someone put 
it well: We are walking backwards, and it is very dangerous that 
way. People who call themselves members of the Russian Communist 
Party today are hardly communists in essence. After all, they 
have included in their program a diversity of forms of 
management and their equality under the law. Today in the Duma 
there are entrepreneurs and bankers in the communist faction. In 
the agrarian faction there are farmers, bankers, lawyers, 
economists, and even anticommunists. Actually, many of the 
former labels are simply obsolete. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42774 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Members of Yeltsin's `Inner Circle' Interviewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944Q0156A Moscow NOVOYE VREMYA in Russian No 3, Jan 94 
[Signed to press 18 Jan 94] pp 16-19 </F>

<F P=103> 944Q0156A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NOVOYE VREMYA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with unidentified members of Yeltsin's "inner </F>
circle" by Olga Kuchkina; place and date not given: "`Boris 
Nikolayevich Is Aware Every Minute That He Is President.' 
Yeltsin: A View From His Inner Circle."] 
  [Text] Before New Year's there appeared in the NEW 
YORK TIMES an article by William Safire written as if it were by 
Boris Yeltsin. The situation that had developed before and after 
the elections on the Russian political scene was represented as 
the result of Yeltsin's clever moves, everything having gone 
precisely as planned: I had to show the democratic reformers how 
much they depended on me, and to do this I introduced and ran 
Zhirinovskiy, and, moreover, he is a counterbalance to my "main 
problem"--Yavlinskiy, and so forth. 
  The old faithful hard-working chance put me in touch 
with people from Boris Yeltsin's inner circle, which resulted in 
the recording I was permitted to make without naming names. It 
seemed interesting and necessary to give the Russian reader a 
different view of this president's inner world from the one 
conceived by the American. 
  [Kuchkina] What do you think, was the very form in which the 
article was written ethical? To what extent does the mode of 
thinking ascribed to Yeltsin correspond to his real one? 
  [Answer] Genres may vary. We have already read what was 
supposed to be a letter from B.N. in response to the letter to 
him from Vitaliy Tretyakov, and this is similar to a certain 
degree. There are no complaints against the genre. But the 
character, world view, internal content, and sequence of 
thoughts of the person represented are in no way accurate, they 
are altogether different. This is some kind of laboratory test 
model, and the author has no need to feel the national character. 
  [Kuchkina] When you read articles like this, how do you feel 
about them, are you offended or insulted? 
  [Answer] Yes. 
  [Kuchkina] But you remain silent? 
  [Answer] We are not being silent. We are drawing our own 
conclusions. We have emotions just like anyone else, but the 
main thing are the conclusions: This means that somewhere 
something was missed, was not explained. Because such 
conjectures begin when there is no information. 
  [Kuchkina] At his last news conference the president 
announced that he wanted to expand the channels of independent 
information. What lies behind this? 
  [Answer] The need to improve and increase the effectiveness 
of the work of structures of government and administration. For 
which it is necessary to arrange contacts with independent 
experts outside the Kremlin. Assessments inside the Kremlin may 
be subjectively slanted even in spite of a person's will. 
Independent experts frequently give unpleasant information. 
  [Kuchkina] Does he read the newspapers? 
  [Answer] Information from the newspapers comes to him 
directly. He has many newspapers and he reads them all himself. 
  [Kuchkina] According to rumor he read something in 
NEZAVISIMAYA and threw it down saying: Get this paper out of my 
sight. 
  [Answer] As I recall, something similar happened with 
PRAVDA. 
When the tone is insulting to him, when the words are 
insulting--that kind of reaction is possible. But the next day 
this newspaper still must be lying there on his desk. 
  [Kuchkina] A sharp reaction--is that his human character or 
his obkom [oblast committee] character? 
  [Answer] Human. He does not get angry, he does not get 
wrathful, this offends him, and he takes it hard. 
  [Kuchkina] Is he given the mail that comes to him? 
  [Answer] There is a department that reads letters, 
generalizes them, and submits summaries. The clearest and the 
most profound and serious are given to him. 
  [Kuchkina] And abuse? 
  [Answer] Sometimes he asks to see these himself. But if it 
is 
nothing but vulgarity and nothing else, then no. 
  [Kuchkina] But does he know that there is mail like this? 
  [Answer] In all of the summaries they write down in detail 
and with candor the subjects, the problems, and the attitudes. 
  [Kuchkina] The outline of events for 3-4 October is largely 
known. I recall that one commentator said on the radio at that 
time: Thank you, Boris Nikolayevich, and now go--to a monastery, 
wherever you want, shovel away a little more dirt and then leave. 
  [Answer] As for his feelings, these hours and days were 
probably the most difficult in his life. It was a tragedy. When 
he uttered this word in a speech on television it was his 
personal assessment. He felt sympathy both with the disturbances 
and with the victims. How did he cope with this--and he did cope 
with it--is very difficult to say. But regarding the monastery, 
regarding the sin--he felt that. And no matter what he did, even 
if he were to leave his post, he had the feeling that this load, 
this burden would be on him for the rest of his life. He wakes 
up in the middle of the night, that is, it is always with him 
now. Recently he uttered the sentence: I do not believe in God 
but perhaps I will believe. Mainly because he feels the burden 
of these victims. This is his cross to bear. 
  He arrived at the decision to storm the White House after 
much torment and he made it with immense difficulty. He had to 
break something or twist something inside himself, and this same 
thing had to be done by his inner circle, the people in power, 
and Dmitriy Antonovich Volkogonov, who as a part of the 
operations group had to spend a long time persuading B.N. after 
the seizure of the mayor's office and the battles near Ostankino 
that it was necessary to break up this group, there was no other 
solution, otherwise everything would be in vain because, as we 
imagined, the very next morning if they were to remain there 
they would arrange all kinds of communications, a certain part 
of the army could be on their side, and then a real civil war 
would break out. Possibly B.N. would not have resorted to the 
edict of 21 September if he had known what would happen on 4 
October. Not even on the 3d, but the 4th. We are not yet 
familiar with all the documents, but that autumn opponents of 
the reforms, conventionally speaking, declared a season of 
battle, everywhere there was information about growing tension, 
about a whole series of actions scheduled apparently for 7 
November--the day when Soviet power was to have been restored. 
To a certain degree the edict was to forestall these events. And 
the entire power line was calculated so that there would be no 
bloody developments. He emphasized that repeatedly. There was a 
sense of what we cannot allow. What we could not allow. On the 
3d, after the disturbances had already begun at the Crimean 
Bridge, he understood that it could not be avoided. 
  Incidentally, while aggravating the situation, Rutskoy, 
Khasbulatov, and Baburin, apparently, were not counting on such 
harsh measures in response from the president because they knew 
him. And knowing him, they thought that he would appeal to the 
people, the components of the Federation, the international 
community, and perhaps he would defend the Kremlin and that 
would be all.... 
  [Kuchkina] As a good person he considers the development of 
events on one plane, but events proceed on another. Perhaps here 
it is not enough to be a good person; it is necessary to be a 
good analyst, or a good analyst must be nearby so that it will 
be possible to follow thinking different from his own. 
  [Answer] Yeltsin himself is a very complicated person. He is 
so big that it will take more time to get to know him. Even we 
who have been working with him for many years are always 
discovering something about him. So far we have been speaking 
about his human qualities. But there is also Yeltsin the 
politician who has a cold intellect and deep and far-sighted 
understanding. And all the events after 21 September and after 3 
October were calculated with a cold intellect. He prepared the 
edict himself. And how events would develop if he made a 
mistake. He is aware every moment that he is the president of an 
immense country and bears responsibility for this country, he 
feels this responsibility with his bones, with his mind, with 
every cell. But politics is not chess, and reality can always 
bring surprises. 
  [Kuchkina] That is, all the mythology that he merely signs 
things and that all of his inner circle plays the role of king, 
and the king may go to Zavidovo and sit there, as Zhirinovskiy 
says, does not square with reality? 
  [Answer] This, incidentally, is another conscious means of 
evoking additional negative emotions. It is clear that it is 
impossible to do without analysts, without aides, and without an 
inner circle because the volume of work performed by the 
president is gigantic. But the president and his inner circle 
must not exchange places. There can be certain edicts that are 
signed in error, but he has the ability to recognize his own 
mistakes. Gorbachev would not admit his mistakes for anything. 
He would find some way to wriggle out of them and not admit his 
mistakes. B.N. has learned to admit things. But it is not even 
that: He is also able to correct his mistakes. 
  He has a clear mind and a phenomenal memory. He takes a text 
and reads it down the middle while managing to cover everything 
on the left and right. He will say, I have already read it. Some 
people will answer him: That cannot be. He will recite the text 
of the document by heart. He selects people he trusts for their 
abilities and their orderliness in work and preparing documents. 
As long as the person does not make a mistake. Then he starts to 
watch them more closely. There are many problems, and there are 
also problems that are new to him or that have been 
underestimated so far. But the many problems on the fundamental 
or strategic plane he knows in detail. 
  Before becoming the chairman of the government he worked 
with 
the economy on the scale of the oblast. Market reform on a 
practical plane was something new for him. When Gaydar began his 
work we went to all the sessions of the government. We saw that 
he began to speak with them as equals fairly quickly. Of course, 
Gaydar knows more, and of course, he speaks in the language of 
economic categories as a scholar who has gone into this in 
depth. But even after a month and a half they recognized B.N. as 
the informal leader of the government and began to work as a 
unified team. 
  Or here is an example from international practice. The main 
topic of one of his conversations with Major was nuclear 
disarmament. At first they spoke on one level, discussing the 
political aspects of the problem, and B.N. went deeper and 
deeper, and reached a point where the other person simply threw 
up his hands. Major recognized him as a specialist with a 
thorough knowledge of his subject. This is a unique quality 
which remained with him from the previous system: He understands 
the significance of responsibility. 
  [Kuchkina] Did he also sign the last edict on the KGB, to 
use 
the old name, himself? 
  [Answer] The peculiarity of the last edict consists in that 
he understood the system with which he was dealing and that even 
if he had entrusted someone else to sign the edict, within a 
couple of hours or minutes this would become known. Therefore he 
prepared the edict himself. At the news conference he even 
called it not an edict but an operation which he conducted. 
  [Kuchkina] Was the president not too late? Perhaps the 
historic moment had passed? Was it done on the wrong wave of 
expectations? 
  [Answer] Perhaps on the propaganda plane he was too late. 
But 
the essence of the matter is that the KGB is not an organ you 
can joke around with. After all, the president had been hearing 
reproaches about this for a very long time. But if you have no 
forces and no capabilities and you offend it, this monster, it 
will tear down everything, destroy everything, and it will tear 
you down too in a couple of hours. One has the feeling that he 
was waiting for the proper moment and waited until it came. On 
the eve of the edict in the Ministry of Security some people 
were working for the president, some people were working for 
others, and some people were drinking. And the fact that B.N. 
selected the moment when nobody even said oh-oh.... 
  [Kuchkina] Are you trying to say that he is able to choose 
the right moment? 
  [Answer] Yes. He comes up with an idea and then carries it 
through. 
  [Kuchkina] In your opinion, are there strategic tasks which 
the president has set for himself for the term of his presidency? 
  [Answer] The main task is for Russia to be an economically 
strong power, and it can be this only through the assimilation 
of market management mechanisms. This means that it is necessary 
to conduct market reform. The communist Soviet system is 
completely obsolete and holds things back, it must be reworked, 
and this requires the Constitution. And so forth. As president 
it seems that he recognizes his role, which consists largely of 
raking up the dirt. But what can he do? He must rake it up so 
that he can lay a foundation for the future. Others will take 
the work up later. 
  [Kuchkina] With this kind of portrait how do you feel, for 
example, about his last statement about Ukraine during his 
meeting with Gore to the effect that the Ukrainians are being 
deceptive and that it is difficult? 
  [Answer] He is a human being and sometimes an idea which 
should be expressed more subtly is blurted out and draws more 
attention to itself than it should. This complicates matters. 
The idea is noticed and people begin to quote it right and left 
without paying any attention to the context. At the same time 
they complain that all the information is classified as it was 
before and his style is not candid, forgetting what happened 
yesterday. For instance whatever Brezhnev said off the cuff, not 
on paper, almost failed to become public. But now there is TV 
everywhere, there are reporters everywhere, and somebody is 
bound to hear you, if not a journalist then some random person, 
if not from one group then from the opposing one. 
  [Kuchkina] What do you think, why do so many people hate 
him? 
From certain people he evokes a truly pathological feeling of 
hatred. Does anyone think about this here? 
  [Answer] Yes, of course, this is analyzed. The president is 
not a person who is perceived in subtle tones. The hatred of his 
opponents contains a certain element of indirect recognition of 
his power. B.N. is straightforward and categorical in his 
communication. This has a strong negative effect on some people. 
  Additionally, there are objective reasons why some people do 
not accept him. A period of severe breakup is linked to him. The 
people lost the Soviet Union. Those who are living and working 
with this breakdown, who have lost a sense of being a citizen of 
a great power, may blame him for this. When we flew with him to 
Almaty for the signing of the declaration of the Eleven and then 
returned we had tears in our eyes because we had all grown up in 
the Union, we understood it with our minds, but our hearts had 
not yet accepted this metamorphosis. 
  [Kuchkina] And how did he himself experience this? 
  [Answer] Also painfully. Very. 
  [Kuchkina] But does he consider himself to blame? 
  [Answer] This is an objective process which is beyond any 
human capabilities. The crisis of the system is objective. 
People who point the finger at B.N. are frequently playing 
tricks, and sometimes deliberately. A peculiarity of human 
perception is that we consider what we have to be the worst 
possible scenario for the development of events. Without taking 
into account what might have been and would have been much worse. 
  [Kuchkina] Let us move on to the present situation. How does 
the president evaluate it? What, in his opinion, will happen in 
the near future? What do you think about this and what do you 
know? 
  [Answer] The results on the Constitution are of primary 
importance for the president. For in essence this is the second 
referendum of the year. The political overload is absolutely 
terrible and it is surprising that people are still 
participating in political actions. That would not have happened 
anywhere else; in any other country, they would have simply said 
to hell with politics and voted with their legs. Well, about the 
elections--there was, of course, the element of surprise, linked 
mainly to Zhirinovskiy's success. 
  [Kuchkina] How does the president feel about this? 
  [Answer] He sees it as a serious new problem. He did not 
support any single bloc in the election campaign. That was 
illogical to the president. In terms of their programs the 
democrats are very similar; Shakhray's party is not very 
different from Yavlinskiy's. It would be wrong to participate in 
the deepening of a schism: to support some of them and push some 
of them away. To a certain degree there was an experiment going 
on in determining the real values, the real capabilities, and 
the independent rating of each democratic movement. And it was 
fairly unexpected that the rating would be low without the 
president. We had counted on more. Nonetheless the president is 
geared to work seriously with this parliament. But one of the 
problems that has always bothered him, along with the KGB, is 
the army: Why did some of them vote for Zhirinovskiy. B.N. 
understands that there are vulnerable national sensibilities 
here--everywhere we are being persecuted, made the fall guy, 
offended, insulted.... 
  [Kuchkina] And does he understand that Rutskoy had already 
loosened this soil well? 
  [Answer] Undoubtedly. And he is very concerned about how to 
change the situation there. Another problem that torments him is 
the course of the reforms. When he analyzed the materials from 
the election campaign and Zhirinovskiy's success he understood 
that we had voted not "for" anything but "against" the way the 
reforms were being conducted. Some people had won, some had 
suffered less, some more, but most people had lost. Things had 
become easier in the sense that it was possible to go and buy 
everything, but there was not enough money. One can sense that 
this bothers him greatly from the documents he requests, what he 
reads, and what he discusses with us. The reforms need a second 
wind, they need adjustments. 
  [Kuchkina] If you will allow me, in this connection I would 
like to say something which, perhaps, you also know, but it is 
now important to place emphasis on it. In the first place, it is 
necessary to speak with the people, to defer to the people, 
joining forces, because when the people, the society, are the 
passive part of the reforms and not the active part, not the 
part doing the work, when they are not joined together with the 
government, then we have what we have. In the second place, 
America went everywhere in the automobile. What can we ride in, 
what are the most difficult and neglected things here? Housing 
and roads. We must begin to build housing and roads for 
everyone. These should be declared national programs. Perhaps 
the army could be brought in here. The people would pay for 
this. In the third place, when the people know or hear about 
out-and-out bribery, out-and-out corruption, this makes the 
situation much worse, nobody believes in anybody or anything, 
they do not want anything, so it is necessary in fact and not in 
words to get rid of corruption and corrupt people. 
  Zhirinovskiy's party and to a certain degree his electorate 
include healthy young men from 20 to 40 whose arms and muscles 
are itching, and all the work threatens to go beyond the 
parliamentary framework. Is this a problem for the president? 
  [Answer] If this party and this leader in any way overstep 
the bounds of the Constitution--nobody will try to persuade them 
to come back into bounds. This would present a danger to society 
and the president would be resolute. But the Zhirinovskiy 
phenomenon is one of the serious problems for him and for us. In 
the broad sense of the word. The phenomenon of ideology. He 
claims to respond to the moods of many, to respond to the needs 
of those who want to cling to what is simple and comprehensible, 
casting off the burden of self-determination and placing it on 
someone else's shoulders. If you want to fight--go ahead, we 
will let you fight. If you want to engage in business--engage in 
business. If you cannot do anything, we will feed you, give you 
gifts, and so forth. For people from the country and the city, 
for women and men, for old and young. All this taken together 
means a strong Russia with expanding boundaries. If it is cold 
in your home--you will have a warm sea. People in the east will 
expand to the west. People in the west will take Alaska along 
with the Kurils. For everyone. The phenomenon of this deceptive 
ideology is an indicator that state thinking and national 
self-awareness are in a crisis. Since back in 1990 the president 
has been making the assignment of gathering everything that 
could be given by the best minds regarding the general national 
idea, where we are going, not at the level of intuition but at 
the level of in-depth theoretical developments. For now, 
unfortunately, the progress is insignificant. The task has 
turned out to be difficult both for the institutions and for the 
individuals. 
  [Kuchkina] There is no philosophy of a common cause. Well, 
who would be attracted by these definitions--bourgeois society, 
market society? Can a market really inspire you? It is much 
better to speak of a society of free initiative. It is necessary 
to keep in mind all the time that the artificial world in which 
we lived was or seemed harmonious to us. When you sit in your 
cell, everything you have is placed along the shelves, here is a 
little grain, there is a little vodka--everything, in general, 
is not so bad. But when instead of a cell you have the whole 
world, you do not know where to run or what to do. It turned out 
that we had lost our religious and spiritual orientation. It was 
impossible to turn over to Anpilov or Zhirinovskiy that which 
had always been valued in Russia: honesty and justice. And it 
seems to me that the president must make some kind of vivid 
gesture. Not vivid in form, but in essence. Not giving up his 
car or apartment--he is the president of Russia, he should not 
be living in some kind of shed made of boards, but he could 
declare and consistently adhere to a new policy: We will do this 
and that together with you. 
  [Answer] There are things that are not clear, and once you 
clarify them, everything goes back into place. They talk about 
his moving into Gorbachev's dacha. He did not want to move there 
himself, but they told him: It has all the communications 
systems in place, if you move to a different place it will be 
necessary to reinstall all the communications, all these 
buttons, approaches, to provide for security--millions will be 
spent again. 
  If we are to speak about the new politics, there is a sense 
of this turning point: Yeltsin as the implementer and defender 
of the market course is returning to the former Yeltsin but on a 
new basis. Yeltsin as the defender of the people. The defender 
of their daily life. The defender of their security. The 
defender of their incomes. In two years the people have become 
tired, society as a whole has become tired. We need new people 
and new ideas. 
  [Kuchkina] But that also means that Zhirinovskiy objectively 
becomes stronger. Here he is: a new person with a new idea. And 
so far you have nothing to oppose him with. We have nothing. In 
addition to everything else, his roots lie not simply in the 
electorate but in the party of revanche. Having studied the 
mistakes of the State Committee for the State of Emergency and 
the "Octoberists," having studied the history and the coming to 
power of this one and that one, it is possible to turn in the 
direction of whomever he wants and whatever he wants. 
  [Answer] We are well aware of this. And the president knows 
it. But we must not exaggerate the degree of danger. Society and 
the powers also have other deep and growing roots which will not 
give the revanche party enjoy revanche. Ultimately we are 
dealing with a president who not only experiences everything in 
his soul and is not only capable of adopting a decision, but who 
also has not exhausted himself as a politician. It is not 
without reason that we have spoken about this very complicated 
giant of a man, about his extraordinariness as a politician and 
a human being. The game is far from over. 
  [Kuchkina] Does this mean that we will have one person 
again? 
  [Answer] Everything in history is personified and it is 
foolish to forget this in favor of one to whom it is 
advantageous to brush any person aside. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42775 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   New `State Ideology' Seen Taking Shape </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0293A Moscow KURANTY in Russian 26 Jan 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0293A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KURANTY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Mikhail Shchipanov: "Democracy, the State, and </F>
the People: Will the Kremlin Create a New State Ideology"] 
  [Text] The epigraph to the stormy, rally-filled years of 
perestroyka frenzy are the biblical lines that some 
silver-tongued journalist took a fancy to about the Prophet 
Moses, who for 40 years led his brother Hebrews through the 
desert. At that time, the parable was interpreted absolutely 
unequivocally: During 40 years of wandering in the sands, the 
last Hebrew born in Egyptian bondage was to give his soul back 
to God. So also over the decades we were directed to squeeze 
"homo sovieticus," or simply "sovok" (Soviet man) out of 
ourselves drop by drop, destroying everything old that was 
keenly reminiscent of the long spiritual bondage. 
  Some ill-natured minds, of course, preferred the 
interpretation of Moses' wanderings given by A. Dulles, the 
first American intelligence officer. According to the CIA man, 
it turned out that after 40 years of swallowing sand, it was not 
so much the former slaves who were supposed to die out as much 
as the untalented Hebrew chiefs who dared to place in doubt even 
the recommendations of the Lord God. But this kind of 
interpretation already personified the blame too much for the 
well-known failure, to which an end has not been put to this 
day, instead of spreading it on the sorrowful plate of our 
"irresponsible and ignorant" people. And here another biblical 
wisdom came in time. That which advises to begin "gathering 
stones" after a rout. The time, it is said, has come. Well, 
then, is this the end of crossing the desert? Proletarians, 
remaining kolkhozniks, emerging farmers, eternally dissatisfied 
intellectuals, and devouring new bourgeois, unite! But what is 
the question about? Is it really about the paschal table? Thus, 
the question of creating a new state ideology of Russia has 
assumed considerable significance. 
  In fact, there was talk about an ideological vacuum a year 
to 
a year and a half ago, when a happy toast addressed to brother 
Balts "To your freedom and ours!" unexpectedly turned into a 
bitter and humiliating hangover for millions of Russians, who by 
the will of fate ended up outside the borders of Mother Russia. 
But the delayed attempts at least verbally to protect emigrants 
willy-nilly (even with references to the rich "democratic" 
American experience in this regard) ran into a torrent of 
accusations of imperial ambitions, although after the crash of 
the indestructible Union, Russia by definition could not become 
an empire. 
  Oil was also poured onto the fire by the continuous 
discussions about the impending collapse of Russia itself, which 
was doomed, it was said, to repeat the Union's road to Calvary. 
The best minds even warned against early elections which, it was 
said, the former autonomies would repudiate after sanctioning 
the de facto decay of the great Russian body. As if it were 
possible to put off the elections indefinitely, at the same time 
preserving the appearance of representative democracy. They 
cannot be avoided... 
  Just what happened recently that served as a catalyst of the 
process of fermentation in the Kremlin think tank? As a classic 
would write it, here is what happened during this time: Winter 
came. The winter of the introduction of a new state 
constitution, parliamentary elections, with their reassessment 
of many values that had become usual for a couple of years, and 
a noticeable distancing of the president from former historical 
allies (it is another matter that history itself is moving). The 
breakthrough of "the master in all languages," V.V.Zh., once 
again demonstrated that a state not protected by its own 
pragmatic ideology is in fact defenseless against the virus of 
radicalism and ultrainfections. But phrases of the type "we are 
not promising miracles" are not at all suitable for the state 
banner. 
  A natural need has arisen to define the role of the Russian 
state more clearly, without restricting oneself to the abstract 
slogan "Less State," and its duty to the citizens and 
responsibility for the future of the nation, that is to say, to 
put together a complete state structure from the traditional 
blocks. And, apparently, it is at this stage that the 
split occurred, which far more logically than arguments on the 
new residence of parliament explain the hasty departure of 
Gaydar into the domain of the Duma. 
  It seems that two concepts have collided, neither of which 
is 
without genetic defects. However, here is more detail about 
everything... 
  The supporters of the new state ideology (conditionally 
speaking, a "Kremlin" ideology) prefer to call it centrist. The 
plan of the state structure is a Russia that is united and 
indivisible. In economics--restoration of the traditional 
elements of "controllability" that reinforce the role of state 
regulation. In policy--intensification of authoritarian trends 
combined with charitable trends on the scale of Russia (read the 
new constitution). In the sphere of relations with CIS 
countries--a period of "collection" that is expressed in a 
strengthening of the attachment of the former Soviet republics 
to Russia. Monetary union with Belarus--the first but important 
step. In international policy--something in the nature of the 
French "quiet strength," ensuring Russian influence and respect 
for its interests in areas of traditional Russian influence, in 
the final analysis also sanctioned by the world community. The 
symbols of this kind of approach are both continuation of the 
construction of the super-cruiser Peter the Great and the recent 
announcements of Andrey Kozyrev. And, naturally, the idea of the 
creation of a presidential party contemplated, apparently, for a 
"long" rule even under conditions of a permanent election game. 
Something like the Italian Christian-Democrats or the Japanese 
Liberal Democrats. Naturally, their epochs comprise many years 
of prosperity. 
  Many first persons of the state who are not noted, as they 
say, for extremism will embody the new concept--V. Shumeyko, V. 
Chernomyrdin, O. Soskovets, evidently A. Kozyrev, many prominent 
presidential advisers...and, in the final analysis, the 
president himself. Other figures who until recently were 
considered filed away in the political archives are also 
possible. It is not for nothing that the names Abalkin and 
Shcherbakov, former minister of finance of the Union, which were 
partially forgotten for the last year and a half, surfaced once 
again in the last few days. 
  Of course, the traditional reliance on strengthening the 
state comes into direct conflict with a number of already 
implanted liberal principles, but in the new context liberalism 
in the economy, evidently, will be preferable to political 
liberalism. It is not accidental that a high-standing Russian 
delegation headed by Minister Kozyrev is studying the experience 
of free economic zones in China this very week, a system that 
Gaydar apriori considered unacceptable for the new Russia. 
  But this is one point of view. Another was expressed once 
again last Saturday by Yegor Gaydar, who stressed his adherence 
to the idea of an inexpensive state apparatus with a limited 
sphere of interference, patterning of foreign policy based on 
Russia's real capabilities (live within one's means), and 
guaranteeing the interests of the citizens. Gaydar's program is 
also logical in its way, but it is, perhaps, the same as when 
abstract logic runs up against state traditions and the national 
mentality. It is more likely that Gaydar' model would be 
suitable for Norway in an ideal way. Meanwhile, the de facto 
elimination of Russia's status as a world power threatens it 
with quite specific economic losses, not to mention the loss of 
many strategically important markets, including the armaments 
market as well. It is known that frequently arms are acquired 
from the country whose influence and support are counted on. And 
this is only one aspect of the problem. 
  In a word, there are no ideal ideological systems. 
Especially 
in the changing conditions of the breakup. But it is obvious 
that Gaydar's departure is not a consequence of a private 
quarrel concerning monetary union with Belarus. And it is 
strange that the leader of Russia's Choice still only indirectly 
hints at his deepening differences with the Kremlin. 
Nonetheless, it will all come out in the open. 
  What is most difficult of all, of course, is to determine 
unequivocally those who are right and those who are to blame in 
the emerging dispute on ways of ideologically forming the 
Russian state. The more so because not only did Zhirinovskiy 
succeed in the elections but it would seem that the classic 
statesmen from the Civic Union suffered defeat. Not one of the 
disputing sides can now manifestly refer to the voice of the 
people, who are far more concerned about prosaic and everyday 
problems. With the exception, perhaps, of the defense of their 
own national dignity. It is the lever that they use more and 
more frequently. It is clear, for example, that the Philippine 
authorities could not permit the arrest of two American generals 
even for the sake of forcing the departure of the military 
Yankees, as was recently done in Latvia with our generals. And 
any government will have to react equally to such challenges. 
Even the most incurable liberals. 
  A year to a year and a half remain to make adjustments in 
emphasis, but the favorite at the next presidential elections 
will be precisely the bearer of a state ideology. Not so much 
one who is blatant like V.V.Zh., but one who inspires respect 
for the average Russian citizen. Especially in the provinces. 
Will this be Yeltsin himself? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42776 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Rutskoy Corruption Investigation Reviewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0689A Moscow ARGUMENTY I FAKTY in Russian No 6, Feb 94 
pp 1-2 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0689A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ARGUMENTY I FAKTY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by N.N. under the rubric "In the Russian Federation </F>
Procuracy": "Investigation Into Rutskoy's Money May Be Reopened"] 
  [Text] It is not nice to count money in other 
people's pockets. Nevertheless, since August of last year all of 
Russia was doing precisely that, trying to figure out how many 
million dollars A. Rutskoy had in a Swiss bank--$3 million or 
$10 million. 
  The commission especially set up by the president made 
public 
the vice president's alleged account number in the Swiss 
Indosuez Bank and a copy of a trust agreement. By this agreement 
A. Rutskoy entrusted to a certain Austrian citizen, Kerets, the 
management of his own firm abroad--Trade Links, to whose 
accounts money allegedly flowed from Russia. 
  The Moscow City Procuracy was assigned the task of checking 
out these allegations. The Procuracy, in turn, quickly closed 
the case, just before the elections to the Federal Assembly and 
the referendum on the Constitution. The voters realized that an 
honest man, A. Rutskoy, simply had been set up by his political 
opponents. 
  Two months have passed since that virtual exoneration of the 
former vice president. The case is currently in the Office of 
the Procurator General of the Russian Federation for review. 
There are reasons to believe that a decision will be issued that 
it had been closed improperly. 
  At first glance it may look like there is an intent to 
"finish off" A. Rutskoy one way or the other. But this is not 
quite so. 
  The conclusion that led to the decision to close the case 
was 
made mainly after a Moscow investigator had traveled to 
Switzerland and interviewed the owner of the Seabeco company, B. 
Birshteyn. The latter stated that Trade Links was his company 
and that A. Rutskoy had nothing to do with it. 
  The Office of the Procurator General, however, believes that 
in order to make a decision on the case it was necessary to meet 
with a Canadian notary, Chapnik. 
  He was the person who at the time notarized the original of 
the trust agreement and a true signature of A. Rutskoy, to which 
he recently testified in the presence of two witnesses--officers 
of the Canadian Mounted Police. And if the Office of the 
Procurator General does indeed close the case, Chapnik will face 
a criminal prosecution in Canada for perjury. The big question, 
of course, is who will turn out to be right--our Procuracy or 
the Canadian notary. 
  So, we have, on the one hand, the testimony of B. Birshteyn, 
the owner of a company that is banned from operating on the 
territory of the Russian Federation. And on the other, a 
statement of a neutral Canadian notary. 
  Some light on the Rutskoy case could be shed by the 
documents 
of the Renewal foundation, through which money and 
contracts--including those with Seabeco--had been handled. But 
all documents, not without the knowledge of R. Khasbulatov, had 
been transferred in good time to the White House and were burned 
during the October events. 
  A number of witnesses met with a tragic death. It appears 
that the fund's documents in regional branches already have been 
destroyed. 
  As to accounts in Western banks, many people probably 
remember that at the time of being an acting prime minister, Ye. 
Gaydar had contacts with the American company Kroll Associates. 
  The latter was looking for the CPSU party money and, of 
course, personal accounts. Well, according to some information, 
it is quite easy for this company to find out account numbers 
even in Swiss banks--at a price, of course. 
  There are rumors that they are in possession of many secrets 
regarding Russian citizens' foreign currency holdings abroad. 
There are also rumors that quite a few people in the West do not 
want such scandals. 
  Imagine how solidly one can keep any person on the hook 
(especially if he is big brass) if one sits on such compromising 
materials. And what if such a person happens to be a minister; 
or a presidential candidate? 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42777 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> POLITICAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Abdulatipov Views Own Political Career </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0294A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 4, 28 Jan 94 
p 8 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0294A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with R.G. Abdulatipov, first deputy minister of </F>
nationality affairs and regional policy and deputy chairman of 
the Federation Council, by Yelena Dikun, under the rubric 
"Reputation"; place and date not given: "Ramazan Abdulatipov: `I 
Am Sincere and Direct'"] 
  [Text] Ramazan Abdulatipov has become famous as a 
politician who stays afloat under all regimes. On this score he 
is considered to be a worthy successor to the legendary, 
"unsinkable" Anastas Ivanovich Mikoyan. This former chairman of 
the Soviet of Nationalities of the Supreme Soviet of the Russian 
Federation (and prior to this, an executive official of the CPSU 
Central Committee) is still in the saddle while most of 
Abdulatipov's old comrades-in-arms from the parliament failed to 
hang on at the rough turns of history: Some ended up in prison, 
others are in disgrace. He is now first deputy minister of 
nationality affairs and regional policy of the Russian 
Federation and deputy chairman of the Federation Council. In the 
words of Ramazan Gadzhimuratovich himself, the secret of his 
long political life is quite simple. 
  [Abdulatipov] I have a principle: The higher I rise in my 
life, the more resolutely I give up displays of personal 
ambitions. As a politician I just do not have the right to show 
my hatred or even dislike toward someone; I must remember at all 
times that there are 300,000 voters standing behind me, as was 
the case in the old parliament, or as now the entire Dagestan 
is, and that any sharp word or action of mine will ricochet and 
hit them. I felt this particularly acutely after I signed in 
1991 the statement of the "six," in which we warned that Boris 
Nikolayevich was inclined toward authoritarianism and incapable 
of collective work, and that a handful of courtiers held sway 
rather than the Supreme Soviet. To this day I believe that this 
statement was timely, and had both sides pondered it calmly, the 
one criticizing and the one criticized, the subsequent 
confrontation could have been avoided. However, my presentation 
at the time infringed on the interests of voters in a way. 
Following this, I began to behave in a more restrained manner, 
mindful that specific people stand behind me. 
  There is one more aspect: I have endeavored not to allow 
myself a single insulting attack that would be an affront to the 
honor and dignity of my political opponents, no matter what my 
attitude toward those opponents is. I remember well how hard it 
was for my relatives when mud was slung at me right and left 
after the statement of the "six." Since then, as I talk to my 
opponent I always imagine his circle of loved ones standing 
behind him. 
  Besides, I am a straightforward person. It is not the 
tradition of our people to settle accounts behind each other's 
backs. I usually express my doubts about someone's behavior and 
refine positions to the person's face and, as a rule, due to 
this I manage to find a common language with that person. 
Therefore, the phenomenon of my "unsinkability" is explained 
primarily by the fact that life compelled me to become a 
centrist. 
  [Dikun] In addition to the action of the "six," you took 
part 
in creating Skokov's Accord for the Motherland committee, which 
was likewise of an anti-Yeltsin persuasion. You stayed in the 
White House until the end. Moreover, at a conference of the 
components of the Federation you expressed the point of view of 
the rebellious parliament quite definitively. What did the 
president forgive all your sins for? 
  [Abdulatipov] If we were to use your terminology, 
"forgiveness" was, apparently, granted for the same reason--my 
criticism is sincere and direct, I do not weave a web of 
clandestine intrigues. On a human level, I like Yeltsin; his 
direct approach is somehow akin to that of a mountaineer, 
although I disagree with his political course on many points. 
  The hadith [prophetic tradition] of the Prophet Muhammad 
says: "Beware of the ignorant." I have always viewed 
manifestations of all extremes as a sign of ignorance. If we 
sort this out, there were no irreconcilable differences between 
the economic and political approaches of the representative and 
executive authorities. Much is explained by the struggle for 
access to the president. At certain stages, Rutskoy and 
Khasbulatov were among Yeltsin's closest entourage, but 
subsequently this space was occupied by other people, and the 
most elementary human jealousy became a factor. The tragedy of 
the situation was in the fact that the people at the very "top" 
were unable to "arrange" their ambitions according to rank and 
subdue their pride. 
  As far as I was concerned, all my criticism of the president 
notwithstanding, I was prepared to cooperate with him in the 
interests of Russia. Thus, on the eve of the Seventh Congress I 
brought my entire chamber to him in the Kremlin in search of an 
accord. I was later berated for this in the Supreme Soviet: You 
went and bowed down to the president, they said; why did you not 
summon him to the White House? I answered: "He is older than I 
and, according to our customs, I must go to him." 
  During the days of the October events I did not conduct 
negotiations about who would surrender to whom or about our 
readiness to confess--not at the conference of Federation 
components in St. Petersburg, not in the Constitutional Court, 
not at the Monastery of St. Daniel. The discussion was about 
eliminating the extremes on both sides, about saving the 
parliament and the president in the existing situation. Alas.... 
  [Dikun] After the dispersal of the parliament you went into 
state service--you became Shakhray's first deputy in the State 
Committee for Federation and Nationality Affairs (now it is the 
Ministry for Nationality Affairs and Regional Policy--OBSHCHAYA 
GAZETA). Do you intend to pursue the course of the parliament on 
the nationality issue within that establishment? 
  [Abdulatipov] I have always believed that we have created 
many hotbeds of ethnic conflicts with our own hands. I have 
repeatedly told Yavlinskiy and Gaydar that in this enormous 
country there may not be a single model for transition to a 
market economy. Dozens of versions adapted to local conditions 
are needed--the Dagestani model, the Khakass model, and so on. 
Meanwhile, the economic reform was built on purely a party 
approach: A Gosplan [State Planning Committee] concept of who is 
to develop which way was issued from Moscow. As a result, all 
the republics began to climb out on their own. Failing to see a 
niche for itself in the reform, Tatarstan stepped aside and 
began to pursue its own policy; Chechnya began to distance 
itself from Russia because of helplessness. 
  At this point people are only aware of failures. Meanwhile, 
we in the Soviet of Nationalities succeeded in averting a war on 
Moscow, which was actually declared by autonomous okrugs and 
oblasts, by signing the Federation Treaty with them. We have 
stopped the secession of many republics from the Russian 
Federation, including Yakutia and Bashkortostan. 
  Incidentally, when unrest began in North Caucasus, 
Shelov-Kovedyayev, Poltoranin, Medvedev, and Khasbulatov went to 
Chechnya. I went with my group to Kabardino-Balkaria, where the 
situation was no better. As a result of negotiations and 
consultations with national movements, we succeeded in bringing 
back the government, scheduling new elections, and averting a 
split of the autonomous entity into two republics. In Chechnya, 
they took a revolutionary path, and the result of this is known. 
Right then I wrote to Yeltsin and Khasbulatov that it was not 
possible to proceed from the principle of revolutionary 
feasibility in relations with the republics. We wanted to take 
the "August revolution" from the White House "to the farthest 
outlying areas," and this would end badly. 
  [Dikun] They say that you had an arrangement with Shumeyko 
about the distribution of positions on the Federation Council: 
You ensure votes for him during the election of the speaker, and 
he ensures for you, as a reward, the position of his deputy. For 
this reason, you argued before the deputies in favor of voting 
for the candidacy of Vladimir Filippovich. 
  [Abdulatipov] We had a somewhat different arrangement, and 
it 
was not with Shumeyko. The leaders of most republics and 
representatives of some autonomous entities, krays, and oblasts 
met in my office shortly before the beginning of the proceedings 
of the Federation Council. I was the first one to be nominated 
as a candidate for the position of speaker at this conference, 
but I warned right away that I would not go for the position of 
chairman. First, I was not morally prepared for this; second, I 
was afraid that now, when the anti-Caucasus card is being 
played, it will be hard for people to see Abdulatipov's human 
face behind the "person of Caucasian nationality" right away. 
Subsequently, the candidacy of Viktor Stepanov, chairman of the 
Supreme Soviet of Karelia, was discussed, but he also declined 
because he was running in the presidential elections in his 
republic. The candidacy of Spiridonov, chairman of the Komi 
Supreme Soviet, emerged at the last moment, but he also did not 
agree to it because he had promised his voters he would work at 
home. 
  In general, an interesting situation emerged in which there 
was no one to bet on anymore. At that point I proposed to 
support Shumeyko. Some of my friends of a more conservative hue 
even took offense at me over this and stopped talking to me. As 
far as my "arrangement" with Vladimir Filippovich about becoming 
his deputy, long before the elections I had said that I intended 
to seek this position no matter who becomes chairman, and asked 
the leaders of the republic to support me. There later was such 
a conversation with Shumeyko, too. Therefore, this was a play in 
the open. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42778 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Yeltsin Representative in Khabarovsk Profiled </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0295A Moscow ROSSIYA in Russian No 4, 26 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0295A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Lyubov Latypova: "The Main Thing Is To Position </F>
Yourself Comfortably Between the Hammer and the Anvil"] 
  [Text] Khabarovsk--Probably nothing evokes such 
contradictory opinions as the institution of representatives of 
the president. Some call them the "eye of the state," while 
others, remembering bygone times, call them "party organs of the 
Central Committee." At one time Nikolay Travkin, speaking from 
the parliamentary rostrum, promised "to inform" on himself every 
Wednesday if he is spared such representatives of the president. 
According to available information, speaker of the Federation 
Council Shumeyko is disposed to a radical resolution of this 
problem. In all probability the near future will show how 
reliable these assumptions are. But in the meantime a new 
representative of the president, Kondrat Yevtushenko, has been 
appointed representative of the president in Khabarovsk 
Kray. 
  Only one thing identifies Kondrat Yevtushenko, the new 
representative of the president in Khabarovsk Kray, with 
Vladimir Desyatov, his predecessor: Both came to politics on the 
crest of the democratic wave, and both supported its radical 
wing. The similarity ends here. Yevtushenko thinks that the 
self-isolation of the representative of the president from the 
administration of the kray and the local democrats was the 
reason for his dismissal. In this respect, Yevtushenko is the 
complete opposite of his predecessor. Being a people's deputy of 
Russia in the last convocation, he used his personal 
capabilities to the maximum to resolve the kray's problems. This 
ensured Yevtushenko the support of Viktor Ishayev, head of 
administration, who half a year before this appointed Kondrat 
Mikhaylovich manager of the executive branch of Amurskiy Rayon. 
  The opinion exists that the surgeon-traumatologist did not 
make it as an administrator and business executive: For example, 
in autumn he bought potatoes at an exorbitant price in Siberia 
instead of getting them right there from his own farmers. 
Important entrepreneurs are unhappy with the absence of support. 
However, he himself thinks otherwise: In this half year the city 
has become cleaner, asphalt has appeared, and they have started 
to build a waterline and finish building purification 
installations that were abandoned by the defense industry. As 
for production, he considers one of his unquestionable services 
the output of linoleum at one of the converted enterprises and 
the preparation of bus assemblies at another. 
  Yevtushenko thinks that the results of the elections to the 
State Duma, for which he submitted his candidacy, speak in his 
favor, although he did not become a deputy. Four-fifths of the 
people supported Kondrat Mikhaylovich in three rayons of his 
electoral district, and he surpassed his opponent by 13,000 
votes in his native Amursk. However, Komsomolsk preferred not a 
doctor democrat but a professional entrepreneur. 
  He started work in his new capacity with an accounting of 
state money expended on maintenance of the apparatus. His 
predecessor, with two representative offices--in Khabarovsk and 
Komsomolsk-na-Amur--worked three days in each. Yevtushenko 
immediately eliminated the office in Komsomolsk and also 
curtailed the position of deputy. 
  There are also dangers concealed in the position of 
representative of the president. For example, if he defends the 
interests of the kray "at the top" too actively, he risks 
bringing down on himself the displeasure of the immediate 
leadership apparatus and the president himself. If he is too 
cautious--the example of his predecessor also rings clear. In 
general, as the representative of the president attests, he 
clearly recognizes this situation of being between the hammer 
and the anvil, and treats it calmly. Yevtushenko is convinced 
that there are no poor decisions of the president, inasmuch as 
they are based only on the Constitution, but there are poor 
local authorities who execute them poorly for various reasons. 
Well, it is a novel idea. 
  However, a certain continuity is still seen. Kondrat 
Mikhaylovich began his contact with this journalist with a 
request that the article be submitted to him for approval. 
Desyatov also always started this way... 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42779 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   First Results of Dagestan `Special Order' Reviewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0295B Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 22 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0295B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Eduard Urazayev: "Makhachkala Sums Up First </F>
Results of `Special Order': Public Discusses Political 
Encroachments"] 
  [Text] 
  The Dagestan militia summed up the first results of the 
special order introduced for six months in the capital starting 
3 January. As is well known, there already are analogies of 
"special regimes," but the Makhachkala one in particular 
stipulates that citizens should "continuously have a passport 
with them, or some other document that identifies them, and 
present it at the request of workers of Internal Affairs 
organs," but that "citizens who are detained without identifying 
documents are subject to a fine in the amount of 10,000 rubles 
[R], and, if necessary, are put into a reception-transfer center 
and are kept there up to 10 days until identity is established." 
The decree of the city administration prescribes that "persons 
from other towns, who are in the city of Makhachkala without a 
purpose, will depart for their place of residence in 24 hours" 
under the threat of eviction from the city and a fine of 
R10,000. For driving motor vehicles in the city without a 
license, drivers are fined R100,000. 
  During the first 10 days about 4,000 persons went through 
the 
"special regime" (the population of the city is approximately 
360,000), and about half of them stayed in the duty room. Six 
hundred persons were fined, 128 persons were evicted from the 
city, and a substantial number of volunteers left for home by 
themselves. The amount of fines levied on the citizens for 10 
days amounted to about R20 million. 
  After the introduction of the special order, the number of 
recorded violations in the city increased, but they started to 
be exposed less frequently. When people who had arrived for 
personal or business reasons were detained without 
justification, the leadership of the GUVD [Main Administration 
of Internal Affairs] had to give assurances on local television 
that the "special order" was not a special regime, and that 
guests could come to the city freely. However, a decree of the 
administration gave heads of the organs of Internal Affairs of 
Makhachkala the right "to subject violators to administrative 
detention of up to 10 days," which contradicts the constitution, 
which permits arrest without a court order for a period of no 
more than 48 hours. The chief of the GUVD admitted that 
absolutely innocent citizens had run into cases of bribery of 
workers of law enforcement organs. 
  A similar "special order" has now been introduced in the 
cities of Kaspiysk and Yuzhno-Sukhokumsk. In addition, another 
investigative commission from Moscow is working in Makhachkala. 
This time it came from the Procuracy of the Russian Federation 
on Ramazan Abdulatipov's announcement concerning the increase in 
crime in Dagestan. 
  In particular, before the New Year a young person who had 
been convicted three times was arrested on suspicion in the 
murder of candidate for deputy to the Federation Council 
Bayramov in Kaspiysk. While being driven to the station, he blew 
himself up with a grenade and died. A judicial investigation was 
assigned. Commentaries on the affair concerning Bayramov's 
murder reported that he had been offered the position of 
minister if he removed his candidacy. 
  Last week Deputy Chairman of the Council of Ministers of 
Dagestan Amirov declared that the series of attempts in Dagestan 
is associated not with clan fights but with the economic 
interests of those who are for the new or old system of economic 
management, while associating himself with those who support the 
reforms of the president and the Government of the Russian 
Federation. On 2 April 1993, 27 rounds from an assault rifle 
were fired at Amirov's official vehicle, one of which struck his 
spine, and the deputy chairman is still undergoing treatment. 
  Amirov is the only one of the republic leaders who have 
declared the need for a Chamber of Nationalities in the new 
parliament of the republic, where equal representation of the 
peoples of the republic would be guaranteed. The existence of 
such a chamber would make it possible to balance the interests 
of the people of Dagestan and avoid an exacerbation of 
interethnic relations. At present, official circles are talking 
only about "taking into account" the fact of the many 
nationalities in the republic, but without guaranteeing any kind 
of legal personality of the people. 
  The attempt on Amirov's life occurred in the evening of the 
day he declared in DAGESTANSKAYA PRAVDA the need for a 
representative of the people of the republic in parliament. A 
session of the Supreme Soviet of Dagestan is scheduled for the 
end of January, where a draft constitution and a draft law on 
elections will be examined in the new parliament of the republic. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42780 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Krasnoyarsk Admin Chief on Regional Interests </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0283A Novosibirsk SIBIRSKAYA GAZETA in Russian No 1, 6 
Jan 94 pp 1,3 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0283A </F>
<F P=104>  Novosibirsk SIBIRSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Valeriy Zubov, Krasnoyarsk Kray </F>
administration head, by Viktor Yukechev, under rubric "In 
Today's Issue: On the Eve of the Event," and subrubric 
"Evaluations and Forecasts": "What Does the Head Think About 
After It Gets into Parliament?: (Correct answers: `about its 
region' -- one point, `about Siberia' -- two points, `about 
Russian regional policy' --three points.)"] 
  [Text] On 10 January, on the eve of the first session 
of the new Federal Assembly, the Council of the Siberskoye 
Soglasheniye [Siberian Agreement] Interregional Association will 
convene in Moscow. In order to elect a new chairman and work out 
the tactics for interaction (confrontation?) with the 
parliament, since 14 of the 19 territories that make up the 
Association are represented in the Federation Council by their 
heads. 
  Our correspondent met with Valeriy Zubov, governor of 
Krasnoyarsk Kray, who, in Sibirskoye Soglasheniuye, heads the 
Coordination Council on Finance and Investments. The meeting 
occurred shortly before Zubov's departure to Moscow. 
  [Yukechev] Valeriy Mikhaylovich, how do you evaluate the 
fact 
that almost all the governors who ran for election have been 
elected to the upper house of the new parliament? And how are 
you planning to handle this victory? 
  [Zubov] Well, I wouldn't call it a victory, since I do not 
see anyone who has been defeated. The population supported not 
so much the personalities, as I understand the situation, as 
they did the leaders of their regions. Since, whereas the State 
Duma has to be oriented on the resolution of Russia-wide 
problems, the Federation Council has to carry out expert 
deliberations concerning the draft versions of laws with the 
object of taking the interests of the regions into 
consideration. That idea has reached the population, and it 
voted for its rights. 
  How will our "faction" behave in the Federation Council? I 
think that, rather quickly, we shall become coordinated and 
begin working on the formulation of a regional policy. 
  [Yukechev] A regional policy, in its turn, consists of 
several policies. One of them is finance and credit policy. 
Wherein can the participation of Sibirskoye Soglasheniye and 
specifically your participation in its formulation be expressed? 
  [Zubov] First, in influence on the Russia-wide financial 
situation. There is truly a misalignment of the interests here. 
We are exporting regions. Our welfare depends directly upon how 
Russia-wide export is carried out. Suffice it to state that 
Krasnoyarsk Kray exports more than Moscow, Moscow Oblast, St. 
Petersburg, and Leningrad Oblast. In addition, there are Tyumen 
and Irkutsk Oblast. If one looks at history, those regions were 
assimilated largely in order to produce output for export. But 
today the finance and credit policy does not promote the 
development of export as a whole, or, consequently, those 
regions. It is an absurd situation when three of the world's 
largest aluminum plants are in a critical state. 
  We are putting our country's energy system in a critical 
situation, because the basic systems with a surplus of energy 
are here in Siberia. Our cheapest coal is here, but it is 
unprofitable to export it. As for our basic timber resources, 
once again we cannot export them. What do we want to get as a 
result? A short-term effect, when the ruble is stable and it is 
used to support branches that are operating exclusively on 
imported raw materials and equipment? Or do we want to develop 
our own production, which is capable not only of satisfying the 
country's needs, but also of producing output for export? Those 
are the key reasons why the Siberian regions occupy a special 
position. 
  [Yukechev] Are you talking about an incorrect choice of 
priorities? 
  [Zubov] Yes. 
  [Yukechev] In that instance, how do you propose carrying out 
a re-evaluation of priorities? It is possible, with the same 
people, to sit down next to one another and try to understand 
one another better. It is also possible to exert an influence on 
federal policy by other methods: by lobbying, by promoting one's 
own people... Which methods seem to you to be the most 
acceptable? 
  [Zubov] The most acceptable path, which, properly speaking, 
is the one that Sibirskoye Soglasheniye proceeded along until 
today, is negotiations. For example, when our council on 
foreign-economic activity began operating, we attempted there, 
together with the Ministry of Foreign Economic Relations and MID 
[Ministry of Foreign Affairs], to find those points where things 
were advantageous both for Russia and for Siberia. So far as I 
know, that kind of conversation with the northwest region did 
not occur. Or if we are convinced that, in this short period of 
time, the so-called Russia-wide interests must predominate, then 
we shall agree with that, or it will be necessary to agree with 
us: we cannot place three-fourths of Russia in a very serious 
situation for the sake of abstract stabilization on the rest of 
the territory. 
  If all the financial resources are pulled into Moscow and 
St. 
Petersburg, what then about Siberia, "the territory of 
progress," to use Chernomyrdin's expression? Therefore we shall 
undertake efforts, as we have done up until now, to concentrate 
the financial means here -- in order to resolve regional 
problems. Putting it more succinctly, our task is to influence 
Russia-wide policy so that it will be advantageous for the 
regions. 
  [Yukechev] What effect can the increase in the 
transportation 
rates have in the Siberian territories? 
  [Zubov] A bad one, of course. It is necessary to weigh 
carefully which is more beneficial -- either to guarantee the 
profitability of the branches and regions situated on the 
Transsib [Trans-Siberian Railroad] by subsidizing the mainline, 
or to subsidize individual branches and individual regions. 
  Nonferrous metallurgy (50 percent of the total industrial 
production), and the timber and coal industries, constitute the 
basis of the kray's economy. Two of these three branches depend 
entirely on the Transsib. So let's figure out which is more 
advantageous. 
  [Yukechev] But what if, as has happened in the past, no one 
listens to the voice of the regions? 
  [Zubov] When the negotiations fail, lobbying begins, by 
urging along people who understand, who share our views. There's 
nothing new about this. 
  [Yukechev] You know, better than I do, that the rate of 
budgetary support in the various Siberian regions differs. The 
difference sometimes is too great. Is that normal? 
  [Zubov] Krasnoyarsk Kray is among the five largest taxpayers 
into the Russian budget. It has developed that, for many decades 
the state, in a concentrated manner, invested funds into certain 
regions. Therefore they also proved to be in a preferential 
position. Of course, Krasnoyarsk Kray was developed by the 
entire country, like the Togliatti Automobile Plant. But it is 
necessary to help the other "weak" regions not at the expense of 
the collapse of the strong ones, which are obliged to be 
economically more supported at the expense of the taxes 
collected from themselves. 
  A single standard for deductions to be paid into the budget 
is possible in the event that part of the budget will be 
redistributed in a purposeful manner to those regions that have 
previously been declared to be depressed or undeveloped, for 
which certain terms are created: over a period of, for example, 
ten years of state support they will reach the level of 
self-support. In this part, I must say, the federal government 
is proceeding correctly today -- this is approximately the way 
that the 1994 budget is being formed. 
  [Yukechev] But is it possible to return to the idea of a 
consolidated budget within the framework of Sibirskoye 
Soglasheniye? 
  [Zubov] No, it's impossible. This is a completely 
unnecessary 
idea. Today we must not reconsider the borders, or introduce new 
territorial or national formations. It is possible only to unite 
the budgets, according to the wishes of the territories, to 
resolve completely local tasks. But one cannot speak about a 
single budget, otherwise this problem will change over to the 
political plane... 
  [Yukechev] Can you give examples of these specific programs? 
  [Zubov] Yes. For example, Agrosib. A quota for the timber in 
Krasnoyarsk Kray was allocated to that program, with the 
assumption that the proceeds from that will go into developing 
the processing of agricultural output in the Siberian regions. 
  [Yukechev] For Russia as a whole, the reprocessing of waste 
products is a vitally important problems. In addition to those 
waste products of our own that we have enough of, the European 
countries are ready to sell us more... At the same time, there 
have been proposals from abroad: to give us modern technological 
systems and even investments, if only we build reprocessing 
enterprises in our country. What is your attitude to this? 
  [Zubov] I want to talk only about the reprocessing of waste 
products from nuclear electric-power stations. They are being 
stored today. There exists a definite period of time during 
which they can simply lie around. But if we do not build 
enterprises to reprocess them within the next 16 years, we shall 
finding waiting for us an ecological catastrophe that is more 
terrible than the Chernobyl disaster. There are two methods for 
resolving this problem: either find budgetary money to build 
those enterprises, or earn money from having those waste 
products brought to us. For us, only the second path is 
economically possible: we do not enough of a budget today. The 
cost of one such modern plant is approximately equal to the 
kray's budget (but in dollars). It is necessary to provide the 
opportunity to a nuclear enterprise (Krasnoyarsk, Tomsk, 
Chelyabinskny situation) to earn money for building a processing 
plant. France acts this way, for example, and there's no problem 
-- it's normal. And our technological systems do not yield to 
the French ones. 
  [Yukechev] Does that mean, then, that you are ready to 
consider specific investment proposals? 
  [Zubov] We are already considering them. 
  [Yukechev] That sounds optimistic. 
  [Zubov] No, it sounds pessimistic. Because all it will take 
is to have five energetic people come and stir up the entire 
population, and everything will go to rack and ruin... You 
cannot make decisions like this at rallies. And if you do make 
them, then there should be mention of your name in the 
newspapers: so that your descendants will know who made that 
decision. Just as, incidentally, they should know who made the 
decision to build the plant, who signed the contracts. In any 
instance the person's name should be known. 
  [Yukechev] I have heard that Krasnoyarsk has announced its 
candidacy for conducting the 2002 Goodwill Games. Do you hope 
that this question will be resolved to our advantage? 
  [Zubov] Yes. Most of the sports federations have already 
supported this idea. I must say that when, in 1982, the winter 
sports days were held in Krasnoyarsk for the first time, and the 
next ones were also set up here, we were convinced that we can 
do things normally. 
  [Yukechev] Well, then, we also wish you luck in this matter. 
  [Zubov] Well, I think that all Siberians should give us 
moral 
support too. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42781 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Bashkortostan President on Cooperation With Neighbors </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0283B Chelyabinsk CHELYABINSKIY RABOCHIY in Russian 5 
Jan 94 p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0283B </F>
<F P=104>  Chelyabinsk CHELYABINSKIY RABOCHIY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with M. Rakhimov by M. Kotlukhuzhin, </F>
Ufa-Magnitogorsk, under rubric "On the Basis of Stability: 
Republic President Murtaza Rakhimov Gives Assurance That 
Bashkortostan Will Continue a Policy of Mutually Advantageous 
Cooperation With Its Neighbors"] 
  [Text] On 12 December in the neighboring Republic of 
Bashkortostan, simultaneously with the election to the Russian 
Federal Assembly, the election of the first president in the 
republic's history took place. Two candidates laid claim to that 
position -- Murtaza Rakhimov, chairman of the republic's Supreme 
Soviet, and Rafis Kadyrov, chairman of the board of the Vostok 
[East] Bank. The results of the voting showed that M. G. 
Rakhimov won with a large advantage. 
  Our oblast, and especially Magnitka [Magnitogorsk] and 
its metallurgical plant in particular, is linked with 
Bashkortostan by traditionally deep mutual economic interests. 
We are also brought closer together by common sociopolitical 
problems and the need to resolve them by combined efforts. This 
explains our striving to meet with the president of 
Bashkortostan. 
  Despite the fact that he was extremely busy preparing 
for the session of the republic's Supreme Soviet and for his 
inauguration, Murtaza Gubaydullovich Rakhimov nevertheless 
managed to find time for a quarter of an hour to answer a number 
of my questions. 
  [Kotlokhuzhin] First of all, Murtaza Gubaydullovich, please 
accept our congratulations on your having been elected the 
president of Bashkortostan. I saw in the republic press that one 
of the first persons to congratulate you was B. N. Yeltsin. Does 
that mean that the sovereignization of Bashkortostan is being 
supported at the highest state level? 
  [Rakhimov] Thank you for the congratulation. Actually, I 
received two telegrams from the president of Russia. Boris 
Nikolayevich also congratulated me on my having been elected 
deputy to the Federation Council of the Russian Federal Assembly. 
  But the sovereignization of Bashkortostan could not 
encounter 
any opposition from the center, inasmuch as it does not present 
any threat to the integrity of Russia. Our republic was, and 
continues to be, one of the most powerful subjects in the makeup 
of the Russian Federation. I might recall that, on a voluntary 
basis, we have been part of the Russian state for more than four 
centuries. And we shall continue to strive not to weaken, but to 
strengthen, that historical unity. We proceed from the idea that 
the Russian Federation will be strong in proportion to the 
strength of its subjects. Therefore we shall support an 
efficient separation of the powers between the federal agencies 
of state authority and the republics' agencies of authority, and 
the independence of the Federation's subjects in many areas of 
socioeconomic life. 
  We are also convinced that Russia can become strong if we 
are 
able to unite among ourselves to achieve a common goal -- the 
creation of a prosperous society. If we are able to guarantee 
the supremacy of the law and a truly federal system, without 
infringing upon the rights of anyone, or any nation. In Russia 
the Law governs, rather than any single party, clan, or 
individual. 
  [Kotlokhuzhin] Exactly four years ago, at the first congress 
of the Bashkir Ural [Urals] Social Center, I proposed including 
a small line in the telegram demanding the granting of political 
sovereignty to Bashkortostan: "on the basis of economic 
independence." At that time the proposal did not find any 
support. Today the economic independence of your republic is the 
chief condition for sovereignty. 
  [Rakhimov] Naturally, without any broad economic 
independence 
there cannot be any true sovereignty. I am convinced that if 
Gorbachev had granted the Baltic republics economic independence 
promptly, it would have been possible to avoid the collapse of 
the USSR. And under today's conditions of the complete collapse 
of the country's economy, which I consider to be simply a crime 
against the nation, sovereignty is necessary to multi-ethnic 
Bashkortostan in order to guarantee to its people a worthy life. 
For this purpose it is necessary create in the republic those 
conditions in which every citizen -- irrespective of his 
nationality, religion, or social status -- can, without any 
restrictions, engage in his job, demonstrate all his 
capabilities and receive just compensation for his labor, and be 
calm concerning his own life and the life of his children. The 
republic's economic independence guarantees more rights and 
opportunities to the cities and rayons in carrying out their 
social development programs. 
  [Kotlokhuzhin] What paths do you see and plan, Murtaza 
Gubaydullovich, for getting out of the present complicated 
socioeconomic situation? 
  [Rakhimov] What we need first of all are political and 
social 
stability, consent among nationalities, and the prevention of 
indecisive actions. It is necessary to restore and stabilize 
production, to develop our life on the basis of all forms of 
ownership, to encourage private enterprise and business, and to 
encourage investments in the republic's economy. I feel that 
stability in the regions is necessary in order to save Russia 
from collapse. 
  The main error in reforming the economy, in my opinion, is 
the making of encroachments on the producer. In our republic we 
are planning a new course. The producer in Bashkortostan will 
receive the state's complete support in the high-priority 
economic areas. We feel that economic reforms must be carried 
out in the interests of people. And we choose as our unshakeable 
rule the following: any reform must be carried out only in the 
event that it improves people's lives. 
  Of course, the economy of Bashkortostan cannot develop in 
complete isolation from the economy of Russia, or the entire 
former Union. The negative consequences of the universal 
economic collapse did not bypass us. So, just as pertains 
everything, although perhaps only to a lesser degree, our 
volumes of production are dropping. Among your neighbors, for 
example, at the Beloretsk Metallurgical Combine, a powerful 
wire-making machine is standing idle because of the lack of 
production orders. 
  Nevertheless, the steps being taken by us are already 
yielding certain positive results. In our republic we have not 
allowed a reduction in the volumes of housing construction, and 
we consider this to be a major achievement. It apparently will 
be important for the people of Chelyabinsk to know that we also 
are not allowing a complete drop in agricultural production, 
since your oblast, and particularly Magnitka, receives a rather 
large amount of food products from Bashkortostan. We plan to 
continue to render effective support to agriculture, without 
making any distinctions at such time among the forms of 
ownership. We are ready to help everyone -- the kolkhozes, 
sovkhozes, and individual farmers -- so long as they manage 
their farms effectively. That is the main criterion. 
  And the rural areas respond to this attention by performing 
work well. I am aware that in Chelyabinsk and Orenburg oblasts a 
rather large number of fields remained unharvested during the 
recent serious autumn. That did not occur in our republic. All 
the grain was harvested. 
  [Kotlokhuzhin] One can only rejoice at your successes. Am I 
correct in thinking that, with this attempt on your part to 
achieve stability and to preserve your previous economic ties, 
the Magnitogorsk metallurgists apparently have the right to 
count on the continuation of the mutually advantageous 
cooperation with Bashkortostan? 
  [Rakhimov] There should be no doubts about this! The 
cooperation will continue on the basis of the long-term contract 
that was signed by us two years ago with the leadership of the 
Magnitogorsk Metallurgical Combine. In exchange for metal 
products, Bashkortostan will continue the shipment of food 
products and of petroleum and chemical products. 
  [Kotlokhuzhin] The interests of the MMK [Magnitogorsk 
Metallurgical Combine] are not limited only to this. 
Recreational centers for the combine and for other industrial 
enterprises are situated on the territory of Abzelilovskiy and 
Belorechnyy rayons. Do your political concept and the program 
for developing economic cooperation make it possible to hope not 
only for their preservation, but also for further development? 
  [Rakhimov] Of course. I reemphasize that we are not planning 
to isolate ourselves, to separate ourselves, or to speculate 
with our sovereignty. We have enough land, both for the 
recreational centers for the Magnitogorsk metallurgists and for 
other good deeds. So we shall continue to live in peace and 
harmony, and, on the basis of mutually advantage cooperation, to 
strive for a good life for all working people, wherever they 
live -- in Bashkortostan or in Magnitka. 
  [Kotlokhuzhin] Thank you, Murtaza Gubaydullovich, for the 
conversation. On behalf of the readers of our newspaper,I would 
like to wish you success in your important endeavors. 
  [Rakhimov] Rakhmat. Khau bulygyz! Good luck! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42782 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94013" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Perm Local Election Scene Previewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0283C Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA in Russian 26 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0283C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA correspondent Grigoriy </F>
Bazhutin, Perm, under rubric "Boondocks": "The Blizzard of 
Passion Has Not Abated"] 
  [Text] People in Perm are depressed, fearful, and 
hungry. At least many of them are. A few days ago a blizzard 
played tricks over the city, pressing down on it with large 
snowdrifts and converting the sidewalks into narrow paths and 
the roads in narrow ruts. The city administration does not have 
any funds to put them in order. 
  Ordinary citizens are being "squeezed" by the prices in the 
stores, in transportation, and in the day care centers and 
hospitals. The defense enterprises that constitute the basis of 
the city's industry are "squeezing" people by their violations 
of the conversion law. Motorostroitel, the city's largest AO 
[joint-stock company] received for the current year a state 
production order that is capable of giving a workload to only 
five percent of the production capacities. 
  The Christmas vacation at some enterprises has not yet 
ended. 
According to the administration's estimates, during the next few 
weeks the conversion plants will have to lay off at least 
approximately 15,000 workers. Who will be included in that 
figure? Where will those people go? What will their families 
live on? These are questions to which no one in Perm can give an 
intelligible answer. 
  It is only in the headquarters of the local parties and 
public associations that life is in full swing. The people there 
are preparing for the election to the oblast Representative 
Assembly. According to preliminary estimates, from 500 to 600 
candidates will contend for 40 places. Who, then, has the best 
chances of success? 
  Perhaps one of the leaders of the local section of the LDPR 
[Liberal Democratic Party of Russia]--19-year-old Aleksandr 
Chulkov, who identified himself as a student but who, it 
transpired, is not carried on the rolls of any higher 
educational institution? He has already announced that the 
Zhirinovskiy followers have been guaranteed the majority in the 
assembly. In addition, he has called himself the "shadow 
governor," and has recruited a shadowy "cabinet of ministers." 
Another local leader of the same party sent to the Perm section 
of the SDP [Social Democratic Party], which is organizing an 
antifascist front, a letter in which he promised that, in 
payment for the criticism leveled against his party (when the 
LDPR comes to power), everyone will be subjected to repressions, 
up to and including death by firing squad. 
  But if one speaks seriously, in Perm the LDPR scarcely has 
any chances of success. But the Communists have substantial 
ones. This is attested to if only by the results of the election 
to the State Duma. V. Zelenin, agricultural institute professor, 
and V. Putilov, chairman of the Rossiya [Russia] Kolkhoz, the 
largest one in the oblast, both of whom got through the election 
with unambiguously Communist programs, garnered considerably 
more votes than the other pretenders. 
  It is also interesting that today more and more Communist 
Party sections are being supported by young people and students. 
They have begun, by the way, to issue a newspaper under the 
somewhat pretentious name NASH PAROVOZ [Our Locomotive]. 
  The trade unions are also counting on a majority in the 
Representative Assembly. People in the Perm Oblast Council of 
Trade Unions regret that they did not take part in the election 
to the State Duma. Now they have decided to fight actively for 
places in the oblast representative authority. 
  Yet another previously unknown force arose unexpectedly on 
the local political scene -- the force consisting of the united 
managers of banks and other financial structures. And it can be 
assumed that a definite amount of success has been guaranteed to 
them --if only at the expense of the money that they have at 
their disposal. 
  Those Perm residents who still preserve some kind of 
political aggressiveness are, of course, worried most about what 
kind of succession will occur between the present Council that 
is living its last days and the future Representative Assembly. 
M. Bystryantsev, chairman of the oblast Council, feels that 
there is no doubt about it. First, in his opinion, at least half 
the members of the small Council can become part of the 
Representative Assembly and be beneficial there. But he himself 
is also planning to run for election. 
  One should have no doubts about Mikhail Ivanovich's success. 
Several districts and public associations are already arguing 
today about the right to nominate him as their candidate. 
Immediately the question arises: does this mean that he will 
also head the assembly? That would really be too much! There are 
two real leaders. One of them is, yes, M. Bystryantsev. However, 
the oblast administration has decided to oppose him with Doctor 
of Economic Sciences Ye. Sapiro, first deputy governor. 
  To tell the truth, the collision between the two leaders 
seems to be a bad thing. But, really, there are those who wanted 
very much to organize it. Why? Apparently the administration 
wants to put under its control the new representative authority 
that has not even been born yet! We can see that the process 
that is gathering force on the federal level has also seized the 
provinces. Until the snowdrifts are cleared away here... to the 
politicians! 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42783 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94014" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   New Caucasus Confederation Troop Chief Profiled </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0299A Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 1 Feb 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0299A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SEGODNYA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vakhtang Dzhanashiya: "Shamil Basayev Appointed </F>
Troop Commander of the Confederation of Peoples of the Caucasus] 
  [Text] Shamil Basayev, a Chechen, was confirmed as troop 
commander of the Confederation of Peoples of the Caucasus [CPC] 
at the Fifth CPC Congress, and Amin Zekhov, an Adygey, was 
confirmed as chief of staff. 
  Shamil Basayev was born in 1965 in Chechnya. After serving 
as 
a firefighter in the Air Force he entered the Moscow Institute 
of Land Management. In 1988 he was dropped from the second 
course because of bad grades but he remained in Moscow until 
1991. He worked, in his words, "as one of the Chechen 
cooperators" in a trade-intermediary limited liability 
partnership. At the beginning of 1991 he returned to his 
homeland and immediately entered the CPC forces. 
  Just five days after the conflict in Abkhazia began he 
arrived there as chief of the first detachment of confederates. 
In January 1993 at a joint session of the Presidential Council 
and the Parliament of the CPC, Mr. Basayev was appointed 
commander of the CPC expeditionary corps in Abkhazia. He was 
assigned the duties of "coordinating, uniting, guiding into the 
necessary channels, and supervising the flow of arriving 
volunteers." Later confirmed by an edict of Vladislav Ardzinba 
in the position of deputy minister of defense in the Gudauta 
administration, Shamil Basayev stated that his rights extended 
only to the mountain volunteers--only a part, albeit an 
extremely significant one, of the Gudauta armed forces. 
  It is Shamil Basayev's conviction that "It was in Russia's 
interests to have the Abkhaz-Georgian conflict grow into war so 
that both sides would be brought to their knees." The 
confederates knew ahead of time about the forthcoming 
introduction of a military contingent. He evaluates the Georgian 
troops as rabble who have to be called an army only because the 
Georgian Government has supplied them with uniforms and 
weapons." Georgia's defeat in the war is explained by the 
absence of order in the government and the army and the "whole 
idea--the idea of the sovereignty and unity of Georgia." 
  In Mr. Basayev's words, Russia granted no military aid to 
Abkhazia. To the question of why the Russian Federation 
ministers of defense and foreign affairs did not deny the report 
about such aid, Mr. Basayev noted that he "cannot answer for all 
the babble that goes around Moscow." The weapons, including the 
latest costly tanks and aircraft, Mr. Basayev asserts, were 
purchased privately: "There are many ways of making money--why 
did Abkhazia need anybody's help? The CPC commander in chief 
personally has 18 automatic Kalashnikovs, one machine gun, and 
three pistols: "There are gobs of weapons in the Caucasus. In 
the Northern Caucasus everyone is looking for a weapon, they all 
buy them, but they will not fire!" In his opinion the 
Confederation of Peoples of the Caucasus, which gives warning 
about many possible conflicts, can take credit for that. In the 
opinion of Shamil Basayev, the Fifth CPC Congress has 
transformed the Confederation's troops into "peacemaking forces." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42784 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94015" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   State, Private Sector in Conflict Over Buryatia Gold Deposits </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0299B Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 1 Feb 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0299B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SEGODNYA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Aleksandr Bekker: "Privatization Is Worth Its </F>
Weight in Gold" 
  [Text] The Committee on Precious Metals Against the 
State Committee for Management of State Property 
<H5>  Conflict </H5>
  Seven kilometers separate the rayon center of Taksimo in the 
north of Buryatia from the Irokinda gold mine. Six years ago 
this was the distance the heavy Urals would cover every day 
carrying their loads. For some drivers the path to the mountain 
of gold was their last: Their brakes would fail on the steep 
pass and the vehicles "were on their way" into the abyss. As for 
the extraction of metal, the workers of the Zabaykalzoloto state 
association spent more time boozing it up than increasing the 
country's gold supply. "Taking into account the lengthy period 
when the mines were worked at a loss, their insolvency plus the 
fact that the measures taken repeatedly...produce no positive 
results," effective 1 July 1988 the association terminated state 
mining. The Irokinda mine and the wretched housing that went 
with it were turned over to the Vitim gold mining artel. 
  In a short period of time the private owners had completed 
the construction of a mining village and a factory for enriching 
metal, they had blasted the pass and built a road from Taksimo 
that could be traveled in a couple of hours, and they had 
extended an electric power transmission line to Irokinda. The 
few kilograms of gold from the period of state production were 
turned into 2.4 "artel" tonnes. 
  And a real interest in Irokinda awakened again in the state: 
The Buryatzoloto state gold mining enterprise (GZP), which 
replaced Zabaykalzoloto and with which Vitim had concluded 
contracts for leasing technical equipment and working the mine, 
decided to become a joint-stock company. And in such a way that 
the mine and practically everything that had been done by the 
prospectors was to go to the GZP, while the artel itself would 
either be absorbed by Buryatzoloto, half of which was made up of 
white-collar workers in Ulan-Ude, or, after turning over what it 
had acquired and created, would depart. At the same time the 
Vitim prospectors, who were also trying to privatize, wanted 
nothing to do with this "vassal." 
  The scenario is not a new one: When they divide up property 
everything is blood, sweat, and tears. But when they divide up a 
"vein of gold" there is a lot more of everything. The branch, 
which has enriched the country by tens of billions of dollars, 
was built through unconcealed exploitation of gold mining 
artels. They did not receive licenses to work the deposits, they 
did not have the right to bring armed guards to the gold mines 
and fields, and they were essentially deprived of their property 
claims, being forced to conclude agreements for leasing by state 
enterprises. The latter sold the gold to the Committee on 
Precious Metals at prices considerably below world prices, but 
they cut the payment to the "private owners" by another third. 
  They did not manage to include in the first state program 
for 
privatization in 1992 a provision whereby gold miners could 
purchase leased property from state enterprises. A certain 
breakthrough was made by Council of Ministers Decree No. 117, 
according to which during 1992 the artels were permitted to work 
without licenses, automatically, without special clearance from 
state enterprises, leasing agreements were extended, and 
payments were set in the form of 75 percent in rubles and 25 
percent in foreign currency in direct settlements with the state 
for gold. The only thing that Buryatzoloto won away from the 
artels that year was that the apparatus would be maintained with 
deductions from profit and amortization. And the artels, even 
without valuable instructions from the GZP, increased extraction 
and expanded mine production out of their own revenues, they 
improved the technology for enrichment of gold in the factories, 
and they started up their own refineries. 
  The prospects of losing the "gold mine" made the general 
director of Buryatzoloto, Valeriy Dmitriyev, uneasy. His 
instinct for self-preservation told him that he should gather 
together some workers and start mining. The question as to 
"where to mine?" was answered by the general director without 
much fuss: the best deposits. And where would he find them? He 
would take them away from the gold mining collectives. Valeriy 
Dmitriyev acted intelligently. In order not to have the artels 
form a front against him, he set all the small, placer mines 
adrift. The GZP chief dealt his first blow to the largest artel 
in Buryatia, Sayany. "They literally wrenched it out of our 
hands," said its chairman, Mr. Markovskiy. "Administration by 
injunction, threats, and graft among workers were all put into 
play. We were forced to turn over the enrichment factory and 
abandon the richest mine, Kholba." The best artel, by the 
admission of other gold miners, one that had built dozens of 
kilometers of roads and bridges, an enrichment factory, and 
sanatoriums, one that had extracted about two tonnes of gold and 
introduced technology for obtaining it in slabs, was essentially 
crushed, forced to retreat to the Irkutsk placer mines where 
gold is extracted by the kilogram. 
  It was a little bit difficult for Valeriy Dmitriyev to 
"swallow up" Sayany and Vitim all at once, and therefore he 
applied the tactic of gradual suffocation to the second artel, 
Buryatzoloto. According to the law on minerals and the "Statute 
on the Procedure for Licensing the Use of Minerals," Vitim, 
which was operating at Irokinda, should have received its 
license for 1993 automatically. But the republic Council of 
Ministers and Geology Committee, sidestepping the law, issued it 
not to the artel but to the GZP. The Vitim chairman, Vasiliy 
Davidyuk, resisted for three months, but the futility of the 
situation forced him to sign an agreement with Dmitriyev. Under 
these conditions 63 percent of the revenue from the sale of the 
metal would be collected by Buryatzoloto. Without lifting a 
finger, last year the GZP "panned" out of the artel R5.9 billion 
and $1.09 million. 
  In words Valeriy Dmitriyev is not denying Vitim the right to 
exist: "The artel can form a joint-stock company as a part of 
Buryatzologo and receive the portion of shares due to it." The 
trick here is that the GZP sharply increased the sum of its own 
fixed capital by appropriating the property of Sayany and part 
of Vitim's and it also gave this sum in current prices while the 
artel's "wealth" was accounted for in 1992 prices; thus the gold 
mining collectives' share of Irokinda in its authorized capital 
shrank from 70 percent to 10 percent. But even that is not the 
main thing. Valeriy Dmitriyev submitted one document whereby 
Buryatzoloto would not inform the artel of the plan for 
extraction for 1994--the general director, in his mind not 
considering himself the master of Irokinda, gave Vitim up as a 
lost cause. 
  And this is at a time when the laws are on the side of the 
latter. On 21 May 1993 Decree No. 480 of the Council of 
Ministers, was published under the signature of Viktor 
Chernomyrdin, according to which the Russian Federation State 
Committee for Management of State Property was instructed "upon 
privatization of mining enterprises not to include in their 
authorized capital property leased by gold mining artels and to 
include it on the balance sheet with subsequent transfer to be 
leased by the gold mining artels." The fact that the Buryat 
conflict was so typical and the desire of the Russian GZP's 
under the Committee on Precious Metals to profit from the 
formation of joint-stock companies at the expense of the artels 
led the first deputy chairman of the GKI [State Property 
Committee], Petr Mostovoy, in a special letter to the local 
regions to emphasize once again the property rights of the gold 
mining collectives. And right before that Yegor Gaydar, a deputy 
prime minister at the time, instructed the chiefs of 
administrations of the oblasts where precious metals are mined 
and the chairman of the Council of Ministers of Buryatia, 
Vladimir Saganov, "before 31 December 1993 to adopt a decision 
to issue licenses to gold mining artels for precious metal 
deposits they are working or preparing for working." 
  Vitim still did not receive a license. In this case Valeriy 
Dmitriyev, the law abider, as he calls himself, interprets 
obedience to the law extremely broadly. Since October of last 
year Buryatzoloto has stopped paying money to gold mining 
collectives for the work they have done. In January, on orders 
from the general director of the GZP, all work was halted at 
Irokinda, dozens of armed people from Buryatzoloto took the 
enriching factory under guard, and they are trying to drive the 
gold mining collectives out of the electric power plant and the 
boiler room. The situation heated up to such a degree that the 
Committee on Precious Metals sent a commission to the site of 
the events. It is no secret that the chairman of the Committee 
on Precious Metals, Yevgeniy Bychkov, depends on the general 
directors of state gold mining enterprises for support. The 
commission could not fail to take this circumstance into account 
and it unequivocally took the side of Mr. Dmitriyev. Both Mr. 
Bychkov and the "generals" of the branch are afraid that Vitim 
will create a precedent. In order to prevent this they are 
refusing to recognize the instructions of the State Property 
Committee and they are ignoring the decrees of the government 
right down to the directive of Deputy Prime Minister Oleg 
Soskovets of 22 January to the Russian Federation State 
Committee on the Administration of State Property and the 
Committee on Precious Metals "to provide for unconditional 
fulfillment" of the property rights of the artels. 
  If we set aside the moral and legal aspects of the Buryat 
"battle" it makes no difference to the Russian citizen who chips 
away at the ores of Irokinda--as long as they mine more gold. 
But the fact is that the state enterprises have demonstrated 
their abilities long ago. After taking the Kholba deposit into 
his own hands and driving Sayany out, Valeriy Dmitriyev, instead 
of the 1.5 tonnes of gold he had promised the republic, produced 
840 kg while the plan of the artel, which was overfulfilled 
every year, was for 1.2 tonnes. It took Sayany four months to 
build the technological line at the enriching factory while the 
GZP took a year. And there was nothing stored up for the future. 
The same thing will happen if Irokinda is seized. They can only 
squander what they have obtained for nothing. Practically 
nothing can change the nature of the GZP, which is capable of 
surviving only on state subsidies and what they can steal from 
the artels. In 1992 and 1993 on secret instructions from the 
government to Buryatzologo, 500 kg of precious metal each were 
allotted for financing developments in Kholba and Irokinda. The 
commission of the Committee on Precious Metals, which had been 
given the assignment of figuring out what the money was spent 
on, never did make their way to the end. The gold mining 
collectives from Vitim said that they were prepared to pay half 
of Buryatzoloto's debt--as long as the artel was allowed to 
privatize itself along with the mine and everything that had 
been done there by Vitim. 
  In general this only requires something small--but it is 
fundamental: to legally grant the gold mining artels the right 
to buy from the state not only movable but also immovable 
property. It seems that the Russian Federation State Committee 
on the Administration of State Property did not have enough 
strength to beat off the attack from the Committee on Precious 
Metals and at the last moment that point was left out of the 
State Privatization Program for 1994. And so there will be more 
conflicts like the ones in Buryatia and resolving them is not 
likely to add to Russia's gold supplies. 
  In December of last year at a conference of branch leaders 
the chairman of the Committee on Precious Metals, Mr. Bychkov, 
proudly informed those in attendance that against the background 
of the general depression of the national economy only the gold 
mining industry did not lower the production level. It is just 
that Mr. Bychkov forgot to add that this had not occurred 
because of the self-sacrificing labor of the GZP. It is simply 
that the gold mining artels had increased gold extraction by 18 
tonnes in three years. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42785 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94016" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Tatarstan January Price Increases Detailed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  94P50095 Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA in Russian 5 Feb 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 94P50095 </F>
<F P=104>  Kazan IZVESTIYA TATARSTANA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Irina Goryacheva, Economic Trends Center: "In </F>
January Prices Increased by 20 Percent. But the Cities of 
Tatarstan (Kazan, Chistopol, and Naberezhnyye Chelny) Remain 
Among the `Cheapest' Cities of Russia"] 
  [Text] After the rather high weekly rates of inflation that 
were recorded at the beginning and middle of the month, towards 
the end of January these rates grew more slowly, and between 15 
and 25 January prices increased by 3.4 percent. 
  Nevertheless, since the beginning of the year the rate of 
inflation has already reached nearly 21 percent. During the 
past week once again the greatest increase was observed in 
tariffs on paid services, which increased by 7.6 percent. 
Prices for foodstuffs increased by 3.8 percent. The growth of 
prices for noncomestibles in January continued to lag behind the 
increase in prices for services and foodstuffs, and during the 
past week amounted to 2.2 percent. 
  The highest rates of inflation were recorded in the Uralskiy 
and Severo-Zapadnyy rayons, where they reached 4.7 and 4.6 
percent, respectively. For the last three weeks the lowest 
increase in prices for basic consumer goods and paid services 
were observed in the Severokavkazskiy region, where rates grew 
by 2.8, 3.4, and 2.2 percent, respectively. 
  In Moscow the growth of consumer prices for goods and 
services over the past week was higher than in Russia on the 
average, amounting to 4.6 percent. The greatest price increase 
in the capital was for foodstuffs, amounting to 5.8 percent. In 
St. Petersburg the overall increase in prices for consumer goods 
and services came to 3.5 percent. 
  Over the past week prices for foodstuffs increased by 3.8 
percent, and since the beginning of January have increased by 
20.6 percent overall. The weekly growth of prices in organized 
marketing was higher than in unorganized marketing, amounting to 
4.1 and 2.5 percent, respectively. On the whole during the past 
week, as in the week preceding it, the greatest price increases 
were for dairy products (7.8 percent), animal oil (5.2 percent), 
and bakery goods and vegetables (almost 5 percent). Macaroni 
and cereal products, eggs, and fish products were almost 4 
percent more expensive than one week ago. Prices for 
confectioneries and fruit grew by 2 percent during the week. 
Prices for sugar have remained nearly stable since the 
beginning of the year. 
  In unorganized marketing over the past week the increase in 
the price of vodka was the greatest increase in any of the goods 
under observation and, at 7.2 percent, was significantly higher 
than the new rate in organized marketing stores, which increased 
by only 3.1 percent. 
  The greatest increase in foodstuff prices over the last week 
was noted in the Severnyy rayon, where in both organized and 
unorganized marketing prices grew by 5 percent. 
  The average cost of an assortment of nineteen basic 
foodstuffs as of 25 January amounted to 366,000 rubles, having 
increased each week by 4.5 percent, and since the beginning of 
the month by 19 percent. 
  Once again the cities of the far eastern region took first 
place in terms of the cost of an assortment of nineteen basic 
foodstuffs. Over the last week the increase in the price of 
such an assortment in the cities of this region grew from 1 
percent, in Komsomolsk-na-Amure, to 17 percent, in 
Yuzhno-Sakhalinsk. 
  Over the week in Moscow the cost of an assortment of 
nineteen 
basic foodstuffs grew by 3.3 percent, amounting to 396,000 as of 
25 January. In St. Petersburg the cost of such an assortment 
increased by 1.4 percent, totalling 352,000 rubles. Among the 
cities under consideration Moscow is in 36th place (a week ago 
it was 33rd), and St. Petersburg is again in 60th place, as it 
was a week ago. 
  Since the beginning of January prices for noncomestibles 
have 
grown much more slowly than those for foodstuffs and services. 
Over the last week prices increased by (figure unclear) 
percent, and since the beginning of the month by 10 percent. 
During the week the greatest increase was observed in prices 
for medicine and fuel, which increased by 7 and 6 percent. 
Prices for footwear and tobacco goods remained virtually the 
same as they had been the previous week. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42786 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94017" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Maritime Kray Faces Energy Crisis </TI></H3>
<H4>   Causes of Crisis </H4>
<F P=102> 944F0286A Vladivostok VLADIVOSTOK in Russian 12 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0286A </F>
<F P=104>  Vladivostok VLADIVOSTOK </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Andrey Kholenko, VLADIVOSTOK: "Dalenergo </F>
Prepares To Shut Down Electric Power"] 
  [Text] In connection with the coal shortage, the production 
association Dalenergo received a directive from Yevgeniy 
Nazdratenko, Maritime Kray chief of administration, to draw up a 
timetable for shutting down electric power supply to housing. 
The energy producers are inclined to consider the situation that 
has come about as catastrophic. 
  VLADIVOSTOK reported that since 25 December the miners of 
Eastern Siberia and Southern Yakutia have stopped unloading coal 
at the Maritime Kray electric power station. The Maritime Kray 
energy industry is presently being supplied only by enterprises 
of the Primorskugol association, which are in no condition to 
eliminate the fuel shortage. The four large state regional 
electric power stations and thermal electric power facilities of 
Maritime Kray require 50,000 tonnes of coal daily, while local 
miners are delivering just 20,000 tonnes. 
  Yesterday aggregate coal reserves on hand at the electric 
power stations amounted to 720,000 tonnes. This supply is 
diminishing daily by 30,000 tonnes. Thus, unless coal deliveries 
from outside Maritime Kray are resumed and measures taken to 
conserve fuel, all local electric power stations will shut down 
in 24 days. Yevgeniy Nazdratenko acknowledged in his decree that 
the situation regarding supply of electric power in the kray was 
critical. 
  The reason for the situation that has unfolded lies in 
Dalenergo's lack of money to purchase coal outside Maritime 
Kray. This financial shortage, in turn, arose because local 
consumers are simply not paying for their use of thermal and 
electric energy. In order to surmount the fuel crisis, the 
Maritime Kray energy industry must pay 32 billion rubles [R] for 
coal and fuel oil--this is the approximate amount of Dalenergo's 
indebtedness. 
  In order to discipline the debtors, who account for just 
about all the industry of the kray, and reduce the fuel shortage 
at the same time, beginning 8 January heat deliveries to the 
industrial enterprises have been curtailed 50 percent--once 
again, based on the governor's decree. Yevgeniy Nazdratenko has 
tasked Vladivostok head of administration Viktor Cherepkov with 
eliminating almost R3 billion of the indebtedness of the 
municipal enterprise for heating systems prior to 18 January. 
  Today at the directive of the governor, Dalenergo 
specialists 
are drawing up an electric power shut-down timetable, indicating 
the substations, lines, and times of shut-down. Dalenergo chief 
engineer Vladimir Patsev stated, however, that it would not be 
in the very near future that residential lights will be turned 
off--not during the present freezing weather ("not in January or 
February"), but sooner or later it will be necessary to do so. 
  And whereas in Vladivostok the hope still exists of getting 
through the cold period without damage, in Dalnegorsk, for 
example, according to Dalenergo information, several residential 
buildings have frozen through due to the shortage of fuel oil in 
the boiler facilities, and residents are being saved only with 
the help of electric heaters. 
  The R32 billion financial problem of the energy 
industry--resulting in the emergency situation regarding fuel 
supply for Maritime Kray--can be resolved, in the view of 
Dalenergo specialists, only through the affording of grants to 
the production association, insofar as "Dalenergo is in no 
position to obtain credits--no one will extend them credit." 
Yesterday it was planned to hold a session of the Emergency 
Situations Commission in the kray administration building, 
chaired by Vice Governor Igor Lebedinets. Two questions were on 
the agenda: the state of the fuel and energy complex of the kray 
(Yuriy Basharov, general director of Dalenergo, delivering the 
report); and the life sustenance capability of the city of 
Vladivostok (report delivered by Viktor Cherepkov, head of the 
city administration). 
  Please check tomorrow's newspaper to read about the measures 
adopted by the kray Emergency Situations Commission. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42787 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94018" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Maritime Kray Faces Energy Crisis </TI></H3>
<H4>   Administration Tries To Deal With Crisis </H4>
<F P=102> 944F0286B Vladivostok VLADIVOSTOK in Russian 13 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0286B </F>
<F P=104>  Vladivostok VLADIVOSTOK </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Oshchenko, VLADIVOSTOK: "Pot-Belly </F>
Stoves Can Be Fueled Without Coal or Fuel Oil"] 
  [Text] "Pot-belly stoves must first be placed in the 
hallways, and only then in the apartments." This comment uttered 
Tuesday by Sergey Demin, deputy head of administration of 
Maritime Kray, at the session of the kray Emergency Situations 
Commission passed somehow unnoticed by those assembled. 
  There is every reason to believe, however, that the next 
session of the commission may be held under candlelight, and it 
will be dedicated to precisely which plants will have 
requisitions placed for pot-belly stoves and what will be used 
to fuel them. 
  Perhaps publicly for the first time in his life Yuriy 
Basharov, general director of the Dalenergo joint-stock company, 
screamed out in front of television cameras and bystanders--"We 
have reached bottom... We are on the brink of disaster! If we 
cut off the energy system today, we will not only freeze this 
winter--we will be living under torchlight for the next two 
years." Basharov's face turned red as he screamed from the 
platform. 
  Due to the fact that kray enterprises and city 
administrations owe Dalenergo over R110 billion for energy used, 
the Dalenergo people themselves have become debtors and cannot 
pay for fuel. The required amount is R30-40 billion. 
  As a result, fuel oil has stopped being offloaded at the 
Maritime Kray thermal power station as of 23 December, and coal 
in the amounts intended for the kray has stopped being loaded in 
Eastern Siberia and Southern Yakutia as of 25 December. Reserves 
of fuel oil on hand are capable of supplying only five to eight 
days of operation of the heat producers. 
  "If we sweep the coal storehouses clean, the Maritime Kray 
state regional electric power station will have a supply to last 
until 1 February, while reserves at the Artem state regional 
electric power station will last until 10 February," Basharov 
continued. 
  According to a departmental order with respect to Dalenergo, 
a timetable for shutting off thermal energy systems of 
enterprises and residential buildings must be drawn up by 13 
January. It would be appropriate under the present situation to 
compare this timetable with a sentence, the execution of which 
depends on the resourcefulness of financial specialists and 
directors of enterprises in debt to Dalenergo. 
  Igor Lebedinets, chairman of the Emergency Situations 
Commission and deputy head of administration of Maritime Kray, 
stated unambiguously: "Unless we put R30-40 billion of net 
assets into circulation right away, we will have to shut off 
power from residences." In short, use your water and electricity 
now while you have them. 
  The situation Vladivostok is in looks especially bleak. The 
municipal enterprise for heating systems owes Dalenergo R15.7 
billion, but residential building trusts have not settled their 
accounts with it. These trusts, in turn, are not receiving money 
from the city administration. Once again, unfortunately, the 
leaders of the city and the kray have been unable to find a 
common language even for such a topic as whether or not their 
own apartments will go without heat. City mayor Viktor Cherepkov 
did not attend the Emergency Situations Commission session at 
all. City manager Vladimir Gilgenberg again tried to argue the 
matter of putting tax withholdings into the city budget, but 
Igor Lebedinets did not want to hear any explanations--either 
from Gilgenberg himself or from the deputy mayors of Vladivostok 
for finance and economics. 
  Sergey Demin, deputy head of the kray administration for 
problems of the fuel and energy complex, is to fly to Moscow 
today, where he will try to secure the receipt of grants 
promised by the government in the amount of R62.8 billion. At 
the same time, Demin himself stated: "For Moscow, our regions 
are remote not by virtue of their designation or distance, but 
by virtue of their treatment..." 
  Here we can only modify a common saying: Rescue of the 
freezing is a matter for the freezing themselves... 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42788 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94019" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Resin Charts Moscow Development Course </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0646A Moscow LITERATURNAYA GAZETA in Russian No 4, 26 
Jan 94 p 10 </F>

<F P=103> 944K0646A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow LITERATURNAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Vladimir Resin, first deputy mayor of </F>
Moscow, by LITERATURNAYA GAZETA columnist A. Gasparyan; place 
and date not given: "Vladimir Resin: `Moscow Reflects Both the 
Magnificence and the Misery of Present-Day Russia'"] 
  [Text] [Gasparyan] Vladimir Iosifovich, I would put my 
first question this way. Just what is the image of Moscow? How 
do you personally imagine it? 
  [Resin] I think that very many things go into this concept. 
Beginning with the architecture of the historical part of the 
capital and ending with the lifestyle of the ordinary 
microrayon. Everything that surrounds us goes into the concept 
of the "city's image." And, of course, the quality of the 
functioning of the whole city's environment. I will begin with 
the fact that Moscow is the capital of an enormous, wealthy, and 
mighty state. But the paradox is that under normal conditions 
there cannot be a rich state with a people whose standard of 
living, to put it mildly, is not the very highest. But, you see, 
this has happened here. 
  We are a mighty state! And Moscow is the capital of this 
state, its face, which reflects the magnificence and the misery 
of the whole country. 
  You and I have such creations as the Kremlin and the Bolshoi 
Theater...and here right alongside we have 20 million square 
meters of 5-storied buildings. But if these 5-storied buildings 
are pulled down and modern buildings are built to replace 
them--this will be far more expensive than the construction 
itself. The question arises: What kind of a fool built them? No, 
not a fool. This was a correct resolution of the housing problem 
at that time. We brought people out of basements and 
semi-basements. 
  [Gasparyan] How is the situation to be corrected now? 
  [Resin] There is a program that is directed at this. We 
built 
9 million square meters of housing in three years. Moreover, not 
the same kind as before, but with the entire social and 
engineering infrastructure. 
  Can you imagine for yourself that now in Butovo, for 
example, 
not all of the built kindergartens are full? There are schools 
in Mitino that are not yet filled with pupils. Do you recall how 
children were bused to neighboring schools? This happened. This 
no longer exists. 
  [Gasparyan] But housing, nevertheless, is the main thing. 
Today, not just long lines remain. The situation has changed. A 
person stood in line for an apartment under socialism, but today 
he has ended up in others, under market and capitalistic 
conditions... 
  [Resin] I understood your question. Indeed, today we live 
according to the principle of a bit from socialism, and a bit 
from capitalism. At the same time, many want to work as if under 
socialism, but to live as under capitalism. And what does this 
lead to? All of us want to have a good apartment and to receive 
it free of charge. Without giving anything to society. But, 
nevertheless, the Moscow government did not abolish the lines, 
because there would be social injustice. We retained them, while 
in Kazakhstan and Ukraine housing lines have been abolished. 
  Last year, we provided housing for people in the 1981 
waiting 
line for housing. This year we want to take care of people in 
the 1982 waiting line. But the line became stratified, like 
society itself. People appeared who can buy an apartment, and 
they are buying it. A housing market has emerged in our country. 
  We gave, are giving, and will continue to give to those who 
cannot buy. 
  To put it briefly, we do not want to discard that which was 
good under socialism. And let us look truth straight in the 
eyes. We are all people of that time. Maybe our children and 
grandchildren, as they say, will absolutely be market people. 
  I cannot pass by when I see that a person is in need. Even 
if 
he is pretending. But next to me is a stranger who does not even 
look in the direction of a beggar, because he is brought up on 
different principles. 
  [Gasparyan] Nevertheless, it seems to me that the image of 
Moscow has started to disappear and become obliterated. Today, 
the capital is not what it was before. 
  [Resin] Of course, during the years of Soviet authority 
Moscow lost a big part of its individuality, you are right on 
this. 
  But we have been doing a lot in the last three to four years 
to return the former features of the capital. Have you noticed 
that the center is being repaired and restored? The 
Tretyakovskaya Gallery will be opened this year. The Malyy 
Theater has been put in shape. The Metropole... We will open the 
National this year. 
  But take a look at how carefully every building is being 
treated that is being reconstructed. 
  [Gasparyan] Incidentally, many are saying that the 
appearance 
of Moscow is also getting worse, because many Western companies 
are making everything in their own fashion. Is this being 
monitored somehow? 
  [Resin] Nothing is done in Moscow without the permission of 
the city planning council and the chief architect of the city. 
The concept is based on an approved city plan foe Moscow 
reconstruction. And none of the foreigners are permitted to 
build if it does not coincide with the general plan of 
reconstruction of the capital. 
  [Gasparyan] Nonetheless, many think that Moscow is basically 
being sold to foreigners. 
  [Resin] First, this is not true. Second, have Americans 
become impoverished because a big part of the buildings in 
Manhattan has been sold to entrepreneurs of various countries? 
  But we have not sold anything. Indeed, individual stores and 
buildings have been leased by Western firms or by joint 
enterprises. Foreigners have started to pay taxes and have put 
these premises in order, so that nothing damaging to Moscow has 
occurred. 
  But a market is a market. So, we will also have to trade. 
But 
stability--both political and economic is needed so that someone 
would buy something from us. You and I cannot brag about this at 
the present time. 
  [Gasparyan] As the manager of the building department, are 
you satisfied with the results of the work? 
  [Resin] The one who is satisfied with himself is a person 
who 
is lost to the economy. But in some things, yes. In the past 
year we put into operation the Moscow City Palace of Justice, 
the Moscow Art School under the Institute imeni Surikov, 
maternity hospitals, a bridge crossing for the Moscow Zoo, such 
unique structures as the Palace Hotel on Tverskaya Street, the 
theater on Pokrovka, the exposition of private collections of 
the Museum of Fine Arts imeni Pushkin, and the VTU [Higher 
Technical School] imeni Shchukin on Vakhtanov Street. A number 
of facilities of a cultural nature have been restored--the 
Cathedral of the Icon of the Mother of God of Kazan, the Temple 
of Saints Faith, Hope, and Love and Their Mother Sofia, and the 
mosque on Zemlyachka Street. 
  However, despite the efforts being undertaken, it is still 
difficult to call the situation with the reconstruction of the 
center of the city satisfactory. Questions of engineering 
support are being resolved with difficulty. Dates have been 
postponed for the withdrawal of production enterprises and 
lessees, the resettlement of tenants, and the formulation of 
contractual relations of the prefectures of the Central 
Administrative District with investors. Up to the present time, 
26 parcels under the new housing construction program of work of 
the past year have not been released. Also being 
unsatisfactorily implemented is the release of structures 
included in the reconstruction program from residents and lease 
holders. A number of investors are not fulfilling their 
contractual obligations. There continue to be cases of long 
delays in assimilating released land parcels by involved 
organizations. 
  A significant volume of work arose at the end of last year 
in 
connection with the tragic events of 3-4 October 1993, which 
entailed partial destruction of the White House buildings, the 
mayor's office, the Ostankino television center, and Hotel Mir. 
During two months, 110,000 square meters were restored, and the 
stylobate part of the White House was put into operation. Work 
was started in the buildings of the Moscow's mayor's office and 
Hotel Mir, and repair-restoration work was accomplished in the 
Ostankino television center. 
  Last year, the practical implementation of the program of 
low-story and cottage construction was started in the 
Ramenskoye, Dmitrovskiy, Domodedogo, and Solnechnogorsk Rayons. 
  Cottages of a total area of about 60,000 square meters were 
built and put into operation during 1993. 
  [Gasparyan] Of the transportation problems, obviously the 
metro is closer to you, since this is associated with 
construction... 
  [Resin] Indeed, it was and will continue to be necessary for 
me to build the metro. And I must say that to build the metro as 
we did up to the war, or in the first years of the war, is 
simply impossible from the standpoint of costs. Why should we 
establish a museum under ground? What does this give us other 
than making travel on the metro more expensive? Therefore, they 
have now started to build good quality--as was built before--but 
at the same time also without any extravagances. 
  The metro in Moscow remains the most reliable, profitable, 
and quickest form of transportation. Therefore, despite all of 
the difficulties, we are continuing to build it, extending 
branches into all new microrayons. We will now introduce new 
housing complexes in Lyublin, and we are immediately providing 
for the metro as well. 
  Of course, the outward appearance of surface transportation 
also reflects on the image of Moscow. Our trolley buses and 
streetcars, of course, have become worn out. As a result of the 
breakup of the Union, the renewal of the fleet is moving along 
much more poorly. We are now compelled to organize the 
production of buses at the ZIL [Likhachev Automobile Plant). 
  Now about roads. The volume of repair work increased sharply 
in recent years. The asphalt has become better and, accordingly, 
the roads have become better. But, in general, the 
transportation problem in Moscow has not been resolved yet. I 
think that we made a serious mistake in yielding to the pressure 
of "public opinion," which in the 1980's prohibited the building 
of a third beltway. And, after all, large sums of money were 
spent. We have now once again undertaken to build a third 
beltway and, I think, the situation will improve with the 
completion of its construction. 
  [Gasparyan] There are still other facilities from which the 
appearance of the city is formed. These are the railroad 
stations... 
  [Resin] I agree. Let us first look at the outward appearance 
of Moscow's railroad stations. The Kiev railroad station has 
already been put into shape, it was renovated, and it is an 
excellent structure. The Paveletskiy is on the whole an 
adornment of Moscow, and it also was put into shape. The Kursk 
railroad station has been rebuilt, and it is one of the best 
buildings in Moscow, both from the standpoint of architecture 
and city planning. Work is being done on the Kazan railroad 
station. The Leningrad railroad station has been recovered and 
put into order. As, moreover, has the Savelovskiy. Therefore, if 
we are talking about the material status of the railroad 
stations, they are all in good condition. 
  The situation at the railroad stations is another matter. 
But 
this does not depend on the architecture. Everyone has to work 
on this. Both the MPS [Ministry of Railways] and the MVD 
[Ministry of Internal Affairs]. Well, and of course, we are not 
being idle--we are taking all measures to bring order there. The 
successes are not significant, but, nevertheless, a drop in the 
increase in crime at the railroads has been noted. 
  But it must be admitted that Moscow has turned out to be an 
unprotected city. However, in bringing order, we cannot 
sacrifice basic human rights. It would be easiest of all to 
close Moscow, to adopt harsh measures, etc. Muscovites would be 
satisfied. But we cannot do this. There is always more order 
under a totalitarian regime than under a democracy. But since we 
have already chosen the path of democracy, then it is necessary 
to understand what the costs will be here. 
  We are paying a lot of attention now to reinforcing the 
Moscow militia. Not in words, but in deeds. The mayor is 
personally looking into these questions. Large resources have 
been allocated to raise the prestige of workers in the militia 
and to improve its physical facilities. 
  Last year, 25 modern, new local militia stations were built. 
Instead of the two or three that were built previously each 
year. And no fewer will be built this year. These are militia 
stations with garages, with shooting ranges, and with recreation 
rooms. Briefly, everything that is necessary today for such a 
station. Moreover, we built everything using the most beautiful 
decorative materials. 
  The leadership of the militia has also been strengthened. 
Lieutenant General Vladimir Iosifovich Pankrat is a highly 
professional manager, a person who knows his business. 
  [Gasparyan] Concern for the militia is extremely important. 
But what about the social protection of the poor? 
  [Resin] Of course, as the manager of the department, I 
should 
think about the builders first of all. The housing question 
continues to be the most acute for the builders themselves as 
well. Last year, it was proposed to improve the housing 
conditions of more than 4,000 builders' families, with an 
allocation for this on the order of 200,000 square meters. By 
the beginning of the year, 60 percent of what was planned was 
taken care of. At the present time, orders for the remaining 
volume of housing area are being formulated. 
  The problem of social protection for the poor workers of the 
branch is also not alien to us. Ten charitable actions in the 
sum of about a billion rubles [R] have been conducted for 
veterans, participants in the Great Patriotic War, and for large 
worker families. Incidentally, the construction complex was the 
only branch in the city economy of Moscow that maintained 
children's health improvement camps. Thirteen such camps, in 
which 10,000 children rested, were opened in the summer period. 
  [Gasparyan] And what can you say about places of leisure for 
Muscovites? In my opinion, there are fewer areas like this now... 
  [Resin] We are building them. Victory Park on Poklonnaya 
Hill, for example. Last year, we put the initial complex of a 
building park into operation, and just before 9 May the opening 
of the first line of this memorial was held. Construction has 
started on a Disneyland kind of children's park in Mnevniki. I 
think that we will build it in the course of 10 years. Moreover, 
Russia does not yet have this kind of a park. Meanwhile, Gorkiy 
Park is operating, and it is not in bad condition. But, then, 
the VDNKh [Exhibit of Achievements in the National Economy] has 
really been transformed into something that is not 
comprehensible. 
  [Gasparyan] The mutual relations of Moscow and Moscow 
Oblast. 
There are also a lot of disputes about this. Some are for 
unification, and others, for separation. What is your viewpoint 
on this problem? 
  [Resin] Personally, I think that Moscow and the oblast are, 
of course, a single region, and they cannot develop without each 
other. And for all practical purposes, we are developing 
together. This separation has been artificial, according to the 
party-communist principle. There were obkoms [oblast party 
committees] and gorkoms [city party committees]. But at the 
present time, the basis for unification has been lost. Many 
residents of Moscow Oblast are not in the mood for this. It 
seems to them that Muscovites will make life in the Moscow 
suburbs worse. 
  As long as our friends from Moscow Oblast do not change 
their 
views, it is impossible to talk about any kind of unification. 
  [Gasparyan] Do you, Vladimir Iosifovich, believe in the 
reorganization of Moscow into a true capital of Russia with its 
own inimitable image? 
  [Resin] Moscow today is already the most beautiful city in 
the world. And we do not plan to change it architecturally. We 
will adhere to that concept that evolved back in the 19th 
Century. We will restore what was destroyed and what has become 
dilapidated. But in no case will we destroy that appearance of 
the city that was left to us by our fathers, grandfathers, and 
great grandfathers. This is unequivocal. 
  For example, we will very likely lower the building of the 
Intourist Hotel on Tverskaya Street, and it will correspond to 
the style of Tverskaya Street. 
  I call on Muscovites to come to the city planning exhibit, 
which was visited by the Russian president, to look it over, and 
to express your opinion. We will try to take all interesting 
opinions and proposals into account. After all, Moscow is our 
common home. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42789 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94020" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Moscow Government Creates Guaranteed Import Credit Fund </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0305A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 25 Jan 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0305A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [POSTFAKTUM report: "Credit Guarantee Fund Established"] </F>
  [Text] Aiming to ensure an uninterruptible supply of 
imported foodstuffs to Moscow in 1994, the capital city 
government has set up a credit guarantee fund for imports in the 
amount of 100 billion rubles [R]. Financing of deliveries will 
be done through special accounts that the Foreign Relations 
Department of the Government of Moscow will open in foreign 
banks. An agreement is expected to be reached with the Central 
Bank of Russia before 1 February on the matter of opening the 
guarantee fund's special accounts in foreign banks for a period 
of one year and transferring into them R100 billion in U.S. 
dollars at the Central Banks of Russia exchange rate. The 
Government of Moscow intends to give foreign banks the right to 
use the fund's deposit accounts as guaranteed collateral for 
1994 purchases and deliveries to Moscow of foodstuffs and food 
processing equipment. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42790 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94021" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Moscow Privatization Progress Examined </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0305B Moscow MOSKOVSKAYA PRAVDA in Russian 27 Jan 94 p 7 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0305B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MOSKOVSKAYA PRAVDA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by M. Chernyshev under the rubric "The Fate of the </F>
Voucher": "Privatization-93: Moscow Review"] 
  [Text] One of the most prominent features of last year was 
privatization, which was broadly launched all over Russia. It 
was this process which, despite inflation, political 
instability, and legislative mishaps, was to start the formation 
of a broad stratum of private property owners as the basis of 
the future free market society. 
  Of course, the conditions, pace, volume, and specific 
details 
of privatization differed considerably from region to region; 
however, the supercities, such as Moscow and St. Petersburg, 
with their immense volume of potential facilities for 
privatization, found themselves in the most difficult situation 
in implementing denationalization of state property. 
  An important factor in speeding up privatization in the 
capital was the fact that the Moscow Property Fund, set up in 
1991 in accordance with the Law "On Privatization of State and 
Municipal Enterprises in the RSFSR," became in 1993 the lead 
organization in matters of privatizing facilities of federal and 
municipal property on the territory of the capital. 
  During the time of its operation, the fund's specialists 
frequently participated in expert evaluations of draft normative 
documents on privatization issues and in the development of 
proposals for drafts of state and city privatization programs. 
  The fund entered a coordination and division of 
responsibilities agreement with the Moscow Committee on 
Administration of Property, which made it possible to remove 
many points of contention between the two agencies and establish 
a single privatization procedure for Moscow; the fund's transfer 
to the jurisdiction of the capital city government after the 
October events gave the fund's activities a new impetus. 
  Over the past year the fund has considered more than 1,500 
letters, petitions, and complaints on matters related to 
privatization of state and municipal property, to which replies 
and clarifications were issued or necessary petitions to 
appropriate bodies of authority prepared. 
  The fund's management has set up a reception room for 
representatives of enterprises, as well as legal and physical 
persons undergoing privatization. More than 3,000 of them 
received the consultations they needed on organizational, legal, 
and methodological matters of privatization. 
  In 1993 Property Fund specialists participated in more than 
300 sessions of arbitration courts, at which more than 120 
lawsuits were considered and resolved, in which the fund 
participated as an initiator of a suit against the Moscow 
Committee on Administration of Property, its territorial 
agencies, and various legal entities. 
  For the purpose of improving the work in various areas of 
privatization, a wide network of middlemen has been organized 
and is operating under the fund's auspices; they act as 
distributors for securities sold by the fund, hold real estate 
bids and auctions, conduct market research, and do other 
auxiliary work that raises the effectiveness of privatization. 
More than 120 middlemen firms work today on a contract basis 
with the Property Fund and are accredited with it. These firms 
have opened 57 facilities where applications are accepted for 
participation in specialized voucher auctions. 
  In 1993 the fund's specialists handled more than 2,000 
privatization cases; this immense volume comprised the main 
content of the Property Fund's activities. 
  Despite a difficult operating environment and great volume 
of 
work, the fund signed 1,900 sale contracts on privatized 
facilities. Among them were 60 contracts that resulted from 
commercial bids, which in the end brought more than 13 billion 
rubles [R] in proceeds, and 196 contracts to sell securities of 
publicly held joint-stock companies created in the process of 
privatization of state enterprises. 
  The fund regularly held open money auctions where stocks of 
joint-stock companies that had completed a voucher auction were 
sold for rubles. 
  The fund's specialists also were actively involved in such a 
new endeavor as development of a secondary securities market, 
using proven information exchange technology on the basis of the 
F-Broker information system. In addition, there was an ongoing 
information exchange on non-exchange security trading. 
  The Property Fund paid special attention to information 
support and public disclosure in the conduct of privatization. 
Twice a month the fund put out an information bulletin in which 
it regularly published all the necessary information on state 
and municipal enterprises offered for sale; sales of stock of 
joint-stock companies; the terms, place, and date of 
privatization deals and their results in the capital and other 
industrial centers of Russia. 
  The fund's bulletin was also distributed electronically 
through computer information networks, which have more than 
100,000 subscribers. 
  Materials covering various aspects of the fund's activities 
were published throughout the year in various publications under 
the terms of information distribution agreements the fund has 
with leading information agencies. 
  Overall, one may say the fund has accomplished the tasks set 
for 1993. Much remains to be done, however: to complete "small 
business" privatization, and in the summer of 1994 to bid 
farewell to the voucher. 
  Work will continue in the area of identifying property 
contributions made by state and municipal enterprises to the 
charter capital of small business and joint venture enterprises 
on the territory of Moscow. Control will be increased over how 
privatized enterprises comply with the terms set in sale 
contracts. One of the serious tasks for the coming year is to 
delve into problems of privatization in the sphere of land 
relations. 
  Work will continue on setting up trust companies and 
joint-stock companies, whose development is in the interests of 
the population. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42791 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94022" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> REGIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Muscovites' Standard of Living for 1994 Assessed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0305C Moscow MOSKOVSKAYA PRAVDA in Russian 27 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944F0305C </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow MOSKOVSKAYA PRAVDA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by D. Rakhmanin, editor of the "13 Tverskaya </F>
Street" department, under the rubric "Commentary of the Week": 
"One in Three Get Aid From the Mayoralty"] 
  [Text] I will begin with a rather interesting, in my 
opinion, forecast for Muscovites' standard of living in the 
coming year. It was issued by the economic policy department of 
the Government of Moscow at the budget hearings recently held by 
the deputies in the city Duma. According to the latest 
estimates, the average monthly wage will increase 6.5-fold. And 
prices--sevenfold. At the same time, the amount of money 
channeled by the mayoralty into social protection of low-income 
residents will increase 14.8-fold, and its share in the city 
budget will increase 2.6-2.8-fold. This money will enable the 
city to provide aid to 3.6 million Muscovites--one-third of the 
capital city's population. No sharp decline in Muscovites' 
standard of living is envisaged for 1994. 
  I personally never counted myself as an optimist. What is 
considered a "sharp decline in the standard of living"? And does 
it matter anyway whether it drops sharply or gradually but 
steadily? All in all, we have had a considerable increase in the 
number of skeptics over the past few years. Few now believe in 
promising assurances "a la Gorbachev" that in a half a year (a 
year, two years...) life will get better. No matter what 
forecasts politicians and economists come up with, every month 
we determine rather precisely our standard of living by the 
amount of cash left in our wallet on the eve of receiving a 
long-awaited paycheck or pension. Like the absolute majority of 
Muscovites, I am not terribly confident in tomorrow. What I do 
not doubt, however, is that no matter what comes, Luzhkov will 
keep his word and will find the money for social needs. 
  I have seen more than once at city government meetings how, 
in response to eternal laments of the capital city's Minister of 
Finance Yu. Korostelev that there is no available money in the 
budget and no place to get it, the mayor has said unambiguously: 
"Money for social aid must be found." Every day I sort out new 
mail (and the newspaper is getting increasingly more letters, 
for which we are grateful to our readers). Well, there is a lot 
of criticism addressed at Luzhkov's team--all sorts of 
criticism, sometimes fair and sometimes not quite. The 
government and its local representatives ought to be criticized 
for still terrible roads (despite titanic efforts), mud and 
trash in the streets, occasional lapses in central heating, and 
leaking roofs. But I have never seen a letter in which 
Muscovites berate the mayor for lack of attention to social 
programs. 
  In this respect Moscow is far ahead of the rest of Russia. I 
have in front of me a document signed by Yu. Luzhkov on 28 
December--a comprehensive program of social protection measures 
for certain categories of Moscow residents in 1994 and a report 
on the results of the analogous program in 1993, which 
considerably expanded and strengthened social guarantees set at 
the federal level. 
  Last year, 61.7 billion rubles [R] was spent on financing 
the 
city's social program from the budget fund for social 
protection. The 1994 budget envisages financing of expenditures 
on the implementation of measures of social protection of the 
population taking into account their indexation. The Moscow City 
Statistics Administration will now conduct a monthly calculation 
of the subsistence minimum in keeping with the decision of the 
trilateral commission of the Government of Moscow, the 
Confederation of Industrialists and Entrepreneurs, and the 
Moscow Trade Unions Federation. In the near future, proposals 
will be finalized on improvements in the system of supplements 
to pensions of nonworking pensioners and child allowances. The 
prefectures have been instructed to adopt within a month 
regional programs of social protection of the population using 
the districts' financial resources. 
  In keeping with the program signed by the mayor, the Moscow 
Government is increasing subsidies for school lunches and food 
for low-income pensioners, the mayoralty's personal stipends to 
students, and subsidies to students in acute need. Subsidies for 
children who do not attend preschool facilities are being 
increased to 25 percent of minimum wage (which currently amounts 
to R3,655); supplemental pay to child allowances for single 
mothers, families with many children, and nonworking mothers who 
receive benefits from social security organs; and extra pay for 
food products for children under the age of three. An newborn 
child allowance is being increased to double the minimum wage. 
In addition, a number of measures of social protection envisaged 
by republic legislation and financed out of the Moscow budget, 
naturally, remain in effect. We plan to look at individual parts 
and provisions of this comprehensive program in the next few 
issues. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42792 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94023" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Kozyrev Details Russian Peacekeeping Effort </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944Q0162A Moscow NOVOYE VREMYA in Russian No 4, Jan 94 
(signed to press 25 Jan 94) pp 18-20 </F>

<F P=103> 944Q0162A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NOVOYE VREMYA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Andrey Kozyrev, minister of foreign affairs of </F>
the Russian Federation: "Russian Peacekeeping: There Are No Easy 
Solutions"] 
  [Text] The settlement of the armed conflicts in Georgia, 
Nagornyy Karabakh, and Tajikistan has become a key problem of 
Russia's foreign policy. 
  The consequences of these conflicts are reflected directly 
in 
the daily life of Russians. More than 2 million refugees arrived 
in the country in 1993 alone. The Government of the Russian 
Federation and the local authorities have in just the last two 
years spent R51.5 billion in making provision for them. This is 
a difficult economic burden for any country, let alone ours. The 
mass influx of refugees has revived the threat, long-forgotten 
here, of epidemics of dangerous diseases. Waves of organized 
crime are coming to Russia from the "flash points." 
  The great Russian historian V.O. Klyuchevskiy considered a 
principal factor reflected in the historical fate of Russia its 
lack of a natural border on the vast expanse between the Urals 
range and the Caspian. Down the ages nomadic Asiatic hordes 
entered Russia through this "gate." 
  Although today's Russia is not threatened by invasions of 
nomads, it once again in fact lacks a southern border. We simply 
do not have the means to furnish one. But even a highly 
fortified border would not protect us against the new threats 
connected with the instability and internal conflicts of our 
neighbors. Especially since compatriots living outside of Russia 
are coming primarily to be the victims of these conflicts. 
<H5>  For the Defense of National Interests </H5>
  The debate in Russian society in connection with the 
problems 
of the near abroad is unfolding in the space between two extreme 
positions. 
  The first: a solution of the problem by way of "restoring 
order" in the former Soviet republics, that is, simply put, the 
restoration "by fire and sword" of the disintegrated USSR. In 
order to imagine what this would signify it is sufficient to 
glance at events in the former Yugoslavia. If Russia has 
succeeded thus far in sparing itself the horrors that have 
fallen to the lot of the peoples of this country, it is only 
because Moscow has not attempted to restore the Union state by 
force and redraw internal borders. Adopting an imperial policy 
would mean getting that same Yugoslav scenario, but one that is 
immeasurably more dangerous owing to the dimensions of the 
former state and the presence on its territory of nuclear and 
chemical weapons, nuclear power stations.... 
  The second position: Russia "walks away" from the near 
abroad, removing itself completely from involvement in the fate 
of the states of the former USSR. But this option also, despite 
all its ostensible allure, would ultimately result in 
catastrophe. If, for example, the Russian peacekeepers were to 
leave Tajikistan, tomorrow hundreds of thousands of refugees 
would be pouring into Russia from there, and not only Russians 
but both Tajiks and Uzbeks also, what is more. The result would 
be chaos in Russia itself, from which it would be a straight 
path to a pogrom-type-nationalist dictatorship, and from this to 
the Yugoslav version once again. 
  It transpires that Russia is "condemned" to perform a 
special 
role in the former USSR, but the role not of a gendarme but of a 
peacekeeper. Especially since no state of the near or far abroad 
and no international organization is displaying a desire or is 
in a position to replace Russia as the peacekeeping force in 
this region. 
  But recognition of a special role does not signify Russia's 
claims to some "free hand" in respect to its neighbors. We are 
organizing our actions strictly in accordance with the 
principles of international law: respect for the sovereignty and 
independence of the states involved in conflicts, 
noninterference in their internal affairs, and recognition of 
their territorial integrity, with respect for the rights of the 
national minorities. In all cases where this is possible Moscow 
aspires to joint actions within the framework of the CIS. 
  At the same time, on the other hand, it should be clear that 
Russia is forced at times to speak strongly and has no intention 
of paying in the lives of its soldiers for a lack of will to 
reconciliation in the parties involved in a conflict. 
  Russian peacekeeping has already accumulated considerable 
experience. There have been no military operations in South 
Ossetia or the Dniester region for more than a year now. 
Mechanisms of mediation in a settlement of the Karabakh and 
Abkhaz conflicts are operating. Russia's important practical 
contribution to a settlement of the conflicts in Nagornyy 
Karabakh and Abkhazia has already been recognized in a number of 
documents of the UN Security Council and the CSCE. If a decisive 
turn toward peace in the post-Soviet space has not yet occurred, 
it is not because the choice in favor of an active peacekeeping 
policy was wrong. It is primarily a question of the seriousness 
and complexity of these conflicts. And the "peacekeeping 
techniques" formulated by the United Nations, the CSCE, and 
other organizations are still imperfect to a large extent also. 
  No one in the world has a 100 percent effective methodology 
of peacekeeping operations. This is indicated, specifically, by 
the experience of their prosecution in Bosnia and Somalia. Like 
other states also, we have to learn peacekeeping, perfecting 
both international and domestic mechanisms. 
  It is essential first and foremost to ensure the pursuit of 
a 
common all-state policy in respect to local conflicts. It should 
not appear as a "layer cake," in which each layer corresponds to 
the tastes of individual persons, departments, or regions. 
Manifestations of such an approach, even in defiance of Russia's 
official position, not only seriously harm the cause of a 
settlement (we saw examples of this in Abkhazia) but also 
undermine trust in Russia on the part of the world community, 
fostering the myth of "Russian imperialism." 
  The new constitution adopted at the general referendum 
clearly enshrines the prerogatives of the president in questions 
of foreign policy and security. The further strengthening of 
Russian statehood requires that a barrier be erected in the way 
of departmental and opportunist calculations. 
  The efficiency of our peacekeeping should be enhanced 
through 
the alignment of Russia's trade and economic relations with the 
parties to conflicts with the overall aim of a peace settlement. 
  Peacekeeping also needs a strong material and legal 
foundation. It is important that our new parliament not repeat 
the deplorable experience of the former Supreme Soviet, which, 
while from time to time striking an heroic pose in relation to 
our neighbors, displayed no concern for the creation of a 
full-fledged legislative base of Russian peacekeeping. 
<H5>  Faced With a Common Challenge </H5>
  Support for Russia in the settlement of conflicts in the 
former USSR is a test of strength of the partnership that has 
taken shape between former adversaries in the cold war. I 
emphasize that we are talking about assistance, not attempts to 
instruct and control while shifting the burdens of the 
accomplishment of this task onto Russia. 
  Europe and the world are coming increasingly to recognize 
that these conflicts are not some far-off fratricidal strife but 
a serious problem of European and international security. Even 
now the waves of the narcotics mafia and crime from the "flash 
points" are beginning to roll down to Central and West Europe. 
Understandably, no "cordons sanitaires" will save Europe if 
conflicts and instability in the post-Soviet space engulf Russia. 
  But it is not only a question of a common threat. The 
fundamental interests of Russia and our partners in the far 
abroad coincide in a desire to see in the new independent states 
observance of generally recognized international standards, in 
the field of human rights included. After all, the southern 
border of the CIS has become, simultaneously, the border of the 
CSCE also. This is important for Russia primarily because only 
under the conditions of peace, democracy, and the observance of 
human rights in these states can the rights of the 
Russian-speaking population be fully secured. 
<H3>  The United Nations and the CSCE: `Inspectors' or 
Participants in Peacekeeping in the CIS? </H3>
  The world community has begun to pay more attention to 
peacekeeping operations in the former USSR as of late. We are 
grateful to the representatives of the United Nations and the 
CSCE who are working in the conflict zones hand in hand with the 
Russian peacekeepers. But a certain duality is being displayed 
in the position of many of our partners. They are torn, as it 
were, between recognition of the real significance of the 
Russian peacekeeping mission and doubts lest it serve as a 
pretext for a revival of Russia's "imperial propensities." As a 
result we are at times encountering attempts to make cooperation 
with us dependent on a variety of speculative conditions and 
"criteria," which only distract from the real cause. 
  These apprehensions are noticeable among our neighbors also. 
Memories of the carnage caused by the Soviet authorities in 
Tbilisi, Baku, Vilnius, and Riga are with them superimposed on 
top of new fears born of the ultra-nationalist appeals of a 
number of Russian politicians. The best "medicine" for such 
fears is interaction in the sphere of peacekeeping, within the 
CIS framework included. 
  An international peacekeeping strategy is needed, 
on the whole. 
  An important component of it should be the bolstering by a 
UN 
mandate of the peacekeeping operations being conducted by Russia 
in the former USSR. We are not talking about some international 
"legalization" of the presence of Russian peacekeeping forces in 
CIS countries. There is no need for this since they are deployed 
there on an entirely legitimate basis, at the request of the 
corresponding governments. The need for such a mandate is caused 
by the fact that Russia's peacekeeping operations are 
"nontraditional" from the standpoint of UN practice. They are 
being conducted on the territory of neighboring states, where 
Russia has serious economic and other interests. Under these 
conditions a UN mandate and the presence of observers are 
designed to confirm the dispassionate nature of the Russian 
mission, strengthen its connection with the UN efforts, and, on 
the whole, enhance the efficiency of the peacekeeping operations. 
  UN and CSCE observers should be sent to the conflict zones 
at 
the right moment, when a cease-fire has been achieved. In this 
case they could really bolster the Russian peacekeeping 
contingent as a third force. The breakdown of the Abkhazia peace 
negotiations in the summer of 1993 showed the cost of delay in 
the deployment of a peacekeeping mission. On the one hand the 
Russian contingent failed to obtain the necessary reinforcement, 
although it was known from the outset that the forces available 
by the start of the operation would be insufficient for 
accomplishing it in full. The Russian piece of folk wisdom: 
Don't start a job you can't finish, is pertinent here. But such 
jobs have to be undertaken! The same applies to the United 
Nations. Extraordinary efforts were required of Russian 
diplomacy first for the number of observers whom the UN Security 
Council would have been prepared to send to Abkhazia to be 
increased from the laughable figure of eight-12 to 80. But by 
the time of the breakdown of the agreement, two and a half 
months later, no more than 20 observers were on the scene. 
  International support should be expressed also in acceptance 
of the principle of a fair distribution of the burden of 
expenditure on peacekeeping. We are raising the question of the 
formation of a voluntary international fund to this end. 
  A strengthening of the peacekeeping functions of the CSCE 
constituted the essence of our proposals at the recent meeting 
of CSCE foreign ministers in Rome. The adoption of the 
declaration on countering aggressive nationalism was an 
important achievement. This is a serious contribution of the 
CSCE to the prevention of interethnic conflicts forming the 
basis of many armed clashes in the former USSR and Yugoslavia. 
  The three-year Russian peacekeeping experience has not been 
in vain. We now know better what needs to be done for a 
settlement of interethnic conflicts and how and, what is most 
important, what should not be done. It is now essential to 
patiently and consistently continue the cause of peacekeeping 
that has begun, not succumbing to the temptation of simplistic 
ideas: resolving everything at a stroke or walking away, 
abandoning everything. 
<H5>  Russia's Participation in UN Peacekeeping Operations </H5>
  IKMOON (UN Iraq-Kuwait Observation Mission)--15 
military observers; 
  MOONG (UN Mission on Haiti)--five civilian police 
officers and one civilian specialist have been allocated, but 
the deployment of the mission has been suspended at this time on 
account of the situation on Haiti; 
  MOONPR (UN Mission for Assistance to Rwanda)--it 
is planned sending 15 military observers; 
  MOONPRZS (UN Mission To Observe the Referendum in 
Western Sahara)--three military observers; 
  ONVUP (UN Body Observing Compliance With the Truce 
Conditions, Near East)--17 military observers; 
  SOONO (UN Protection Force, former 
Yugoslavia)--one infantry battalion (831 men, in January 1994, 
following reinforcement, its manning level will be 1,200), 13 
military observers, 40 civilian police officers, two civilian 
specialists, two motor detachments; 
  YUNOMOZ (UN Operation in Mozambique)--20 military 
observers (a further six are being sent) and one civilian 
specialist; 
  YUNOSOM (UN Operation in Somalia)--one civilian 
specialist. 
  (As of 15 December 1993) 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42793 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94024" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Positions on Expanding UN Security Council Membership Eyed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944Q0158B Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 19 Jan 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0158B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Dmitriy Gornostayev: "It Will Be an Extremely </F>
Long Time Before Security Council Candidates Become Permanent 
Members"] 
  [Text] The first session of the open work group on the 
question of fair representation in the Security Council and 
expansion of its membership will begin at the UN headquarters in 
New York today. 
  This problem is bothering mainly Germany and Japan, which 
are 
eager to join the Security Council. It is above all a matter of 
prestige for them: These leading industrial powers, which have 
an immense economic and military potential, set the tone for the 
G-7, and have the status of leaders in Europe and Asia, are 
restricted politically because they do not have permanent 
membership on the Security Council. 
  The solution to the problem is important to the FRG also 
because now Bonn cannot directly affect the policy of the 
international community, above all regarding the Bosnian 
conflict, which has flared up right at Germany's side. 
  There is still the opinion that neither Germany nor Japan 
can 
be allowed on the UN Security Council, recalling the atrocities 
committed by these countries' armies during World War II. As for 
Japan, many of its neighbors in the region are torn by conflicts 
about its joining the "Big Five." Thus, for example, South Korea 
thinks that China's representation on the Security Council is 
clearly inadequate for such an immense continent as Asia. 
Therefore allowing the country of the Rising Sun onto the 
Security Council would be a benefit for Asians. On the other 
hand, this official position from Seoul is countered by the 
opinion of a considerable portion of South Korean society: In no 
case should Japan be allowed to solve problems related to world 
security. As NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA has already written, before 
Morihiro Hosokawa's speech at the 48th Session of the UN General 
Assembly in New York the South Koreans held a demonstration 
protesting Japan's admission to the Security Council. One of the 
demands was compensation and apologies to the victims of 
aggression on the Korean peninsula during World War II. Hosokawa 
made an apology. 
  Germany too softened its position and began to court the 
world community for a leadership chair: Its second petition was 
worded much less ambitiously than the first one. True, the head 
of the foreign political department of the FRG, Klaus Kinkel, 
stipulated at the UN General assembly that it was not yet 
completely clear whether Germany would be able to play a more 
active role by assigning its troops for UN peacemaking 
operations. 
  This question could become a stumbling block for Bonn. 
Because U.S. President Bill Clinton placed emphasis precisely on 
the more active participation of possible Security Council 
candidates in the peacemaking operations themselves and also in 
the financing of these and also UN structures. Although in 
response to UN Secretary General Butrus-Ghali the White House 
actually officially announced its support for the idea of the 
entry of the FRG and Japan into the Security Council. But it 
seems that the Americans need most of all to shift part of their 
burden onto the shoulders of Tokyo and Bonn. Having lost several 
dozen of their soldiers in Somalia and millions of dollars in 
the former Yugoslavia, and having the largest quota for payments 
into the UN budget, the United States, naturally, wants someone 
to share its burden. 
  China's position is somewhat more restrained: In principle 
Beijing has nothing against accepting new members, but not in 
the foreseeable future. Great Britain, England, [as published] 
and Russia are of the same opinion. 
  As a NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA correspondent was told in the 
Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the Russian Federation, as of 
today Moscow sees its basic task as maintaining the 
effectiveness and efficiency which the UN Security Council has 
achieved in recent years. It is thought on Smolensk Street that 
any steps to expand it should be taken in stages. So this 
question will be decided, as the Russian diplomat stated, "not 
today or even tomorrow." To decide it, naturally, will take a 
consensus of the Big Five. Moreover, the report of the work 
group will not be submitted for consideration to the 49th 
session of the UN General Assembly until September. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42794 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94025" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   MFA Official, Commentary Assess Chinese-Russian Relations </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944Q0158A Moscow SEGODNYA in Russian 28 Jan 94 p 3 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0158A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow SEGODNYA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vladimir Abarinov and Andrey Vinogradov: </F>
"Moscow-Beijing: Positions `Close or Overlapping'"] 
  [Text] The Russian-Chinese negotiations being conducted by 
Andrey Kozyrev in Beijing today have as their main goal to 
prepare for a return visit to Russia by PRC President and 
General Secretary of the Chinese Communist Party Jiang Zemin. 
  As a group of Russian journalists accompanying Kozyrev were 
told by Mikhail Belyy, director of the 1st Asian Department of 
the Ministry of Foreign Affairs of the Russian Federation, in 
Moscow it is thought that the development of relations with 
China is in keeping with Russia's basic national interests. The 
parties' positions "are close or overlapping" with regard to 
many international issues. In particular, Moscow and Beijing 
hold similar views concerning the nonproliferation of nuclear 
weapons on the Korean peninsula. But, as the diplomat put it, 
there are "nuances": China is categorically against the 
application of international sanctions against the DPRK while 
Russia sees them as an extremely undesirable but possible 
measure. 
  SEGODNYA commentary. In terms of foreign policy China 
emphatically practices nonintervention in the internal affairs 
of other countries, actively resists attempts at intervention in 
its own, and avoids becoming involved in international 
conflicts. Thus, for example, Beijing, a permanent member of the 
UN Security Council, showed no interest in regulation in 
Yugoslavia, and Spain took its place in the "Yugoslav Five." 
  It is very important to Russia that the PRC strives to 
maintain stability on its northern borders, particularly in the 
Central Asian region, and also that Beijing is concerned about 
possible disturbances within the Russian Federation. China is 
refraining from short-term "advantageous" actions involving an 
active struggle for political influence in Central Asia, from 
attempts to crowd Russia out of this region, from encouragement 
of separatist tendencies within the Russian Federation itself, 
and also from support of opposition forces in the political 
battle at the federal level. All this predetermines the limited 
nature of political contradictions between Russia and China and 
the possibilities of cooperation of the two countries as 
guarantors of stability in the vast border region. This is why a 
drastic change in the current pragmatic leadership in Beijing 
would not be in Russia's interests, since any other leadership 
would focus primarily on nationalism, which would lead to an 
aggravation of the situation in the border regions and relations 
with Russia as a whole. 
  Trade between the Russian Federation and the PRC is 
developing at rapid rates. In 1993 its volume reached $7.2 
billion, and Russia has an active balance of $2 billion. China 
occupies second place after the FRG in Russia's trade turnover. 
But there is also the Russian clearing indebtedness from 
commercial credit granted by China during 1990-1991. 
  But the exchange remains unequivalent: Russian fertilizer, 
metal, and machines--for extremely poor-quality Chinese goods of 
light industry and the food industry. Such a practice is 
encouraged by the Chinese not only at the provincial but also at 
the governmental level through the publication of the 
corresponding statutes. The volume of "shuttle" trade, according 
to Chinese figures, was $614 million. The Russians consider 
shuttle operations to be a negative aspect since they contribute 
to the outflow of hard currency from Russia. 
  Moreover, the fixed exchange rate of the Swiss franc (this 
is 
the currency in which the mutual settlements are transacted) is 
artificially reduced with respect to the Chinese yuan (1.8 
francs per yuan, while the black market rate is 0.1 francs per 
yuan). 
  Weapons are one of the most profitable items of Russian 
exports to China. As an example Mikhail Belyy mentioned the sale 
of two SU-27 squadron fighters and the S-300 antiaircraft 
missile complex (delivery volume not specified). 
  It is known from other sources that Beijing also purchased 
two SU-31 squadron interceptors and an unestablished number of 
T-72 tanks, and they are also showing an interest in Russian 
missile targeting systems. The British weekly JANE'S DEFENSE 
WEEKLY reported another delivery of SN-27's; the representative 
of the Chinese Ministry of Foreign Affairs refused to comment on 
the publication. There have been reports that the Chinese are 
conducting negotiations for the purchase of the Varyag aircraft 
carrier which is under construction. Taking into account China's 
claims to the Spratly archipelago and its desire to dominate in 
the South China Sea, such a transaction can hardly contribute to 
maintaining stability in Southeast Asia. 
  The diplomat noted that weapons trade with China is a 
"completely normal phenomenon" and when engaging in it Russia is 
guided by a number of principles, namely: not to harm its own 
security, nonproliferation of nuclear technologies, and 
transparency. 
  Mikhail Belyy denies the existence of territorial problems 
in 
Russian-Chinese relations. In his assessment, border 
negotiations are proceeding successfully enough. An agreement on 
the eastern section of the border was signed in May 1991. 
Demarcation work was begun on this section in May of last year. 
The Kazakhstan segment of the Western section was finally agreed 
upon a couple of days ago. "There is nothing crucial or 
explosive about this issue," the diplomat noted. 
  At the same time he admitted that there were problems with 
maintaining border procedures. 
  The number of border violations by China on the eastern 
section tripled during the past year. Contraband operations and 
poaching in Russian waters have become widespread (in May 1993, 
as we know, a unilateral Russian moratorium on pollack fishing 
took effect in the central part of the Sea of Okhotsk). 
  Local Russian authorities are also disturbed by the 
demographic situation in the border regions of the Far East. We 
have no precise information on this. The estimates of the number 
of Chinese now living in the Far East range from 300,000 to 1 
million, and the overall number of Chinese citizens living 
permanently (frequently illegally) in Russia amounts 2 million, 
and in Moscow--50,000. The number of Chinese reported to be 
living in certain regions of the Far East exceeds the number of 
local residents. Thus in Partizanskiy Rayon of Maritime Kray, 
according to the results of a special surprise inspection, the 
ratio was 14,000 to 7,000. The crime situation on the border is 
getting worse; it was for this reason that the crossing point 
from Blagoveshchensk to Heihe, where Minister Kozyrev recently 
visited, was closed. 
  During the course of the negotiations, Mikhail Belyy stated, 
it is intended to sign a bilateral agreement on border crossing 
points so as "to make the process controlled." At the present 
time 21 crossing points have been opened on the Russian-Chinese 
border, 19 of which are in operation. What with the 
unprecedented growth of border trade, border and customs 
officials are unable to keep up with their work. For example, 
last year the border was crossed by a total of 2.5 million 
people. The Russians, in Belyy's words, adhere to the principle 
"better fewer but better." On 29 October of last year on 
Russia's initiative an international agreement on visa 
conditions was signed. As for crime, there is an agreement on 
legal assistance between Russia and China, Mikhail Belyy stated, 
which the Chinese propose to augment with an agreement on 
turning over criminals. At one time it was the Chinese who 
refused to include the corresponding articles in the agreement 
on legal assistance. 
  Russia's position on the Taiwan problem is determined by the 
president's edict of 15 September 1992: Relations with the 
island will be conducted exclusively on an unofficial, nonstate 
level. These, Belyy stated, are the "rules of the game which the 
entire world follows." In the recent past, he said, there has 
been a "naive euphoria," largely from the Russian side. But it 
is with extreme caution that capital is invested in Taiwanese 
business. The volume of Russian-Taiwanese trade now, the 
diplomat reported, is about $500 million. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42795 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94026" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Chinese Expansion in Siberia Decried </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944F0304A Novosibirsk SIBIRSKAYA GAZETA in Russian No 3, 21 
Jan 94 p 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944F0304A </F>
<F P=104>  Novosibirsk SIBIRSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Tatyana Galkina, historian at the Russian </F>
Community Abroad Humanities Center, under the rubric 
"Assessments and Predictions," with two introductory paragraphs 
by V. Bykov: "Siberia and China. Contemporary Geopolitical 
Realities and Prospects for a `Peaceful Expansion'"] 
  [Text] The maddening glimpses of political figures, 
the deafening noise of their melee, the depressing setting of 
our daily round--all taken together leave us neither the time 
nor the energy to ponder problems that are not of either the day 
or the minute, but that quite truly exist and require our 
attention because tomorrow they might become the foremost 
problems and our main concern. The geopolitical situation of 
Siberia, which our newspaper has written about repeatedly, is 
one such "nonapparent" problem at present. 
  The article offered to you considers one of the 
important facets of this problem--mutual relations between 
Siberia and China. We will be prepared to continue the 
discussion of this issue if it is of interest to our 
readers. 
  The history of the relations between Russia and China is 
complicated and contradictory. Half a century ago, the leading 
political science centers of the West began to develop new 
geopolitical models of the world proceeding from a new global 
situation (the end of World War II, the spread of communist 
ideas in Europe, the scientific-technical revolution). For our 
purposes, it is interesting that the exceptional role of Siberia 
as a new power center in Eurasia was stressed in all of these 
models, regardless of their "national affiliation." 
<H5>  Views of Siberia Are Very Different.... </H5>
  The prediction that in the decades to come the world would 
switch from a bipolar arrangement (USSR-United States) to 
pluralism, to the formation of new power centers, among which 
China and India would stand out primarily, became commonly 
recognized in the West beginning in the late 1950's. Thus, Fr. 
Shternberg stressed that the strategic significance of Siberia 
would increase sharply as these two states grew stronger. 
  It would help us to know that Western experts predicted most 
of the problems that the Soviet leadership encountered both in 
the 1960's and decades later. As early as 1963 the military 
specialist and geopolitician F.O. Mikshe published an article 
entitled "Russo-Chinese War" in a German military-economic 
magazine, in which he sketched the possible theater of military 
operations and made a prediction for the next 10-15 years which 
subsequently came true to a considerable degree. 
  While the Soviet leadership affirmed the enslaving 
specialization of Siberia as a raw material periphery with 
natural and human resources mercilessly exploited, Western 
statesmen proceeded from the geopolitical uniqueness of the 
Siberian region in modelling the future. 
  De Gaulle advanced the concept of creating a third 
superpower, a "Europe from the Atlantic to the Urals," which 
presupposed a change in the role of Siberia. In his opinion, the 
Russians have transcended their geopolitical boundaries by 
penetrating at one time Siberia, which was populated by "yellow 
nomads, shamans, and Muslim tribes." For this reason, the Slavs 
would be unavoidably crowded out of these lands by the Mongols 
or the Chinese. Socialism was just a short historic episode 
which changed nothing in the "substance of an eternal Russia," 
which would return to the West sooner the more it was threatened 
by China. The need to ensure its security will compel Russia to 
recall its European kinship. The great reformer of France 
translated this idea into a plan of specific political actions. 
This plan called for the withdrawal of the USSR from Asia and 
the withdrawal of the United States from Europe. The world 
brought into equilibrium in this manner would rest on three 
pillars: the European confederation, the Anglo-Saxon complex, 
and China. In the process, Europe, with a new leader, France, 
would become the middle link of this "trinity" and, in a way, 
the center of the world. All of France's foreign policy, 
including a personal visit to Novosibirsk by de Gaulle, amounted 
to implementation of this grandiose plan (the development of 
France's own nuclear weapons, a friendship pact with West 
Germany, opposition to NATO and the United States, recognition 
of the role of China, and rapprochement with the USSR). All that 
remained was to await the struggle between the white and yellow 
races over Siberia and the Far East which had been predicted not 
only by de Gaulle but by many political scientists.... 
  In the last decades of the 20th century, history unfolded 
according to a different scenario. However, this does not at all 
mean that the thoughts and predictions of the 1950's were 
groundless. 
  What is happening now? Contradictions between Europe and 
Asia 
have abated. Conflicts within Europe and within Asia are 
mounting. However, under these conditions it is precisely 
Siberia that is playing the role of "buffer" between them, too. 
In the process, the plugging of Siberia into worldwide economic 
processes and the growth of its significance as a source of 
strategic raw materials and a recipient of capital investment 
continuously leads the geopoliticians of Japan, China, Korea, 
and some other Asian countries into the temptation of making 
statements about the unavoidable more "equitable" redivision of 
Asia. 
  It is precisely now, in the environment of political, 
economic, and legal chaos in Russia, with the obvious weakening 
of state structures and coercive departments, that it is 
premature to refer to the elimination of the so-called 
"territorial" issue in mutual relations with China. 
<H5>  `Master of Asia?' </H5>
  At present, China is a powerful state with strong central 
authority. Prices for the most important types of products and 
raw materials, as well as their production and extraction, are 
strictly controlled. International experts view China as the 
most promising region of the world for investment of capital and 
technology. 
  A raw material crisis is the only problem that hampers this. 
Despite strict state quotas, 30 percent of capacity is idle 
because of an electricity shortage alone. As a result, a 
consumer market has evolved in China, but not a market for the 
means of production. This is precisely what prompts investors of 
the world to be oriented toward Thailand, Indonesia, and the 
Philippines for now. After this obstacle is surmounted, all the 
factors favorable for turning China into a superpower will be 
created. Let us not forget about the traditional human might of 
the country, which had 100 million unemployed in the early 
1990's. 
  It is no exaggeration to say that the market for the means 
of 
production is now being created to a considerable degree through 
the barbaric exports of machinery and raw materials from Russia 
effected by "business circles" of both countries. 
<H5>  One Hundred Ways to the Same Objective </H5>
  Well aware that all territorial claims against Russia cannot 
be satisfied through the use of force, China began a "peaceful 
expansion" into the eastern regions of Russia, into Siberia and 
the Far East. Which forms of penetration have developed? 
  First, the establishment of joint ventures. The 
overall trends of this process are easy to see in the case of 
Novosibirsk Oblast. As of 1 December 1993, 32 joint ventures 
with a total capital of $108,000 and 220,000 rubles [R] were 
registered here. These insignificant amounts are profoundly 
meaningful. More than two-thirds of the joint ventures are 
fictitious; however, even those in operation are questionable. 
More than 50 percent of them openly designated commercial and 
brokerage operations as their main line of business. However, 
other joint ventures registered in the sphere of material 
production actually engage in trade, having secured the 
corresponding tax relief. China has displayed an absolute lack 
of interest in creating research-intensive and educational joint 
ventures. The only venture in the area of education, Yunfa, 
which engages in teaching Russian to Chinese students, is on the 
brink of closure, having failed to secure support from the 
Chinese side. The size of the contribution made by the foreign 
party is also instructive: from 32 percent (Sib-Sheg) to 100 
percent (Chzhunin). Clearly, the latter cannot be considered a 
joint venture, but it has been registered precisely as such with 
all the attendant tax relief. One gets the impression that joint 
ventures are springing up as outposts for the permanent 
establishment in Siberia. As has already been said, joint 
ventures are the first path for peaceful penetration. 
  Second, there is the merchandise expansion of the 
PRC. The Law on the Protection of Consumer Rights applies solely 
to legal entities, and then to a strictly defined assortment of 
goods. Chinese partners use the services of "shuttle traders" in 
order to save the trouble of having the goods certified. Their 
operations are planned and controlled by state scientific 
centers located close to the border. Things carried by a private 
person are absolutely free of control. Moreover, our import 
certificates are issued on the basis of safety rather than 
quality of goods. Therefore, patently poor-quality goods have 
Russian state certificates. The state has fully renounced the 
role of guarantor and the responsibility for what its own 
citizens consume. The scale of this calamity is such that a 
separate issue might be distinguished, "On the influence of the 
merchandise expansion of China on the genetic pool and health of 
the citizens of Russia." Therefore, a consumer market has been 
formed in Russia which is geared towards China to a considerable 
degree. 
  Third, let us note the criminal expansion of the 
PRC. In this instance, reaching a certain quantitative level of 
Chinese in a given territory is the decisive condition. In 
oblasts where the number of the Chinese is above the limit 
sufficient for the creation of their own criminal clan, the 
Chinese criminal underworld is capable even of engaging in 
clashes with law enforcement organs. Due to the above 
geopolitical factors and the new rights of foreign citizens, 
Siberia has become ideal ground for "dumping" and "laundering" 
the money of the Chinese mafia. 
  Fourth, we consider it a short-sighted policy to 
create clustered settlements of PRC citizens, including 
agrarian. In a number of oblasts they have already encountered 
the problem of manageability of these ethnic formations. It 
should be understood that each such settlement is an outpost for 
future expansion. 
  Fifth, we invite the attention of the readers to 
the spread of ideas of Oriental religions and the creation of 
sects emphasizing hostility to the idea of Orthodoxy and the 
unity of Russia. 
<H5>  Ability To Resist </H5>
  How can Siberia, or more precisely Russia, counter the 
activity of China in the region? The government was not in the 
habit of familiarizing its own people with either the overall 
military doctrine or the regional security concept. The 
"Military Doctrine" that was finally released recently requires 
legal work.... 
  At one point, intuitive recognition of mounting tension in 
Asia compelled the Soviet leadership to significantly augment 
the military presence, primarily that of the missile troops and 
the air force. However, the strategic measures of the 1960's 
compensated for the demographic and economic weaknesses of 
Siberia and the Far East only temporarily. A stagnating, 
deserted Siberia and an overpopulated China--such has been the 
reality of recent decades. It is clear that military bases do 
not guarantee the durability of possessing a given territory in 
the absence of populated rear areas, well-developed 
transportation routes, a stable economy, and energy resources. 
Diplomacy will not help in this instance. 
  In the 1990's, the situation became even more dramatic. A 
linear surplus of the death rate over the birth rate has turned 
into an exponential, explosive surplus. The notion of "Siberian 
health" has been virtually wiped out. The strength of the most 
productive and fertile age groups is dropping, especially among 
men. The outflow of the population from Siberia, which is being 
registered, means the loss of high-quality population with 
superior educational and professional standards and the 
"accumulation" of individuals with inferior characteristics. 
  Therefore, we have a demographically exposed Siberia with a 
continuously deteriorating population structure, with a social 
infrastructure in crisis, with ethnic variegation, and with an 
immense, poorly controlled expanse. Is such a Siberia capable of 
opposing continuous and energetic expansion? Tremendous 
responsibility for the consequences of a short-sighted and 
passive policy in the eastern regions of Russia devolves on the 
local structures of power and the central government of Russia 
alike. It is precisely to this that we would like to attract the 
attention of the public in publishing the present article. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42796 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94027" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   U.S., German Firms Vie for Airport Contract </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944Q0165A Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 27 Jan 94 p 10 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0165A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Artem Kudinov: "A New Airport Project in </F>
Novosibirsk: Germans and Americans Have Begun To Compete in 
Siberia"; proper and company names as given in Roman script in 
original] 
  [Text] Plans to build international airports in a 
number of Russian cities have attracted the attention of leading 
Western companies (in the former USSR there were four such 
airports, at present there are about 40 in Russia alone). Late 
on the night of 25 January negotiations on the participation of 
Siemens and a number of other German companies in the 
construction of an international airport in Novosibirsk came to 
a close in that city (according to preliminary estimates the 
cost of construction will come to $1.2 billion). In the course 
of the negotiations, two drafts were compared--the German one 
and the American draft offered by Boeing Aerosystems 
International late last year. 
  The negotiations were conducted by representatives of the 
Novosibirsk directorate for construction of the airport--the 
Transsibavia joint-stock company. In addition to Siemens, 
Gunther Eppelmann, general representative of the company Graf 
von Wedel, and Werner Thiemig, managing engineer of the company 
DYWIDAG Osteuropa, took part in the negotiations for the German 
side. 
  As the Siemens manager Horst Warzel stated in the course of 
the negotiations, the draft of the construction of the 
international airport proposed by Boeing Aerosystems 
International does not fully account for the local climatic and 
financial-economic peculiarities (a consortium of American 
companies led by Boeing and the consulting company Ernst and 
Young is planning to complete work on its draft in 
mid-February). Mr. Warzel noted that the concept of the Siemens 
draft is fundamentally different from the American draft of an 
airport terminal complex which would not allow for further 
expansion. Mr. Warzel believes that in this instance, a 
block-modular pattern of airport construction which makes it 
possible to gradually augment the capacity of the airport is 
optimal. The model of construction of one of the Indonesian 
international airports, as well as that of the airport in the 
capital of Qatar, Doha, was proposed as a prototype; they were 
also designed with the participation of Siemens specialists. 
  As Mr. Warzel stated, the Berliner Bank, the Deutsche Bank, 
and a number of Swiss and Austrian banks, as well as the German 
engineering construction companies DYWIDAG Osteuropa and Graf 
von Wedel have already shown interest in financial participation 
in the project. They are prepared to embark on carrying out the 
airport project shortly; within two to three weeks Siemens could 
develop a business plan of the project. 
  Carrying out the project may influence the nature of the 
economic presence of foreign countries in the Siberian region 
substantially. This circumstance, in combination with the 
considerable cost of the project, was the reason for this kind 
of keen competition between German and American companies. 
  The negotiations have not been completed yet: The 
Transsibavia joint-stock company and the German companies have 
agreed to continue them and hold joint consultations. 
  KOMMERSANT observers note that the lack of necessary foreign 
exchange funds in the possession of the Russian side may become 
the main obstacle to implementation of the project. According to 
data from unofficial sources, representatives of the 
Transsibavia have already approached Aeroflot for financial 
support, but have gotten no response so far. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42797 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94028" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Arms Agreements Free Some Items From Customs Duties </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944Q0165B Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY in Russian 29 Jan 94 p 2 </F>
<F P=103> 944Q0165B </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow KOMMERSANT-DAILY </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Vadim Bardin: "The Customs Procedures of </F>
Disarmament: The Trilateral Uranium Deal May Yield the Expected 
Profits"] 
  [Text] The Decree "On Exempting From Customs Duties 
Goods Moved Across the Customs Border of the Russian Federation 
in Keeping With International Agreements in the Disarmament 
Area," signed by Viktor Chernomyrdin and reported by KOMMERSANT 
yesterday, provides another example of Russia's international 
obligations (including those related to disarmament) being able 
to modify the domestic regimen of foreign trade regulation. 
  According to the official version of the Ministry of Foreign 
Affairs, this decree primarily accommodates a package of 
Russian-American agreements related to reductions in strategic 
offensive weapons, envisioning, in particular, the provision of 
technical assistance to Russia in the area of disarmament. 
Products and transportation vehicles classified as free 
technical assistance or as those imported or exported 
temporarily are exempt not only from customs duties and fees but 
also from licensing. 
  However, this precedent may very well be built on in a quite 
unexpected manner. In principle, nothing stands in the way of 
extending the changes in the regimen of tariff and nontariff 
regulation of foreign trade to the trilateral 
Russian-Ukrainian-American agreement on Ukrainian missiles which 
was signed in Moscow during Bill Clinton's recent visit. 
  The essence of the agreement of the three presidents is 
as follows: Ukraine will ship to Russia the warheads of its 
missiles; in turn, Russia will deliver to Ukraine nuclear fuel 
for atomic power stations; the United States, which controls 50 
percent of the world uranium market, will expand opportunities 
for uranium exports from Russia; foreign exchange proceeds from 
the latter will be split between Russia and Ukraine by way of 
compensation for their disarmament outlays. 
  The trilateral agreement opens the American uranium market 
to 
Russian exports for 20 years. The United States will withdraw 
its traditional charges of dumping. The liberalization of 
foreign trade transactions related to disarmament could 
contribute to the situation where counting on obtaining $12 
billion from uranium exports is justified. 
  Ukraine has not been wronged, either. It counts on receiving 
its share of foreign exchange proceeds, which is estimated to 
come to $1 billion. Besides, Kiev hopes that pliancy on the 
issue of START 1 may yield Ukraine another $1.5 billion in 
credit from the IMF and $700 million from the World Bank. The 
United States, having bolstered its shaken authority as 
peacemaker, will also receive quite palpable economic results, 
acting as an intermediary element in the subsequent resale of 
the Russian-Ukrainian uranium. 
  At first sight, the cancellation of the licensing of trade 
within the framework of disarmament, which is envisioned by the 
government decree, does not in any way fit this broad version. 
However, the issue is easy to resolve. Russia has already 
assumed international obligations in the area of 
nonproliferation of nuclear weapons and has joined the 
international regimen for controlling the exports of relevant 
materials and technologies within the framework of the so-called 
English Club, to which 26 country-suppliers of nuclear 
technology belong. Since compliance with international 
obligations enjoys priority, the cancellation of licensing does 
not apply to uranium, whose exports from Russia are controlled 
by the Ministry of Atomic Energy. The preservation of export 
control is undoubtedly in the interests of all participants in 
the trilateral agreement. 
  [begin box] 
<H5>  Withdrawal of Nuclear Weapons From Ukraine to Russia </H5>
  --Ukraine has agreed to transfer to Russia no fewer than 200 
warheads from the SS-19 and SS-24 missiles within 10 months. 
Ukraine has 130 and 46 of these missiles, respectively. During 
the same period of time, all intercontinental missiles located 
in Ukraine will be deactivated. 
  --Ukraine has undertaken to achieve complete nonnuclear 
status within seven years (as provided by START 1). [End box] 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42798 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94029" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> INTERNATIONAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Further on Schneerson Hasidic Book Collection </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944Q0163A Moscow NOVOYE VREMYA in Russian No 4, Jan 94 
(signed to press 25 Jan 94) pp 48-50 </F>

<F P=103> 944Q0163A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NOVOYE VREMYA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Leonid Goldin: "The Hasidim's First Joys in </F>
Russia"] 
  [Text] We described the disturbing details of the 
story of Schneerson's private library in the article "The 
Misadventures of the Hasidim in Russia" (NOVOYE VREMYA, No 
46/93). Recently there have been some new developments in this 
story. 
  Albert Gore received one of Schneerson's books from the 
Lenin Library depository, and Bill Clinton was given seven of 
them. They say that the question of the return of the Lubavitch 
collection to the Hasidim has been settled. Rabbi Baruch Kunin 
is full of energy and vitality at the age of 50, but he is not 
certain that he will live to see the day when all of the books 
are returned to Rabbi Schneerson. 
  Yosif took a large cardboard box, which had once held 
packages of rice (part of the humanitarian aid his father, Rabbi 
Baruch Kunin, sends to Moscow from California), and carefully 
wrote the following inscription on the box in Russian: "Please 
return our books." He put on a black Russian sheepskin coat and 
set off for the Lenin Library. 
<H5>  The Hasidim Go to the Library </H5>
  Yosif and his friends decided that it was time for the books 
of the Lubavitch rabbis to be returned, now that parliament is 
not keeping the Russian president and government from doing good 
deeds. During the October standoff, the Hasidim had helped the 
Russian democrats as much as they could by delivering kosher 
sausages and apple juice to the Moscow Soviet, where a huge 
crowd had gathered in response to Gaydar's appeals. 
  This year the Hasidim celebrated Hanukkah with the slogan 
"The Freedom of the Schneerson Library and the Genuine Freedom 
of Russia Are Indivisible," and Rabbi Schneerson said: "Kindness 
will prevail in Russia, and the sacred books will be returned 
with a smile." 
  The Hasidim have extremely ambivalent feelings about the 
Lenin Library. They are grateful to it: The books have been kept 
safe there since 1916. The Hasidim have also experienced many 
distressing moments on its steps, however, when they were driven 
away from the door and were not allowed anywhere near their 
sacred writings. Once again, Yosif was getting ready to go to 
the library with a heavy heart. This time, however, the 
inaccessible books were not the only reason. The 20-year-old 
rabbi was certain that the books would be returned to their 
owners sooner or later, but he felt sorry for the people who 
were committing such a grave sin by keeping them in the dusty 
dungeon. "Woe to those who do not return the books to us," said 
Rabbi Schneerson, the head of the present generation of Hasidim. 
The rabbi had never been mistaken! Yosif felt so sorry for 
Gorbachev: He had made many promises but had not kept his word. 
He felt sorry for Gubenko: They say he is a talented man, but 
now he is facing one problem after another. And what about the 
Russian parliament, which had rescinded the governmental and 
judicial decisions to return the books to the Hasidim? Is it 
possible that people do not understand why all of this happened? 
  The new heads of the Ministry of Culture were also 
responding 
in peculiar ways to the requests of the rabbis and senators. 
They offered copies..., but the Hasidim needed the sacred 
objects that had been handled by seven generations of Lubavitch 
rabbis. If the Russian library wants Hasidic books, it can have 
them, but not the ones that had been handled by the rabbis. It 
can also have much more: for example, the possibility of 
on-the-job training for its staffers in libraries in the United 
States and Israel. 
  Rabbi Yitzhak Kogan was getting ready to go to the library 
with Yosif. His requests to leave Russia had been denied for 15 
years. When he arrived finally in the Holy Land, he heard the 
rabbis' decision: "Go back to Russia. You are needed there." 
Yitzhak Kogan is busy with synagogue affairs 24 hours a day: 
humanitarian aid, prayer, the study of the Torah, and the 
thousands of minor and major requests and questions people 
address to their rabbi. In addition, of course, there are the 
books, which he does not forget for an instant. Kogan had 
prepared a whole file of recent articles and older documents for 
his trip to the library. They included Rabbi Yosif Yitzhak 
Schneerson's letter of November 1922 to the director of the 
Rumyantsev Library: "In 1921 the Science Library Department of 
the People's Commissariat of Education issued a decree on the 
return of the books.... I am renewing my petition for the return 
of my books." 
  There were also contemporary case documents. Here is an 
excerpt from a report by Lenin Library Deputy Director V.M. 
Grigorov to the Ministry of Culture: "There are still more than 
10,000 books from the collection in the Lenin Library depository 
in Khimki. They are stacked in piles and are not being stored in 
the most desirable conditions. The delays in the processing of 
this collection are due to the fact that the Lenin Library has 
only one specialist who reads Hebrew--S.A. Goldenberg. He is a 
pensioner and is suffering from cataracts." 
  "I feel that Rabbi Schneerson's manuscripts and books in the 
Lenin Library should be returned to their legal owner, the 
seventh Lubavitch rabbi, because they are of no scientific value 
in the development of Hebrew studies. Academician D. Likhachev." 
  Here is an excerpt from a letter the Ministry of Culture 
received from A.L. Khasroyev, the head of the library of the 
Oriental Studies Institute of the Academy of Sciences: "Given 
the present shortage of Oriental and Hebrew scholars in the 
libraries and the shortage of storage space and of funds for the 
restoration and processing of private collections, and in view 
of the absence of legal grounds for the inclusion of this 
collection among the assets of the Lenin Library, the continued 
storage of these books seems absolutely pointless and can only 
destroy the collection." In addition, there were new petitions 
from scholars, politicians, Jewish Heroes of the Soviet Union.... 
  Rabbi Kogan also took around 10 books with him to the Lenin 
Library as substitutes in case Yosif's cardboard box did not 
remain empty. These books were later returned to the synagogue 
and the box was thrown out with the trash. 
  The Hasidim did notice some changes, however, in the 
attitude 
of library personnel: They were given a copy of the catalogue, 
and a few days later they were allowed to enter the depository 
and hold the old rabbi's books in their hands. They found two 
interesting documents in the archives: 
  "I hereby verify that library staffer Lapin delivered 35 
crates, 5 of which were damaged, of Jewish books from Warehouse 
No. 19 on 28 June this year and that the crates were stored in 
the depository (formerly a church). Report by Lebedev, 20 June 
1924." 
  "Act No. 186, 28 June 1924. According to Jewish library 
storage invoices, 411 poods and 4 pounds of books...were turned 
over to the Public Library imeni Lenin...." 
  "Our sacred objects have already been listed in terms of 
weight in other times and other places," Y. Kogan said. "In 
1242, 18 wagonloads of volumes of the Talmud in manuscripts from 
all of the provinces in France were delivered to Paris.... They 
were burned in the square in front of the Cathedral of Notre 
Dame. I think they suffered a better fate than the eternal 
prisoners of the Lenin Library. The Talmud has this to say about 
burned books: 'The parchment burns, but the letters rise to the 
heavens.' The sacred letters locked in the storehouses of the 
Lenin Library, on the other hand, have been invisible to the 
heavens and the human eye for seven decades now." 
<H5>  Contacts on the Highest Level </H5>
  The Hasidim had great hopes for the Russian visit by 
American 
Vice-President Albert Gore, who had been actively involved in 
the Schneerson cause when he was a senator. These hopes were 
largely justified. He went to the Lenin Library and saw the 
collection of books and manuscripts. He was shown a dozen unique 
publications, including volumes printed in Poland in 1594, in 
Amsterdam in 1659, and in Constantinople in 1502 and a prayer 
book printed in 1541, but the main thing was that Gore left the 
library holding a copy of the "Taniya"--a leather-bound and 
gold-embossed book published in Russia in 1902. This was the 
main philosophical work of the Habad Lubavitch movement. It was 
written almost 200 years ago by Rabbi Schneur Zaman, who was 
then the spiritual leader of the group. The book was to be 
presented to the 92-year-old Rabbi Schneerson. Rabbi B. Kunin 
and his sons, Rabbi Y. Kogan, and Maimonides Academy Director V. 
Irina flew to Brooklyn with the precious relic as soon as they 
had received it from A. Gore. The rabbi has been gravely ill for 
a long time and is confined to a wheelchair. He has difficulty 
speaking. The Hasidim were certain that the book would be the 
best medicine for him. 
  "This is a sign of goodwill and a step in the right 
direction," said Minister of Culture Yevgeniy Sidorov. "We 
applaud this gesture wholeheartedly. The problem of the 
collection now stored in the Lenin Library is close to 
resolution," A. Gore said. Rabbi Baruch Kunin added that 
"receiving this book is only the start of a long journey, but it 
is a phenomenal beginning." 
  In some respects, however, the situation became even more 
complicated. In the past everything was clear: The Hasidim 
insisted on the unconditional return of the books, and their 
opponents were firmly convinced that the books belonged in the 
Lenin Library. Now, however, the Ministry of Culture suggested 
that the collection should remain in Moscow, in a special 
building next to another building for religious ceremonies. This 
option was acceptable to many, even the president of Russia, who 
had approved this plan back in November 1993. 
  This turn of events did not please the Hasidim, however, 
because they saw it as a treacherous maneuver. Now they had to 
pin their hopes on the American President's arrival in Moscow. 
Thomas Pickering, the U.S. ambassador in Russia, was of 
tremendous help to the Hasidim. I had a chance to speak with him 
on the first day of the presidential visit in Moscow, when we 
met by accident in the conservatory and were greeted by Grand 
Hall Director Svetlana Gorbacheva. The ambassador already knew 
all of the details of the case of the Lubavitch collection. 
Pickering's diplomatic artistry produced results: Clinton was 
given seven books and was promised, in the words of some of 
those who accompanied the American President, that almost the 
whole collection would be loaded onto his plane, but there was 
not enough time for this. The Associated Press and Radio Israel 
reported that the issue of the return of the collection had been 
resolved completely, citing sources in the American 
administration, but Rabbi Kunin, who has devoted the last few 
years to the fight for the books, believes that this is not the 
end and that the speculation over the Lubavitch collection will 
continue. The only certainty is that the summit-level meetings 
added eight books to the library in Brooklyn. 
  Once again the future is indeterminate. The Hasidic books 
are 
a tougher nut to crack than the nuclear weapons in Ukraine, the 
Partnership for Peace program, the credits to save Russian 
democracy, and the transmission of KGB secrets connected with 
the Kennedy assassination. All of these matters have been 
cleared up, but how much more time and effort can our high-level 
statesmen waste on the resolution of a matter that is certainly 
not of primary importance to Russia?! The whole Lenin Library 
and all of the liberal arts in Russia are dying, and this is 
arousing less concern and anxiety than a few crates of books no 
one can read. How much longer can this misapplication of 
authority and manipulation of the law be tolerated? How can even 
one book be returned if this is against the law? And if the law 
requires that the whole collection be returned to its owner, why 
has this not been done? Did we grace Clinton with a generous 
gift, or did we put him in an ambiguous position by presenting 
him with something that does not belong to us? America is 
particularly scrupulous in matters of property rights and, in 
contrast to us, draws strict distinctions between church, state, 
and private or personal property. 
<H5>  How Can We Live Together as Friends in the Future? </H5>
  Russia is the birthplace of the Lubavitch movement, and 
although Rabbi Kogan said that "our history in Russia is coming 
to an end," this genetic link cannot be broken even in the event 
of a total exodus, like the one from Egypt. A special center 
devoted to the history of the Lubavitch movement might be 
established here, and the Hasidim are prepared to supply it with 
all of the necessary literature. A Russian translation of the 
"Taniya" is already being prepared for publication in an edition 
of 10,000 copies. Religious Jews are not the only people with an 
interest in Hasidic literature. I saw a large collection of 
works by Martin Buber--the greatest religious philosopher on the 
metaphysics and history of Hasidism--in Paris in the home of 
Valeriy Afanasyev, the famous contemporary pianist and novelist. 
Valeriy is particularly interested in the Cabala and the 
mystical aspects of this philosophy. Habad, of course, is not on 
the same level as Blavatskaya. Here, for example, is what the 
Lubavitch rabbi told his congregation on Hanukkah about the 
difference between the two worlds--Jewish and Hellenistic: "On 
the one hand there is a special way of life, based on pure 
monotheism, in which the prevailing idea is that daily life is 
sacrosanct in all of its details, even the most minor ones; on 
the other there is the hellenistic culture with its polytheistic 
and materialistic ideas." The readers of this message, mostly 
craftsmen, small businessmen, merchants, and kibbutz farmers, 
are completely conversant with this discussion. The educated 
Hasid is usually well-versed in the works of Maimonides and 
esoteric and mystical theories that even a philosopher with a 
degree may not understand. The Hasidim themselves should want 
others to know more about their life and ideas. After all, many 
of their contemporaries see them as borderline fanatics, and 
even those who sympathize with them often equate them with the 
aborigines of Australia and Argentina, but the Hasidim are 
primarily scholars, who are steeped in idealistic dialectic from 
infancy. 
  New approaches can and must be found by the Hasidim and by 
their Russian partners, but Schneerson's books are Schneerson's 
books. Their fate should be decided by the rabbi and the people 
he authorized to do this. The Hasidim would consent to keeping 
the Schneerson collection in a building of its own in Russia 
only as a necessary transitional measure. I have to say that I 
do not think the books should be turned over to the synagogue on 
Bronnaya Street, to the Maimonides Academy, as the Hasidim 
insisted at one time: Conditions there are not suitable for 
this. Other options are certainly possible, but the search for 
the best of these options will require respect for the law, for 
property rights, and for religious values. 
<H5>  When Many Are Erudite But Few Are Wise </H5>
  The legislative aspect of this matter warrants special 
discussion. If legal standards were more precise, these 
disgraceful cases would be much fewer in number. After all, the 
problem is not confined to the Schneerson collection. During the 
ceremonies marking the restoration of the Kazan Cathedral on Red 
Square, the president of Russia announced a decision to move 
sacred Orthodox icons--the Vladimir icon of the Blessed Mother 
and Rublev's "Trinity"--from the Tretyakov Gallery to the 
church. The decision aroused the anger of museum personnel, and 
now a long and troublesome series of judicial hearings is 
anticipated. 
  A scandal with no precedent in our cultural history broke 
out 
in connection with the contract Ostankino signed with U.S. Art 
Group Inc., an American corporation. General Director Yuriy 
Kornilov of the State Television and Radio Program Library was 
arrested for taking bribes from corporate executive Tristan 
Dell, which were paid...with the knowledge of the Russian 
special services. Pianist Nikolay Petrov testified in court 
against the transaction, and his property was impounded. Now the 
case is moving up the judicial ladder, but this was actually a 
case involving national property: unique tapes including 
performances by Chaliapin, Oistrakh, Kogan, Sofronitskiy, and 
Rostropovich. While the country was preoccupied with the 
Schneerson rarities, which no one really understands, the deal 
of the century was being concluded in the Ostankino offices 
without any excess publicity, and even without the consent or 
knowledge of the minister of culture! 
  Germany, Holland, Italy, Austria, and other countries have 
serious claims to some of the cultural treasures that remained 
in Russia after the war. These include the greatest artistic 
treasures, but the methods of quiet diplomacy have prevailed, 
and there has been almost no mention of this in the press. The 
experience of the guileless Hasidim, who go to the Lenin Library 
with their empty boxes, taught many people a lesson. Many issues 
which cannot be settled on the presidential level can be 
resolved in confidential talks with the officials who hold the 
keys to storage rooms and official seals. This will continue as 
long as there are no precise legal standards on the use of the 
country's cultural property. This will continue as long as the 
people responsible for this property act as its managers and 
owners instead of as its custodians. 
  According to a Hasidic parable, the world once had many wise 
men of integrity. They met regularly to make decisions, guided 
by the spirit of the Torah. They could even move the Sabbath to 
a different day. In time, however, there were more erudite men 
than wise men of integrity, and erudite men are not necessarily 
wise or honest, and this is why they can substantiate and 
justify anything that is advantageous or convenient for them. 
Then the commandments of the Torah were supplemented by the 
specific standards of daily life, which defined what could and 
could not be done. There were particularly detailed standards 
regulating the ownership of the eternal sources of discord. 
These strict laws allowed society to survive instead of being 
destroyed by conflicts and clashes of interests and beliefs. 
  I do not know any Hasidim or people close to their community 
who agree on even the most minor issues. They argue their own 
point of view without listening to others and they can be 
extremely competitive and arrogant, but the law tells them that 
there is one serious matter, one constant--the Torah. This is 
where all debates come to an end. This is what allowed the Jews 
to endure and survive the difficult millennia of their history. 
This is what helped them in their fight with the Soviet 
bureaucracy for Schneerson's books. After all, they have already 
accomplished so much: The books have been released from 
captivity and are being handled by individuals who regard them 
as the most sacred objects on earth. The road to further 
advancement has been cleared. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42799 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94030" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> UZBEKISTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Edict on 1 January Increase in Wages, Pensions, Stipends </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0642A Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA in Russian 1 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0642A </F>
<F P=104>  Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Edict of the President of the Republic of Uzbekistan: On </F>
Increasing the Amount of Salaries, Pensions, and Stipends 
Beginning 1 January 1994"] 
  [Text] 1. To establish, beginning 1 January 1994 on the 
territory of the Republic of Uzbekistan: 
  the minimum wage in the amount of 30,000 sum-coupons per 
month, increasing other wages appropriately; 
  the nontaxable minimum citizen income in the amount of 
30,000 
sum-coupons per month; 
  the minimum amount of worker pension as 32,450 sum-coupons 
per month, appropriately increasing the amounts of all types of 
pensions currently in effect in the republic. 
  2. To increase stipends to students at institutes of higher 
education, secondary technical schools, and vocational 
institutions, by a factor of 1.2 on the average. 
  To establish, beginning 1 January 1994, in exchange for 50 
percent discounts on the cost of meals in student dining 
facilities and cafeterias, monetary compensation for this 
purpose in the amount of 10,000 sum-coupons per student per 
month. 
  3. That ministries and departments, the Council of Ministers 
of the Republic of Karakalpakstan, the administrations of 
oblasts and the city of Tashkent, budget-financed organizations 
and institutions, and the Republic of Uzbekistan Ministry for 
Social Security will ensure that salary scales of workers are 
recalculated in timely fashion proceeding from the minimum wage 
established by this edict, in accordance with the unified grade 
and category scale for wages, and also with respect to the 
minimum pension amounts here established. 
  4. Expenditures related to the increase in wages of workers 
at budget-financed institutions and organizations and the 
increase in pensions and stipends will be covered using funds 
from the state budget of the republic and from the social 
insurance fund. 
  5. To recommend that enterprises and organizations operating 
on a cost-accounting basis, regardless of their form of 
ownership, increase wages in accordance with this edict to the 
extent they are able to procure sources of revenue, and for the 
temporary period during which these are insufficient--through 
the use of special-purpose monetary credits afforded by banking 
institutions. 
  6. Responsibility for supervision of the implementation of 
this edict is entrusted to the Cabinet of Ministers of the 
Republic of Uzbekistan. 
  [Signed] President of the Republic of Uzbekistan I. KARIMOV 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42800 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94031" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> UZBEKISTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decree on Measures To Strengthen Circulation of Cash </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0642B Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA in Russian 1 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0642B </F>
<F P=104>  Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Decree of the Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of </F>
Uzbekistan: On Measures To Strengthen Circulation of Ready Cash"] 
  [Text] The Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of 
Uzbekistan decrees: 
  1. To establish that effective 1 January 1994, the only 
legal 
means of payment on the territory of the Republic of Uzbekistan 
is the sum-coupon. 
  Effective 1 January 1994, 1961-1992-issue banknotes of the 
USSR Gosbank [State Bank] are completely prohibited from 
monetary circulation in all their denominations. 
  2. Effective 1 January 1994, all trade and other types of 
organizations, regardless of form of ownership, and bank 
institutions will accept from the populace only sum-coupons as 
payment for goods and services, all other types of payments, 
crediting to settlement accounts, deposits, letters of credit, 
and remittances on the territory of the republic. 
  Any acceptance on the part of trade employees or employees 
of 
other organizations of 1993-issue banknotes of the Bank of 
Russia will be considered a violation of existing legislation on 
currency transactions and will entail all applicable 
consequences proceeding therefrom. 
  The Ministry of Internal Affairs will intensify its 
supervision of compliance with existing legislation with respect 
to bringing criminal charges against responsible officials and 
citizens who violate the regulations on currency transactions. 
  3. The Uzbeksavdo and Uzbekbirlyashuv associations and 
ministries and departments that have a trade network are 
authorized to conduct trade in consumer goods for 1993-issue 
banknotes of the Bank of Russia at individually established 
trade centers. The above-mentioned organizations will submit 
proposals to the Cabinet of Ministers regarding the network of 
such trade enterprises, their distribution, and the procedure 
for conducting trade. 
  The Cabinet of Ministers will approve the procedure for 
trading for Russian rubles within three days. 
  4. Effective 1 January 1994, taking into account their 
supply 
of ready-cash sum-coupons, institutions of Uzsberbank 
[Uzbekistan Savings Bank] will pay out deposit withdrawals, 
except for amounts credited to a separate, special, 
non-interest-bearing account. 
  5. Effective 1 January 1994, the registration of newly 
established economic entities and the opening by bank 
institutions of new accounts for physical and juridical persons 
will be resumed. 
  6. Responsibility for supervision of the execution of this 
decree is entrusted to a republic commission (A.M. Mutalov). 
  [Signed] Chairman of the Cabinet of Ministers I. KARIMOV 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42801 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr014___94032" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-014 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   14 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> CENTRAL ASIA </F>
<F P=101> UZBEKISTAN </F>
<H3> <TI>   Decree on Measures To Further Stimulate Growth of Export Potential </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944K0642C Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA in Russian 4 Jan 94 p 1 </F>
<F P=103> 944K0642C </F>
<F P=104>  Tashkent PRAVDA VOSTOKA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> ["Decree of the Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of </F>
Uzbekistan: On Measures To Further Stimulate the Growth of 
Export Potential of the Republic of Uzbekistan"] 
  [Text] With the aim of creating favorable conditions for 
development of the export potential of the republic, forming a 
special fund of the Central Bank for stabilization of the 
monetary unit of the Republic of Uzbekistan, and in conformance 
with the Law "On the Introduction of Amendments and Additions to 
the Law of the Republic of Uzbekistan" and the Law "On Taxes 
from Enterprises, Associations, and Organizations" dated 7 May 
1993, the Cabinet of Ministers of the Republic of Uzbekistan 
decrees: 
  1. To establish that: 
  enterprises, associations, and organizations of all forms of 
ownership that are engaged in entrepreneurial or other activity 
on the territory of the Republic of Uzbekistan and receive 
proceeds in foreign currency will pay taxes on such proceeds in 
foreign currency and will effect the mandatory sale of a portion 
of their proceeds in foreign currency to the Central Bank of the 
Republic of Uzbekistan; 
  with respect to the performance of barter export and import 
transactions, the amount of currency proceeds is calculated from 
the value of the contract and is subject to taxation in foreign 
currency and to mandatory sale to the Central Bank; 
  taxes on proceeds in foreign currency are paid to the 
Republic Currency Fund at the rate of 10 percent, and to the 
appropriate currency funds of the Republic of Karakalpakstan, 
oblasts, and the city of Tashkent at the rate of 5 percent. 
  Simultaneously with the payment of taxes on proceeds in 
foreign currency, enterprises effect mandatory sale to the 
Central Bank of 15 percent of their proceeds in foreign 
currency, according to procedure prescribed by the Central Bank 
and Ministry of Finance of the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
  2. To approve the Statute on Procedure for the Computation 
and Payment of Tax from Proceeds in Foreign Currency. 
  3. That the Central Bank will present to the Cabinet of 
Ministers within 10 days, jointly with the Ministry of Finance 
of the Republic of Uzbekistan, proposals on the procedure for 
mandatory sale to the Central Bank of a portion of proceeds in 
foreign currency. 
  4. That the Central Bank and Ministry of Finance, jointly 
with the Ministry for Foreign Economic Relations, Main State Tax 
Directorate, State Customs Committee, National Bank for Foreign 
Economic Activity, and State Committee for Forecasting and 
Statistics, will draw up within two weeks a statute on currency 
control which envisages the provision of appropriate control 
over transfers of foreign currency funds during the conduct of 
export and import operations by enterprises and precludes the 
possibility of unauthorized maintenance of these funds in banks 
abroad. 
  5. That the Ministry of Finance and Central Bank, jointly 
with the Ministry for Foreign Economic Relations, Main State Tax 
Directorate, State Customs Committee, and National Bank for 
Foreign Economic Activity, will bring their directive documents 
into conformance with this decree. 
  6. To declare Point 1 and the second paragraph of Point 2 of 
Cabinet of Ministers Decree No. 251 "On Currency Regulation in 
the Territory of the Republic of Uzbekistan" dated 25 May 1993 
as no longer valid. 
  7. This decree enters into force effective 1 January 1994. 
  8. Responsibility for supervision of the implementation of 
this decree is entrusted to U.T. Sultanov, deputy prime minister 
of the Republic of Uzbekistan. 
  [Signed] Chairman of the Cabinet of Ministers I. KARIMOV 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42802 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr015___94003" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   `Elektrobank' Chairman on Growing Difficulties of Commercial Banks </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0439A Moscow BIZNES I BANKI in Russian No 4, Jan 94 pp 
1, 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0439A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow BIZNES I BANKI </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by V.V. Muzhitskikh, chairman of the board of the </F>
Elektrobank Commercial Bank, under the rubric "Competent 
Opinion": "The Difficulties Experienced by Commercial Banks Are 
Not Diminishing"] 
  [Text] Despite the criticism leveled against the 
Central Bank, commercial banks, and other credit and financial 
institutions, the banks are ensuring on the whole the normal 
operation of the economy during the most complicated period of 
transition from a totalitarian to a market economy, all the 
current difficulties notwithstanding. This is what V.V. 
Muzhitskikh, chairman of the board of the Elektrobank Commercial 
Bank and the author of this article offered to you, believes. 
However, in his opinion, many problems affecting the banking 
sector not only remain unsolved but are even being 
aggravated. 
  Legislation is the first problem. The debate over to whom 
the 
Central Bank is subordinated goes on. We need stability in the 
interests of the strength of our credit and monetary system, the 
reliability of commercial banks, the exchange rate, and the 
general prestige of the country. The replacement of Central Bank 
chiefs, which is easy and poorly substantiated, as we have seen 
on occasion, cannot be allowed to occur. Within the framework of 
strict legislation, the Central Bank should have the power to be 
able, if necessary, to oppose both government structures and 
local organs in defending the interests of strengthening the 
ruble and the entire credit and monetary system, all the more so 
because in keeping with the new constitution, expansion of the 
rights of local government organs is envisioned. Naturally, 
under the new conditions we need such a Central Bank and such 
laws as will ensure normal balanced development of our monetary 
and credit system and at the same time strengthen the role of 
commercial banks. Significant success will not be achieved in 
the absence of this. 
  I do not maintain that the Central Bank is free of flaws. 
However, on the other hand, I am convinced that this organ 
should have a special status which should be codified in 
legislation. The argument over to whom the Central Bank should 
be subordinated--the president, the government, the parliament, 
or the Ministry of Finance--is superfluous. Foreign experience 
indicates that the state of affairs in the economy is far better 
in countries in which the Central Bank acts as an independent 
state structure, as compared to countries where the bank plays a 
secondary role, being subordinated and resubordinated to various 
government structures. 
  As far as commercial banks are concerned, a number of 
legislative acts have been developed which envision reinforcing 
their role. The adoption of these laws was delayed by events 
everybody is aware of. We have 1,800 commercial banks, for each 
of which there are two branches on the average. In essence, most 
of them cannot be considered banks at all. Only some banks--the 
Mosbiznesbank and certain other banks--have weighty grounds to 
operate on an equal footing with foreign banks both at home and 
abroad. Meanwhile, the good performance of a bank does not 
necessarily hinge on the size of its capital. All kinds of banks 
are needed, large and small alike; they complement one another 
and form a unified banking system serving the Russian economy. 
  Much has been said and written in our country about 
improvements in the operation of commercial 
banks--computerization, credit cards, and so on. All this is 
fine; however, a completely different qualitative standard for 
operation of the banking system is needed. Settlements are the 
most pressing problem. No matter how much the Central Bank and 
commercial banks are criticized in this area, the settlement 
situation will not change until the state of affairs in the 
economy improves. If an enterprise is insolvent, what has this 
got to do with the bank, even if the latter delays documents for 
collection? 
  The state sector of the economy is suffering the greatest 
economic losses. To this day its monopoly position virtually has 
not changed; production outlays have not been reduced. State 
enterprises have long been insolvent. However, taking advantage 
of their monopoly position, they have continued to demand still 
new credit. Our bank services the largest enterprises of the 
fuel and energy complex. These enterprises are still convinced 
that they will receive funds from the budget to cover their 
losses because of their monopoly standing. Getting funds from 
the budget means getting them from me and you. A tribute of 
1,000 rubles [R] has been exacted from each resident of Russia 
in order to cover the losses of the enterprises of the energy 
complex. We have already come to the decision to stop financing 
the hopelessly unprofitable enterprises which are being 
sustained by banks. For this reason, commercial banks are forced 
to sharply reduce the issuance of credit: they have no right to 
risk their clients' funds. 
  When they talk about a debt of R16 trillion, they think for 
some reason that this situation is advantageous for commercial 
banks, forgetting in the process that a slowdown in the turnover 
of funds unavoidably brings about excessive outlays for the 
banks, and that the issue of settlements may only be resolved 
through the joint effort of the government, the Central Bank, 
commercial banks, and enterprises. Anyone who thinks that the 
commercial banks alone and the Central Bank can solve everything 
is in grave error. The enterprises themselves and the entire 
economy should be restructured. 
  Each group of commercial banks strives to create its own 
computer system, without which it is no longer possible to 
operate. Special satellite communications systems are being 
designed, but at present there is no money in the country to 
create a global communications system. Nonetheless, it is unwise 
to disperse funds by creating local and regional systems. We 
should pool efforts in this area and gradually create a unified 
communications and information system similar to SWIFT [Society 
for Worldwide Interbank Financial Telecommunication] out of 
regional systems. 
  Providing escorts to clients abroad is the next issue. If we 
look at foreign experience, all the banks provide escorts for 
their clients in virtually all countries of the world. This is a 
quite expensive endeavor calling for relevant cadres and the 
knowledge of legislation. Practice has indicated that this task 
will not be accomplished without training specialists abroad. 
There are opportunities for that. The government of Switzerland 
has a program for retraining our specialists so that they will 
later work in our representative offices abroad. The cost of 
training one specialist comes to $700 a year. This is a feasible 
sum, and we should coordinate efforts to this end and determine 
the need for specialists and a schedule for training them. 
  Our country lacks a primary center for cadre training and 
retraining. In conjunction with this I would like to say that 
our bank has suitable parcels of land, and we could join 
together with other banks to establish such a primary center. 
The Association of Russian Banks could offer assistance in this 
endeavor. We should be aware that at present we are still 
getting by with cadres who were trained in the environment of a 
centralized economy. Training new cadres of bank employees is 
our most important common task. Nobody will accomplish it for us. 
  The issue of investment is one of the greatest problems. If 
we exist for another year or two within the same arrangement as 
at present, an overwhelming number of enterprises which ensure 
the maintenance of the economy at a certain level will shut down 
because of the wear on fixed assets. Equipment has been 70-80 
percent depreciated in the fuel and energy sector and in 
metallurgy. The enterprises are in danger of shutting down. Some 
attach their hopes to banks. However, even if we scrape up all 
the monies, including statutory capital, this will be nothing 
compared to what is needed. Where are resources to be obtained? 
They are available in the country. Many different off-budget 
investment funds have emerged in Russia. They are disbursed 
haphazardly; funds are transferred from one region to another, 
and frequently disappear and get dispersed there. They should be 
concentrated for investment in the fuel and energy complex, a 
base industry which ensures the viability of the entire economy. 
Otherwise, we will be threatened with a reduction in electricity 
generation and a new increase in rates for it. 
  We cannot agree with the existing system for the 
distribution 
of investment. The government commission for substantiating the 
requests of ministries and departments prepares a decision for 
the Ministry of Finance. In the process, everybody gets as much 
as he can grab. It is not economic effectiveness or the speed 
and security of repayment of credit that are the main arguments 
but rather the fact that construction has begun. The supporters 
of this procedure refer to the fact that the collective and the 
equipment are idle, that funds have already been invested in the 
construction project, and so on. Meanwhile, there is little 
accounting for whether it is necessary to complete all 
construction projects under the current conditions and what the 
returns from the newly built enterprise will be. Under such 
conditions, the banks are put at an impasse. Who will pay back 
their credit? Each new appropriation is processed as a one-time 
act, while the construction project drags on for several years. 
We usually say: We will still give you money this year, and we 
will see about later. Recently the chairman of the State 
Construction Committee reported that one-third of the facilities 
had to be shut down. So, why were they financed in 1992, and who 
will pay back the credit now? The economy indeed needs many of 
these facilities, but banks cannot invest their resources in 
this manner. 
  It is necessary to revisit the issue of creating a 
specialized group of bank-government agents under the Ministry 
of Finance. They exist in a number of countries and have 
acquitted themselves well. However, this does not amount to the 
creation of a parallel government system for the management of 
state property. Bank-government agents should evaluate locally 
the effectiveness of investment and opportunities for its quick 
recovery, rather than be mere transshipment points: We have 
issued you centralized credit, you clean up the mess yourselves. 
Nothing like this exists anywhere in the world. 
  The banks under the Ministry of Finance should ensure the 
safety of investment and study its effectiveness. They should 
possess a powerful expert and auditor staff. We cannot allow 
money to be committed to construction projects without an 
analysis of the effectiveness of its spending and opportunities 
for recoupment anymore. 
  Here is one more problem associated with investment: 
guarantees to foreign capital which could be used as a 
supplemental investment resource. It is feasible to create a 
banking company to this end. One such company has already been 
established. It is a very large structure compared to our banks. 
Its combined capital assets come to R240 billion. Such a company 
may finance a number of large projects and extend credit to them 
in many regions of the country on its own, without using the 
resources of the Central Bank. Banks belonging to the company 
remain independent and are not subordinated to the government or 
other structures. In addition to banks, two of the largest 
state-industrial corporations belong to this company. At 
present, the company is being registered by the Central Bank. 
When this process is completed successfully, we will obtain one 
of the most important structures which, on the one hand, will be 
able to independently issue guarantees to foreign banks, while 
on the other hand it will conduct negotiations on behalf of the 
banks belonging to it about attracting investment to our 
country. Besides, unlike the previous practices whereby 
guarantees to foreign investors were issued only by the state 
banks and the government, the new company will be able to also 
give such guarantees in cases in which it is approached by banks 
that do not belong to it. 
  In the process, we should not hope to obtain significant 
credit resources in the West. The process of renewal of fixed 
assets has begun there, and they need money themselves. We have 
sufficient resources ourselves, but they should be raised and 
pooled, which only the companies are in a position to do. We 
will not secure major success without creating such companies 
and using budgetary appropriations correctly, on the basis of 
repayment. 
  A report surfaced in the press to the effect that a decree 
on 
commercialization of commercial banks has been prepared. Upon 
familiarization with this document it came out that at issue was 
the transfer to the State Committee on Administration of State 
Property of all the capital of former state enterprises with all 
the dividends, and the buildings and structures which the banks 
are now leasing. This amounts to R40 trillion in current terms. 
If this decision is made, we will all end up as Mr. Chubays's 
property. This decision was prepared without the participation 
of the Central Bank, which once again indicates the government's 
lack of appreciation for it. So far, we have succeeded in 
stopping the document, and we are trying to have it amended. 
Nonetheless, our representatives are still not participating in 
working on it. How can such an important issue of the national 
economy be resolved without the banks? It turns out that 
everybody has converted to joint-stock operations and has 
undergone a voucher process, but the banks have been forgotten. 
Now they have suddenly remembered the banks, and want to make 
the State Committee on Administration of State Property the 
owner of all banks. 
  What will this bring about? When the capital of banks is 
bought out with vouchers or in some other manner, the statutory 
capital of the banks will be softened. A tremendous number of 
shareholders will come along. Our bank made such an assessment, 
and it resulted in 103,000 shareholders with registered shares. 
Our computer took three days to process this data base. Now 
imagine settlements on contributions, and so forth. In turn, 
there are almost 1,800 commercial banks! Why was everything 
reduced to registered stock? After all, there is the tax 
service, which should control profits from stocks. Besides, 
mandatory registered stock restricts the circulation of the 
shares on the stock exchange. While the banking system has still 
accomplished something under market conditions, the decision in 
question will set it far back. In this situation, a clear-cut 
law is needed, rather than rushing back and forth. I think that 
in all this we could be helped by a unified national association 
and individual banking associations created on the regional 
principle, as they now are. The national association could 
represent us before the Central Bank, the government, and the 
Federal Assembly and ensure more effective decisions which would 
indeed take the interests of bankers into account. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42803 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr015___94004" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Heritage Foundation Views Russia's Current Economic Prospects </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0424A Moscow IZVESTIYA in Russian 2 Feb 94 First Edition 
p 2 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0424A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow IZVESTIYA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Igor Karpenko: "The Future of Privatization in </F>
the Estimation of American and Native Experts"] 
  [Text] U.S. Experts evaluate the situation which has taken 
shape following the parliamentary elections in Russia far more 
pessimistically than our reformer democrats. Leading specialists 
of the American Heritage Foundation, Jeffrey Gainer, Kim Holmes, 
and John Robson, see the reform course corrections as a real 
threat for the revival of the command-administrative system, 
which could bring Russia to the brink of economic catastrophe. 
Despite a certain difference in approach, the Americans draw one 
common conclusion: It was not the "shock therapy" and "wholesale 
privatization" which brought the reformers to economic crisis 
but, on the contrary, the all-too-slow reform development caused 
the failures and setbacks in both economy and policy. 
  "Yeltsin's economic 
policy appears radical," John Guardiano, 
Heritage Foundation policy analyst, maintains, "but in reality 
it is quite moderate. Far from being `shock therapy,' it 
destroyed the old economic system without having created any new 
one in exchange." The expert offers his harsh prescription: "To 
go much further than the relatively timid Yeltsin policy of 
price liberalization and privatization. This essentially means 
destruction of the monopoly system of industrial sectors 
subordinate to the state, the establishment of `iron' laws, and 
the creation of a system for social protection of the people who 
have lost their jobs." 
  In Yegor Gaydar's opinion, Russian reform and privatization 
could not have been of a different character: The reformers were 
faced with abandoning the reforms altogether or accepting the 
compromises that were imposed by the Supreme Soviet. Only by 
agreeing to the imposed rules of the game did they acquire an 
opportunity, albeit in distorted, crude form, to undertake the 
"standard, mass circulation" of private property. Three of the 
four main tasks--internal liberalization of the economy and its 
openness to the outside and privatization--were accomplished at 
the first stage of the reform. Just one of the set 
tasks--financial stability--was not accomplished. "Public" check 
privatization is now being completed, private property and the 
stock market have become a reality, and it is possible to embark 
on the next stage--the restructuring of enterprises and sectors. 
  At the new stage, Gaydar believes, it is necessary to switch 
from universal to individual methods of privatization and from 
the distribution of property free of charge to its sale. The 
general political task is to create a strong social stratum of 
property owners and market mechanisms ensuring the impossibility 
of the revenge of the administrative-command system. The 
"romanticism of a return" to a communist regime is a forlorn 
hope, for that matter--even at the state-owned enterprises today 
not one director wants a return to the State Planning Committee 
and the party district committees, which would once again 
command them and, as earlier, "set the wages of his secretary." 
Only rightwing extremism and "radical nationalism," which could 
incite a mass protest with dangerous consequences, might 
represent a real threat today. This problem, however, as Yegor 
Timurovich joked, "has no solution within the framework of the 
privatization procedure." Only economic growth, the surmounting 
of the sharp differentiation in income, and legality and law and 
order in the state could be effective weapons here. Then there 
would be a real chance of "private property not being bulldozed 
one more time." 
  More specific tasks at the next stage of privatization were 
outlined by Dmitriy Vasilyev, deputy chairman of the State 
Property Committee. By July we need to have completed check 
privatization, and not simply to have "collected" the vouchers 
from the public, what is more, but to have sold as large a 
proportion of state property as possible--only the substantial 
weight of the private sector can "really make Russia a bourgeois 
country." The enlistment in the privatization process of land 
and nonresidential property--this is the basis of small- and 
medium-sized business, without which, essentially, there is no 
market--will be of immense significance at the next stage. 
  Petr Filippov, leader of the president's analytical office, 
set forth at the conference his view of the mechanism for 
surmounting such monopolism, proposing, specifically, the 
introduction of a progressive payroll tax prompting the breakup 
of economic structures into small units. Government tax policy 
in relation to small business and enterprise today is just about 
the main reason why they are being wound up. 
  The question of investment policy, the attraction of foreign 
investors included, was raised repeatedly at the international 
conference devoted to problems of privatization in Russia. The 
opinion of the American expert John Robson is eloquent in this 
respect: "Money is cowardly, it goes only where there is 
political stability, a prospect of economic growth, and real 
hopes of a multiplication of capital." 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42804 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr015___94005" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Chairman on State Duma Budget Committee's Objectives </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0450A Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA in Russian No 5, 4-10 Feb 
94 p 7 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0450A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow OBSHCHAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Mikhail Zadornov, chairman of the State Duma </F>
Budget, Taxation, Banking, and Finance Committee, by Andrey 
Nizamutdinov; place and date not given: "Mikhail Zadornov: 
Gaydar's Departure Does Not Mean A Departure From Reforms"] 
  [Text] As is known, the new constitution perceptibly 
narrowed the field of activities of the Federal Assembly as 
compared to the former Supreme Soviet; however, control over the 
formation and execution of the state budget and the functioning 
of the monetary and credit system remain within the Duma's 
competence. 
  The deputies understand that the committee's work may 
have a real effect not only on the economy but also on policy. 
It is therefore no accident that 43 Duma members--that is, 
practically one in 10--expressed a desire to work on this 
committee. Among them are such notables as Academician Nikolay 
Petrakov, commentator Vasiliy Selyunin, and Aleksandr Pochinok, 
who headed an analogous committee in the previous parliament. 
All factions and deputy groups are represented in the committee, 
plus a good number of independent deputies. Most are 
professionals: economists, finance specialists, banking 
professionals, and entrepreneurs. 
  "At the very first meetings," remarks M. Zadornov, "we 
agreed 
that we will try to leave our political leanings and 
disagreements outside working meetings, and will be guided 
exclusively by the principles of professionalism and pragmatic 
assessment of the situation." 
  [Nizamutdinov] And where do you intend to start? 
  [Zadornov] By placing all work into the framework of the 
law. 
I mean not just our committee or the Duma as a whole--I mean the 
work of all organs of state authority in general. For instance: 
Russia has entered the year 1994 without an approved federal 
budget. We have had the same situation for the past two years. 
The state budget was approved on a quarterly basis, in parts, 
with great procrastination and delays. Meanwhile, the current 
law on the budget system says that the federal budget is 
approved for a calendar year, and this is to be done in 
advance--in October of the preceding year. In other words, a 
practice of constant violation of the law has already developed, 
which produces a chain of negative consequences not only in the 
economic and social but also in the political sphere. A 
fallacious practice has developed of using the budget as an 
instrument of political struggle, behind-the-scenes 
manipulation, and all sorts of abuses. It is unimportant here 
who is right and who is wrong--it is the economy as a whole that 
suffers. That is precisely why our committee considers it a 
priority task to return to the procedure set forth in the law. 
We have already sent the government a request to submit to the 
Duma a draft budget for the current year, and stand ready to 
consider it immediately. 
  [Nizamutdinov] Every normal family tries to plan its budget; 
even more so the state... 
  [Zadornov] Precisely. But that is the problem--for at least 
half a year the government works practically without a program. 
There are no development plans even for two or three years 
ahead--medium range--let alone long range. The government simply 
follows events, adopting documents post-datum and dealing with 
problems on an emergency basis--be it the miners, agrarians, or 
individual regions. 
  [Nizamutdinov] But if there is no, as you say, normal 
program, how can we talk about reforms? 
  [Zadornov] What does this mean: "reforms"? Unfortunately, 
over the past two years we have developed the mass habit of 
substituting political cliches and incantations for real 
analysis. The new stereotypes have taken hold not only in the 
absolute majority of the mass media, but also among many 
specialists. "Gaydar's departure from the government means a 
departure from the course of reforms." But this is not so! My 
opinion is: There are different types of economic policy, each 
with characteristic features. Gaydar's policy in its pure form, 
as it was proclaimed at the end of 1991, ceased to exist very 
quickly. It was basically abandoned in May 1992; the economic 
policy shifted in the direction of compromise; a balancing act 
and concessions to individual sectors or regions came on the 
scene. This has been going on over the entire last year. Now we 
should wait before we start talking about changing course. Let 
the reshuffled government present its program; let it support it 
with concrete budget drafts, a list of priority state programs, 
and proposed volume of centralized financing--then we can 
evaluate the course, the type of economic policy chosen by the 
government. To think that a reformist policy means tight money 
and a conservative one means handing it out is too simplistic an 
approach. Is it possible to get by without investment? And debts 
have to be paid, too. But if this is done sensibly, as a 
one-time thing, inflation fluctuations will remain within 
allowable boundaries and it will be possible to attenuate them 
later. A clearly pronounced inflationary policy is a completely 
different matter. But it is too early to talk about it now. 
  [Nizamutdinov] If the government announces such a policy, 
nevertheless, what will the Duma do? 
  [Zadornov] The disposition of forces in the Duma, its blocs 
and alliances, have not taken a final shape yet. The LDP 
[Liberal Democratic Party] has its own niche; the Agrarians are 
pursuing their own goals, which, despite conventional wisdom, 
far from always and far from in everything coincide with the 
position of the Communists. The picture is the same on the other 
side of the political spectrum. There will still be a regrouping 
of forces. I think there will be quite a few supporters in the 
Duma for a considerable increase in expenditures, and thus a 
mutual understanding may develop between the government and the 
parliamentary majority. Well, we will have to give people the 
opportunity to find out for themselves that attempts to give in 
to the demands of individual sectors or regions will not bring 
positive results. I think, however, that freezing prices and 
issuing colossal credits is no longer possible now. In any case, 
in our committee so far the prevailing intent is to follow the 
road of nursing the budget back to health, gradually easing the 
tax burden--first and foremost for enterprises in the production 
sphere, making the long overdue changes in the legislative base 
that regulates the financial and monetary and credit sphere. 
  [Nizamutdinov] Does nursing the budget back to health mean 
cutting its deficit? 
  [Zadornov] Cutting the budget deficit is a general task, not 
a goal in itself. We cannot build the whole economic policy on 
this basis. For instance, over the entire last year Boris 
Fedorov maintained a special position in the government. His 
actions were aimed at containing the deficit by any means 
possible--sometimes even not quite proper means, not allowing 
additional money emission. We have to give him credit: he 
accomplished principally important steps in the direction of 
changing the type of our economy--removing import subsidies, 
which used to be immense, and suspending the practice of 
preferential credits that had been used for who knows what 
purpose. But at the same time other important directions--for 
instance, credit policy--did not get the proper attention. These 
are the issues--investment, taxes, insurance, banking 
activities, including the Central Bank--that we will be dealing 
with in addition to budget issues. 
  [Nizamutdinov] You mentioned the Ministry of Finance and the 
Central Bank. How are your committee's relations with these 
institutions developing? 
  [Zadornov] It is too early to tell yet. The previous 
parliament had a confrontational relationship with the Ministry 
of Finance. We intend to establish normal working contacts, 
regardless of who will head the ministry and the Central Bank. 
After all, it is the Duma that sets the limits on the Central 
Bank's credit emission, and considers and approves the budget; 
therefore, normal relations are in our mutual interest. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42805 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr015___94006" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Skokov on Economic Reforms, Federation Objectives </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0433A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 28 Jan 94 pp 
1, 3 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0433A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with Yu. Skokov, chairman of the Federation of </F>
Russian Manufacturers, by Aleksandr Gagua, under the rubric 
"Position"; place and date not given: "Manufacturing--the Last 
Line of Defense of the State: Yuriy Skokov Believes That Less 
and Less Time Remains To Rescue the Economy"] 
  [Text] Yuriy Skokov, the former first deputy prime 
minister and subsequently secretary of the Security Council of 
the Russian Federation, is currently chairman of the FTR 
[Federation of Russian Manufacturers]. The FTR consists of the 
League of Assistance to Defense Enterprises, the Russian Union 
of Industrialists and Entrepreneurs, the Agrarian Union, the 
Union of Labor Collectives, the Russian Chamber of Commerce and 
Industry, the Union of Oilmen, and more than 50 regional 
associations. The Federation of Independent Trade Unions and the 
Association of Russian Banks take part in the operations of the 
FTR on a permanent basis. 
  [Skokov] Let us recall that reform, on whose account many a 
lance is now being broken, began after everyone came to the 
conclusion that the conditions of our lives had to be changed, 
and a new economic foundation had to be laid which would make it 
possible to guarantee some kind of social opportunity to all 
strata in a socially more equitable manner. The idea of economic 
reform appeared at that time. It has now been more than two 
years since the beginning of the reform was announced. What 
results have we achieved? Having discussed this problem at a 
recently held congress of the Federation of Manufacturers, we 
came to the conclusion that in reality there have been no 
reforms as such. A process of a kind of rearrangement in 
economic operations and economic management procedures has 
occurred in an absolutely spontaneous manner. As a result of 
this, we have not arrived at anything intelligible anyway. 
  Indeed, we had one system of manufacturing which kept demand 
and supply, incomes and expenditures, in balance by command and 
administrative methods, and we wanted to live under a different 
economic system which would maintain the equilibrium of demand 
and supply by qualitatively different methods. Interaction 
should be different under this new system, enterprises should be 
managed differently. The role of the federal authorities becomes 
completely different, and the regional authorities get another 
role. The roles of the collective itself and the enterprise are 
new; mutual relations between individual participants in the 
entirety of the production process are different; the nature and 
principles of investment are different, as are the methods of 
assessing effectiveness--everything is different. All of these 
should have emerged in the process of reform. However, different 
in what sense? To date we do not have an answer to any of these 
questions. When discussing this topic, we also discussed another 
one: At present, no government is in a position to correct the 
situation by acting in isolation, as a separate entity. 
Processes have gone too far; old possibilities and methods for 
influencing the behavior of both enterprises and regions have 
been destroyed. If a reactionary government of some kind 
suddenly wished to go back, it would be fraught with serious 
dislocations, just as serious as the current ones. 
  At the same time, if we fail to see clear-cut methods for 
reform we will be continuously wandering around in the dark, 
eating away at the national heritage we got from our fathers and 
grandfathers. At the congress we came to the conclusion that we 
should not wait for the government to resolve anything. We 
believe that at present the government is, in principle, not in 
a position to say how each element in the system should operate. 
We should do this ourselves. For this reason it was resolved 
that we should create a self-organizing, self-reforming system, 
but in cooperation with the government and other federal power 
structures. We resolved that we would support Chernomyrdin, that 
at present the head of the government should not be changed. We 
should help the prime minister and support the government at 
this difficult stage. Look at the programs of all the parties 
and movements. There is little difference between them. These 
are mostly declarations. This is why, no matter what new 
government comes along, it would hardly be able to put forth a 
clear-cut program of real actions. We agreed that in supporting 
the prime minister we will cooperate with the government in 
searching for solutions to our common problems. I was instructed 
to meet with Chernomyrdin and bring to his attention everything 
that we discussed at the congress. We agreed there that 
manufacturing remains the last line of defense of the state. 
  If manufacturing is ultimately destroyed it will make no 
sense to talk about reforms because the form which is to be 
changed will no longer be there, nor will there be any economic 
foundation for advancement, for ensuring social guarantees, and, 
most importantly, for preserving statehood and society as such. 
There will be nothing to talk about as far as the defense of 
human rights in its broadest interpretation is concerned--that 
is, the very point in the name of which all reforms began. 
Therefore, the defense of manufacturers at present is, in 
essence, the defense of human rights, of society and the state. 
I brought all this to the attention of Viktor Stepanovich. We 
discussed possible forms of cooperation and methods of 
interaction. Our long discussion proceeded in an atmosphere of 
mutual understanding. We agreed to meet with him after the 
completion of the procedure of forming the government in 
conjunction with the appearance of a new parliament and to 
discuss the details of this endeavor. I would like to note at 
the same time that the New Regional Policy faction of deputies 
has been created in the State Duma (I think that about 70 people 
will belong to it). It is headed by Vladimir Sergeyevich 
Medvedev, president of the Union of Oilmen--one of the founders 
of the FTR; Medvedev personally is a member of the presidium of 
the federation. We want to cooperate with this group in 
developing and implementing the necessary regulatory acts to 
ensure the defense of domestic manufacturers. 
  Incidentally, while opening the State Duma, Viktor 
Stepanovich put forward a thesis concerning support for domestic 
manufacturing. 
  [Gagua] Many people attribute the recent leap in the 
exchange 
rate of the dollar to inflationary expectations associated with 
the promise of such support. 
  [Skokov] We have gotten used to juggling words to such a 
degree that we have stopped pondering the essence of what we are 
saying. Many financial and economic programs have become a topic 
for politicking individuals attempting to solve their own 
problems by supposedly discussing financial and economic issues, 
rather than a subject for a search for professional solutions. 
As far as I understand it, Minister of Finance Fedorov, who is 
to a great degree to blame for the country ending up at such an 
impasse but who is quite ambitious and categorical in his 
judgments, is engaged in an active struggle with Chernomyrdin 
because he very much wants to become chairman of the Central 
Bank (as one of the newspapers justly said recently, he is one 
of the few ministers who ignore the edicts and decisions of the 
president, which is impermissible in a normal society). I think 
that this would bring about a catastrophe. I know Fedorov well; 
I worked with him in the Silayev government, and I can say 
confidently that he does not quite understand what the state 
budget is and does not know how to draw it up expertly. 
  In talking about the exchange rate of the dollar, I would 
note that the exchange rate emerges in the following manner 
(this is a somewhat simplified pattern, but in view of the fact 
that we are talking for a newspaper, let us spend some time on 
it). My country trades with another country. In order to be able 
to trade I must have the currency of that country in order to 
buy its goods. The other country should have my currency to buy 
my goods. The essence of the exchange rate is found in the 
relationship of the foreign trade balance of your country to the 
10 or 20 countries with which you trade. Indeed, currency 
markets exist in all countries; however, they appear on the 
basis of the need to service foreign trade, foreign economic 
activities, and the exchange rate on these markets evolves 
depending on the balance. 
  In our last interview I told you that, for example, the 
gross 
product of 15 trillion [rubles] in 1992, if converted at the 
1:650 exchange rate of the dollar at the time, made it possible 
to say that we produced a gross product of $23 billion. If we 
divide this by 150 million inhabitants, it will fall short of 
$200. This is less than Ethiopia. In terms of volume, it is less 
than all of our exports--$38 billion--and less than the volume 
of the natural production of coal, oil, and gas converted to 
world prices (more than $200 billion). This is what the exchange 
rate in our country is all about. 
  Until recently, a game was on--systematic currency 
interventions were carried out (this was done by the Central 
Bank and the Ministry of Finance through their institutions) in 
order to artificially support the exchange rate and thus 
demonstrate the supposedly favorable state of affairs in our 
economy. Commercial structures engage in speculation on the 
currency market because playing on the exchange rates of 
currencies is the most profitable endeavor at present. All this 
is a very complicated process, but it has got nothing to do with 
civilized economics. We do not have regular foreign economic 
operations, and we absolutely lack a clear notion of the value 
of our currency against other currencies. This is why I would 
like to stress yet again that in our country the exchange rate 
of the dollar has become an instrument of politicos and a 
subject of very major, large-scale operations. This is a channel 
and an opportunity to launder dirty money both within our 
country and in the West, a bridge which may allow the economic 
expansion of any group from the other side here (time and 
technique are all it takes). 
  Our rich have become rich not because they have created 
material production within the country. They purchased in the 
West, very cheaply, goods which for various reasons were not in 
demand there and sold them here at sky-high prices. The market 
is filled with these goods. Meanwhile, there are no domestic 
goods. In this situation the exchange rate of the dollar indeed 
becomes a weighty inflationary factor. However, this is an 
artificial situation, and I would not venture a judgment as to 
whether it was created out of confusion or purposefully. 
  [Gagua] What do you propose? 
  [Skokov] The FTR has developed quite a number of 
comprehensive proposals for overcoming the crisis in our economy 
and rescuing production. For the time being, before our second 
conversation with Viktor Chernomyrdin, I would prefer not to 
discuss it. However, after the meeting I will be prepared to 
share with the readers our plans--if it works out, joint plans 
with the government. 
  [Gagua] However, support for manufacturers means new credit 
and, consequently, a new cycle of inflation, does it not? 
  [Skokov] The proposals developed by our federation do not 
discuss massive injections of state credit. The government and 
the Central Bank simply do not have that kind of money. The 
discussion is about a system for interaction between enterprises 
in the regions and between regions, changes in the tax and, 
generally, economic environment which would make it possible not 
to drive up the price of domestic goods and, therefore, to 
contain the growth of prices for imported products which scares 
our consumers so much on a daily basis. 
  After all, inflation expressed in the growth of prices is 
caused by a disequilibrium between supply and demand in the 
domestic market. The people do not even give a thought to how 
such inflation is evaluated. A basket of consumer goods is 
taken, and a price index is established on its basis. For 
comparison, in the United States a basket of 300 products is 
used. However, at present 30 percent of the population cannot 
afford to buy even our basket with 19 products in its entirety. 
Another 50 percent merely fit within the framework of this 
basket. At present, we do not have effective demand at all. The 
entire problem lies in the fact that domestic manufacturing has 
come to a halt; the market is barren--there are no domestic 
goods; our manufacturers cannot produce either cheap popular 
goods or goods competitive on the world market. After all, our 
economy was so designed that, in the environment of the 
decontrol of energy and raw material prices, no producer of ours 
is in a position to manufacture cheap goods. The resource market 
and the merchandise market have been severed. Meanwhile, in a 
market economy, this is the foundation for building the model of 
circulation of products, goods, and profits. 
  [Gagua] In both our country and the West the departure of 
Gaydar and Fedorov is now being interpreted as a rejection of 
the reform course, which they symbolized for many people. What 
do you think about this? 
  [Skokov] I very much regret that in my time I did not 
succeed 
in talking President Yeltsin into distancing himself from the 
government. When he assumed leadership of the government in 
1991, he may have been right: It was necessary to "shield" a 
sharp change in the course with his authority. However, later, 
in November and December 1991, we had repeated discussions to 
the effect that the president should not head the government. 
The government may be changed many times, whereas the president 
is the head of state and leader of the country. However, it was 
very advantageous for the people in the government to hide 
behind the president. They did all they wanted while bearing no 
responsibility for it. Please recall this: If there is no 
Gaydar, there will be no $24 billion. So, they retained Gaydar 
at the Sixth Congress. Did the $24 billion come along? No, it 
did not. The next slogan was: The presence of these people is a 
guarantee of reform. However, everyone now understands that 
there is no way back. There is virtually no one who could say: I 
want to go back, to the old conditions. Even if they say this, 
it is just out of desire to regain the lost feeling of 
confidence, stability, and tranquility. Nobody wants to be 
ordered about, hurried along, or commanded. 
  [Gagua] What do you mean by economic management? 
  [Skokov] This question cannot be answered briefly or 
succinctly. Let us recall that previously the entire national 
economy amounted to something like a huge plant. The government 
operated on a certain pattern, saying who should produce what 
and how much, where to ship it, and who would get how much for 
it. In essence, the director of a plant had the same management 
structure. The government had the same functional and sectoral 
subdivisions and reception methods: which shop was to produce 
and what, and where it was to be built so that it would be able 
to fit into the general pattern of operation of the huge plant 
called the national economy. We did not have a regional policy 
as such because the entire structure of the national economy was 
patterned on the sectoral principle. Each region had up to 90 
percent of purely sectoral enterprises reporting to the Union. 
When these industrial enterprises received something from on 
high for their development, the regions also got a cut for 
social programs. Previously, we had an industrial policy, and 
regional policy was its appendage. Under current circumstances, 
now that social responsibility in its entirety has devolved on 
the regions, regional policy is becoming the centerpiece, and 
industrial policy must be worked out in a very rigid correlation 
with regional policy. The sectoral principle for the formation 
of the economy has almost disappeared. At any rate, the 
possibility of handing down commands from the top has virtually 
disappeared. What does manageability of the economy mean? As 
defined by the originators of the theory of management, 
management is a command transmitted to the recipient with a view 
to effectively influencing him. 
  Previously, I could give someone a command because I said in 
the process: There are so many goods in the oblast; to this end, 
you will receive this quantity of resources, an opportunity to 
draw wages and centralized capital investment for the 
construction, expansion, or upgrading of your plant, and this 
amount of funds for social facilities. Your region will receive 
this much. I cannot give commands like this anymore. How can I 
give an order to some plant? It will respond: Since you are 
giving me an assignment to manufacture this quantity of 
products, give me material resources. The government will say: I 
do not distribute resources at present. We have a market system 
now. Well, fine, give me credit resources based on 20 percent of 
the discount rate. The government will say: Of course, but only 
at 220 percent. But I can buy them at a commercial bank for 230 
percent! It makes no difference whether it is 210 or 250. This 
is short money, which does not make it possible to do anything, 
to even exist--for a small business or any other. Just 
yesterday, licenses and quotas were sought. However, at present 
domestic costs denominated in rubles are so high that, according 
to the calculations of an institute of the Academy of Sciences, 
the cost of one tonne of oil in Tyumen comes to $95-96, and this 
is commensurate with the producer cost of extraction. In 
addition, there is transportation, taxes, and duties! Therefore, 
even selling raw materials is becoming unprofitable now. It 
turns out that only one thing is profitable now--stealing 
something and selling it. 
  Therefore, the issue of manageability cannot now be restored 
in its old form. On top of this, regionalization ushered in a 
different situation whereby the federal government is running 
into a great many problems in each region. These problems were 
created by the Gorbachev-Pavlov government in its time when it 
proclaimed that all social programs should be solved at the 
regional level. However, the regions should have money and 
resources for that. Where are the regions to get this? 
Maneuvering begins, along with attempts to evade taxes, retain a 
considerable proportion of funds, and thus get an opportunity to 
influence the behavior of enterprises. After all, nobody knows 
now what to do about the social infrastructure "burdening" 
former state enterprises or the still surviving state 
enterprises. The problem of a transition from centralized 
management to complete decentralization is becoming fundamental. 
The war between the federal and regional authorities over 
whether the budget is to be relinquished or not is a nonsensical 
war. A fundamentally different pattern for the formation of 
manufacturing, merchandise-distribution, and financial-support 
structures should be sought. 
  [Gagua] In other words, you believe that having destroyed 
the 
old system, we cannot obtain a new one by betting on it arising 
out of processes of self-organization? 
  [Skokov] I can repeat my opinion: We cannot leap from one 
condition to another; it is impossible. We need to build a new 
system gradually. When I proposed the creation of state 
intersectoral industrial associations with their withdrawal from 
ministries in 1987-1988, it was, in essence, a timid attempt to 
create financial-industrial groups or financial-industrial 
corporations. At the time, the idea of the first commercial bank 
appeared; it was devised to be a hub, a center for external 
investment policy. However, this concept did not gain support. 
What was the idea of that period? At the time, we had 
approximately 200 different ministries and departments which 
turned to the government for particular types of resources. We 
calculated, proceeding from the number of enterprises and a 
certain model of such financial-industrial groups, that 
approximately 300-400 banking structures had to be created which 
could become the nuclei of financial-industrial groups. A few 
tens of thousands of industrial enterprises could be assigned to 
the banking structures for servicing, 10-15 enterprises to each. 
In this manner it would be possible to evade the direct 
administrative impact of ministries and to connect to the 
government directly, while not increasing the number of clients 
served by the government. 
  They are now trying to revisit this procedure. There is 
discussion of creating financial-industrial groups or 
corporations. However, at present financial and industrial 
capital are isolated. For example, I have money and want to 
protect it. For this reason, when someone in possession of 
industrial capital says: Give me your financial capital, and we 
will unite, I say: Give me no less than 20 percent every month 
so that I will be able to protect myself against the 240 percent 
(the discount rate). I cannot do this in principle because, if I 
begin to manufacture and subsequently sell products, I need at a 
minimum three to four months, as dictated by technology. That is 
to say, I will generate profits in three to four months. 
Besides, taxes are so high that I will be left with nothing. 
Therefore, it is quite difficult to establish a management 
structure at present, but there still is a chance, if the 
government grasps that it should sit down with the manufacturers 
and agree on how to act rather than apply pressure, give orders, 
and smash heads. 
  [Gagua] What does the federation you head mean by 
"protecting 
the rights of manufacturers?" 
  [Skokov] Let us talk about rights. Yesterday, the right to 
work was laid down in our Constitution. At present, it is laid 
down that labor is free. You work if you want to, and you do not 
if you do not want to. The state guarantees nothing. It merely 
says that labor is free. How was the right to labor exercised 
yesterday? The state had the right to assign a plan to its state 
enterprise, and this plan was balanced. The enterprise received 
resources in keeping with this plan; however, at the same time 
it was obligated, having brought in the people, to provide work 
for them and guarantee the level of wages established by the 
state. Therefore, the right to labor was exercised through this 
complex chain. This is not the case today. At present, any 
director may, in principle, fire even the entire work force. If 
directors go for it, there will indeed be a social explosion. At 
present, there is a discussion about our people being patient. 
However, there has been no explosion also because the old corps 
of directors, which retains old notions of their ethical 
obligations and civic duty, is now dodging, hustling, and trying 
to pay so-called wages while enterprises are virtually not 
operating. These are not wages but rather unemployment benefits. 
This is hidden unemployment. 
  The question is: Is the state currently in a position to 
absorb unemployment, which Fedorov advocates so much, reporting 
with pride that next year we will have 10 million unemployed? At 
present, the state does not have a system of unemployment 
benefits and social protection. After all, in the West this is a 
complex, well-conceived, and proven system. This is why 
protection of the rights of manufacturers is a quite difficult 
issue. What is "the rights of manufacturers" supposed to mean? 
All Western governments must protect their manufacturers, 
primarily by either allowing or not allowing outside goods onto 
the domestic market. The government assists its entrepreneurs in 
placing their goods on the foreign market through certain 
procedures, customs duties, taxes, and the like. Meanwhile, in 
our country the doors are wide open, and domestic manufacturers 
and the internal market have no protection at all. 
  To be sure, some of our politicians are fond of saying that 
our people, supposedly, do not work properly, do not do the 
right thing, and so on. If so, let us ask the people in the 
government: Do they always do the right thing? What is the 
measure of their civic and legal accountability--accountability 
to society and the state for having brought the situation to its 
present-day condition through unprofessional management? Under 
the circumstances, why do they consider themselves entitled to 
tell a manager: You are working poorly? Indeed, he cannot work 
because these people have created such conditions for him. The 
environment in which domestic manufacturers find themselves has 
become hostile. It has become profitable not to work at all. 
What do powerful enterprises do at present? They lease their 
premises to real estate brokers in order to sustain their 
people, paying them hidden unemployment benefits. The people who 
lease out these premises, in essence selling and redistributing 
the national wealth, are paid a portion of wages out of the 
funds taken away from these same people. This is the highest 
measure of social injustice. 
  Our economy currently reminds me of a cart sitting in the 
woods. The mare is no longer there, it has run away; the shafts 
are on the ground, and the cart itself has fallen apart. To be 
sure, the wheels are still in place. We are discussing the 
following issue: How are the ruts by which the cart will travel 
to be deepened? And who will get the cart moving? If it is 
moved, will this not end up with it falling apart completely? 
Who will pull it, who will ride in it, who will repair it as it 
moves, and, generally, where is the cart to be pulled? After 
all, we believed that we were moving along the path of reform 
toward a highway on which luxury cars were traveling, and as 
soon as we reached this highway, we would switch to such a car 
right away. So, are we to pull the cart toward the highway, 
modifying it en route, or are we to wait until someone builds a 
car for us? Nobody will build it for us. 
  We should modify this cart ourselves en route, without 
stopping, because there is no opportunity to stop. When 
politicians begin to look for enemies of reform and blame "the 
working people of this country" for doing something wrong, let 
them ponder this question: Do they themselves do all of this 
correctly? Second, the working people are the nag who must pull 
this cart. One should not spit upon them, but rather help these 
people to figure things out, because everybody is already 
confused to the point of not understanding anything. Instead 
they steer the conversation from the area of economic reform and 
the search for ways and methods for such reform to the area of 
convenient political twaddle. It is much too convenient to say 
that he is an enemy of reforms, we must fight him. However, in 
ethical terms, lies about us living well as soon as tomorrow and 
everything stabilizing here are not far removed from thievery. 
After all, such lies rob the people of that which is most 
important, hope--the hope that there indeed might be some 
justice, that we will indeed live better. 
  All our reformers should be grateful to our old system for 
conditioning a generation of people who trust, endure, and 
wait--and are sustained by the cherished hope that there are 
authorities that will take care of them, do the thinking, and 
make decisions. This feeling makes people patient. This vestige 
of the other, old system still prevents people from being openly 
indignant over the outrages and the conditions they find 
themselves in. 
  For now, there is time to change something for the better, 
but there is less and less of it. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42806 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr015___94007" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Piyasheva To Found Institute of Economics, Criticizes `Gaydar' Reforms </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0440A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian 28 Jan 94 p 5 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0440A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Interview with economist L.I. Piyasheva by DELOVOY MIR </F>
commentator Lina Tarkhova under the rubric "Point of View"; 
place and date not given: "`I Am Coming Out of a Bleak Period'"] 
  [Text] 
  [Tarkhova] Larisa Ivanovna, the readers have "lost track" of 
you. Not so long ago, the pages of newspapers were replete with 
your name; you invariably found yourself at the center of 
discussions, and suddenly you disappeared. Where are you now, 
what are you doing? 
  [Piyasheva] After my departure from the Moscow mayor's 
office 
I headed an educational institution in which I administered 
examinations today for the last time. I am also quitting this 
job. I want to establish a new institute, likewise an 
educational one--an institute of economy and law. Due to 
domestic circumstances, the last year was very difficult for me, 
it was one solid bleak period. I am now trying to come out of 
it, and am engaging in vigorous work. 
  [Tarkhova] You criticized Gaydar's economic program sharply. 
Do you experience profound satisfaction in conjunction with his 
departure? 
  [Piyasheva] Not in the least. I believe that it was not 
worthwhile for him to return to a government in which he 
patently could not have a decisive influence. 
  [Tarkhova] In conjunction with the latest events, the 
disputes about economic transformations being reversible or 
irreversible have resumed with renewed strength. What is your 
opinion? 
  [Piyasheva] I think that they will not abandon the path of 
Gaydar's reforms. Gaydar is being rebuked for unjustifiably 
trying to accelerate, for running ahead of himself. My 
complaints about him are of a directly opposite nature: he did 
not begin reforms in earnest, after all. Apparently, being 
carried away by the idea of financial stabilization, he failed 
to see, was unable to see, which economic processes were behind 
this. Otherwise, he would not have dragged out privatization 
over a few years, would not have accepted its current model, and 
would have indeed given property to the people. "Chubays-style" 
privatization has not resulted in a change of ownership: the 
state still owns most of the country's wealth, no matter what 
joint-stock companies' or holding companies' labels camouflage 
this. Gaydar did not begin structural changes in industry; the 
institution of bankruptcy was not introduced. These mechanisms 
are rigidly interconnected, and they need to be set in motion 
simultaneously. However, an attempt was made to accomplish the 
impossible--to leap across a precipice in two jumps, an attempt 
that was patently doomed to failure. 
  Besides, Gaydar did not pursue his monetarist line firmly 
enough, either. He made concessions to the government, to the 
parliament, yielding his ground time after time. The current 
events which have disturbed everyone so much--a new upswing in 
prices, the fall of the ruble--are not at all a consequence of 
Gaydar's departure and a government crisis, as is believed. The 
populist decisions of the last months of the year, when the 
reformers wanted to look good before the elections, are becoming 
a factor. 
  Therefore, Chernomyrdin will simply stay Gaydar's course. 
The 
fight against inflation will go on in some form. The government 
will not allow unemployment to occur; subsidies to unprofitable 
industries will not be stopped. The prime minister believes 
religiously in the command economy in which wages and prices can 
be fixed and centralized supply, or more precisely distribution, 
can exist. He is not averse to adding a dash of market economy 
to this. However, it has been proven a thousand times over: one 
cannot be somewhat pregnant. A choice has to be made between two 
directions: social-democratic or liberal. Either a state plan 
and equality in poverty, or economic freedom, unlimited 
opportunity for manufacturers, but also the risk of ruin and 
bankruptcy--of course, with social protection for the old and 
weak. The richer a society, the better it handles this task. 
  [Tarkhova] In your opinion, how much time will the 
government 
need to ascertain this? 
  [Piyasheva] The current leaders will never understand this. 
This is how they were conditioned and molded by their time. What 
will happen to the country? There will be trouble. It is only 
possible to hang on within the framework of a socialist model 
through the use of force, and many steps back will have to be 
taken. Borders will have to be closed again, and the persecution 
of dissidents will have to be started. Stalin did not at all 
introduce terror because he was a bad man. It is impossible to 
build socialism otherwise, because since the people resist. 
Logically, the same should begin now. They will begin with 
bankers and farmers and take away what these people already 
have. However, people will not give up their freedom 
voluntarily, and here they are--opponents of the regime, enemies 
of the people. They are gunning down bankers already; recently, 
they killed five all at once. 
  [Tarkhova] However, this was not "at the hand" of the 
government. 
  [Piyasheva] Of course not. However, the policy with regard 
to 
commercial banks, which they cannot forgive for breaking loose 
and wishing to pursue their own financial policy, is triggering 
this. If I am not mistaken, not a single killer of an 
entrepreneur has been found and convicted yet. I am convinced 
that the notorious affair involving forged advice notes, whereby 
tremendous sums that subsequently literally evaporated were 
channeled through commercial banks, could not have succeeded 
without powerful support from the top. The banks were faced with 
the choice: either generate forged advice notes, and in this 
case, with bankruptcy and prison awaiting, or be destroyed. This 
was a purposeful action. 
  [Tarkhova] This is a sad picture. However, something 
favorable has been done in recent years, has it not? Although 
this is absolutely unscientific, could you estimate the 
percentage content of the "market" in our economy at present? 
  [Piyasheva] The "market" content is as high as the degree to 
which privatization has been implemented. Chubays intends to 
complete privatization by June; from his point of view, it 
perhaps comes to 80 [percent] even now. I believe that it is 5 
percent. I think that the elements of a market economy in the 
regions are altogether minimal. Moscow and St. Petersburg have 
been reformed the most. 
  [Tarkhova] As you see it, what should economic policy be 
with 
regard to the regions? 
  [Piyasheva] It is frequently interpreted as a transfer of 
power from the center to the localities. However, this merely 
means the redistribution of nomenklatura power. Freedom should 
be granted to producers with a minimum of participation by the 
administration in this. A private owner, an independent, free 
person should finally appear in the center and the most 
godforsaken provinces alike. 
  [Tarkhova] Why is it that the salespeople in privatized 
shops, in all these limited-liability companies with smart 
names, are as rude to customers as before, and their dress is as 
dirty as before? Economists have said so much about the magic, 
transforming power of the pride of ownership! 
  [Piyasheva] That the salespeople are rude and unclean is 
proof positive of the absurdity of the current fictitious 
privatization. Nothing has changed in real life and, 
consequently, in the mentality of these people. They do not own 
either the premises of the shop or the land underneath it. Just 
like before, a trust is ensconced above the salespeople which 
gives them managerial directives and, at the same time, shows 
some concern for supplies. A recent open letter from Luzhkov to 
the president about the failure to procure the necessary amount 
of foodstuffs for Moscow is nothing but testimony that our dear 
centralized supply system is alive and well, although all shops 
are allegedly not owned by the state anymore! Sometimes they 
say: So, they were privatized on Piyasheva's flawed pattern, and 
this is the source of all the trouble. However, I did not have 
an opportunity to conduct privatization the way I conceived of 
it: each store should become an independent unit, without 
officials above it who need to be fed. The owner of a store 
looks for suppliers himself; however, to this end, wholesale 
warehouses, transportation, and other infrastructure should also 
be privatized. I came to the mayor's office with this specific 
program. Popov, who offered me the job, created ideal 
conditions, but two months later suddenly quit as mayor. I found 
myself in a vacuum: Luzhkov has a completely different view of 
privatization. I had to quit. 
  [Tarkhova] Some figures maintain that, by virtue of their 
peculiar traits, the Russian people are not the material for 
market relations and are in principle incapable of rational 
economic behavior. For example, foreigners happen to be shaken 
when they learn that a woman here is capable of forking over an 
entire month's salary, say, for boots. Generally, what is 
"economic behavior" about? 
  [Piyasheva] It is about economic operations being geared 
toward the greatest possible result. Subsidies to unprofitable 
industries are noneconomic behavior. As far as boots for a 
month's salary are concerned.... I do understand this woman. One 
does not want to walk about in overshoes. Foreigners are 
surprised because they have an entirely different orientation to 
life. Western people eagerly invest funds in real estate, cars, 
land, stock. A Western person would buy some kind of equipment 
for his shop rather than new boots. 
  The orientation of our people is toward consumption, and the 
"nouveaux riches" display this vividly. Our millionaires are 
undoubtedly ahead of Western ones in terms of the number of 
prestigious cars, prodigious banquets, and luxury cruises. Easy 
come, easy go, because there are no long-term prospects, and 
they are not being created. Only pride of ownership, an 
opportunity to become free, provides prospects, that is, a 
foundation for economic behavior. It is based on confidence in 
the authorities and the law. What confidence can there be given 
our instability? 
  [Tarkhova] What has been your most serious disappointment in 
recent years--a person, an idea? 
  [Piyasheva] Perhaps it is the policy of conducting Gaydar's 
economic reforms. You see, a lot was expected of him. He came to 
take a place which had been cleared through a monumental effort 
of the people. Let us recall how it happened: We had fought 
Ligachev, Ryzhkov, Abalkin.... We cleared away one obstacle 
after another. So, the 1991 August putsch failed, a democratic 
government came in, and there were no objective obstacles to 
quickly implementing the entire set of reforms. It did not work 
out. 
  [Tarkhova] Are you prepared to blame Yegor Gaydar for this? 
  [Piyasheva] No. By no means should one person be blamed in 
this instance. Apparently, this has to do with the people having 
been too powerfully traumatized by everything this country has 
gone through. There are no leaders. After all, the flower of the 
nation was indeed exterminated. One may only be surprised at 
people still being human. 
  [Tarkhova] What is your philosophy in life? 
  [Piyasheva] Live no lies. Serve the idea, your convictions, 
the motherland. Live by God. 
  [Tarkhova] Did you come to religion long ago? 
  [Piyasheva] This is a personal question. 
  [Tarkhova] How do you find consolation in a time of 
difficulty? 
  [Piyasheva] Alas, there are instances when consolation is 
not 
to be found...perhaps only in music. Recently I listened to 
Paganini's violin concerto at home for one month in a row. I am 
gradually coming out of a bleak period. I intend to write a few 
articles. After all, for a while I in a way suspended all public 
and publishing activity, and quite deliberately at that. I did 
not want to criticize Gaydar and Chubays. They were working, so 
let them work. I thought: What kind of specialty do I have--to 
criticize everyone? 
  [Tarkhova] However, not so long ago you "picked apart" 
Gaydar's program on an entire newspaper page. 
  [Piyasheva] This was purely by chance. This kind of 
situation, a stressful situation, happened. I wrote the article 
to relax. Quite unexpectedly, I got a prize from the Soros 
Foundation for the article. 
  [Tarkhova] Congratulations. Are you now establishing an 
institute to "relax?" 
  [Piyasheva] It is badly needed. Economics and law--one does 
not work without the other, and we see it every day. Economists 
should know the law, and lawyers should be conversant with 
economics. The institute will train specialists of an 
international class, managers, bankers, lawyers. 
  [Tarkhova] Larisa Ivanovna, you are a hopeless optimist! You 
painted the most gloomy picture of our immediate future--and 
suddenly such a project. 
  [Piyasheva] Yuriy Mikhaylovich Luzhkov promised assistance 
in 
this matter. No matter how different our views of economic 
problems are, I must admit that he is one of the few of our 
leaders who know how to achieve a set goal. His word can be 
trusted. As far as I am concerned.... I do not know how to be 
depressed for a long time. I must work. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42807 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr015___94008" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Labor Ministry Provides Statistics for 1993 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0443A Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA in Russian 5 Feb 94 pp 1-2 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0443A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow RABOCHAYA TRIBUNA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Yelena Vasilkova: "But As Far As the Rest Is </F>
Concerned--Everything Is Coming Up Roses!"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Ministry of Labor Provides Results for Last Year </H5>
  "According to information from the Nutrition Institute, last 
year our schoolchildren grew thinner by a kilogram. We find this 
report disturbing," Valeriy Kolosov, first deputy minister of 
labor of the Russian Federation, told journalists. 
  Plans called for the minister himself to conduct this press 
conference on the situation in the socio-labor sphere, but he 
was detained at a government meeting. His deputies, V. Kolosov 
and R. Batkayev, therefore came under the "shelling" of press 
representatives. 
  What did we find out? 
<H5>  Population Income </H5>
  Population income increased 11-fold over the level of 1992. 
However, this takes into account the incomes of people engaged 
in entrepreneurial activity. If these are not taken into 
account, the level of income fell. 
  More than 30 percent of the populace have incomes lower than 
the minimum wage level, and 13 percent have incomes which do not 
exceed the cost of the minimum subsistence selection. And this 
does not consider the quality of nourishment, a factor of 
serious concern to medical experts. For example, the 
above-mentioned schoolchildren no longer receive milk at 
breakfast. 
<H5>  Wages </H5>
  Wages increased 9.9-fold over the level of 1992, which 
corresponds approximately to the growth in consumer prices. But 
in December of last year wages increased only eightfold over the 
level of the previous December, while prices rose almost 
10-fold. The differential seen with respect to wages is ever 
increasing. 
  "At a number of state enterprises, the salaries managers 
receive exceed the average wage dozens of times," V. Kolosov 
stressed. "This is abnormal. We have to have some kind of rules 
regulating this." 
  Recently a critical situation has arisen regarding delays in 
monetary payments, especially to workers in the budget sphere. 
Their pay level continues to lag behind wages in the production 
sphere. Last year the wage level in sociocultural sectors 
amounted to 40-80 percent of the average wage in industry. 
<H5>  Employment and Unemployment </H5>
  The total number of "persons out of work and actively 
seeking 
work" (as the employment services characterize the unemployed) 
and "workers in the less-than-full employment mode" (the 
potentially unemployed) came to 7.8 million individuals by the 
end of 1993, or 10.4 percent of the "economically active 
population." Some 0.8 million people hold official status as 
unemployed. Considering sectors of the national economy, the 
most significant employment reductions were seen in science and 
construction. Yet the number of people employed in credit 
services, insurance, tax inspectorates, public notary offices, 
and legal services is increasing. 
<H5>  Labor relations </H5>
  Labor relations are characterized as tense. The reasons: 
nonconformance of labor legislation to new economic conditions 
and the absence of an effective system of protecting the labor 
rights of workers. 
  Contract forms of labor relations based on principles of 
social partnership have virtually displaced the administrative 
forms of labor relations. 
<H5>  Labor Conditions and Social Insurance </H5>
  Every day about 30 individuals lose their lives and more 
than 
50 become disabled in the production sphere. Some 400 accidents 
occur each year. Expenses incurred by enterprises related to 
damage compensation exceed 40 billion rubles [R] per year. Our 
level of occupational trauma is two to four times greater than 
in the developed countries of Europe. Nonetheless, enterprises 
are reducing funds designated for ensuring occupational safety, 
and in the private sector they often do not allocate such funds 
at all. 
<H5>  Personnel Training </H5>
  Over the past three years, we have seen sharp reductions in 
the numbers of directors and specialists--by more than 
threefold, and of workers--by 5.4-fold. The number of workers 
undergoing training, retraining, or receiving instruction for 
the first time decreased twofold. 
  Assessing the situation overall in the socio-labor sphere, 
specialists of the Ministry of Labor have concluded that as a 
result of measures taken, the landslide drop in standard of 
living of the population which began in 1992 came to a halt in 
1993. 
  To agree or not agree with this--is the right each one of us 
has. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42808 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr015___94009" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Living Standards, Consumer Market Situation in 1993 Analyzed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0446A Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA in Russian 3 Feb 94 p 4 </F>
<F P=103> 944E0446A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow NEZAVISIMAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Report by Center for the Study of Economic Trends under the </F>
Government of the Russian Federation: "On the Population's 
Standard of Living and the Situation in the Consumer Market in 
1993"] 
  [Text] Over the past year the Russian government's actions 
have been directed in many respects at strengthening the social 
orientation of the current reforms, carrying out targeted 
support of certain population groups and, through this, 
achieving stability in society. The dynamics of the main 
indicators of the standard of living show that in the past year 
the bulk of the population have been able to adapt to the new 
conditions. 
  According to estimates, in 1993 the real monetary income of 
the population increased by more than 10 percent as compared to 
1992. An especially fast rise of this indicator (almost 30 
percent) was observed in the first half of 1993. An inflation 
jump in the third quarter slowed down the dynamics of real 
income. At the same time, comparing the distribution of the 
population by income level at the end of 1993 with the analogous 
period of the preceding year (in constant prices) shows a 
certain increase in the share of persons whose material 
situation became relatively better. 
  One of the main social consequences of economic reforms last 
year was a considerable increase in stratification of the 
country's population by income level. The gap in per capita 
income between those in the top 10 percent income bracket and 
the poorest population groups measured at the end of 1993 a 
factor of 10.8 as compared to 8.7 in December of the preceding 
year. It is estimated that the top 10 percent of the population 
accounts for 30 percent of all income in society; in December 
1992 it was 25 percent. The index of income concentration (the 
Gini coefficient) increased by the end of 1993 to 0.350 as 
compared to 0.256 in 1991 (0.327 in December 1992). The 
accelerated rise of this indicator over such a short period of 
time points to an extremely swift polarization of society. 
  Despite continuous increases in social benefits, there 
remains a sufficiently large social group in the country whose 
income does not provide for an acceptable consumption minimum. 
By the end of 1993 there were 54 million persons (36 percent of 
the total population) whose income was below the subsistence 
level, including 4 million (3 percent) with income below the 
physiological maintenance level. In the poor category are mostly 
families with many children and incomplete families with 
children, families with a high burden of dependents and labor 
remuneration close to minimum wage, single pensioners, and the 
disabled. 
  In the environment of a production decline and cutbacks in 
centralized imports of consumer goods, market saturation mainly 
took place through goods brought in by commercial structures and 
physical persons from near and far abroad. Imported products 
became more competitive in relation to domestically produced 
ones; this includes first and foremost household electronics and 
industrial goods. 



  Threshold and Level of Poverty in Russia (monthly averages) 

                 1992                              1993                                 1994 

                 March    September    December    March     September    December      March 
                                                                          (estimate)    (estimate) 

Subsistence      1,400    2,900        5,700       10,700    37,700       62,000        98,000 
minimum (upper 
threshold of 
poverty), 
rubles per 
capita 

Physiological    800      1,500        2,900       5,400     15,700       21,000        33,500 
maintenance 
minimum (lower 
threshold of 
poverty), 
rubles per 
capita 

Population       35       49           42          57        57           54            59 
with income 
below 
subsistence 
level, million 
persons 

as % of total    57.0     32.8         28.2        38.4      38.5         36.2          40.2 
population 

Population       28       10           7           11        7            4             5 
with income 
below 
physiological 
maintenance 
level, million 
persons 

as % of total    19.0     6.9          4.8         7.4       4.5          2.8           3.6 
population 



</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42809 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr015___94010" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Stock Market Activities for 1993 Viewed </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0420A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian No 8, 17-23 Jan 94 p 
3 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0420A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Unattributed article: "Stock Market 1993: Some Results. </F>
What Happened, and What Will Happen...."] 
  [Text] Due to the development of the general information 
infrastructure and aspects of the technical infrastructure, 
considerable changes occurred on the securities market last year 
which entailed certain shifts in the array of market 
participants. Last year some substantial changes were registered 
in commercial transactions with nonstate securities along with 
trends that have persisted for a long time now, in particular a 
stable improvement in trends on the market of shares of the 
largest commercial banks and the prevalence of the stock markets 
of the capital city in the breakdown of the volume of 
transactions. 
  Thus, despite the prevalence in commercial circulation of 
transactions with bank securities, with which institutional 
investors (in particular, voucher investment funds) frequently 
replenish their investment portfolios, last year new segments of 
the market evolved virtually from scratch before our eyes: a 
market for stock in privatized enterprises and a market for the 
stock of voucher investment funds. Besides, as the general 
knowledge of information of market participants improved and the 
number of issuers whose stock actively circulates on the 
secondary market increased substantially, the number of those 
actively speculating in the securities of private and 
institutional investors grew considerably. In the latter 
instance an important role was played by the fact that the 
intensification of inflationary processes has virtually robbed 
long-term investment in stock (for the purposes of receiving 
regular dividend income) of its attractiveness; this focused the 
attention of market participants almost exclusively on 
speculative play with the shares of Russian issuers. 
Transactions to acquire or sell controlling blocs of shares of 
the issuers continue to form a special group in operations with 
the securities of Russian enterprises. The role of this segment 
of the market grew the most as secondary trading in the shares 
of privatized enterprises got underway. 
  In analyzing the dynamics of the activities of participants 
in the market, we should note that this year market trends did 
not experience the usual summer slump, and the volume of sales 
on the securities market did not drop during the summer vacation 
season; in some instances, volumes even increased. 
  Certain shifts occurred last year in the significance of 
regions within the structure of the all-Russian securities 
market. Thus, it should be noted that the proportion of 
commercial volume sustained by participants in regional markets 
increased substantially and confidently exceeded the 30-percent 
mark. At the same time, the proportion of transactions involving 
the stock of regional issues on the markets of Moscow and St. 
Petersburg increased sharply, especially in the second half of 
1993. 
  Nonetheless, despite the intensive development of new 
segments of the market, the stock of respectable commercial 
banks still enjoys well-deserved attention from investors; until 
recently these banks were virtually the only group of issuers 
vigorously involved in maintaining the liquidity of their 
securities. 
  For a long time the Tveruniversalbank, the Commercial Bank 
of 
Mytishchi, the Siberian Trade Bank, and the Hermes Center Bank 
led this segment of the market most of the time. A stable 
improvement in trends on the market for the stock of these 
issuers was due primarily to the vigorous activities of 
market-makers for these stocks. Besides, in the case of the 
Tveruniversalbank we have a wonderful example of coordinated 
operations by an extensive Interregional Chain of official 
dealers which was set up by the bank; the dealers offer 
continuous two-way quotations of the stock in both capital 
cities and the regions. 
  A "bank" market for securities that has evolved in St. 
Petersburg merits special discussion: for a year now, 
transactions with the shares of three or four local banks have 
accounted for more than 80 percent of the commercial volume. The 
banks have a wonderful field for the exercise of influence and 
control in the form of the isolated and not-too-deep market of 
St. Petersburg. This, in particular, may be the explanation for 
the stable and extremely high rates of growth of quotations of 
bank stock in the summer and fall of 1993. The St. Petersburg 
Bank, Promstroybank, and Vitabank are among the largest issuers 
in this group. 
  There were also other reasons for the sharp increase in the 
value of stock of commercial banks. Thus, a leap in the value of 
Inkombank stock in the fall of this year was due to a 
combination of circumstances occurring simultaneously. After 20 
July, Inkombank released information on the acquisition of 40 
percent of its stock by a large American finance company, 
Shearson Lehman Brothers [rendered in English in original]. This 
large bloc of shares was distributed among three American 
finance companies (their names were not revealed). The amount of 
the transaction came to $40 million, which made it possible for 
the bank to increase the paid-in statutory capital to at least 
$90 million. At the same time, in the course of modifying 
strategy in the market for its securities, the bank reverted to 
a previously used pattern whereby liquidity in the secondary 
market for its own securities was maintained through dealers 
controlled by the bank. The Irtan joint-stock company founded by 
Inkombank played the role of lead dealer. The set of measures 
taken made it possible to substantially raise the quotations of 
bank shares on the market. From the second half of July on, the 
value of Inkombank stock has continuously remained above the 
previously unattainable mark of 45,000 rubles [R], reaching 
R49,000 on the exchange and R50,000 in off-exchange transactions. 
  As experts study the development of the Russian nonstate 
securities market, on the whole they still agree that the 
liquidity of traded stock remains at an unsatisfactory level. 
Nonetheless, an extensive process of conversion to joint-stock 
operations and privatization in Russia lays the foundation (in 
the long term) for the rapid growth and expansion of the stock 
market in Russia. 
  This is also confirmed by the fact that powerful groups of 
institutional investors, which in the long run will be capable 
of ensuring an acceptable depth of the stock market in Russia, 
are gradually beginning to emerge in the market. The first group 
was made up of voucher investment funds which have raised 
massive batches of privatization vouchers in the process of 
voucher privatization. The second group is being made up of 
insurance companies; the volume of attracted insurance premiums 
of the largest of them come to dozens of billions of rubles a 
year. Finally, in the fall of this year the process of 
legitimizing the operations of nonstate retirement funds, of 
which there already are about 120 in Russia, should be 
completed. These factors create a tremendous potential for the 
development of the stock market in Russia. 
  As the most significant result of 1993 we may note the utter 
collapse of illusions with regard to the ability of the existing 
Russian stock exchanges to become stable centers for the liquid 
trading of securities. During 1993 the stock market remained off 
the exchange; an overwhelming majority of exchange transactions 
were performed for demonstration purposes. Many professional 
finance brokers are quite skeptical about the ability of stock 
exchanges to become genuine centers for high-quality, liquid 
secondary trading in securities even in the remote future. The 
reasons for the pessimism of brokers with regard to stock 
exchanges include the poor standards of their managers and 
experts (the absence of exchange trading robs exchanges of their 
main source of support, which makes it impossible for them to 
retain highly rated specialists), the absence in most instances 
of genuine steps toward the development of effective trading, 
settlement, and data systems, and many other reasons. 
  Under the circumstances, 1994 may become the year of 
unexpected self-organization of the strongest market-makers into 
an off-exchange system for securities trading which would 
function efficiently and would be managed by a collective organ. 
Sufficient quantities of traded high-quality shares and 
sufficient numbers of professional financial institutions are 
already creating the necessary prerequisites for the emergence 
of a system of this kind. It is "just" the organizational 
solution for the operation of an off-exchange system of this 
kind that largely remains a problem to this day. 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42810 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr015___94011" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Economy's Performance in 1993 Summarized </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  PM0802154594 Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA in Russian 8 Feb 94 
First Edition p 4 </F>

<F P=103> PM0802154594 </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow ROSSIYSKAYA GAZETA </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:BFN 

<F P=106> [Unattributed report "based on Russian State Committee for </F>
Statistics material": "Difficult Path to the Market. Results 
of Russia's Socioeconomic Development in 1993 Summed Up"] 
  [Text] 
<H5>  Production and Use of Gross Domestic Product </H5>
  Gross Domestic Product [GDP], which is calculated as the 
difference between gross production and interim consumption and 
characterizes the value of the end product destined for final 
consumption, accumulation, and export, totaled 162.3 trillion 
rubles [R], a 12-percent drop in comparable terms on 1992. This 
was due to a decline in the production of goods and services in 
most sectors of the economy, including falls of 16.2, 7, and 4 
percent in industry, construction, and agriculture respectively. 
  Almost 58 percent of GDP was used for final consumption in 
1993 against 54 percent in 1992. The proportion of accumulation 
in GDP dropped 6.2 percent in 1993. 
<H6>  Industry </H6>
  Physical production dropped 16.2 percent compared with 1992 
and 16.1 percent in December. Civilian and military output 
dropped 15.9 and 29 percent respectively (the figures were 12 
and 42 percent respectively in 1992). 
  In 1993 total industrial production was 37 percent down on 
1990, including 28 percent and 38 percent in extraction and 
processing sectors respectively. 
  In 1993 the greatest fall in production compared with the 
same period in 1992 was recorded in January (21.8 percent) and 
the smallest in August (12 percent). 
  Production of 234 out of 262 categories of reported 
industrial output (89 percent) fell, while production of 28 
products (11 percent) rose. 
  The scale of the production decline differs considerably 
among sectors and among spheres of production. Production of 
fuel and raw material resources dropped 3-12 percent, along with 
investment output (20-40 percent), output intended for 
agriculture (22-41 percent), basic foodstuffs (10-24 percent), 
and light industry goods (13-34 percent). Production of some 
categories of high-technology household goods increased 8-9 
percent. 
  Last year it did not prove possible to carry out the 
comprehensive structural reorganization of industry, and the 
sector showed a stronger trend toward a more cumbersome 
production structure. 
  In fuel and energy sectors, in standard equivalent terms, 
extraction and production of all categories of primary energy 
resources dropped 6 percent compared with 1992. Some 956 
billion kilowatt-hours of electricity (5 percent down on 1992) 
were generated and 352 million tonnes of oil, including gas 
condensate, (down 12 percent), 618 billion cubic meters of gas 
(down 3 percent), and 305 million tonnes of coal (down 9 
percent) were extracted. 
  In ferrous metallurgy in 1993 production of basic categories 
of output dropped owing to the fall in demand: 40.5 million 
tonnes of cast iron were extracted (down 12 percent on 1992), 
along with 58.3 million tonnes of steel (down 13 percent), while 
42.7 million tonnes of finished rolled iron (down 9 percent) and 
5.8 million tonnes of steel pipe (down 28 percent) were 
produced. Many progressive kinds of metal output suffered the 
greatest production falls. 
  In the machine-building industry production of many goods 
dropped considerably owing to the decline in customers' 
purchasing power: Production of one-fourth of 62 highly 
important categories of output reported dropped 20-40 percent, 
while production of one-third of these goods was down 50 percent 
or more. 
  Production of high-technology output dropped, in particular 
metal-cutting tools and forging and pressing machines with 
digital program control -- down by a factor of four or five. 
Production of railroad and agricultural machine-building and of 
construction equipment dropped (30-70 percent). 
  Production of automobile industry output for which there is 
a 
relatively steady demand dropped the least. In 1993, 956,000 
automobiles and 47,200 buses were produced (99.3 and 98 percent 
of the 1992 level respectively). 
  Structural transformations in defense industry sectors in 
connection with the conversion of military production were a 
typical feature of the past year. Production fell 11 percent at 
enterprises undergoing conversion. Civilian output makes up 
around three-fourths of the total production at enterprises 
undergoing conversion. Two-thirds of the work force are 
employed in producing this output. 
  In the chemical and petrochemical industries 9.9 million 
tonnes of synthetic ammonia were produced (7 percent down on the 
1992 level), along with 8.2 million tonnes of sulfuric acid 
(down 15 percent), 2 million tonnes of soda ash (down 26 
percent), 1.4 million tonnes of caustic soda (down 22 percent), 
8.6 million tonnes of mineral fertilizers (down 22 percent), 
349,000 tonnes of chemical fibers and yarns (down 26 percent), 
and 36.1 million automobile tires (down 14 percent). 
  The chemical and pharmaceutical industry reduced production 
of 11 out of 16 highly important pharmacotherapeutic 
preparations. 
  Production of commercial timber dropped by more than 
one-fourth in the timber procurement industry compared with 1992. 
  Production of the most important categories of woodworking 
and pulp and paper industry output dropped considerably. In 
1993, production of lumber totaled 39.9 million cubic meters (25 
percent down on the 1992 level), pit props -- 450,000 cubic 
meters (down 55 percent), commercial pulp -- 1.6 million tonnes 
(down 21 percent), and paper -- 2.9 million tonnes (down 20 
percent). 
  The fall in production and technical construction resulted 
in 
a drop in production in the construction materials industry. 
Some 50.1 million tonnes of cement (19 percent down on 1992), 
3,249 million standard slates (down 28 percent), 19.1 billion 
bricks (down 12 percent), and 101 million square meters of 
window glass (down 13 percent) were produced. 
  In 1993, light industry enterprises produced 3.7 billion 
square meters of fabric (27 percent down on the 1992 level), 547 
million pairs of hosiery (down 13 percent), 340 million items of 
knitwear (down 26 percent), and 146 million pairs of footwear 
(down 34 percent). 
  Varying situations developed with regard to the production 
of 
everyday and domestic goods. Production of ice boxes and 
freezers in 1993 totaled 3.5 million (9 percent up on 1992), 
televisions -- 4 million (8 percent up), washing machines -- 3.9 
million (10 percent down), sewing machines -- 1.4 million (13 
percent down), tape recorders -- 2.2 million (20 percent down), 
and video recorders -- 270,000 (39 percent down on 1992). 
  In 1993 the fall in production of certain foodstuffs slowed: 
4.0 million tonnes of meat were produced, along with 8.2 million 
tonnes of whole milk products, 1.1 million tonnes of vegetable 
oil, and 3.9 million tonnes of sugar. Production of vegetable 
oil, semimanufactured meat products, fatty cheeses and Caucasian 
cheeses, canned dairy products, and mayonnaise increased. 
<H6>  Capital Construction </H6>
  In 1993, enterprises under all forms of ownership in the 
Russian Federation absorbed R25.2 trillion in capital 
investment. State enterprises and organizations (59 percent) 
and joint-stock companies (29 percent as opposed to 6.7 percent 
in 1992) account for the largest proportion of absorbed capital 
investment. 
  Some R15 trillion, or 60 percent, of all capital 
investments, 
was utilized on the construction of production installations. 
The greatest proportion of production investment was channeled 
into the development of the fuel and energy complex (around 40 
percent), the agro-industrial complex -- 18 percent, machine 
building -- 7 percent, and the chemicals, timber, and 
construction complexes -- 5 percent apiece. 
  Some 193 of the 652 Federal Investment Program installations 
due to be commissioned in 1993 actually were commissioned (122 
in their entirety, while capacities are being partially 
commissioned at the remaining 71). The program was 30-percent 
fulfilled, including 42 percent at budget-funded installations 
and 26 percent at those funded using credit investment resources. 
  Unfinished construction work is continuing to pile up. In 
1993 the amount of unfinished construction is estimated to have 
risen 20-25 percent. Production installations account for over 
two-thirds of this. 
  In 1993 the pace of nonproduction construction dropped less 
than in the production sphere, making it possible to somewhat 
increase the amount of housing and a number of other social 
installations commissioned compared with 1992. 
  In 1993, enterprises under all forms of ownership built 
apartment blocks with a total area of 41.8 million square 
meters, or 100.7 percent of the 1992 level (68 percent of the 
1990 level). 
  Enterprises and organizations under all forms of ownership 
commissioned general education schools providing 299,600 places 
(1 percent down on 1992), preschool establishments providing 
61,500 places (36 percent down), hospitals with 14,300 beds (75 
percent up), and outpatient care facilities capable of 
accommodating 45,900 patients per shift (16 percent up). 
<H6>  Agriculture </H6>
  By the end of 1993 over 24,000 kolkhozes and sovkhozes, or 
95 
percent, had been reregistered. Companies of various kinds 
(numbering 11,500) became the main organizational and legal form 
of economic activity. Around 300 open-type joint-stock 
companies, over 400 enterprise and organization subsidiary 
farms, 2,000 agricultural cooperatives, and 3,000 other 
enterprises under new organizational and legal forms of economic 
management were created from reorganized kolkhozes and 
sovkhozes. The collectives of one in three farms decided to 
retain their enterprise's status. As of now agricultural 
enterprises with a state form of ownership account for no more 
than 15 percent of agricultural land and the value of output 
produced. 
  Owing to the increasing difficulties with material and 
technical supplies, the deterioration in the financial position, 
and other factors 14,000 private farms ceased their activity in 
1993. 
  In 1993, gross agricultural production at comparable prices 
fell 4 percent on the previous year; however, the value of gross 
output on the population's personal subsidiary plots rose 4 
percent. 
  Some 99 million tonnes of grain were harvested in 1993 (93 
percent of the 1992 level). The harvests of sugar beet (25.5 
million tonnes), potatoes (38.1 million tonnes), and vegetables 
(9.8 million tonnes) remained at roughly the 1992 level. The 
gross sunflower seed and flax fiber crops totaled 2.8 million 
and 58,000 tonnes (11 and 26 percent down on 1992 respectively). 
The sowing of winter crops and plowing of fall plowland lagged 
appreciably behind 1992. An area of 15.5 million hectares of 
winter crops has been sown (20 percent down on 1992), including 
14.3 million hectares of grain (20 percent down). The winter 
rye crop lands dropped the most (34 percent), while the winter 
wheat and barley crop lands dropped less (12 and 6 percent 
respectively). An area of 41.9 million hectares of fall 
plowland was plowed -- 6.2 million hectares down (13 percent) on 
fall 1992. 
  A decline in receipts of produce from agricultural 
enterprises' farms and the simultaneous increase in production 
at personal plots was typical of livestock farming in 1992. 
Production of meat on all categories of farms was down by 
860,000 tonnes live weight (7 percent) on 1992, while production 
of eggs dropped by 2.6 billion (6 percent) and wool by 18,500 
tonnes (10 percent). The slump in milk production was halted, 
with production remaining at the previous year's level. 
  As of 1 January 1994 there were 48.9 million head of cattle 
[krupnyy skot] on all categories of farms (6 percent down on the 
same date in 1993), 19.8 million cows (down 2 percent), 28.5 
million hogs (down 10 percent), and 43.6 million sheep and goats 
(down 15 percent). At the same time there was an increase in 
the number of livestock on the population's farms: Numbers of 
cattle, cows, and hogs were up 4, 6, and 2 percent respectively. 
  The proportion of cattle owned by citizens has risen over 
the 
past three years -- from 17 to 25 percent, while that of cows 
has risen from 25 to 34 percent, hogs -- from 18 to 28 percent, 
and sheep and goats -- from 28 to 38 percent. 
<H6>  Transport and Communications </H6>
  In 1993, freight shipments fell as a result of the 
continuing 
decline in output production. The amount of freight shipped by 
transport in public use fell by 1.2 billion tonnes (25 percent) 
compared with 1992 to total 3.6 billion tonnes. Freight 
shipments were down 18 percent by rail, 40 percent by road, 8 
percent by the merchant marine, 31 percent by internal 
waterways, 28 percent by air, and 8 percent by pipeline. 
  Freight shipments by internal water transport in public use 
to parts of the Far North and equivalent localities were 
virtually complete in October. From the start of the shipping 
season the river fleet dispatched 35 million tonnes of freight 
to these areas, 24 percent down on 1992, while maritime 
transport accounted for around 8 million tonnes of freight (down 
28 percent). 
  Public transport passenger turnover dropped 5 percent in 
1993 
compared with 1992. Some passenger flow switched to relatively 
cheaper railroad transport, where passenger turnover rose 7 
percent. Road transport passenger turnover dropped 6 percent, 
while passenger turnover on the internal waterways and by air 
was down 16 and 29 percent respectively. Notwithstanding a 
37-percent drop in passenger turnover on domestic air routes, a 
29-percent increase was recorded on international routes. 
  Over the year communications enterprises provided services 
totaling R1.6 trillion, including R314 billion in consumer 
services, which represents a 12-fold increase on 1992 at 
effective prices. At the same time the volume of communications 
services is still falling in real terms. Thus over 11 million 
requests for domestic telephone installation have still not been 
met. 
<H6>  The Consumer Market </H6>
  In 1993 the population was sold goods and services via all 
sales channels worth R65.2 trillion, which represents a 
10.7-fold increase on 1992 at actual prices; at comparable 
prices the figure is virtually the same as the 1992 level (down 
0.5 percent). Spending on consumer goods and services from 
unorganized trading outlets accounts for around 40 percent of 
this. 
  Compared with 1992 the retail trade network was more 
saturated with goods. Whereas in 1992 the food and nonfood 
availability coefficients at retail trade outlets were around 50 
and 70 percent respectively, in 1993 the figures were 60-70 and 
80-90 percent. Compared with 1992 the retail trade saturation 
index hovered around 120-130 percent. 
  The private sector (including consumer cooperatives) 
accounted for 71 percent of commodity turnover (62 percent in 
1992), while the state sector and other nonstate forms of 
ownership accounted for 25 percent (27 percent) and 4 percent (1 
percent) respectively. 
  Certain changes in the structure of retail commodity 
turnover 
occurred in 1993 with the increase in the population's monetary 
income and their acclimatization to the new prices: the 
proportion of foodstuffs dropped from 55 to 53 percent, while 
nonfood commodities rose from 45 to 47 percent. 
  In 1993, Russia's population was provided with paid services 
to the value of R6.4 trillion, which in actual prices 
represented a 12-fold increase on the 1992 level, but a 
30-percent drop in comparable prices. Consumer services 
accounted for R1.1 trillion rules, a 38-percent drop in real 
terms on 1992. 
<H5>  Foreign Economic Ties With Distant Foreign Countries </H5>
  In 1993 Russia's foreign trade turnover (excluding the CIS 
countries), allowing for imports and exports by private 
individuals, totaled $70 billion, a 12-percent drop at current 
prices compared with 1992. 
  Exports were equivalent to $43 billion and rose 1.4 percent, 
including $25 billion to industrially developed countries (a 
1.2-percent rise), $6 billion to developing countries (a 
39-percent rise), and $12 billion to other countries (the former 
CEMA countries, the republics of the former Yugoslavia, China, 
the DPRK, and the Baltic countries), representing a 5-percent 
drop. 
  Fuel and energy resources accounted for 48 percent of the 
export commodity structure in 1993, including crude oil -- 19.1 
percent, natural gas -- 17.0 percent, and petroleum products -- 
8.0 percent; machines and equipment represented 6.7 percent of 
total exports. 
  In 1993, Russian imports totaled $27 billion, or 27 percent 
down on 1992, including $16.4 billion from industrially 
developed countries (down 31 percent), $2.9 billion from 
developing countries (down 39 percent), and $7.7 billion from 
other countries (down 11 percent on 1992). 
  Machines and equipment accounted for 26.5 percent of total 
imports in 1993, while grain accounted for 5.8 percent, textiles 
and knitted clothing -- 4.5 percent, and sugar (including raw 
sugar) -- 3.0 percent. 
  There was a positive balance of trade in 1993 of $16.0 
billion (in 1992 the positive balance was $5.4 billion). 
<H5>  Foreign Economic Ties With Nearby Foreign Countries </H5>
  Foreign trade turnover with the nearby foreign countries 
totaled R22.5 trillion in 1993, or just 50 percent of the 1991 
level. In this period there has been a drop in shipments from 
Russia to the CIS states of oil -- 60 percent, natural gas -- 8 
percent, coal -- 68 percent, automobile gasoline -- 60 percent, 
and rolled metal -- 64 percent. Fuel resources are the 
top-priority export from Russia (accounting for 88 percent of 
total production and technical exports as against 51 percent in 
1992). 
  These debts are being partially paid off by means of state 
loans, which Russia has granted the CIS countries. What is 
more, more extensive use of payments in national currencies at 
an agreed rate of exchange. 
<H5>  Privatization </H5>
  Some 39,000 enterprises were privatized in the period 
January-November, and 36,000 [figure as published] enterprises 
have been privatized in total since privatization began in 
Russia. Some 31 percent of the total number of enterprises 
privatized in the first 11 months of 1993 have switched to 
private ownership by means of flotation (entirely or in part), 
while 69 percent have been sold. 
  Enterprises in the retail and wholesale trade sphere account 
for 35 percent of the total number of privatized enterprises, 
industry -- 29 percent, consumer services -- 18 percent, 
construction -- 9 percent, public catering -- 7 percent, the 
automobile industry -- 3 percent, and agriculture -- 2 percent. 
  The enterprises privatized in the period January-October (in 
terms of residual value at the prices before their fixed capital 
was revalued in 1992) had a total value of over R753 billion. 
  The average value of one privatized enterprise in municipal, 
territorial, and federal ownership was R12 million, R16 million, 
and R54 million respectively. 
  Preference continued to be given during flotation to Option 
2 
of the three options for concessions that labor collectives were 
given -- the option which allows the labor collective to own the 
controlling block of shares. Over three-fourths of the 
enterprises that became joint-stock companies chose this option 
for concessions. One-sixth of enterprises were floated under 
Option 3, while around 1 percent opted for Option 1. In 
addition, some enterprises (3.3 percent) were floated by 
transforming leasehold enterprises. 
  Large and medium-sized enterprises were in the main 
privatized by means of flotation. Of the enterprises privatized 
in the period January-November by means of flotation the state 
was assigned the controlling block of shares in 305 (2.7 
percent), and the state holds the "golden" share in another 158 
(1.4 percent) enterprises. The majority of these enterprises are 
in industry (54 percent) and construction (12 percent). 
  Small enterprises were generally privatized by being sold 
and 
in effect without restrictions imposed by the state. Some 44 
percent of enterprises were sold by commercial tender, 43 
percent by buying up leased property, and 9 percent at auction. 
  The average rate of value of the enterprises sold (the ratio 
of the sale price to the initial price) in the period 
January-November was 5.7 (3.2 in 1992); the rate was 7.2 at 
enterprises assigned to municipal ownership, 3.3 for those in 
territorial ownership, and 2.3 for enterprises in federal 
ownership. 
  Some 13 percent of the floated enterprises sold all the 
shares for sale, while over three-fourths of the number of 
enterprises privatized by sale paid the full purchase contract 
price. 
  Monetary resources totaling R340 billion and 40 million 
privatization checks were obtained from the privatization of 
enterprises in January-November (including money from 
enterprises privatized in 1992). 
  Some R181 billion rubles (53 percent of total money revenue) 
and 6.2 million checks (16 percent of the total number of 
redeemed privatization checks) were obtained from the 
privatization of municipally-owned enterprises, while the 
figures were R56 billion (17 percent) and 9.6 million checks (24 
percent) respectively for enterprises in territorial ownership 
and R103 billion (30 percent) and 24.2 million checks (60 
percent) respectively for enterprises in federal ownership. The 
territories' budgets, the federal budget, and state 
privatization bodies received 64 percent, 20 percent, and 16 
percent of the revenue respectively. 
<H5>  Development of Market Structures </H5>
  The development of a market infrastructure for the Russian 
Federation is currently undergoing certain changes. A gradual 
reduction in the number of exchanges is being observed. Around 
180 of the 303 exchanges that had received a license were in 
operation by the end of 1993, of which 40 were working steadily 
and holding auctions twice a week or more. The six largest 
commodity exchanges, four of them in Moscow and one each in 
Saratov and Omsk, accounted for the bulk of exchange commodity 
turnover (40 percent). 
  According to preliminary figures, exchange turnover totaled 
R1.6 trillion in 1993, a 4.5-fold increase at current prices on 
1992 turnover. The amount of production and technical output 
and consumer goods dropped in the exchange turnover structure 
(from 65 to 41 percent and from 31 to 12 percent respectively). 
  Operations involving monetary resources and securities 
expanded at stock exchanges. Total sales in overall exchange 
turnover rose from 3 percent in 1992 to 46 percent in 1993. 
  By the end of 1993 around 2,000 commercial and cooperative 
banks with Bank of Russia licenses to conduct banking operations 
and around 4,000 branches (excluding the Russian Federation 
Savings Bank) had been registered. 
  Around one-third of the total number of commercial banks 
have 
been organized on the basis of former special banks and over 60 
percent are newly-formed banks. 
  Commercial banks are given 80 percent of the total credit 
investment in the national economy. 
<H5>  Prices </H5>
  Prices of consumer goods and paid services rose by a factor 
of 9.4 in 1993 compared with December 1992, including increases 
by a factor of 9.0 for food (including alcoholic beverages), 7.4 
for nonfood commodities, and 24.1 for consumer services. Prices 
on city markets rose by a factor of nine, including factors of 
8.5 and 10 for crop farming and livestock farming output 
respectively. 
  In 1993 the dynamics of inflationary processes developed as 
follows. During the first half of 1993 the composite consumer 
price index dropped from 125 percent in January to 118 percent 
in May. However, early in the second half of the year the rate 
of inflation once again began to rise. In July consumer prices 
rose at a rate of 122 percent and the figure was 126 percent in 
August. In the fall, price increases slowed, totaling 123 
percent in September, 120 percent in October, 116 percent in 
November, and 113 percent in December. 
  In 1993, the rate of increase in consumer prices was close 
to 
that of manufacturing enterprises' prices. Industrial 
manufacturers' and agricultural producers' prices rose by 
factors of 10 and 8.5 respectively on average over the year 
compared with December 1992. Prices of capital investment 
projects rose by a factor of 11.6, including an 11.9-fold 
increase for construction and installation work. 
<H5>  Finances </H5>
  In 1993 the consolidated Russian Federation budget was 
implemented with income of R53 trillion and expenditure of R64 
trillion. The budget deficit was around R11 trillion (7 percent 
of GDP) and rose compared with 1992 by more than 18 times, 
notwithstanding a 10-fold rise in the inflation rate. 
  Federal budget income for 1993 (estimated) totaled R29.4 
trillion rubles. Following the indexation of the main items of 
expenditure and new expenditure for which provision had not 
previously been made, the federal budget deficit topped R12 
trillion (7 percent [as published] of GDP). 
  Credit provision in the national economy totaled R30.5 
trillion at the beginning of 1994, a six-fold increase on early 
1993, and totaled 19 percent of GDP as opposed to 28 percent in 
early 1993. 
  Because of the continuing inflation, monetary resources are 
provided on a short-term basis. In 1993 a reduction was 
recorded in the proportion of long-term credit granted for terms 
of over a year. It dropped in overall credit provision from 5 
percent in the first quarter to 3 percent by the end of the year. 
<H5>  The Population's Living Standards and Income </H5>
  The population's money income, counting the income of people 
engaged in entrepreneurial activity, totaled R78.3 trillion 
rubles in 1993, an 11-fold increase on 1992. Of this increase 
in income figure, wage increases accounted for 73 percent, 
social payments accounted for 16 percent, and other income 
accounted for 11 percent. 
  Measured against the consumer price index, money incomes 
increased 9 percent and disposable money income 10 percent. 
  The proportion of income from state and cooperative 
organizations dropped in the structure of families' incomes from 
78 to 74 percent, while the proportion of social payments rose 
from 13 to 15 percent and other income (from selling food, 
livestock, buildings, and income for handicrafts and trades) 
rose from 9 to 11 percent. 
  For the bulk of the population wages were the main source of 
money income. The average wage in Russian economic sectors was 
R141,200 in December 1993, a 39-percent increase on November. 
  In 1993, pension payments were revised quarterly. The 
minimum old age-pension rose from R2,250 in January to R26,320 
in December 1993 (including compensatory payments). It is 
estimated that the average fixed monthly pension overall stood 
at R39,400, with old age pensions at R41,400. 
  The stratification of society into rich and poor is 
proceeding at a rapid pace. At present the income of the most 
well-off 10 percent is 11 times that of the least well-off, 
whereas this figure was 7.5-8 in late 1992 and 4.5 in 1991. By 
the end of 1993 there were 40 million people (27 percent of the 
total population) with average per capita money incomes below 
the subsistence minimum. In December that minimum averaged 
R42,800 per capita, including R48,400 for the working 
population, R30,200 for pensioners, and R42,800 for children. 
  The differentiation of the population in terms of property 
is 
not as great as that in terms of income. According to a 
Russia-wide survey of households, families with incomes below 
the minimum subsistence level have 8 percent fewer refrigerators 
than other families, 11 percent fewer washing machines, 26 
percent fewer color televisions, 20 percent fewer sewing 
machines, and 25 percent fewer tape recorders and wall units. 
<H5>  Employment </H5>
  In 1993, there were 71 million people, or 48 percent of the 
total population, employed in the Russian economy. The nonstate 
sector, in which over 40 percent of workers are now employed, is 
playing an ever-increasing role. 
  In 1993 compared with 1992 the number of personnel increased 
in the main sectors of the social complex -- public education 
and the health service. The number of people employed in credit 
provision and state insurance, tax inspectorates, notaries' 
offices, and legal services is steadily rising -- which is 
evidence that the infrastructure characteristic of a market 
economy is starting to take shape. However, the number of 
people employed in science and the scientific service sphere, 
design, and research organizations dropped. 
  At the end of 1993 there was a total of 7.8 million people 
-- 
or 10.4 percent of the economically active population -- without 
work or actively seeking work in addition to those not in full 
employment (the potential unemployed). Some 3.8 million (5.1 
percent) of the letter are classified as unemployed in 
accordance with International Labor Organization methodology. 
Some 0.8 million people, or 1.1 percent of the economically 
active population, have official unemployed status. 
  In 1993, strikes of one day or more were recorded at 265 
enterprises, establishments, and organizations in Russia -- 
one-fourth of the 1992 figure. 
<H5>  The Demographic Situation </H5>
  In 1993 the population of the country fell by 300,000, or 
0.2 
percent, to 148.4 million at the beginning of 1994. This is due 
to adverse changes in the birth and death rates determined not 
only by the present situation but also by the nature of past 
demographic development. 
  In 1993, 1.4 million babies were born, 226,000 or 14 percent 
down on 1992. The birth rate per 1,000 dropped from 10.7 to 9.2. 
  The number of deaths over the year rose by 360,000, or 20 
percent, to 2.2 million, and the total death rate per 1,000 rose 
to 14.6 against 12.2; 348,000 people died from injuries or 
poisoning -- a 1.4-fold increase on 1992. 
  The death rate among the working-age population increased 
faster, increasing by one-third over the year, while the 
proportion of people of this age among total deaths rose to 30 
percent as opposed to 27 percent in 1992. 
  Adverse changes in the birth and death rates brought an 
increase in natural population loss: 800,000, or 60 percent, 
more deaths were recorded than births (in 1992 the figure was 
220,000, or 14 percent). 

</TEXT>

</DOC>

<DOC>
<DOCNO> FBIS3-42811 </DOCNO>
<HT>    "jpusr015___94012" </HT>


<HEADER>
<AU>   FBIS-USR-94-015 </AU>
Document Type:JPRS 
Document Title: 

</HEADER>

<ABS>  FBIS Report: Central Eurasia </ABS>
<DATE1>   17 February 1994 </DATE1>
<F P=100> RUSSIA </F>
<F P=101> ECONOMIC AND SOCIAL AFFAIRS </F>
<H3> <TI>   Survey of Socioeconomic Situation in 1993, Prospects for 1994 </TI></H3>
<F P=102>  944E0422A Moscow DELOVOY MIR in Russian No 2, 10-16 Jan 94 
pp 14-15 </F>

<F P=103> 944E0422A </F>
<F P=104>  Moscow DELOVOY MIR </F>


<TEXT>
Language: <F P=105> Russian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

<F P=106> [Article by Professor Vladimir Boykov, Doctor of Philosophy: </F>
"Russians on Key Problems of Society's Life and on Their Hopes 
for 1994"] 
  [Text] This material reflects 
subjective--socio-psychological, ideological, political, and 
other--aspects of different categories of people's attitudes to 
key problems of economic life of Russian society; the current 
conditions of realization of the population's basic material, 
social, and spiritual needs; their appraisal of the political 
situation; and opinions regarding ways of getting Russia out of 
the economic and political crisis. 
  It is based on the results of a number of all-Russia and 
regional surveys conducted in 1992-1993, and polling the 
experts, among whom were chiefs of the Russian Federation state 
tax services, heads of regional committees of the State 
Antitrust Policy Committee, chairmen of territorial banks of the 
Savings Bank of Russia, enterprise directors, and specialists. 
Wherever the logic of the analysis requires evaluation of its 
dynamics, comparative data of surveys conducted in 1988-1991 are 
given. 
<H5>  Public Opinion: For or Against a Free Market? </H5>
  A substantial change in the economic orientation of the 
population employed in the national economy in favor of a 
transition to a market economy occurred at the point of 
approaching the 1990's. A retrospective comparison of the 
results of sociological surveys conducted in 1988-1990 of the 
population engaged in the production sector provides a snapshot 
of it (in percents of the number of respondents). 


Subjective feeling of    1988              1989              1990 
workers expressed in 
their replies 

Lost a sense of being    86                90                93 
masters of their 
enterprise 

Did not believe in the   66                88                94 
possibility of getting 
paid more even if they 
worked better 

Expressed hope that      no data           43                48 
the transition to a 
market economy would 
change the situation 
at their enterprise 


  Sociologic research materials show that it is precisely this 
deep economic alienation caused by the vices of the old economic 
system that is the main cause of the people's persistent 
reluctance to return to the command-administrative order of 
organizing production and distributing material goods. The 
syndrome of nonacceptance of the old system of economic life 
affects the mind set of the majority of the Russian population 
in such a way that even a protracted economic crisis and the 
steady decline of the standard of living have not turned most 
people away from the idea of shifting to a market economy as an 
alternative of its barracks-style organization. 
  Despite the fact that the absolute majority of the surveyed 
population already for several years have been expressing acute 
concern with respect to the worsening economic situation of 
enterprises, are seriously worried about potential unemployment, 
and are aggrieved by impoverishment, nevertheless the 
proportional share of supporters of a market economy in Russia 
remains steadily greater than the share of its opponents. For 
instance, in 1991 57 percent of the surveyed populace favored 
development of private enterprise; one year later in June--60 
percent; and in April 1993 private entrepreneurial activities 
were supported by 63 percent of them. True, at the same time 
only a few still believed in a quick success of the ongoing 
reforms, which is supported by the distribution of answers to 
the question "Do you believe in the success of the current 
economic reform?", received in April 1993 (in percents of 
the number of persons polled): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yes, by the end of the year           |2                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yes, within two-three years           |15                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yes, but not anytime soon             |36                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Do not believe it will succeed        |27                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Hard to tell                          |19                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No answer                             |1                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Nevertheless, at least 53 percent of the surveyed populace 
believe that in the medium- or long-term perspective economic 
transformation will produce a positive effect. 
  A positive attitude to the course toward mastering the 
mechanisms of the market economy was expressed by most workers 
and specialist cadres in the national economy, as well as trade 
union leaders polled in June-August 1993 at enterprises in 
Moscow, Stavropol Kray, and Nizhniy Novgorod and Tyumen Oblasts. 
To the question "Do you approve the country's transition 
to a market economy?" the distribution of answers was as follows 
(in percents of 3,400 polled workers, 78 specialist cadres, and 
72 members of enterprise trade union committees): 


                   Workers            Specialist cadres     Trade union 
                                                            leaders 

Yes                57                 55                    49 

No                 21                 12                    30 

No opinion         22                 30                    20 

No answer          -                  3                     1 


  Noting a stable orientation of the working population toward 
market transformations, attention should be drawn to the fact 
that at the same time people express dissatisfaction with 
practical forms of implementing economic reforms, social costs 
of transferring the means of production into private ownership, 
price liberalization, breakdown of old economic ties, and so on. 
This may be seen, for instance, from comparative data of two 
all-Russia population surveys conducted in April 1992 and April 
1993 (as a percentage of the number of persons polled): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |1992                     |1993                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Satisfied with the cours-|6                        |22                       | 
|e of privatization of ho-|                         |                         | 
|using                    |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Not satisfied with the c-|48                       |39                       | 
|ourse of privatization o-|                         |                         | 
|f housing                |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Privatization of housing |46                       |39                       | 
|has not started yet      |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Satisfied with the cours-|4                        |8                        | 
|e of privatization of th-|                         |                         | 
|e enterprise             |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Not satisfied with the c-|27                       |22                       | 
|ourse of privatization o-|                         |                         | 
|f the enterprise         |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Privatization of the ent-|56                       |42                       | 
|erprise has not started  |                         |                         | 
|yet                      |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No answer                |12                       |18                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Thus, while in the matter of privatization of housing a 
certain shift has occurred in the direction of an increase in 
the number of people satisfied with it, in the opinion of the 
people positive shifts in the area of privatization of 
enterprises are minimal. 
  As the survey showed, the latter factor is associated to a 
considerable extent with the fact that enterprises' collectives 
as a rule are removed from the real decision making in 
privatization. Judging by the data of a survey conducted among 
employees at enterprises in Moscow, Stavropol Kray, and Nizhniy 
Novgorod and Tyumen Oblasts in June-August 1993, 70 percent of 
them believe that the decisive word in choosing the 
privatization option for the enterprise must rest with 
enterprise collectives. In reality, however, they note that 
collectives do not participate in it--everything is decided by 
enterprise administration and central and local bodies of 
authority. The polled specialist cadres in the national economy 
and trade union activists supported this appraisal: Only 10 
percent of them said that collectives have not been left out of 
decision making with respect to practical issues of 
privatization of enterprises. 
  The results of the research permit us to say with certainty 
that a quite stable "pro-market" orientation has taken hold in 
the mass consciousness: The share of the populace advocating 
market transformations exceeds the proportional share of those 
who do not accept a transition to a market. However, the support 
for economic innovation is associated not so much with the real 
practice of reform as it is with rejection of the past. In other 
words, the nourishing environment of a pro-market thrust 
reflects to a lesser degree the current life experience of the 
people than it does their past one. 
<H5>  Incentives and Motivations of Business Activities </H5>
  The radical changes in the economic environment and social 
conditions of life that have taken place over the past years 
have caused a change in old norms and values and have led to 
substantial changes in the mechanism of business activities. 
This is manifested most graphically with respect to private 
property and private enterprise. Research conducted in May 1991 
showed that as early as then the notion of private property had 
begun to free itself from the old ideological blinders. 
One-third of the people polled in the all-Russia sample said 
that the notion "private property" is associated in their mind 
with economic prudence, enterprise, and a responsible attitude 
toward the business at hand. In another survey conducted in June 
1992, 25 percent of the respondents expressed the opinion that 
private enterprise is the factor capable of leading Russia out 
of the economic crisis; 16 percent held a diametrically opposite 
point of view; and 59 percent were not certain. 
  It should be noted, however, that a positive attitude in the 
public opinion toward private business so far essentially 
represents nothing other than a new ideological stereotype. 
Speaking of private property in general, in the abstract, the 
respondents mean the prosperity achieved by industrially 
developed countries. When the topic is shifted, however, to 
Russian realities, a considerable number of respondents speak in 
a very negative way of the actions of businessmen with whom they 
have had an opportunity to interact in practice. 
  Still, the general vector of attitudes toward 
entrepreneurial 
activities remains positive. This is supported rather 
convincingly by the results of three all-Russia surveys of the 
general populace conducted by comparable methodology. For 
instance, in May 1990, 34 percent of polled Russians felt that 
development of the private sector in trade and consumer services 
is possible and allowable; in May 1991, 67 percent expressed 
this opinion; and in June 1992--already 70 percent. Let us point 
out that this rather substantial shift in the public attitude 
has taken place despite the worsened situation in the consumer 
market, higher prices, and other negative phenomena. 
  The populace's loyalty to private enterprise is also 
supported by the fact that there has been a shift in the 
positive direction in the opinions regarding work for hire in 
the privatized sector of the economy. The proportional share of 
persons trying to set up their own business is growing. A survey 
conducted in December 1992 in Tomsk Oblast, as well as the 
results of an all-Russia population survey (April 1993) showed 
that almost one-third of the respondents are looking into the 
possibility of starting their own business. Students of 
graduating classes in institutions of higher learning and 
vocational schools, engineers and technicians, and managers of 
state enterprises give this idea thought increasingly often. 
  The data used here should not be seen as a pretext for a 
total replacement of state property by private on the grounds 
that allegedly the entire population is leaning toward private 
business. First, while supporting the policy of privatization, 
the populace expresses no less support of state forms of 
ownership. Actually, state and collective forms of ownership 
enjoy a relatively greater public support than the private when 
it comes to major industrial enterprises, agricultural 
production, and health care and educational institutions. 
Second, a relative majority of the populace would prefer to see 
the national economy based on a mixed-economy model. This 
conclusion is supported by the answers of respondents to a 
somewhat artificial question: In your opinion, which form 
of ownership should be given preference in Russia?", posed 
in the all-Russia survey in November 1993 (in percents of the 
number of persons polled): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|All equally                           |37                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|State                                 |24                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Private                               |21                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Collective, joint-stock holding       |16                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No opinion                            |10                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Even given the seeming "either/or" choice of answers to the 
question, people frequently chose not one but several forms of 
ownership, thus correcting the sociologists' error. Therefore, 
the sum of answers (taking into account those with no opinion) 
exceeds 100 percent. 
  According to respondents' replies, the main factor that 
prevents them from realizing their desire to engage in 
entrepreneurial activities is the lack of a start-up capital and 
experience. An equally significant barrier on the road to 
private enterprise (by the number of respondents who selected 
it) is the draconian tax policy. Keeping in mind the above, it 
would be interesting to see how this question was answered by 
experts--chiefs of regional (Russian Federation constituent 
republic, kray, and oblast) state tax services. These opinions 
were obtained through a sociological survey on 5 November 1992. 
Not much has changed in the tax policy since then; hence, the 
experts' opinion is still current. The survey included 54 chiefs 
of inspectorates, that is, most representatives of regional 
institutions of this particular state structure. This is how the 
replies were distributed (in percents of the number of persons 
polled): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|In your opinion, to what extent is the current tax policy appropriate for th-| 
|e course of transition to a market?                                          | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Completely appropriate                |4                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Basically appropriate                 |52                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Not quite appropriate                 |35                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Inappropriate                         |5                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Not sure                              |4                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|There is an opinion that the current system of taxation does not contribute  | 
|to the growth of business activities. Do you agree with this opinion?        | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Agree                                 |41                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Rather agree than disagree            |28                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Rather disagree than agree            |15                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Disagree                              |16                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  As we can see, more than half of state tax services' top 
officials, who are the conduit of tax policy, appraise its 
impact on entrepreneurial activities as negative. This is 
expressed not only in the tax policy's braking impact on the 
reform in a macroeconomic sense--exacerbating the paralysis of 
entrepreneurship, price hikes, creating incentives for the 
flight of capital abroad, etc. Taxation is the nerve of the 
economic organism that reaches individual people. The damage 
inflicted by the costs of taxation manifests itself in the 
deformation of stimuli and motivation of business activities of 
individual entrepreneurs and those who want to get into 
business. Because of high taxes, they tend to move their 
business into the sphere of the shadow economy. And quite 
successfully, which is evidenced, among other things, by the 
replies of top officials of tax inspectorates to the following 
questions (in percents of the number of persons polled): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Do you believe that you will be able to establish an effective control over  | 
|payment of taxes in the next year or two by the following entities:          | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|a)Small businesses and cooperatives                                          | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yes, I am certain                     |15                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|I hope so, but not certain            |59                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No, it is unlikely                    |26                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Commercial stores (kiosks)                                                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yes, I am certain                     |0                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|I hope so, but not certain            |21                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No, it is unlikely                    |70                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Persons reselling goods at city markets and in the streets                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yes, I am certain                     |0                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|I hope so, but not certain            |13                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No, it is unlikely                    |87                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Physical persons                                                             | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yes, I am certain                     |15                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|I hope so, but not certain            |54                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No, it is unlikely                    |31                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  The burden of taxes coupled with the difficulties in leasing 
space to set up a business; bureaucratic obstacles to 
registering a private enterprise; racketeering; and some other 
unfavorable circumstances result in arrangements whereby private 
business often leads a parasitic existence on the back of state 
enterprises, and flourishes on corruption, machinations, and so 
on. 
  The processes of transformation of the Russian economy 
contribute to the development of secondary employment. The most 
important factor contributing to it is the emergence of 
different forms of ownership, which allows people to decide 
where and for what kind of money to work, and creates a certain 
competition between employers in the labor market. The 
development of secondary employment also is prompted to an equal 
degree by inflation and a decline in the population's standard 
of living, which prompts people to look for extra earnings. 
Finally, the third important factor in the development of 
secondary employment is associated with the people's desire to 
realize their abilities and aspirations. Private business 
provides them with this opportunity. 
  According to the data of the Russian Federation State 
Committee on Statistics [Goskomstat], the number of employees in 
the private sector of the economy increased over the period from 
1991 to March 1993 almost fourfold: from 4.9 million to 18.7 
million persons. These data are supported by the results of 
sociological surveys. For instance, according to the results of 
an all-Russia survey conducted in June 1993, 12 percent of the 
respondents were engaged in entrepreneurial activities and 
earned income from it. 
  Far from everyone engaged in the private sector of the 
economy, however, has severed their ties to state enterprises 
and institutions. Most continue to work in the state sector, and 
consider it their primary job that permits them to retain some 
social guarantees. 
  Secondary employment is not limited to combining work at 
state enterprises with work in the private sector. Quite often 
private entrepreneurs, too, do extra work at state enterprises. 
A survey conducted in June 1993 showed that 32 percent of 
workers have an additional income besides their income earned at 
the primary job. Naturally, the proportional share of persons 
who have a second job producing regular income varies 
considerably depending on socio-professional group. For 
instance, among workers of machine-building enterprises, 
communications, and a number of other sectors of the national 
economy, the share of such persons comprised 12-13 percent. At 
the same time, secondary employment for the purpose of earning 
additional income is very common among workers whose activities 
are not subject to a strict technological routine. 
  It is also interesting that the level of income from the 
main 
and secondary occupation among some categories of people often 
depends more on secondary income than income from the main job. 
Only for about one-half of those who have a second job is the 
extra income smaller than the main income. The rest (their 
proportional share comprised 14 percent of the total number of 
respondents in the all-Russia sample) have extra income that is 
equal to or even greater than that at the main place of 
employment. This factor requires separate consideration, since 
it is unclear how much time and energy is being expended on the 
second job as compared to the main one, whether taxes are paid 
on additional income, and so on. At the same time, one thing is 
clear--there exists a distortion in economic relations that 
undoubtedly affects management of production, moral and 
psychological climate in labor collectives, and attitude of 
hired labor to work. 
<H5>  Attitude Toward Labor </H5>
  Full-fledged implementation of the economic reform and 
mastering market mechanisms of the functioning of production 
assume not only a change in macroeconomic conditions, but also 
microeconomic preconditions for an economic upturn. Among the 
latter, of decisive importance is forming a new motivational 
core of labor activities, and overcoming alienation of labor. 
  Materials of representative surveys of workers, specialist 
cadres in the national economy, and other categories of the 
labor force conducted in different years by a comparative 
methodology provide some insight into the state of affairs. For 
instance, the question "Could you work better than 
now?" produced the following distribution of answers (in 
percents of the number of persons polled): 


Respondents' replies      Survey dates 

                          1986              1988              July 1993 

Of course I could         66                43                43 

Probably could            22                38                37 

No, I could not           12                19                10 

Not sure                  -                 -                 10 


  The facts show graphically that attempts to reform the 
economy through cosmetic measures during the period of 
perestroyka, and the subsequent fundamental change in the system 
of economic relations and administration equally failed to 
create conditions that would allow most workers to develop and 
realize their potential. 
  Naturally, the concrete causes and circumstances that compel 
people to work with half the effort are far from identical when 
comparing the past with the present. In the past, what stood in 
the way of professional self-realization was the preponderance 
of command-administrative methods of administration; now it is 
the disintegration of economic ties, supply, distribution of 
output, and so on. In the past, labor collectives frequently 
suffered from an end-of-the-period rush; now they are hurt by 
the impossibility of providing enough work for the people. For 
instance, according to Goskomstat data, about 3 million workers, 
or almost 5 percent of the total employed labor force, were sent 
on administrative leave at the administration's initiative over 
January-June 1993. In excess of another 1.5 percent were 
transferred to a shortened work week. 
  The unused available potential affects not only blue-collar 
workers, but also engineers and technicians, as well as the 
administrative staff. As during the years of economic 
stagnation, 73 percent of specialist cadres in the national 
economy surveyed in 1993 said that they work considerably below 
their capacity, that their abilities have been and remain unused. 
  There is no need to argue that a worker becomes a master of 
production in substance--not just in terms of being legally 
formalized--only when he is in a position to influence the 
management of production and has the right of vote in the 
distribution of profits. The full extent and breadth of 
participation in management is the most important indicator of 
change in economic relations and at the same time the main 
criterion of developing labor motivation that corresponds to the 
national economy. Theoretically, transferring state enterprises 
into joint-stock holding and giving them economic independence 
was supposed to accomplish precisely this. 
  Research conducted in 1993 at enterprises, half of which by 
then had been converted to joint-stock holding, showed, however, 
that trade unions as an institution of collective management 
have lost even the past minimal influence on the process of 
making principally important decisions. It is not accidental 
that only 23 percent of polled workers expressed the opinion 
that trade unions at their enterprises are capable of handling 
the tasks emerging in the environment of a free-market economy, 
and only 57 percent of the respondents supported unequivocally 
the preservation of trade unions. Also hardly reassuring is the 
fact that the proportional share of members of production 
collectives who attempt to influence the management of their 
enterprise does not exceed 10-15 percent. Even among them, 
however, a majority believes that the administration does not 
take into account the opinion of ordinary workers with respect 
to management of production. 
  A very important factor in attitude toward labor is the 
connection between the work done and wages. In the past this 
connection suffered from the chronic disease of leveling. As 
research showed, the system of material incentives with respect 
to labor of workers in mass professions has not improved. This 
very troubling circumstance is clearly seen from the answers to 
the question: "How will your wages change if you work 
better and more effectively at your enterprise? (in 
percents of the number of persons polled): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Respondents' replies     |Engineering and technica-|Blue-collar personnel    | 
|                         |l personnel              |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Will increase considerab-|14                       |12                       | 
|ly                       |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Will increase slightly   |19                       |18                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Will remain the same     |47                       |53                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Not sure                 |20                       |17                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


<H5>  Investment Orientation </H5>
  Production decline, the increase in past due arrears among 
enterprises, the instability of the financial market, 
continuously rising interest rates, and inflation all 
contributed to a protracted and steady worsening of the 
investment environment. According to expert opinion polls of 
chairmen of regional banks of the Savings Banks of Russia 
conducted in December 1992 and September 1993, even this bank, 
which possesses considerable financial resources, currently is 
not interested in investing in production. Its efforts are 
concentrated mainly on financing middlemen activities and 
deposits trading. Most respondents indicated that they readily 
issue credits mainly to commercial banks. Only 14 percent of 
chairmen of territorial savings banks indicated that their banks 
capitalize their assets by investing in individual enterprises. 
And even in that, only those who by virtue of their monopoly 
position earn superprofits. 
  The terms of credit and the tax policy, which make 
production 
of goods and services unprofitable, separate the banking and 
production capital. It is very rare even for relatively large 
banks to capitalize their assets through acquisition of 
enterprises' stock. 
  As banks' and enterprises' investment activities decline 
sharply, the population becomes increasingly prominent as an 
investor. This is caused by a number of circumstances. Among 
them are the availability of stocks for sale, a large-scale 
privatization of state property, and a high rate of inflation, 
which compels people to look for ways to protect their income. 
  Despite the fact that the nominal income of the population 
rises more slowly than consumer prices, some people attempt to 
set aside savings as insurance for the future. Given the modest 
degree of consumption on the part of most people, money 
accumulation in the hands of the population is quite 
substantial. According to specialists' expert estimates, the 
volume of cash in the hands of the population as of June 1993 
amounted to 1.037 trillion rubles [R], or 23 percent of the 
total population income. 
  An all-Russia survey conducted in June 1993 showed that a 
relative majority (38 percent) try to buy material things in 
order to salvage devaluing money; 16 percent put money in the 
banks into current and time-deposit accounts; and 9 percent 
acquire securities. Almost one-quarter of all of the population 
show interest in buying stock, especially enterprise directors, 
engineering and technical personnel, and people with 
sufficiently high income. 
  One of the factors shaping the investment orientation of the 
population are privatization vouchers. Numerous sociological 
surveys of Russia's residents provide evidence that most people 
are skeptical with respect to the real value of vouchers. 
  However, in those instances where voucher owners are able to 
exchange them for stock of enterprises where they work, their 
attitude toward the vouchers' buying capacity is quite 
respectful. At the same time, persons who find themselves placed 
in the disadvantageous position of depositors of privatization 
vouchers into investment funds often express negative attitude 
toward them. The proportional share of people in the latter 
category is considerably greater than the share of those who 
have an opportunity to participate in the privatization of their 
enterprises' property with the help of vouchers. 
  This factor represents one of significant reasons why many 
Russians are dissatisfied with the course of privatization. For 
instance, to the question "Are you satisfied with the way 
privatization is being implemented in Russia?" asked in an 
all-Russia survey of the population in November 1993, the 
replies were distributed as follows (in percents of the number 
of persons polled): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yes, satisfied                        |3                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Partly satisfied, partly not          |16                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Not satisfied                         |34                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|I believe that privatization has not  |16                                    | 
|started yet                           |                                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No opinion                            |27                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No answer                             |4                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  Despite massive advertising of investment funds in the mass 
media, so far they have been less than a success, since the 
proportional share of voucher owners who have not decided how to 
use them comprises about half of the adult population. Judging 
by the results of sociological surveys and the official data, by 
the end of 1993 only one-third of voucher holders had exchanged 
privatization vouchers for stocks of investment funds and 
enterprises or sold them for cash. 
  Research conducted at enterprises in Moscow, Stavropol Kray, 
and Nizhniy Novgorod and Tyumen Oblasts in the summer of 1993 
revealed the respondents' intentions as to how they plan to use 
their privatization vouchers. As it turned out, 38 percent of 
the respondents want to exchange them for their enterprises' 
stock; 10 percent, to exchange them for stock of other 
enterprises; 9 percent want to sell them; 8 percent, to exchange 
privatization vouchers for stock of investment funds; and, 
finally, 35 percent have not decided how they are going to use 
the vouchers or simply do not know what to do with them. 
  Thus, first, the bulk of the population remains a passive 
participant of voucher privatization; second, a contradictory 
situation exists: Most people do not wish to exchange vouchers 
for stocks of investment funds, but the rules of the "game" 
imposed on them are such that privatization funds are set up as 
practically the only possible agent available of most of the 
population in order to participate in the voucher-based 
privatization process. Confidence in investment funds and 
vouchers may rise only if these funds show more convincingly 
their connection to profitable enterprises. So far, however, 
this is not sufficiently taken into consideration in advertising 
and practical activities. 
  The sluggish advancement of the voucher-based privatization 
and the fact that most people place little value on 
privatization vouchers and have not decided what to do with them 
most likely will result in a mass surrender of them to the 
nearest investment fund on the eve of the deadline for 
exchanging vouchers for stocks. 
<H5>  Social Change: New Trends </H5>
  The social structure of the population, being a corollary of 
changes in the system of economic relations, nevertheless exerts 
a tremendous influence on the economy, defining to a large 
extent the algorithm of development of political processes and 
spiritual life. Therefore, it is crucially important to 
constantly evaluate transformations in the population's social 
structure, to identify the peculiarities of needs and interests 
of different social groups, clusters, and strata, and to study 
the mechanism of how social processes are interrelated with 
economic, political, and spiritual ones. 
  The difficulty of such analysis is in the absence of 
reliable, commonly accepted criteria and methodologies for 
defining social differentiation. For instance, in evaluating the 
population's standard of living, which is a constant subject of 
analysis by research institutes, state statistical organs, 
parties, and international organizations, no integral indicator 
has been found so far that would allow for the carrying out 
interregional and international comparisons with complete 
confidence. In addition, there exists an acute shortage of 
statistical information on real income and the level of 
consumption within different population groups. Finally, the 
socioeconomic situation in Russian society changes extremely 
rapidly. Many processes related to the social differentiation of 
the population are still at their initial stage. The scale and 
the pace of the rise in unemployment; formation of the 
securities market and groups of major securities holders; the 
development of private entrepreneurship in production rather 
than in the turnover sphere alone--these and other processes 
have not reached the degree of maturity that produces 
stabilization of the population's social structure. 
  It is precisely the instability of Russian society and the 
marginal (transitional) state of a considerable part of the 
population that determine the lack of predictability when it 
comes to expression of their will, the uncertainty of economic 
and political interests. For this reason in particular, 
political parties and movements cannot find a permanent social 
base, become a connecting link between the population and the 
state, acting as a supporting structure of the society's 
political system. 
  Naturally, the redistribution of property between different 
economic systems and subjects of economic relations is far from 
completed. That is why the picture of social stratification is 
so unstable. For instance, according to Goskomstat data, by the 
fall of 1993 more than 300,000 private farms had been set up, 
which, together with some other economic structures, comprised 
the private sector in agriculture. However, many private farms 
go out of business after being in existence for half a year or a 
year. Most of them are low-capacity and are not included in the 
profitable production of goods. People working on them belong to 
the group of individual proprietors more in terms of legal 
definitions than as subjects of economic relations. 
Nevertheless, they comprise a new population category, whose 
interests it is vitally important to take into account in the 
process of democratic transformations. 
  Most proprietors are currently recruited from among economic 
managers, who have considerable advantages with respect to 
participation in the privatization of property as compared to 
other population groups, as well as from among those engaged in 
trade, public catering, and consumer services, and partly from 
those employed in transportation, construction, and in the 
sphere of finances. The explanation for this is that middleman 
activities and trade provide the opportunity quickly to form and 
multiply private capital. 
  Although entrepreneurship on the basis of private property 
is 
developing fast, the proportional share of private enterprise 
owners remains relatively small. It comprises an estimated 5 
percent of the adult population. In industry and agriculture 
their share does not exceed 1-1.5 percent. Currently the 
fastest-growing segment is that of persons who own a certain 
share of property in the form of securities and at the same time 
work for hire. In this case we mean such owners of securities 
producing (or which will produce) sufficiently perceptible 
income. Judging by the data of sociological surveys, the 
proportional share of holders of stocks, bonds, or those who 
have enough untied money at their disposal to purchase such, 
comprises 6-7 percent. 
  The next social group in terms of size is that of 
high-income 
hired labor: persons working at joint, private, and cooperative 
enterprises, banks, insurance companies, and other structures 
which by reason of the economic state of the market are 
currently highly profitable. Their number reaches 12-15 percent 
of those engaged in the national economy. The situation of this 
category of persons is defined by the opportunity they have to 
turn into sufficiently major holders of securities or to start 
their own business. 
  The remaining four-fifths of the adult population work for 
hire at state enterprises and organizations, or are pensioners. 
It is unlikely that in the foreseeable future their social 
status will change for the better. Special attention should be 
paid to the part of the population who have found themselves 
socially dispossessed--several million refugees, forced 
migrants, chronically unemployed persons, and others. As a rule, 
they lose their social roots, become declasse, and have little 
chance of gaining wealth. 
<H5>  Stratification by Income </H5>
  Social stratification of the population defined by property 
relations is correlated--not completely, but to a large 
extent--with the differentiation of Russians by indicators of 
the level of their income and consumption. This is caused by the 
fact that frequently it is not the wage at the main place of 
employment but additional income, including that from owning 
property, that becomes the main factor in separating the 
population by the property attribute. 
  As of July 1993, classification of families by per capita 
income level looked this way (in percents of the number of 
surveyed families): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Rich families                         |1.5                                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Well-to-do families                   |5.5                                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Normal income families                |20                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Low-income families                   |41                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Poor families                         |32                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  (see: "The Standard of Living of the Population of Russia's 
Regions" No. 9, Moscow, 1993, p. 32) 
  A similar picture of differentiation by level of material 
well-being emerges from the results of sociological surveys. For 
instance, to the question "How do you appraise your 
standard of living?" the distribution of answers was as 
follows (in percents of the number of persons polled): 


                       June 1994        April 1993        November 1993 

I have everything I    2                3                 4 
need 

My living is quite     21               27                31 
acceptable 

I live from paycheck   52               41                44 
to paycheck 

I cannot make the      26               24                21 
ends meet, live in 
poverty 

No answer              -                5                 - 


  The following is of interest. Production volume declines; 
availability of goods and services decreases for a majority of 
the population because of shortages and high cost; the standard 
of living is falling steadily; nevertheless, the distribution of 
self-assessment of the level of material well-being is 
practically stable. Apparently, as the standard of living 
declines, people's perception of normal well-being also changes. 
They begin to settle for a minimal level of goods and services. 
For instance, according to data of a survey conducted in June 
1993, most people are unable to buy fruit and have excluded it 
from their nutrition ration. Nevertheless, most respondents 
believe that their standard of living is satisfactory. Almost 
one-half of the respondents note a steady worsening of their 
well-being and do not expect changes for the better in the next 
year or two. But this situation in a way has become the norm in 
their mind, something accustomed to and tolerable. Apparently, 
it is this lower level of expectations that holds the key to the 
fact that the bulk of the population is not inclined to engage 
in manifestations of social protest against a sharp decline of 
material conditions of life. 
  According to the Goskomstat and the Ministry of Labor data, 
approximately three-quarters of Russia's population may be 
regarded as low-income, including the 32 percent of Russians who 
in the middle of 1993 found themselves below the subsistence 
level. At the same time, about 3 million persons comprise the 
stratum of the super-rich. 
  The gap between the high- and low-income categories of 
people 
is steadily increasing. According to the data of budget surveys, 
in June 1993 the average per capita income in the top 10 percent 
income bracket exceeded by a factor of eight the respective 
level among the bottom 10 percent. 
  These are average figures, however. Among a considerable 
group of super-rich, the per capita income exceeds by a factor 
of tens or even hundreds the income of the poor. For instance, 
while on average the number of privately owned passenger cars in 
Russia amounts to 68 per 1,000 of population, among 
entrepreneurs one out of two owns a car. 
  While it is true that people now as a rule reject the old 
views on the state as a guarantor of a minimum package of goods, 
and despite the fact that they are against imposing limitations 
on honestly earned high income, the negative reaction in the 
public opinion to material polarization in the country is 
growing. It often manifests itself as discontent over unfairness 
in income distribution. The unfairness, in the opinion of 70-80 
percent of the respondents, is in that super-income is gained by 
abusing official position (corruption, machinations, and so on), 
swindling, and speculation. 
  Neither should we disregard a number of other negative 
social 
aspects of material stratification of the population. The 
low-income stratum comprises people working in the spheres of 
culture, education, science, and health care, as well as skilled 
specialists at enterprises producing defense items. The low cost 
of their labor is incommensurate with the level of prices for 
goods, services, and foodstuffs. This undermines the 
intellectual potential of the country and its capacity to 
rebuild itself. 
<H5>  Sources of Social Concerns </H5>
  The monitoring of social moods shows that there are many 
problems that cause public concern. The most acute among them 
are the impoverishment of the population, crime, and a number of 
others. This is graphically demonstrated by the distribution of 
the surveyed population's answers to the question: "What 
problems are of most concern to you?" (in percents of the 
number of persons polled): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Source of concern        |April 1992               |April 1993               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Decline in the standard  |47                       |51                       | 
|of living                |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Rising crime             |52                       |51                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Weak state authority     |38                       |42                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Worsening interethnic re-|40                       |39                       | 
|lations                  |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Unemployment             |29                       |35                       | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  This list of problems is continually named by half or more 
of 
the surveyed population in the research conducted over the past 
three years. In addition, at least half of the respondents in a 
number of regions express concern over environmental pollution 
of their habitat by industrial waste. Between one-quarter and 
one-third of respondents in all-Russia surveys are alarmed over 
the loss of social guarantees with respect to health care, 
education, and organization of leisure. Many people in the past 
expressed concern over the negative consequences of the 
disintegration of the USSR; currently the threat of Russia's 
disintegration brings out an acute public reaction. 
  The integral indicator of the level of social concern caused 
by the lack of guarantees in the life of citizens and 
disintegration of the society is the fact that about one-third 
of the surveyed population consider the prospect of a civil war 
and famine in the country quite likely. 
  The constant social tension and uncertainty regarding the 
future makeup create a very unfavorable socio-psychological 
backdrop for labor activities, as well as demographic and other 
processes. The average life expectancy is declining; disease and 
mortality rates are rising; the birth rate is falling; 
interpersonal relations are breaking down; the role of historic 
traditions in forming the social outlook of new generations is 
being lost; the effect of ethical norms in social control and 
self-control of the people has been weakened. 
  Unemployment is becoming an increasingly weighty factor in 
the destabilization of the social situation. Its stress impact 
on Russian society and individual people who have lost their 
jobs so far has not been sufficiently studied. Meanwhile, as 
research conducted in Tomsk Oblast showed, the longer a person 
remains unemployed, the worse is his social well-being. The 
following results of a survey of unemployed persons provides 
convincing proof of this (in percents of the number of persons 
polled in each of the separate groups): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Socio-psychological stre-|Groups of unemployed                               | 
|ss factors               |                                                   | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |Up to three months       |Six to 12 months         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Decline in the standard  |25                       |46                       | 
|of living                |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Loss of professional ski-|14                       |46                       | 
|lls                      |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Feeling that life is mea-|20                       |40                       | 
|ningless                 |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Friends and family treat |17                       |33                       | 
|one like a loser         |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  The survey showed that the bulk of the population still 
count 
on the federal bodies of authority to find a way to prevent mass 
unemployment. In this, in the opinion of most enterprise 
directors and "ordinary" workers, the state's effort should 
concentrate mainly on solving two interconnected tasks: job 
creation and full-time retraining, aimed at utilizing people in 
new areas of production, the service sphere, and entrepreneurial 
activities. This logic, immaculate on the surface, unfortunately 
does not withstand the test of real life. 
  The creation of new jobs requires a considerable capital 
investment. Neither federal nor regional bodies of state 
authority have it at their disposal today. Neither do the 
overwhelming majority of enterprises, because of inflation and 
production decline. 
  The situation with respect to training and retraining of 
discharged labor force is no better. It is not clear what 
professions they should be trained in, given the 
across-the-board shrinkage of jobs. And does it make sense to 
set up a new system of personnel retraining at a time when it is 
impossible to assign graduates of institutions of higher 
learning and other educational institutions to jobs commensurate 
with their education? 
  The belief that the state will take care of the matter of 
providing jobs is fed by hopes that a structural restructuring 
of the national economy, and contraction of production in mining 
and other base sectors of production, as well as in the defense 
sector, will open greater opportunities for the development of 
the service sphere, which will absorb a considerable part of the 
released labor force. But the economic crisis has hurt first and 
foremost the social sphere. With all the "thirst" for various 
services, their physical volume in 1992 shrunk to 59 percent of 
their 1991 volume. 
  Enterprises have lost their former ability to finance their 
social infrastructure. The state also is withdrawing from the 
sphere of meeting the social needs of the population and is 
shifting it to a commercial basis. The level of its expenditures 
from the centralized budget on education, culture, art, and 
science is continually declining as compared to the pre-crisis 
period. Finally, privatization of trade, public catering, and 
consumer services enterprises, and commercialization of health 
care, culture, and education in the environment of a sharp 
decline of the population's ability to pay result in a 
considerable decline instead of increase in the demand for labor 
in the social sphere. According to survey data, it is precisely 
former workers in the sphere of service, health care, education, 
science, and culture who comprise the most numerous group of the 
unemployed in Tomsk Oblast. 
  Conventional wisdom holds that unemployment has provided a 
certain push toward the formation of the labor market, whose 
inalienable attribute is competition. Analysis shows, however, 
that, first, the shrinking of the labor force is not at all the 
result of the action of market mechanisms, and second, certain 
flashes of competition for jobs in essence differ little from 
queues for goods and foodstuffs, or waiting lists for housing in 
the environment of all-out shortages and producers monopoly. 
  For instance, 59 percent of workers in mass professions and 
28 percent of economic managers surveyed in Tomsk Oblast regard 
a shortened work week one of the most acceptable methods of 
minimizing production costs. One out of three workers and office 
workers expressed a willingness to take an unpaid leave to avoid 
being laid off. Also very widespread is the trend toward wage 
containment as a means of preserving jobs. 
  Increasing social stress is exacerbated by a forced mass 
migration of the Russian-speaking population from the former 
USSR republics and zones of interethnic conflicts in Russia. A 
hostile attitude of the local population to migrants will be 
increasing as the resources to meet the basic needs of the 
people--in food, housing, and other things--become increasingly 
scarce. This is already manifesting itself now. A factor worth 
noting is that a rather high percentage of respondents express a 
negative attitude on the issue of humanitarian aid to refugees. 
  An indicator of a conflict situation in the relationship 
between the local population and migrants rises sharply when the 
ethnic composition of migrants does not coincide with the title 
ethos in the places of their new settlement, since it is 
exacerbated by ethnic and language differences. In other words, 
mass migration is fraught with a "chain reaction" of interethnic 
conflicts. 
<H5>  Attitude to Social Guarantees </H5>
  Russia's painful transition from one type of socioeconomic 
and political system to a different one is predicated among 
other things on the problem of radical change in mentality, the 
difficulties of developing a new mechanism of interrelation 
between the economic and social spheres of the society, in 
particular, optimization of the criteria of effectiveness of 
economic and social development of the society. 
  It is this latter aspect of reforming the society that 
constitutes a cornerstone in the arguments of leading 
economists, politicians, parties, and movements regarding the 
programs, concrete scenarios, and the pace of market 
transformations, and the social costs, for instance, that the 
implementation of a monetarist economic policy will require. 
This aspect is brought to the forefront at the macrolevel in 
deciding on the issue of conversion of defense production and 
implementation of a structural reform in general, in solving the 
problem of cutting the state budget deficit, in working out the 
concept of social protection of the population, and so on. This 
aspect is no less topical at the microlevel, when the fate of a 
labor collective has to be decided during privatization of 
enterprises, in deciding on the fate of an unprofitable 
enterprise, and so on. 
  The disagreement in the approach to these problems between 
the executive branch and the disbanded soviets of people's 
deputies, between the Government of the Russian Federation and 
large socio-professional groups--miners, workers in the sphere 
of education and science, and so on, frequently result in 
intense conflicts, including mass strikes. 
  Of great importance in this connection is the study of the 
population's attitude to social guarantees, especially those 
among them that affect satisfaction of basic needs--housing, 
health care, child care, work, and a number of other. 
  In connection with the above, let us look at the results of 
two representative all-Russia population surveys conducted by a 
comparable methodology in December 1992 and April 1993. To the 
question "What is and what is not acceptable for you in 
the life of the new Russia?" the distribution of answers 
was as follows (in percents of the number of persons polled): 


               Acceptable          Unacceptable          Undecided 

               1992      1993      1992       1993       1992     1993 

Private        63        55        20         23         17       22 
enterprise 

Freedom of     48        36        36         45         16       19 
trade 

Development    22        15        57         63         21       22 
of 
commercial 
foundations 
in education 
and health 
care 

Change from    57        49        14         17         29       34 
a one-party 
to a 
multi-party 
system 

Rejection of   42        29        26         35         12       36 
socialism 


  Numerous control measurements of social attitudes carried 
out 
in regional surveys (in Tyumen and Tomsk Oblasts, Stavropol 
Kray, and others) showed the same picture as registered in the 
table above. The bulk of the Russian population support the 
development of economic and political freedoms. However (and 
this is quite natural) up to a point beyond which radical 
economic and political changes may jeopardize the people's 
existence. People see that for them freedom to trade turns into 
price hikes and the loss of public control over the quality of 
goods. 
  That the public opinion is right is confirmed by the results 
of an expert opinion poll of 58 heads of territorial 
administrations of consumer rights protection of the State 
Antitrust Policy Committee. For instance, most of them believe 
that the Russian Federation president's edict on the freedom of 
trade deprives them of the ability to control the quality of 
consumer goods and foodstuffs. To the question "To what extent 
is the law `On Consumer Rights Protection' complied with by 
sellers?" 55 percent of the experts responded that the law is 
complied with only in part, and 45 percent said it is not 
complied with at all. 
  Similarly unacceptable for the majority of the population is 
commercialization of health care and education. Unfortunately, 
this was not taken into account in drafting the new Constitution 
of the Russian Federation. 
  Decreasing budget appropriations for social needs are made 
up 
for to a certain extent by enterprises. This is seen graphically 
from the results of a survey of the population employed at 
enterprises in Moscow, Stavropol Kray, and Tyumen and Tomsk 
Oblasts. More than half of the respondents appraised as quite 
satisfactory the extent to which enterprises where they work 
provide them with public catering, arrange that foodstuffs and 
consumer goods are available for sale; 72 percent believe that 
enterprises do a lot with respect to providing them with medical 
services. More than two-thirds of the respondents said that 
enterprises should continue in the future their efforts in 
providing social services for their employees. At the same time, 
75 percent of the respondents do not relieve the government of 
the responsibility to provide social protection. 
<H5>  Going Back to the May Survey </H5>
  Below are the results of an all-Russia sociological survey 
conducted on 25-30 May 1993 
  The sample consisted of 1,500 persons representing 
proportionally the main socio-demographic and socio-professional 
groups of the population of 12 regions in the Russian Federation. 
  The respondents' replies are shown below in percents of the 
number of persons polled. 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|How much of your (your family) income is spent on food?                      | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|About 100%                            |26                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|About 75%                             |40                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|About 50%                             |24                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|About 25%                             |5                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Less than 25%                         |1                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Not sure                              |4                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|If you have to economize, at the expense of what?                            | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Nutrition                             |17                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Leisure, entertainment                |31                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Clothes                               |14                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Practically everything                |55                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Do you have to do without something in order to make a planned purchase?     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Yes                                   |84                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No                                    |12                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|No answer                             |4                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 




                    Respondent groups by age (years) 

                    up to 29   30-39        40-49        50 


How would you describe your standard of living? 

I have everything   9          6            6            3 
I need 

Satisfactory        71         66           63           64 

Cannot make ends    20         28           31           32 
meet 

How has your material situation changed over the past year? 

Improved            26         18           16           8 

Has not changed     43         41           27           31 

Became worse        31         41           57           61 

In your opinion, will your material situation improve or get 
worse over the next year or two? 

Will improve        25         16           13           6 

Will remain the     17         17           21           19 
same 

Will get worse      14         26           29           43 

No opinion          38         41           36           32 

No answer           6          0            1            0 




                   Respondent groups by family status 

                   Single       Full family    Full family    Pensioner 
                                without        with two or    family 
                                children       more 
                                               children 

How would you describe your standard of living? 

I have             8            4              7              5 
everything I 
need 

Satisfactory       70           72             64             51 

Cannot make ends   21           23             29             44 
meet 

How has your material situation changed over the past year? 

Improved           22           13             20             5 

Has not changed    41           41             32             25 

Became worse       36           45             48             70 

In your opinion, will your material situation improve or get worse over the 
next year or two? 

Will improve       25           16             12             3 

Will remain the    15           17             20             14 
same 

Will get worse     19           27             29             42 

No opinion         41           40             39             41 




How important are the following factors in causing a conflict at your 
enterprise? 

                    Not at all      Somewhat        Very            Do not 
                    important       important       important       know 

Low wages           4               16              74              6 

Layoff or a         5               27              51              17 
threat of it 

Disagreement with   18              29              19              35 
the form of 
privatization 

Cutbacks in         9               39              30              22 
social services 




------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Has the number of conflicts at your enterprise increased or diminished over  | 
|the past year?                                                               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Increased perceptibly                 |9                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Increased somewhat                    |11                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Remained the same                     |19                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Diminished somewhat                   |6                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Diminished perceptibly                |3                                     | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|There have been no conflicts          |10                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Not sure                              |45                                    | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


<H5>  The "Top" and the "Bottom" </H5>
<H5>  Political moods </H5>
  As a result of a breakdown of old social relations and 
debunking the ideology of socialism as a one-dimensional 
political and socioeconomic societal system, the mass 
consciousness of the Russians has become more open, perceptive 
to ideas of religious, ideological, political, and economic 
pluralism. However, the dying system of sociopolitical values 
and moral reference points has not been replaced and could not 
be fully replaced within such a short historic period by new, 
socially attractive and socially integrating ideas. A political 
and ethical vacuum has formed in the public consciousness. It is 
exacerbated by the information vacuum, since the periodical 
press has become unaffordable for many because of high cost and 
because public trust in mass media information is declining. 
  Many people have currently lost their reference points of 
political development of the society; their consciousness is 
being filled with pessimism, mysticism, expectations of social 
catastrophe, or, on the contrary, social miracle. An erosion of 
the people's moral qualities is taking place; social ties and 
immunity against ochlocracy are disintegrating. 
  At the same time, the tides of political struggle, clashes 
between the executive branch and the soviets of people's 
deputies, and two referendums that took place in 1993 force 
people to face the necessity of a political choice. At the same 
time, most people are inclined to base their political 
preferences not on specific political figures and their 
programs, which as a rule are little known. Most often the 
subject of political choice is the general direction of the 
country's socioeconomic development. 
  One can reconstruct on the basis of research materials the 
sociopolitical orientation of the population stemming from the 
answers to the question: "Which movements' ideas are 
closest to yours?" (in percents of the number of persons 
polled): 


------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|                         |December 1992            |April 1993               | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Movements oriented towar-|20                       |21                       | 
|d the socialist road of  |                         |                         | 
|development              |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Movements of capitalist  |10                       |14                       | 
|orientation              |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Believers movements (Chr-|5                        |6                        | 
|istians, Muslims, etc.)  |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Movements of national-pa-|7                        |8                        | 
|triotic orientation      |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 
|Do not like any of the m-|55                       |52                       | 
|ovements                 |                         |                         | 
------------------------------------------------------------------------------- 


  As we can see, half of the population in answering this 
question showed political inertia. The attitude of others may be 
considered only as a potential base for movements of various 
orientations, but not as an electoral base of existing parties 
and their leaders. 
  Russians' political moods were "boosted" over two years by a 
struggle between the president's supporters and the disbanded 
deputy corps. Judging by materials of all-Russia population 
surveys, an advent of a "strong-hand" authority would rather 
please most citizens instead of causing concerns among them. 
While in April 1992, 38 percent of surveyed Russians expressed 
concern regarding the lack of authority in the country, seven 
months later, in December of the same year, it was 42 percent, 
and in April 1993--48 percent. People understand that as long as 
authority is impotent, it is hardly possible to count on 
stabilization of production, strengthening of law and order, and 
resolution of other problems. 
  In this situation the idea of strengthening the state 
authority through establishment of a presidential form of rule 
by constitutional methods always had a real chance for 
all-popular support. Using force as a method of resolving the 
problem of redistribution of powers between the executive and 
representative branches, on the other hand, never has been 
attractive to most people. It is not accidental that a survey of 
the Russian populace conducted in November showed that 58 
percent of the respondents saw the storming of the White House 
as a "national shame, in which both branches are at fault." 
<H5>  It Is Not Our Power </H5>
  The population's confidence in the renewed authority in 
Russia, which had emerged on the basis of democratization of the 
society, got lost as time went by. This has been caused both by 
exacerbation of the general crisis in the country and by 
miscalculations of state bodies and the policy they conducted. 
  For instance, one of the commonly accepted indicators of 
political alienation is how people see the extent of correlation 
between the decisions taken by the bodies of state 
administration and interests of the people. As numerous 
sociological surveys showed, more than 80 percent of the 
population do not have a clear idea of the substance of the 
policy conducted by the state and are convinced that the state 
does not care in any way about ordinary people and catering to 
their interests. 
  No less serious evidence of deepening political alienation 
is 
the increasing political apathy of the population, the loss of 
interest in political actions of all-national significance. As 
is known, 35.5 percent of Russian citizens refused to 
participate in the referendum on 25 April 1993. A survey 
conducted after the referendum showed that the subsequent sharp 
confrontation between federal bodies of executive and 
representative authority caused a negative reaction among the 
populace. Most people were disappointed that the bodies of 
authority used the results of the referendum to settle the score 
among themselves. 
  Sociological surveys show that, in the opinion of Russian 
citizens, the damage to the prestige of authority was inflicted 
by the following factors: 
  --the gap between promises and actual deeds, especially the 
fact that the promise to implement a radical economic reform 
without a catastrophic decline in the standard of living has not 
been kept; 
  --chaos in lawmaking, as a result of which the overwhelming 
majority of people are not aware of legal reference points; 
legal nihilism on the part of the population is increasing; 
  --a confrontation between the representative and executive, 
federal and local institutions of authority; 
  --bureaucratization of the apparatus of the bodies of state 
power and constant reshaping of power structures; 
  --corruption among state functionaries. 
  Of special interest is the population's attitude toward the 
Government of Russia. As had been the case with the government 
of the former USSR, it traditionally remained outside the field 
of attention of public opinion. For instance, only 10-15 percent 
of survey respondents expressed positive and 15-20 
percent--negative opinions of the work of governments headed by 
Ryzhkov, Pavlov, or Gaydar. Most Russian (between 40 and 60 
percent) did not have any firm opinion of this institution of 
state power at all. Similarly, most experts polled pointed out 
the vagueness of the government's actions, its tendency to cater 
to political trends. A serious argument indicating deficiency on 
the part of the government, from the standpoint of public 
opinion, also is that the population surveyed increasingly often 
expressed concern over the lack of authority in the country, 
explaining it not so much by political struggle as by atrophy of 
the system of state administration. 
  Despite a more proactive position of the government headed 
by 
V. Chernomyrdin, it also remained until lately on the periphery 
of public opinion. For instance, according to the data of an 
all-Russia opinion poll conducted in April 1993, 41 percent of 
respondents could not define their attitude to this government, 
its ability to deal with socioeconomic problems of the country. 
  Among the reasons that many people are ambiguous in their 
attitude toward the government is that within the system of 
power relations it traditionally appears as a conduit of state 
policy rather than its active principal. The principals in 
politics and the "masters" of the government had been the 
Politburo of the CPSU Central Committee, the presidents, the 
Supreme Soviets. 
  The disbandment of the Congress of People's Deputies and the 
Russian Federation Supreme Soviet dramatically changed the 
configuration of power relations at the federal level. There is 
currently an opportunity for the Government of Russia to move to 
the forefront of development and implementation of domestic and 
foreign policy in their organic unity. 
  One of the factors of alienation of power is the absence of 
a 
system of parties, which in industrially developed countries is 
the bulwark of the political system. Expert evaluations and the 
data of public opinion polls show that the stage of a rapid 
proliferation of political parties and movements in the country 
has been replaced by the phase of their crisis. This complicated 
considerably the creation of a civil society, the development of 
new statehood structures, stabilization of power, and general 
political situation. 
  Parties and political movements practically have not 
acquired 
the functions of ensuring the connection between citizens and 
the state and bringing them into active participation in 
political life. According to results of sociological surveys, 
about 60 percent of the adult population do not trust any 
parties. Only 4-5 percent of the respondents see them as 
institutions protecting the interests of the people. Only 2-3 
percent of the respondents believe that they need to participate 
in the activities of some or other party. The process of 
political demarcation in parties and movements is under way; 
they split into wings and factions. 
  This keeps them from developing into a political foundation 
of authority and leads to unpredictability of state 
administration, to constant reshuffling of power structures and 
cadres. Most respondents do not know in whose hands the 
authority is and note confusion in its actions. In reality, 
however, the powers of authority most often are appropriated by 
lobby groups. 
<H5>  The Connection Between Politics and the Economy </H5>
  Radical changes in a political system are impossible without 
a synchronous development and a close coordination of economic 
and political spheres. However, the loss of equilibrium between 
them, which began with the destruction of the 
directive-administrative system of public administration, is 
becoming increasingly pronounced. This begets a vicious circle, 
where the economy and the political-legal superstructure act as 
a brake on each other, which in turns bring about an escalation 
of social tension. Among miscalculations that have brought about 
this situation, the following deserve special attention. 
  The dismantling of the authoritarian-bureaucratic model 
of administration and noneconomic coercion once again is being 
carried out by the bureaucracy itself. 
  In the process, the bureaucracy itself is expanding sharply. 
It is merging increasingly actively with the shadow economy 
dealers. Sociological surveys show that arbitrariness of local 
bureaucracy is one of the main brakes of the people's 
entrepreneurial initiative. Up to 30 percent of population 
surveyed indicate this factor; most economic managers also 
complain about incompetent interference of authorities in 
economic activities. 
  Attempts to build a market economy are blocked by 
political decisions that splinter the economic space into 
fiefdoms or local organs of administration and break economic 
ties, as well as the weakness of the legal base for the 
functioning of the economy. 
  Legal regulation of the national economy on the basis of 
numerous administrative acts is virtually no different from the 
fallacious method of managing it by decisions of the politburo 
of the CPSU Central Committee and the USSR Council of Ministers. 
This practice only creates fertile soil for furthering corporate 
and departmental interests and leads to a legal chaos. 
  The overwhelming majority of the population surveyed are not 
aware of the normative acts that are being adopted. More than 50 
percent of specialist cadres note great difficulties stemming 
from legislative confusion. 
  The measures aimed at overcoming the paralysis of power 
do not produce any visible success, because they are aimed not 
so much at establishing a solid echelon of support in the form 
of parties, social movements, and interested population strata 
as they are at forming new authoritarian structures. 
  Democratic movements increasingly often distance themselves 
from authority. Former CPSU members, who, because of historic 
circumstances, represent the best-trained part of the population 
(skilled workers, the technical, scientific, and artistic 
intelligentsia, and others) are placed in the position of 
opposition to the policy of transformation. Contrary to 
objective need for civic consolidation, members of the ruling 
authority often provoke political, social, and economic 
squabbles, which choke the reforms. 
  The authoritativeness, and therefore the ability to 
act, of authority are being undermined by farfetched promises to 
stabilize the economy within the next few months. 
  People's social experience tells them that this kind of 
populism is either the result of impatient self-assurance of the 
administrators or, which is worse, a deception. Despite all 
reassurances, there is growing anxiety and mass discontent over 
the protracted turmoil and unfulfilled expectations of change 
for the better: Ninety percent of the population surveyed do not 
believe that life will improve within the next year or two. 
  For the sake of minimizing the losses in the process of 
state 
administration, the following are of considerable importance: 
  --creation of more effective "feedback" that will allow the 
bodies of authority to receive timely information on the extent 
of the social well-being of the population, on developing 
conflict situations, on the effectiveness of social 
administration, and others; 
  --changing the structures of executive authority in order to 
overcome parallelism in their work and reducing 
bureaucratization (currently, for instance, quite a few 
difficulties arise in the interaction between the president's 
representatives in the regions and oblast and kray 
administrations, in the interaction between the president's 
administration and the government, and so on); 
  --clarifying the powers and the spheres of influence of the 
leadership and members of the government, whose actions and 
political maneuvers may be on a collision course with the 
priorities of the government program of leading the country out 
of the crisis. Especially unpleasant consequences are brought 
about by attempts of the government's structural units to 
provide a sort of "targeted" support to enterprises and 
individual sectors of the economy (and the people working 
there), substituting these measures for activities aimed at 
creating a common free-market economic space, the same for all 
producers. The practice of granting economic preferences, credit 
on favorable terms, and such only exacerbates monopolism, 
fosters corruption, and feeds subjectivism in state 
administration. 


</TEXT>

</DOC>
